* 

t 



t>& 






s 



% 



\ 






/ 






Father MALEBRANCHE 

H I S 



TREATISE 



Concerning the 

SEARCH after TRUTH. 

The Whole WORK Complete. 

To which is Added 

The AUTHORS TREATISE 

OF 

Nature and Grace: 

BEING 

A Confequence of the PRINCIPLES contained in 

the S EARCK 

Together with / 

His Answer to the Animadversions upon the Firft Volume: 
His Defence againft the Accusations of Monfieur De la Ville, &>c. 

Relating to the fame Subject. 

All Translated by T. TAYLOR, M. A. 

Late of Magdalen College in X F R D. 
The SECOND EDITION, Corre&ed with great ExaSinefs. 



With the ADDITION, of 

A Short Difcourfe upon LIGHT and COLOURS, 

By the fame A U T H O R. 

Communicated in Manufcrtyt to a Perfon of Quality in E NG LA N D; 
And never before Printed in any Language. 



LONDON, 

Printed by W. Bowyer, for Thomas Benhet at the Half-Moon, and T. Leigh and I 
W. Midwinter at the Kofe and Crown, in St. Paul's Church-yard. 1700. 



\-> 



J \ohm SiXt'Y 



.-'/I 77//V71- . ^l / cTl/ 



THE 



P R E F A C 




i -. ■ ■ .- - - 

TH E Mind of Man is, as it were, by its Nature fituated between its Creator and Corpo- 
. real Creatures -, nothing, according to * St. Aujiin, being above it but GO D, nor be- ^nihW eft 
neath it but Body. But as the great Elevation it obtains above all Material Beings, is potentiu's 
no hindrance to its uniting with them, and even to its Depending, after a fort, upon a ilIa creatit- 
Piece of Matter -, fo, notwithftanding the infinite diftance between the Sovereign Being and the ra, . qu *j. • 
"Humane Mind, the latter is immediately and moft intimately united with the former. This laft ^r'rado- 1 " 
Union exalts the Mind above all things 5 'tis this which gives it Life and Light, and all its Hap- nalis, nihil 
pinefs : And of this Union it is St. Aujiin fpeaks in very many Places of his Works, as of that ef * fubIi -. 
which is moft Natural and Effential to it : On the contrary, the Union it has with the Body ex- mi - u ri s: 9 U]C " 
tremely debafes it, and is at this Day the Principal Caufe of all its Errburs and its Miferies. $am 3H* 



tor eft. fr. 23; in Joan. ' Quod rational! .anima melius eft, omnibus confcentientibus, Ceus eft. Aug. 



I do not wonder that the vulgar part of Men, or that the Heathen Philofophers mould only 
confider in the Soul its Relation and Union with the Body, without acknowledging any Union 
or Relation that it has toGOD: But I admire that the Chrifiian Philofophers, who- ought to pre- 
fer the Spirit of GO D to the Mind of Man, Mofes to Ariftotle, St. Aujiin to any wretched 
Commentatour upon an Heathen Philofopher,ihould regard theSoul rather as the form of the Bo- 
dy, than as made in and for the t Image of GOD; that is, according to St. Aujiin, for Truth • f Ad i> 
to which alone She is immediately united. : Tis true, the Soul is united to the Body, and is fa mimuii- 
naturally the Form of it •, but 'tis likewife true, that fhe is united to GO D in a much ftri£tef tudinem . . 
and more effential manner. The Relation fhe has to her Body might have not been i But her fafo^nr 
Relation to GOD is fo effential, that 'tis impoflible to conceive GOD fliould create a Spirit fed fola ' 

Without it. ' fubftantia 

t - ■ rationalis : 

quare omnia per ipfam, fed ad ipfam non, nifi anima rationalis. Itaque fubftantia rationalis & per ipfam fafta eft, & ad ipfam : non 
eft er im ulla narura tnrerpnfiiM ■ r ih. Tmp- t Je Ce*. *J ijtt. Reftiffime dicitur faftus ad Imaginem OC Similitudinem Dei, non eium alker 
incommutabilem veritatem poffetrmehteconfpicefe. Ve ver. ReJ. 

It is evident that GOD can have no other End of acting than Himfelf; that He cannot create 
Spirits but to know and love Him ; that he can neither give them any Knowledge, nor imprels 
upon them any Love, but what is for, and tends to Himfelf ; but He might have refus'd to unite 
to Bodies thofe Spirits which He has united. Therefore the Relation of our Minds to G D is 
Natural, Neceffary,- and abfolutely Indifpenfible : But their Relation to our Bodies, though AV 
rural, is not of abfolute Neceflity, nor of indifpenfible Obligation. 

This is not a proper place to alledge all the Authorities and Arguments which might induce 
us to believe, That it's more, effential to the Mind to be united toOOD than to a Body. That 
would carry us out too far. Toexpofe this Truth in its juftLight,it would be neceffary to overthrow 
the principal Foundations of Pagan Philofophy -, to explain the Corruptions of Sin-, to encounter 
what is falfly named Experience-, and to argue againft the Prejudices and Delufions of the Sen- 
fes. So that to give the common fort of Men a perfeft Knowledge of it, is not fo eafie a Task 
as may be undertaken in a Preface. 

However, 'tis not difficult to make it out to Attentive Perfons, and fuch as are skill'd in True 
Philofophy : For they need only be put in Mind, That fince the Will of GOD Regulates the Na- 
ture of all things, it is more congenial to the Nature of the Soul to be united to GOD by the 
Knowledge of Truth, and by the Love of Good, than to be united to the Body ; fince 'tis certain, 
as is abovefaid, that GOD created Spirits more for the Knowledge and Love of Him than for 
the Informing Bodies. This Argument is inftantly able to ftartle Minds any whit enlightned, to 
render them attentive, and afterwards to convince them. But 'tis morally impofnble for Minds 
irmners'd in Flefh and Blood, whofe Knowledge goes no farther than their Senfes, to be ever 
convinc'd with fuch kind of Reafonings. No Proofs will ferve thele People, but fuch as may be 
zxzv.felt and handled, fince every thing feems Chimerical, that makes not fome ImpreiTion on their 
Senfes, " . 

a The 



the PREFACE, 

Mens quod The Firft Man's Sin has fo weakned the Union of our Mind with G D, that none but thofe 
non fennc, w hoie Hegrt j s pur iff d, and Mind enlightned, can perceive it: For 'tis an imaginary Union in 
pur'iffima & e * r Opinions, who blindly follow the Judgments of the Scnfes and Motions of the PuJJbns. 
&beaafluna eft, nulli cohirec, nifi ipfi vericati, qua: fimilitudo & imago patris, & fapientia diritur. Augujl. lib. imp. de Gen. ad Hit. 

On the contrary, it has fo ftrengthned the Soul's. Union with the Body, as to make us think 
thefe two parts of our felves but one fingle Subftance ; or rather, has fo enflav'd us to cur Senies 
and Paffions, as to perfuade us our Body is the Principal of the Two Parts whereof we are com- 
posed. 

If we confider the different Occupations of Men, we (hall have all the Reafon in the World to 
believe they have this fo mean and grofs a Notion of themfelves. For whereas they all love Fe- 
licity ',. and the Perfection of their Being ; and are conftantly labouring to grow happier, or more 
perreeF 5 could it be fuppos'd they fet not a greater value on the Body, and the Goods of it, than 
on the Mind, and the Goods of that, when we find them almoft always employ'd' about things 
relatingjtQ.the/0/mr, and feldom or never thinking on thofe that are abfolutely neceffary to the 
perfecTion of the latter ? 

The greateft part of Mankind lay themfelves out with fo much Induftry and Pains, merely for 
the Support of a wretched Life, and to leave their Children fome neceffary Suftenance for the 
Prefervation of their Bodies. 

Such as by their good fortune, or Chance of Birth, are freed from that Neceffity, do no bet- 
ter manifeft by their Bufinefs-and Employments, that they look upon the SWas the Nobler pan 
of their Being : Hunting, Dancing, Gaming, Feafting, are their ordinary Occupations. Their 
Soul, grown the ; Slave of their Body, efteems and cherifhes all thefe Divertifements, though 
wholly unworthy of Her. But becaufe their Body is related to all things fenfible, the Soul is not 
only the Slave of their Body, but through in means, and for its fake, of all things fenfible like- 
wife : For 'tis by the. Body that they are united to their Relations, their Friends, their City, 
their Office, and all fenfible Goods ; the Prefervation of which feems as neceffary and valuable as 
that of their own Being. Thus the Care of their Fortunes, and the Dejire of increaling them 
their Paffion for Glory and Grandeur, bufies and imploys them infinitely more than the Perfe&ion 
of their Soul. 

Even Men of Teaming, and Dealers in Wit, fpend more than one half of their Life in Anion's 
purely Animal, or fuch" as give us Reafon to think their Health, their Eftates, and Reputations 
are of dearer Concern than the Perfection of their Minds. 

They iludy more to acquire a Chimerical Grandeur in the Imagination of others, than to give 
their Mind greater Force and Comprehenfion. They make a kind of Wardrobe of their Brain 
wherein they huddle, without Order or Tiflinttion, whatever bears a certain Character of Learn* 
ing j I mean, whatever can appear but Pare and Extraordinary, and provoke others to admire 
them. Their Ambition lies in refembling thofe Cabinets fill'd with Relicks and Curiofties, which 
. have nothing truly Rich or Valuable, but derive their Worth from Fancy, Pajfion, 01 Chance • and 
they rarely labour to make their Mind accurate, and to regulate the Motions -of their Heart. 

Non ex- Yet it mould not be thought from hence, dial Men ajjc intiiely l & noru,re that they liave Z Sou! 
jgua homi- an( j t h at t hj s their South the Principal part of their Being. They have too been again and again 
fed rotius*' convine'd, both by Reafon and Experience, that 'tis no fo confiderable an Advantage to live in ?Re. 
humani putation, Affluence, and Health, the fpace of a few Years • and in general, that all Corporeal 
univerfira- Goods, all that are poffeis'd by Means, and for the fake of the Body, ate Imaginary and Corrup- 
ts fijbftan- t iti e Goods. They know 'tis better to be fufi than Rich, to be Reafonable than Teamed ■ to 
Mr 6 ^ ave a Livel y and Tenetramg Mind, than to have a Brisk and Mtve Body. Thefe are Truths 
Hexm'-j. indelibly imprinted on the Mind, and infallibly difcover'd whenever Men pleafe to attend to them. 
Homer, for Inftance, who extols his Hero for his Swiftnefs, might have perceiv'd, if he would 
that 'twas an Elogy fitter for a Race-Horfe, or a Greyhound. Alexander, fo celebrated in Hiftory 
for his ll/ujirious Robberies, heard fometimes from his moft Retired Reafon the fame Reproaches 
as Villains and Thieves, in fpightof the confus'd Noife of a furrounding Crowd of Flatterers. 
And Ctefar, when he pafs'd the Rubicon, could not help manifefting how thefe inward Tafhes ter- 
rified him, when at. latt he. had refolv'd xofacrifice the Liberty of his Country to his Ambition. 
•} tlbiq-, t The Soul however united very ftricfly to the Body, is nevertheleis united to G D -, and at 
veritasprs- that very time of her receiving by her Body the lively and confus'd Senfations her Paffions infpire 
f idcson ™' into her, (lie receives from the Eternal Truth, prefiding over her Underftanding, the Knowledge 
kntibus te" °f ^ er ^ ut y an(i ^ rre g lilarities ' When her treacherous Body deceives her, GOD undeceives 
fimulque ' her. When it indulges, He wounds her. When it gives her Incenfe and Applaufes, He ftrikes 
refpondes her inward with fmarting Remorfes, and condemns her by the Manifestation of a more Pure 
omnibus . dn< \ Holy Law than that of the Flefh, which me has obey'd. 

ctism di- 

verfa confulentibus. Liquide tu refpondes, fed. non liquide omnes audiunc. Omnes unde volunt confulunt, fed non femper quod 

volunt audiunt. Conf. S. Aug. lib. 10. cap. 26. , 

*v.p/mt. * Alexander needed not that the Scythians fhould have come to teach him his Duty in a ftrange 

Curt. hb.7. Language : He knew from Him who teaches the Scythians, and the moft Barbarous Nations^ the 
c.(,". 3. In- u " _ ' 

ta in domiciliq cogiytionis, ncc Hebraa, necGrsca, nee Lntina, nee Eaibara vcriME, fine oris & Jjngus organis, fire ftrepitu fylla- 
b.trum. Coufijf, £'. Aug, All. c. 3. 

Rules 



The F K E F A C £. 

Rules of Juftice which he ought to follow. The Light of Truth, which enlightens the World 
tnlightned him alfo 3 and the Voice of Nature, which fpeaks neither in Greek nor Scythian nor 
Barbarian Diafcfy fpoke to him, as to the reft of the World, in a moft clear and moft intelligi- 
ble Language. In vain did the Scythians upbraid him with his Condutt ; their Words (truck no 
deeper than his Ears : And GOD not fpeaking home to his Hearty or rather, G OD fpeaking to his 
Heart, whilft he heard only the -Scythians, who but provok'd hisPaflions, and fo led him out of 
irfifWf, he heard not the yoke of Truth, though loud as Thunder, nor faw its Lighf, though it 
ier-c'd him through and through. 

'Tis true, our Union with GOD dimmijhes and weakens proportionably, as our other with 
i.ings ihiRbte Jlrengthens and increafes •, but 'tis impoflible the former Union mould beabfolutely 
toll without the deftruclicn of our Being : For however thofe who are immersed in Vice, and 
drenclfd in Pleafures, are infenfible to Truth, they are notwithftanding united to it, * It *videtur 
level deferts them, 'tis they thatdefert it : Its Light mines in Darknefs, but does not always quafi ijpfc 
ifpell it ; as the Light of the Sun furrounds the Blind, and thofe that wink, though it enlisht- a ceoccide - 
<:ns neither. b ■ rkcum.tu 

ab iplo cc- 
ddas. Aug. in ?[al.2$. Nam etiam fol ifte & videncis faciem illuftrat & cseci ; ambobus fol praefens eft, fed przfente fole unus abfens 
.ft. Sic & Sapientia Dei Dominus J. C. ubique pravfens eft, quia ubique eft Veritas, ubique fapientia. Aug. in pan. Trail. 35. 

The cafe is the fame with the Union of our Mind with the Body. That Union decreafes as 
fall as the other we have with God increafes •, but it is never quite dilTolv'd, but by our Death : w bat I 
jjor though we were as enlightned, and as difingag'd from all things fenfible, as the Apoftles them- h 3 e 'Jf y - °> 
felves, yet Adam's Fall would neceflitate us to a Dependence on the Body 4 and we mould feel / f / Je JS 
a Law of our Fleili conftantly oppoiing and warring againft the Law of our Mind. with god, 

and with 
the Body, ought to be underftood according to our ordinary way of Conception : For indeed our Mind can be immediately united to GOD only ; 
that is, cm truly depend on none but GOD. And if it be united to, or depend oh the Body, 'tis becaufe the Will of GOD makes that 
Vnion or Dependence efficacious. Which will eafily be conceiv'd in the Sequel of this Wor\. 

Proportionably as the Mind increafes its Union with GOD, it grows purer, and more lumi- 
nous, ftronger, and more capacious ; fince 'tis from this Union it derives all its Perfection. On 
the other fide, it becomes corrupt, blind, weak, and contracted, by the fame degrees, as its Uni- , Quis e- 
on with its Body corroborates and increafes •, becaufe this is the Source of all its Imperfection. 5 1 ? 1 f b< F. e 
Thus a Man, v^ho judges of all things by his Senfes*, who on all accounts purfues the Motions of en^onex- 
his Paffions ; who has no other than Sen/ible Perceptions, and loves only blattering Gratifications, perms eft, 
3 in the moft wretched State of Mind imaginable -, as being infinitely remote from Truth and tanto fe a- 
from his Good. But when a Man judges of things but by the pure Ideas of the Mind, carefully ^jj^jfe" 
avoids the confus'd Noife of the Creatures, and retiring into himfelf, hears his SovereignTeacher { mcex - iUS 
m the calm Silence of the Senfes and PafTions, he cannot poflibly fall into Errour. quanto re- 

movere at- 
que fubducere intentionem mentis a corporis fenfibus potuit. Aug. de Immort. Anim. c. 10. 

GOD never deceives thofe who interrogate Him by a ferious Application, and an entire Conver- 
n of Mind towards Him t, though He does not always make them hear His Anfwers. But 
len the Mind, by its Aver/ion from GOD, diffufes it felf abroad ; when it confults only its 
;dy, to be inftrufted in the Truth, and only liftens to its Senfes, Imaginations, and PaJJions, 

which talk to it everlaftingly, it muft inevitably be engag'd in Errour. Wifdom, Truth, Perfeili- 
, and Uappinefs, are not Goods to be hop'd for from the Body. There is none, except ONE 

that is above us, and from whom we receive our Being, who can make it perfect. 
This is what we are taught by thefe admirable Words of St. Aujiin : -Eternal Wifdom, fays he, , Princi- 
the Principle of all Intellectual Creatures, which perf fling immutably the fa?ne, never ceafes to P*" * "crea* 

ipeak to the moflfecret and inward Re of on of his Creatures, to convert them towards their Princi- ™&\J&%\tt. 

pie • Becaufe nothing but the Intuition of Eternal Wifdom, which gives Being to Spirits, can give sterna fa- 

lem, as we may fay, the Accomplifhing Stroke, and the utmoft Perfection they are capable of pientia 

r quod prin- 
jinm manens in fe incommutabiliter, nullo modo ceffat occulta infpiratione yocationis loqui ei creature, cui principium eft, ut con- 
t tatur ad id ex quo eft, quod aliterformata ac perfefta efle non poflit. Lib. 1. de Gen. adLitter. Ch. 50. 

When we fee GOD as He is, zve Jhall be like Him, fays the Apoftle St. John. By that Seimus 
Intuition of Eternal Truth, we mall be rais'd to that degree of Grandeur to which all Spiritu- q noniam 
al Creatures tend by the Neceflity of their Nature. But whilft we live on Earth, the * Weight of |: u ™ it * p £ a ' 
the Body drags down the Mind, withdraws it continually from the Prefence of GOD, or that miles'ei 
Internal Light which illuminates it, makes perpetual Efiays to fortifie its Union with Senfible erimus, 
Yujetfs ; and compells it to reprefent things, not as they are in themf elves, but according to the ^JJjjJJ, 
Relation they bear to the Prefervation of Life. eum fi CUt ; 

. J oh. Ep. 1. ch. g. v. 2. * Corpus quod corrumpitur, aggravat animam. Sap. 9. 10. Terrena inhabkatio deprimit fenfum multa 
ogitantem, & difficile aiftimamus quae in terra funt, & quae in profpeftu funt invenimus cum labore. Sap. 9. 15. 

The Body, according to the Wife Man, fills the Mind with fuch a multitude of Senfations, 

that it becomes unable to difcover the moft obvious things •, the Sight of the Body dazles and dif- 

xites that of the Mind ; fo that the Eye of the Soul has great Difficulty diftinftly to perceive 

v Truth, whilft the Eye of the Body is imploy'd in the Difcovery ; which evidences, that all 

Truths 



The P R E F A C E. 

fbeus Truths are Found out, and all Sciences learn'd merely by the Attention of the Mind. This being 
inteffigibi- indeed its Return and Converfwn unto GOD, who is our only Tut our, who only can inftructus 
lis lux, in wit}l ali Truth, by the Manifeftation of Eis own Subflance, as St. Aiiftin t fpeaks. 
quo^ & per quern intelligibiliter lucent omnia. i.Sol. Infinuavit nobis [Chrijlus] animam humanam nonvegetari, non illuminari, 
ncnbeatiftcari, nifi ab ipfa fubftantia Dei. Augnft. in Job. 

From ail which it is manifeft, that 'tis our Duty conftantly to withftand the Oppofition the 

Body makes againft the Mind ; and to accuftom our felves by degrees to disbelieve the Reports 

our Senfes make concerning all circumambient Bodies, which they always reprefent, as worthy of 

our Application and Efteem, becaufe we muft never make Senfible things the Qbjeft of our 

Thoughts, or the Subject of our Employment : 'Tis one of the Truths which the Eternal Wifi 

illaauto- dom leems willing toteachusby His Incarnation. For, after having exalted a Senfible Body to 

ritas divina tne higheft Dignity poffible to be conceiv'd, He gave us to underftand, by the Ignominy He re- 

dicendaeft, ^^^ ^ f ame £ oiy . ^j. t ^ t ^ ty tne Ignominy of the Nobleft of all Senfible things, what 

SSL 1 "*! Contempt we ought to have for all Senfible Objects. 'Tis poflibly for the fame Reafon that St Paul 

fenfibffibus faid He knew not JESUS. C HRI ST after the flefh. For 'tis not the Flefh of CUR IS T 

fignis cran- we mu ft confider, but the Spirit vaiTd' under the Flefh. Caro vaffuit, quodhabebat attende, non 

fcendic quod erat, fays St. Auftin*. Whatever is a Vifible and Senfible Nature in our L O R D, merits 

himm not our Adoration ; but becaufe of the Union with the WORD, which can only be the ObjeS 

faculcatem, of the Mind. 

led & ip- , 

fiun hominem agens oftendit ei quoufque fe propter ipfum deprefferit, & non teneri fenfibus, quibus videntur ilia miranda ; fed «d 

intelleftum j u bet evolarej fimul demonilrans, & quanta hie poflit, & cur h#c faciat, & quam parvi pendat. Aug. 2. de Ord. j>» *\ Tratt, 

in Joan. 27. Et fi cognovimus fecundum carnem Chriftum, jam non fecundum carnem novimus. 2 adCor. 

It is abfolutely necefTary for thofe who defire to become Wife and Happy, to be wholly co'n- 
vine'd, and as it were piere'd with what I have faid, 'Tis not enough that they believe me on 
my Word, or that they be contented by the glimpfe of a tranfitory Lights 'tis necefTary they 
mould know it by a thoufand Experiences, and as many undeniable Demonftrations. Thefe are 
Things to be engraven 'indelibly on their Mind, to be made prefent to their Thoughts in all their 
Studies,, and in all the Bulinefs and Employs of Life. 

Such as will take the Pains to read the Work I here offer to the Publick with any Application 
of Thought, will, if Imiftake not, enter intq fuch a Frame and Temper of Mind : For we have 
feveral ways demonftrated, that our Senfes, Imagination, and Paffwns, are abfolutely ufelefs to 
the Difcovery of Truth and Happinefs ; that on the contrary, they dazle and feduce us on all 
occafions ± and in general, that all the Notices the Mind receives through the Body, or by Means 
of fome Motions excited in the Body, are all falfe and confused, with reference to xheObjeth repre- 
fented by them ; though they are extremely ufeful to the Prefervation of the Body, and the 
Goods that are related to it. 

In this Work we encounter feveral Err ours, efpecially iiich as have been of longeft Growth, of 
univerfal Reception, and have caus'd the greateft DiJ order in the Mind ; -and we fhew that they 
almoft all proceed from the Mind's Union with the Body. We offer in diverfe places to make 
the Mind fenfible of its Slavery and Dependence on all Senfible things, in order to awaken it 
from its Lethargy, and to put it upon attempting its Deliverance. 

Nor do we reft fatisfy'd with a bare Expofition of our Ramblings •, but moreover explain the 
Nature of the Mind. We don't, for Inftance, infill upon a long Enumeration of all the parti- 
cular Errours of our Senfes and Imagination ; but chiefly dwell upon the Caufes of thefe Err ours. 
And in the Explication of thefe faculties, and the General Errours we fall into, weexpofe all at 
one View an infinite Number of particular Errours whereunto we are obnoxious : So that the Sub- 
ject of this Treat ij e is the Whole Mind of Man. We confider it in itfelf, with its Relation to 
the Body, and with its Relation to GOT). We examine the Nature of all its Faculties ; we 
point out the Ufes to be made of them for the avoiding Errour. In fine, we explain moft of the 
things we thought necefTary to our advancing in the Knowledge of MA N. 

The finelr, the moft delightful, and moft necefTary Knoivledge, is undoubtedly that of Our 
Selves. Of all Humane Sciences, that concerning Man is the moft worthy of Man ; and yet this 
is none of the moft improv'd and moft finifh'd Science that we have. The Vulgar part of Men 
negleft it wholly : Among the Pretenders to Science there are very few which apply to it, and 
much fewer whofe Application is fuccefsful. The generality even of thofe who go for Men of 
Parts, have but a confus'd Perception of the EfTential Difference between the Soul and Body. 
St. Auftin himfelf; who has fo admirably diftinguifh'd thefe two Beings, confeifes it was long 
before he could difcover it. And though it mutt be acknowledg'd he has better explain'd theP;v- 
pcrtics of the Soul and Body, than all that went before him, or have come after him, to our pre- 
ienr Age ; yet it were to be wifh'd he had not attributed to the Bodies that are about us, all the 
Senjib/e Qualities we perceive by means of them : For, in brief, they are not clearly contain'd in 
the Idea which he had of Matter. Infomuch that we may pretty confidently fay, The Diffe- 
rence between the Mind and Body, till of late Years, was never fit ficiently and clearly known. 

Some there are who fancy to themfelves they very well knoiv the Nature of the Mind. Many 
others are perfuaded, 'tis vnpojfible to know any thing of it. Laftly, the greateft Number of all 
lee not of what ufc that Knowledge could be, and therefore defpife it. But all thefe i'o com- 
mon Opinions are rather the Effects of the Imagination and Inclination of Men, than the Confe- 

quences 



The PREFACE. 

quinces of a Gear and DiJiinffView of their Mind •, and proceed from their feeling an Uneafi- 
Deft and Regret to retire into themfelves, there to difcover their Weakneffes and Infirmities ; and 
their being pleased with Curious Enquiries and gayer fort of Sciences. Being always Abroad, 
they are inlenfible of the Diforders that happen at Home within themfelves. They think all's right, 
becaufe there's a Stupor on their Soul, and rind fault with thofe who knowing their Diftemperi 
betake to Remedies, faying, they make themfelves fick, becaufe they try for Cure. 

But thefe Great Genius, who pierce into the molt Myfierious Secret s of Nature, who lift 
themfelves in Opinion as high as Heaven, and defcend to the bottom of the Abyfs, ought to re- 
member what they are. Thefe great Obje&s, it may be, do but dazle them. The Mind muft 
needs depart out of it felf, to compafs fo many things ; and this it can't do without fcattering 

its Force. 

Men came not into the World to be Aftronomers, or Chymifs, to fpend their whole Life at 
the end of a Tele/cope ; or labouring at a furnace, to deduce trilling Conferences from their 
painful Obfervations. Grant that an Aftronomer made the firft Difcoveries of Continent, and 
Sea, and Mountains in the Moon ; that he firft obferv'd the Spots that circuit upon the Sun , and 
that he had exactly calculated their Motions : Suppofe that a Chymifi had found out, at length, the 
Secret of fixing Mercury, or of making the Alkaeji, wherewith van-helmont boafted to diffolve 
all Bodies : What are they the wifer or happier for all this ? It, perhaps, has fet them up in 
Reputation with the World ; but if they would reflect upon it, they would find that Reputa- 
tion did but increafe their Bondage. 

Agronomy, Chymiftry, and molt of the other Sciences, may be look'd on as proper Divertife- 
ments ior a Gentleman. But Men mould never be enamour'd with their Gayety, nor prefer them 
before the Science of Humane ~Nature : For though the Imagination fixes a certain Idea of Great- 
nefs to Agronomy, by teafon of its considering Great and Glorious Objefts, and feated infinitely 
above all' other things, the Mind is not blindly to proftrate it felf to that Idea, hvxfit its Mafter, 
and its Judge, and fir if it of that Senfible Pomp which amazes Reafon. The Mind muft pro- 
nounce of all things, according to its Internal Light, without hearkening to the falfe and con- 
fus'd Verdiil of its Senfes and Imagination ; and whilft it examines all Humane Sciences by the' 
Pure Light of Truth, which enlightens it, we doubt not to affirm it will difefteem molt of 
them, and fet a greater Price on ;that which teaches us to know our/elves, than on all the other 
put together. 

Therefore we choofe rather to advife fuch as wifh well to Truth, to judge of the Subject of 
this Treat ife by the Refponfes they (hall receive from the Sovereign InftruLlor of all Men, after 
having interrogated him by fome Serious Reflexions, than to foreltall them with a long anticipa- 
ting Difcourfe, which perhaps they might look on as Common-place Matter, or the vain Orna* 
ments of a Preface. If they are perluaded this is a Subject worthy their Study and Application, 
we defire them once more not to judge of the Things contain'd in it, by the good or ill Manner 
they are exprefs'd in, but ftill to retire into themfelves, and there to hear the Decifions they 
are to follow, and to judge by. 

Being thus fully perfuaded, that Men cannot teach one another-, and that thofe who hear us Nolitepu-' 
learn not the Truths we fpeak to their Ears, unlefs at the fame time, He who taught them us, tare quen- 
manifeft them likewife to their Mind : We think our felves farther obliged to advertife the Read- ^ m ho T. 
ers, that would profit by this., not to credit us on our Word, out of any Inclination, and Gwd^ 'j^difce- 
liking, nor withftand our Sentiments out of Prejudice or Averfion. For though we think no- re ab ho- 
ming be therein advanced, but what we learned at the Expence of Meditation, we fhould how- mine, 
ever be very forry that others fhould be contented with the Remembrance and Belief without the Ad ™ onere 
Knozvledge of our Notions $ and fall into Errour, for want of Underftanding us, or becaule we p° r Xepi- 
have Err'd before them. . turn vods 

noftrse, ft 
non fit intus qui doceat, inanis fit ftrepitus nofter. Aug. in Joan. " Auditus per me faftus, intelleftus per quern ? Dixit aliquis & ad 
cor veftmm, fed non eum videtis. Si intellexiftis, fratres, diftum eft & cordi veftro. Munus Dei eft incelligentia. Auguft, Joban, 
Traft. 40. 

That prefumptuous Pride of fome of the Learned, who demand our Belief Upon their Word, 
feems intolerable : They are angry with us for Interrogating GOD, When once they have fpoke 
to us, becaufe they Interrogate Him not themfelves. They grow warm upon every Oppcjition to 
their Opinions, 'requiring an abfolute Preference fhould be given to the -Mifis and Darknefs of 
their Imagination, before the Pure Light of Truth, which illuminates the Mind. 

We are, Thanks to G O D, very remote from this way of proceeding, though it be often 
charged upon us. We demand indeed a Refignation to Matters of Pall, and the Experiments we' 
produce, becaufe thefe are things not learn' d by the Applying the Mind to Sovereign and Univer- 
sal Reafon. But as to Truths difcoverable in the True Ideas of things, which the Eternal Wif- 
dom fuggefts to us in our moft inward and fecret Reafon •, herein we exprefly caution againft NoIl .F? ta * 
refting upon what we have thought of them, as judging it no fmall Crime thus to equalize our effeVuxem! 
felves with GOD, by ufurping a Power over the Minds of Men. Aug.inPfJ< 

The chief Reafon why we are fo earneftly defirous, that thofe who read this Work bring all 
poffible Application along with them, is, that we are willing to be reprehended for the Faults 
we have been guilty of; For we pretend not to be Infallible. We have fo itri£t an Union with, 
and fo ftrong a Dependence on our Body, that we are juftly apprehenlive, left we have fometimes 

miftaken 



the PREFACE. 

tniftaken thh confused Noife wherewith it fills the Imagination, for the Pure Voice of Truth, which 
fpeaks to the Underjianding. 

Were it GOD only who fpoke, and did we judge only according to what we heard, we might 

Sicut audio perhaps fay in the words of our LORD, As 1 bear I judge, and my Judgment is juft. But we 

fie judico, h ave a Body that fpeaks lowder than GOD Himfelf, hut never fpeaks the Truth. We have Self 

meumju-" 1 ^ ove -> Wfl i cn corrupts the Words of G D, which are all Truth : and we have Pride, which em- 

ftum eft .- boldens us to judge without Haying for the Words of Truth, which ought to be the Rule of all 

quia non our Judgments. For the principal Caufe of our Errours, is, that our Judgments reach farther 

qua-rovo- than our Pure Intellectual Perceptions. Wherefore I intf eat thofe to whom GOD fhall difcover 

meam? m 7o- ^Wandrings, to put me in the Right Way 5, that fo this Treatife, which I offer as an Ejfay, 

ban. c'ap.$. whofe Subject is well worthy the Application of Men, may by degrees arrive to its Perfection. 

30. This Undertaking was at firft ettempted only with defign of inffrucfing my felf : But fome 

Perfons being of Opinion it might be of ufe, if publifh'd, I the willinger fubmitted to their Rea- 

fons ; becaufe one of the principal fo well fuited with the defire I had of advantaging my felf. 

The beft means, faidthey, of being informed in any Matter, is' to communicate our Opinions about 

it to the Learned. This quickens our own Attention, as well as provokes theirs. Sometimes 

they have different Profpecf s, and make other Difcoveries of Truths ; fometimes they pufh on 

certain Enquiries, which we out of Lazinefs have neglected, or for want of Strength and Courage 

have deferted. 

And upon this Profpect of Benefiting my felf, and fome others, I run the hazard of being an 
Author. But that my Hopes may not prove abortive, I throw in this Precaution, That a Man 
(hould not be prefently difcourag'd, though he meet with tilings that run counter to Common 
Opinions ; which he has all his Life long believ'd, and found generally approved by all Men in 
all Ages of the World. For they axeThefe Universal Errours I more especially ftrive to extirpate. 
Were Men throughly enlightned, Univerfal Approbation would be an Argument : but the cafe 
is quite contrary. Let him therefore be once for all re-minded, that nothing but Reafon ought 
to prefide over the Judgments we pafs on all Humane Opinions ; which have no relation to Faith: 
of which GOD alone informs us in a quite different way, from that of our diicovering Natural 
things. Let him Retire into himfelf, and preis near to that Light, which perpetually Jhines With- 
in, to the end his Reafon may be more and more enlightned. Let him induftrioufly avoid all thofe 
too lively Senfations, and all the Commotions of the Soul, which fill the Capacity of the Mind. 
For the leaf Noife, or Glimmering of Light fometimes difturbs the View of the Mind : And 
therefore 'tis good to avoid all thefe things, though not abfolutely neceffary. And if after all the 
.ffruggles he can make, he finds himfelf unable to withftand the continual Impreffions that his 
Body, and the Prejudices of Childhood, make upon his Imagination : recourfe to Prayer is need- 
ful, that GOD may afford thofe Supplies, wherewith his own Strength cannot furnifh him ; 
Qui hoc ~® ever failing fill to refift his Senfes. For that ought to be the perpetual Employment of thofe, 
videre non who in imitation of St. Auftin, have a great love for Truth, 
poteft,oret 

& agat ut poffemereatur, nee ad hominem difputatorem pulfet, ut quod not legit Iegat, fed ad Deum Salvatorem, ut quod non valet 
valeat. Epift. 112. cap. 12. Supplexqj ilii qui lumen mentis accendit, attendatut intelligat. Cotf. Ep. Fund. cap. 33. Nullo modo 
refiftitur Corporis fenfibus ; qus nobis facratiflima difciplina eft; fi per eos infliftis plagis Vulneribufque blandimur. Ep. 72. 






THE 






The C G N T E N T S of the Firfl Volume. 



CHAP. I. 

i./"\F the Nature and Properties of tte Under- 
KJ flanuuig. ' 2. Of the Nature and Properties 
of the Will, and wherein its Liberty confifts. Page I 
CHAP. II. 

i. Of our Judgments and Reafonings. i. That 
they depend upon the Will. 3. The Vfe which fhou Id 
be 7n ade of its Liberty on their account. 4. Two Ge- 
neral Rules for the avoiding Error and Sin. 5. Some 
Neceffary Reflexions on thofe Rules 4 

CHAP. III. 

1. The Anfwers to fome Objections. 2. Obfervations 
vpon wlwt has been /aid concerning the Neceffity of 
Evidence 7 

CHAP. IV. 

I. Of the Occafwnal Caufes of Error, whereof 
there are five Principal. 2. The General Defign of 
the whole Work. 3. The Particular Defgn of the 
Firfl Book 9 

CHAP. V. 

Of the Senfes. 1. Two ways of Explaining ,how 
they were corrupted by Sin. 2. That 'tis our Liberty, 
end not our Senfes, which is the trice Caufe of our 
Errors. 3. A Rule for avoiding Error in the ufe of 
our Senfes 10 

CHAP. VI. 

i. Of the Errors of Sight in re/pelt of Extenfion 
abfolutely conflder'd. 2. A Continuation of thefe Er- 
rors about lnvifible Object's. 3. Of the Errors of 
Sight touching Extenfion relatively confidered 1 3 
CHAP. VII. 

1. Of the Errors of Sight about figures. 2. We 
have no Knowledge of the leaf of them. 3.. The 
Knowledge we have of the Greater is not exact. 4. An 
Explication offome Natural Judgments which prevent 
our Deception. 5. That thefe very Judgments de- 
ceive us in fome particular Junctures 1.8 
CHAP. Vlil. 

I. That our Eyes are incapable of informing 1$ of 
the Quantity or Swift nefs of Motion confidered in it 
felf. 2. That Duration which is neceffary to our 
Knowledge of the Qiiantity of Motion is unknown to 
us. 3. An Infance of the Errors of Sight about 
Motion and Reft 1 9 

C H A P. IX. 

A Continuation of the fame Subject. 1. A Gene- 
ral Demonjlration of the Errors of our Sight concern- 
ing Motion. 2. That the Diflance of Objects is ne- 
ceffary to be known, in order to judge of the Quantity 
af their Motion. 3. The Mediums whereby we know 
file Di fiances. of Ob jells are examined 21 

CHAP. X. 

Of our Errors about Senfible Qualities. 1 . The Di- 
fl in it ion of the Soul and Body. 2. An Explication of 
the Organs of the Senfes. 3. To what part of the Bo- 
dy the Soul is immediately united. 4. An Infance to 
explain the Effetl which Objects have upon our Bodies. 
5. What it is they produce in the Soul, and theReafons 
why the Soul perceives not the Motions of the fibres 
of the Body. 6. Four things which are generally con- 
founded in every Senfation 25 

. CHAP. XI. 
j/'i. TJ?e Error we fall into concerning the Action of 
Objects again fl the external Fibres of our Senfes. 



2. The Caufe of this Error. 3. An Objection anl 

Anfwer 2S 

CHAP. XIL 

I. Of our Errors concerning the Motions of the 
Fibres of our Senfes. 2. That we have no Percept 
tion of thefe Motions, or that we confound them zoitb 
our Senfations. 3. An Experiment that proves it. 
4. Three kinds of , Senfations. 5. The Errors thai 
accompany them ' Ibid, 

CHAP. XIII. 

I. Of the Nature of Senfations. 2. That a ' fjjjiati 
knows them better than he thinks he does. 3. An Ob- 
jection and Anfwer. 4. Why a Man imagines he has' 
no Knowledge of his own Senfations. 5. That it is an 
Error to think all Men have the fame Senfations of 
the fame Objects. 6. An Objection and Anfwer 3 1 

CHAP. XIV. 

I. Of the falfe Judgments that accompany our Sen- 
fations, and which we confound with them. 2. The 
Reafons of thefe falfe Judgments. 3. That Err or is 
not in our Senfations, but only in thefe Judgments 

35 
CHAP. XV. 

An Explication of the particular Errors of the 
Sight, which may ferve as an Exemplar of the gene- 
ral Err ours of our Senfes . .37 
CHAP. XVI;] 

i. That the Errors of our Senfes ferve m inflead 
of General and very Fruitful Principles, from whence 
to draw falfe Conclufwns ; and thefe Conclufwns again 
become other Principles in their turn. 2. The Ori- 
gin e of Efjential Differences. 3. Concerning Subflan- 
tial Forms. 4. Of fome other Errors of the School- 
Phi lofophy 38 
CHAP. XVIL 

1. Another Infance taken from Morality, which 

floews that our Senfes offer us nothing but falfe Goods., 

2. That God alone is our true and proper Good.. ^.The 1 

Or'igme of the Error of the Epicureans and Stcicks 

39 
CHAP. XVHL 

1. That our Senfes make us liable to Error, even in 

things which are net fenfible. 2. An Example taken 

from the Converfatwn of Men. 3. That Senfible 

Manners are not to be regarded 41 

CHAR XIX, 

Two other Examples. 1. The fi/fi concerning our 

Errors about the Nature of Bodies. 2. The fecond 

concerning thofe which refpett the Realities of the -famfi 

Bodies 42 

CHAP. XX, 

The Conclufon of the Firfl Book. 1. Thai' our 
Senfes are given w only for the Prefervation of our 
Body. 2. That we ought to doubt of the Reports 
they make. 3. That ^tis no little thing to. doubt as 

4'4 



we ought to do. 



Book the Second, 



CHAP. I, 
'i. AGeneralldea of the Imagination. 2. That it in- 
eludes two Faculties, an A ctive and a Pa (Jive. 3 . A gene- 
ral Caufe of the Changes winch happen in the Imaginati- 
on of Men \ and the Foundat ion of the Second Book 4 ? 
«$ C H A Vi 



The CONTENTS. 



CHAP. II. 

T Of the Animal Spirits, and the Changes they are 
\tijell 'to in general. 2. That the Chyle entring the 
"Heart, occafions a Change in the Sprits. 3. That 
limine does the fame thing 47 

CHAP. III. 

. . That the Air 'vnplofd in Refpiration caiifes fome 

chahge in the Animal Spirits 48 

CHAP. IV. 

1. Of the Change of the Spiritscaus'd by the Nerves, 

zvhich go to the Heart and Lungs. 2. Of that which 

is caused by the Nerves, which go to the Liver, to the 

Spleen and Vifcera. 3. That all that is performed 

without the Concurrence of our Will, but yet it cannot 

be done without a Providence 49 

CHAP. V. 

1. Of Memory. 2. Of Habits $i 

CHAP. VI. 
1. That the Fibres of the Brain are not fubjetl to 
fo fudden Changes at the Spirits. 2. Three different 
Changes incident to the three different Ages 53 

CHAP. VII. 
1. Of the Communication there is between the Brain 
of a Mother, and that of her Infant. 2. Of the Com- 
munication that is between our Brain and the other 
Parts of our Body, which inclines its to Imitation, and 
toCompaJJion. 3. An Explication of the Generation 
of Monfrous Children, and the Propagation of the 
Species. 4. An Explication of fome Irregularities 
of the Underffanding, and of fome Inclinations of the 
Will. <$. Concerning Concupifcence and Original Sin. 
6. Objections and Anfwers 54 

CHAP. VIII. 
1. The Changes which happen in the Imagination of 
an Infant, after his Birth, by his accompanying with his 
Aiother, his Nurfe, and other Perfons. 2. Some In- 
jlrulfions for their good Education 6 1 

The Second Part. 

CHAP. I. 

1 . Of the Imagination of Women. 2. Of the Ima- 
gination of Men. 3. Of the Imagination of old Men 

64 

• CHAP. II. 

That the Animal Spirits generally run in the Tracks 

of Ideas that are inofi familiar to us, which is the Rea- 

fon of our prepofierous Judgments 66 

CHAP. III. 

Of the mutual Connexion between the Ideas, and the 

Traces of the Brain ; and of the mutual Connexion 

there is between Traces and Traces, Ideas and Ideas 

68 
CHAP. IV. 
1. That Men of Learning are the 7710ft fubj ell to 
Error. 2. The Caufes why Men had rather be gui- 
ded hy Authority, 'than make ufe of their own Rea- 
fon 71 

CHAP. V. 
Two pernicious Effelts Reading has upon the Ii7ia- 
gi nation 72 

CHAP. VI. 
That Men ofLear7wig generally are fo opinionated 
acith an Author, that their principal Drift is the Itnow- 
ing what he held, without caripg to- know what ought 
10 be held 74 

CHAP. VII. 
Of the Yrepoffeffion of Co7iimentat6rs 76 



chap. vm. 

I. Of the Inventors of new Sy ferns. 2. The lafil 
Error of Men of Learning . -ja 

CHAP. IX. 

1. Of Effeminate Minds. 2. Of Superficial Minds. 
3. Of Men of Authority. 4. Of the Experimental 
Philofophers 81 

The Third Part. 

C H A P I. 

Of the Difpofition we have to imitate others in all 
things, which is the Original -of the Communication of 
thofe Errors that depend on the Power of Imagination. 
2. Two things that more efpecially increafe this Dif- 
pofition. 3. What that ffrong Imagination is. 4. That 
there are fever al kinds of it. Of Fools, and of thofe 
that have a ffrong Imagination, in the Senfe ''tis here 
taken. $. Two conftderable bnperfetlions of Men of 
afrong bn agination. 6. Of the Power they have to 
perfuade and impofe on others 84 

CHAP. II. 
General Inffances of the Strength of Imagination 87 

CHAP. III. 
1. Of the Force of fome Authors Imagination. 2. Of 
Tertullian * • \ a 3 

CHAP. IV. 
Of the Imagination of Seneca 91 

C H A P. V. 
Of MontagneV Book 95 

CHAP. VI. 
I. Of Witches in Imagination, and of Wolf -men. 

2. The Cone lufion of the two Firft Books 99 

Book the Third. 

CHAP. I. 

1. Thought is only effential to the Mini. Senfation 
and Imagination are only the Modifications of it. 2. We 
know not all the Modifications our Soul is capable of. 

3. They are different from our Knowledge andourLove^ 
nor are they always Confequences of them 101 

CHAP. II. 

1. The Mind being limited, cannot comprehend any 
thing of an Infinite Nature. 2. Its Limit at ion is the 
Origine of a great many Errors. 3. And efpecially of 
Herefies. 4. The Mind muff befubmitted unto Faith 

105 
CHAP. III. 

1. The Philofophers diffipate or diffolve the Force of 
the Mind, by applying it to the Subjells, including too 
Many Relations, and depending on too many things ; 
and by obferving no Method in their Studies. 2. An 
Infiance taken from Ariftotle. 3. That Geometricians 
on the contrary take a good Method in the Search of 
Truth : Efpecially thofe who 77/ake ufe of Algebra and 
Analyticks. q.That their Method increafes the Strength 
of the Mind, and that Ar iftorieV Logic k leffens it. $.A- 
nother Fault of Learned Men 1 07 

CHAP. IV. 

1 . The Mind cannot dwell long upon Objells that 
have no relation to it, or that include not fo/ue thing of 
Infinity in them. 2. The Inconf fancy of the Will, is 
the Caufe of that want of Application, and confequent- 
ly of Error. 3. Our Scnfaiions take us up more than 
the ptife Ideas of the Mind. 4. Which is the Source 
of the Corruption of our Morals. 5. And of the Ig- 
norance of the Vulgar fort of Men 109 

Second 



The CONTENTS. 



Second Part concerning pure Undemanding. 

CHAP. I. 

I. What is meant by Ideas. That they really exift, 
end are neceffary to our perceiving all material Ob jells. 
2. A Particularization of all the ways pojftble for m 
to perceive external Ob jells 112 

CHAP. II. 
That material Objefls'emit not Species which refem- 
ble them 114 

CHAP. III. 
That the Soul ha* no power to produce Ideas. The 
caufe of the Error Men are guilty of upon this Sub- 
ielt . n$ 

CHAP. IV. 
That we perceive notObjeflsby means of Ideas cre- 
ated with us. That God does not produce them in us 
every moment we have need of them ' 1 1 7 

CHAP. V. 
That the Mind perceives neither theEffence nor the 
Exiftence of Objetls, by confide ring its own Perfecti- 
ons. That none but God fees them in that manner 

118 
CHAP. VI. 
That we fee all things in God 1 1 9 

CHAP. VII. 
1. Four different manners of Perception. 2. How 
it is that we know God. 3. How we know Bodies. 
4. How we know our own Souls. 5. How we know 
the Souls of other Men, and pure Spirits 122 

CHAP. VIII. 
1. The intimate Prefence of the indefinite Idea of Be- 
ing in general, is the caufe of all the dif orderly abft ra- 
tions of the Mind -, and the moji part of the Chimeras 
of the vulgar Philofophy, which hinder many Philofo- 
phers from acknowledging the Jolidity of true Princi- 
ples of Phyficks. 2. An Injiance concerning the Ef- 
fence of Matter. 1 24 

CHAP. IX. 
1. The Lift general Caufe of our Errors. 2. That 
the Ideas of things are not always prefent to the Mind 
when we would have them. 3 . That every finite Mind 
isfubjefl to Error, and why. 4. That we ought not to 
judge that there is nothing but Body and Spirit : nor 
that God is a Spirit, according to our conception of 
Spirits. 128 

CHAJ>. X. 
Some Inftances cf Errors in Phyficks, ivherein Men 
are engaged, bpfuppofing that the things which differ 
in their Nature, their Qualities, Extenfion, Duration 
and Proportion, are alike in all thefe things 130 

CHAP. XI. 
Inftances of fome Errors of Morality, which de- 
pend on the fame Principle 133 
The Conclufion of the Three firft Books 134 

Book the Fourth, r 

CHAP. I. 

1. Inclinations are of neceffary to Spirits, as Mo- 
tions to Bodies. 2. God gives no Motion to Spirits, but 



what tends towards him/elf. 3. The tendency Spirits 
have to particular Goods, proceeds but from their Mo* 
tion towards Good in general. 4. The Original of our 
chief eft natural Inclinations, which will make up the' 
divifion of this fourth Book 137 

CHAP II. 
1. The Inclination for Good in general, is the Prin- 
ciple of the Refilefnefs of the Will : 2. And confequent- 
ly of our Inadvei'tency and Ignorance. 3. The Firji 
Injiance (/hewing that) Morals are but little known 
by the generality of Men. 4. The Second Injiance 
(fkewing that) the Immortality of the Soul is contro- 
verted by fome People. 5 . That we are in extreme Ig- 
norance in point of abfirall things ; and which have 
but little reference to us. 139 

CHAP. III. 
1. Curiofity is natural, and neceffary. 2. .Three 
Rules to moderate it. 3. An Explication of the firft 
of thefe Rules. - 143; 

CHAP. IV. 
A Continuation of the fame Sub jell. I. An Expli- 
cation of the fecondRule concerning Curiofity. 2. An 
Explication of the Third 146 

CHAP. V. 
1. Of the fecond natural Inclination, or of Self- 
love. 2. The Divifion of it into love of Being, and of 
Well-being -, or ofGreatnefs, and Pleafure 147 

CHAP. VL 
1. Of the Inclination we have for whatever elevates 
m above others. 2. Of the falfe Judgments of fome 
Religious P erf ons. 3. Of the falfe Judgments of the 
Superftitious, and Hypocrites. 4. Of Voetius, Mr. 
Des Cartes\r Enemy. 148 

CHAP. VII. 
Of the Defire of Science, and of the Judgments of 
the faljly Learned. 151 

CHAP. VIII. 
1. Of tbeDefire of feeming Learned. 2. Of 'the con- 
verfationof the falfly Learned. ^.Of their Works 153 
CH A P. IX. 
How the Inclination for Honours and Riches condu- 
ces to Error. 155 
CHAP. X. 
Of the Love of Pleafure^ with regard to Morality. 
1. That Pleafure istobe fhunrfd, though it make us 
happy. 2. It ought not to carry us to the loving f en- 
fib le Goods 156 
CHAP. XI. 
Of the love of Pleafure, with reference to Specula- 
tive Sciences. 1. How it dif able s us from dif cove ring 
Truth. 2. Some Injiance s 159 
CHA P. XII. 
Of the Effetls which the Thoughts of Future Hap- 
pinefs and Mifery are capable of producing in the 
Mind 163 
CHAP. XIII. 
1. Of the third Natural Inclination : viz. The 
Friendfhip we have for other Men. 2. It makes us ap- 
prove the Thoughts of our Friends, and deceive them . 
by undue Praifes. 16$ 



Tome 



The CONTENTS. 



Tome II. Book V. 



CHAP. I. 

OF the Nature and Original of Paffions in gene- 
ral Page i 
CHAP II. 

Of the Union of the Mind with fenfibleThings ; or 
of the Force and Extent of the Paffions in genera! 3 

CHAP. III. 
. A particular Explanation of all the Changes, hap- 
pening either to the Body or Soul in every Pajfton 6 
CHAP. IV. 
That the Pleafure and Motion of the Paffions en- 
gage us in Errors, andfalfe Judgments about Good; 
that we ought continually to rejift them. How to im- 
pugn Tuibertinifm ■ 10 
CHAP. V. 
That the Perfetlion of the Mind confifts in itsUni- 
on-with God, by the knowledge of Truth, and the 
love of Vertue ; and contrariwife, That its Imperfeffi- 
on proceeds only from its dependency on the Body, cau- 
fed by the DiJ order of the Senfes and Paffions 1 3 
CHAP. VI. 
Of the more general Errors of she Paffions, with 
fome particular Inftances 16 

C H A P. VII. 

Of Paffions in particular, andfirft of Admiration 
and its ill Ejfetls 18 

CHAP. VIII. 
A Continuation of the fame Subjeffi : What good ufe 
can be made of Admiration and other Paffions 1 24 
CHAP. IX. 
Of Love and Averficn, and their principal Spe- 
cies 26 
C H A P. X. 
Of Paffions in particular, and in general of the 
way to explain them, and to know the Errors they 
caufe ■ 29 
CHAP. XI. 
That all the Paffions juftifie themf elves. What Judg- 
ments they caufe us to make in theirVindication 3 1 
C H A P. XII. 
That fuch Paffions as .have Evil for their Ob j eel, 
are the mofi dangerous andunjuji; and that thofe that 
have the leaft mixture of Knowledge are the moft live- 
ly andfcnfible . 34 

Book the Sixth. 

CHAP I. 

The Defign of this Book : Two general ways to keep 
to Evidence in the Search of Truth, which J hall be the 
Subjefl of t his Trail 3 6 

CHAP. II. 

That attention is necejjary topreferve Evidence in 
our Knowledge ; that the modifications of the Soul malie 



her attentive, but fhare and take tip too much her Ca- 
pacity of perceiving 37 
CHAP. III. 
Of the ufe that can be made of the Paffions and 
Senfes, to preferve the attention of the Mind 3 9 
CHAP. IV. 
Of the ufe of Imagination to ?nake the Mind atten- 
tive, and especially of the ufefulnefs of Geometry 41 
CHAP. V. 
Of the means to improve the extent and capacity of 
the Mind: That Arithmetick and Algebra are of ab- 
folute neceffity to it 46 

Book the Sixth. Part II. 

CHAP. I. 

Of the Rules that are to be obferved in the Search 
after Truth 50 

CHAP. II. 

Of the general Pule that concerns thefubjeUofour 
Studies : That School Philofophers obferve it not, which 
is the caufe of fever al Errors in their Phyficks 5 1 

chap. in. 

Of the' moft dangerous Error in the Philofophy of 
the Ancients 54 

CHAP. IV. 

An Explication of the fecond part of the general 
Pule : That the Philofophers obferve it not, but that 
Des Cartes ha* exaitly followed it 57 

CHAP. V. 

An Explication of the Principles of the Peripate- 
tick Philofophy, in which is ffiewn, that Ariltotle 
never obferved the fecond part of the general Rule, 
and his jour Elements, with the Elementary Qualities, 
are examined 64 

CHAP. VI. 

General and necejjary Advices to proceed orderly in 
the Search after Truth, and in the choiee of the Sci- 
ences 7-o 
CHAP. VII. 

Of the ufe of the Jirji Rule concerning particular 
^ueftions 74 

CHAP. VIII. 

An Application of the other Rules to particular ^ue- 
ftions 79 

CHAP. IX. 

The lafl injiance tojhevo the ufefulnefs of this Trea- 
tife, wherein the caufe of the Union of parts in Bodies, 
and withal the Rules of the Communication of Motion 
are examined 85 

The Conclufion of the Three lafl Books 96 

III uft rat ions upon the foregoing Books 98 

F. MalbrancheV Defence againfi the Accufation of 
Monfieur De la Ville 183 

Of Light and Colours . 1 9 3 



The End of the Contents. 



C « 1 



F. MALEBRANCH E'S 

TREATISE, 

CONCERNING 

The Search after Truth. 

BOOK the FIRST. 

Concerning The 

Errors of the Senses. 



CHAP. L 

I. Of the Nature and Properties of the Understanding. 

II. Of the Nature and Properties of the Will, and wherein the Liber- 
ty of the Soul confefts. 

ERROR is the Vnlverfal Caufe of the Mifery of Mankind j 'tis the corrupt Principle 
that has Produc'd Evil in the World : 'Tis this which breeds and cherlfhes in our. 
Soul, all the Evils that afflidt us , and we mult never hope to eftablifh a folid and 
real Happinefs, but by ferioufly labouring to avoid it. 
We are taught by the Holy Scriptures, that Men are only miferable, becaufe they are 
Sinners, and Criminals ; and they would neither be Sinners, nor Criminals, did they not make 
therafelves Slaves to Sin; by taking part with Error. 

If it be true then, That Error is the Source of all the Miferies of Men, 'tis very reafonable 
that Men lhould endeavour to free themfelves from it ; and certainly their Endeavour would 
not be altogether unprofitable, and unrewarded, though it met not with #11 the Succefs that 
they could wifh. If Men lhould not hereby become Infallible, yet they would be much lefs rub- 
ied to be Deceiv'd ; and though they obtain'd not an abfolute Deliverance from their Evils, they 
would however avoid a great part of them. An intire Felicity ought not to be expefted in this 
Life, fince in this Mortal State there can be no Pretentions to Infallibility ; but the Endeavour 
againft Error lhould be earneft and continual, becaufe the Deiire of being freed from Mifery is 
inceflant. In a word, as we fervently defire perfeft Happinefs, without the hopes of it , fowe 
lhould ever induftrioufly tend towards Infallibility, without pretending to it. 

It lhould not be imagin'd there is much Difficulty to be undergone in the Search of Truth f 'Tis 
but opening the Eyes, becoming Attentive, and exaftly obferving fome Rules we fhall give in the 
* following Difcourfe. An exadtnefs of Thought has fc?rce any thing painful in it j 'tis not a * see tie 
flavery, as the Imagination reprefents it, and though we meet with fome Difficulty at firii, yet we 6th. Booh 
find Satisfaction enough to recompenfe our Pains j foratlaft, 'tis this only which enlightens us, 
and guides us into Truth. 

But not to fpend time in preparing the Mind of the Reader, whom 'tis much more juft to be- 
lieve, fufficiently, of himfelf, difpos'd to xhz Search of Truth , let us examine the Caufes and Na- 
ture of our Errors - and fince the Method of examining things by confidering them in their Birth, 
and Origine, is the molt regular and perfpicuous, and ferves better than others to give us a tho- 
rough Knowledge of them, let us try to put it here in Practice. 

The Mind of Man, being neither Material nor Extended, is undoubtedly a fimple Subftance,in- of the Nk* 
divifible,and without any Compofition of Parts ■■, Notwithstanding it has been the Cuftom to di- ture&pro- 
itinguifh in it two Faculties, namely, the Vnderftandi?ig and the Will, which it is necefiary in the $ e , rties °f 
firlt place to explain. For it feems that the Notions or Idea's Men have of thele two Faculties, are %^t r ' 
not fo clear or diftinct as they ought to be. s " 

P. But. 



E Malebranche Concerning Book I, 

But becaufe thefe Idea's are very Abftraft, and fall not under the Imagination, it feemsnot 
amifs to exprefs them by the Refemblance they bear to the Properties belonging to Matter, which 
being eaiie to be Imagin'd, will render the Notions which may conveniently- be apply'd to thefe 
two Words Vnderfianding and Will, more diftindr, and alfb more familiar to Vs ; only this Cau- 
tion mull be obferv'd, that thefe Refemblances betwixt the Mind and Matter, are not perfeftly 
juffc ; And that thefe two kinds of Beings are only compar'd in order to make the Mind more At- 
tentive, and to make others, as it were, fenfible of our meaning. 

Matter, or Extenfion, contains in it two Properties or Faculties ; the firft Faculty is that of 
receiving different Figures, and thefecond is its capacity of being mov'd: In like manner the Mind 
of Man includes two Faculties } the firft, which is the Vnderfianding, is that of receiving many 
Idea's, that is, of perceiving many things:, the fecond, which is the Will, is the Faculty of re- 
ceiving many Inclinations, or of J Filling different things. We will begin with an explication of 
the Refemblances the firft of the Faculties belonging to Matter, has to thefirft of the two Facul- 
ties appertaining to the Mind K 

Extenfion is capable of admitting two kinds of Figures,The one is only External, as the Round- 
nefs of a piece of Wax, the other is Internal, and is peculiar to all the little parts the Wax is com- 
pos'd of j for it is molt certain that all the little parts which go to the Compofition of a piece of 
Wax, are of a Figure very different from thofe, which conftitute a piece of Iron. Therefore I 
call that which is external, barely Figure, and I term the internal Figure, Configuration ; which 
is peculiarly neceffary to the Wax to make it what it is. 

So likewife it may be faidthat the Idea's of the Soul are of two forts, taking the name of Idea 
in general for whatever the Mind immediately perceives. The firfr. give Us a Reprefentation of 
fomething without Us, as of a Square, or an Houfe, &c. The fecond reprefent to Us only what 
we find within Us, as our Senfations, fain, Tleafure, or the tj/e like. For we fhall make it plain 
hereafter, that thefe laft Idea's are only a manner of the Mind's exifiing ; and for that reafon I call 
them the Modifications of the Mind. 

Thus alfo the Inclinations of the Soul might be call'd Modifications of the fame Soul : For it be- 
ing manifeft that the Inclination of the Will is a manner of exifiing of the Soul, it might be term'd 
a Modification of the Soul} jtift as Motion in Bodies, being a manner of exifiing of thofe Bodies, 
might be faid to be a Modification of Matter: Notwithftanding I do not term the Inclinations of 
the Will, or the Motions of Matter, Modifications, for as much as both thofe Inclinations, and 
thofe Motions have commonly a reference to fomething that's external ; for the Inclinations ftand 
related unto Good, and the Motions have a reference to fome feparate Body. But the Figures and 
Configurations of Bodies, and the Senfations of the Soul have no neceffary relation toany thing with- 
out. For as a Figure is round when all the external parts of a Body are equally diftant from one 
of its parts, which we call the Centre, without relation to any thing external ; fo all the Senfa- 
fations we are capable of, might have their fubfiftence, though there were no outward objeft in the 
World : Their being includes not any neceffary relation to the Bodies which feemto caufe them, as 
we fhall elfe where prove •, and they are nothing but the very Soul, modify'd in fuch, or fuch a 
manner ; fo that they are properly Modifications of the Soul. Let me then take leave to name 
them fo, in order to explain my felf. 

Thefirft, and principal Agreement, or Refemblance, that is found betwixt the Faculty which 
Matter has of receiving different Figures, and different Configurations ; and that which the Soul 
has of receiving different Idea's, and different Modifications is this, That as the Faculty of re- 
ceiving different Figures, and different Configurations in Bodies, is intirely paffive, and contains 
nothing at all of Aftion, fo the Faculty of receiving different Idea's, and different Modifications in 
the Mind, is altogether paffive and includes no A&ion at all. I call that Faculty or Capacity, 
the Soul has of receiving all thefe things, the UNDERSTANDING. 

Whence we ought to conclude, That 'tis the Vnderfianding which perceives ; fince'tis only its. 
bufinefs to receive the Idea's of Objefts: For, for the Soul to perceive an Object, and to receive 
the Idea which reprefents it, is one and the fame thing : 'Tis alfo the Vnderfianding which per- 
ceives the Modifications of the Soul, fince I mean by this word Vnderfianding, that paffive Faculty 
of the Soul, by means of which it receives all the different Modifications it is capable of. For it is 
the fame thing for the Soul to receive a mode of exiftence, which we call fain, as to perceive Pain, 
fince it has no other way of receiving Pain, than by the Perception of it ; whence it may be mferr'd, 
that 'tis the Vnderfianding that imagines the Objedts that are abfent, and is fenfible of thofe that 
are prefent ; and that the Senfes and Imagination, are nothing but the Vnderfianding, perceiving Ob- 
jects by the Organs of the Body, as fhall be explain'd hereafter. 

But becaufe in the Senfation of Pain, or any thing elfe, Men generally perceive it by the media- 
tion of the Organs of Senfe ; they cuftomarily fay they are the Senfes which perceive it, without 
knowing diftin&ly what it is they mean by the word Senfe: They fancy there is fome Faculty di- 
itinct from the Soul, which renders It, or the Body capable of Senfation, as believing the Organs 
of Senfe do really participate of our Perceptions. They imagine the Body is fo affiftant to the 
Mind, in its Senfations, that if the Mind was feparate from the Body, it could have no Senfation 
at all. But thefe thoughts are the effefts of Prejudice ; and becaufe in the State we are in, we are 
fenfible of nothing but through the ufe of the Inftruments of Senfe, as fhall be lhewn elfewhere 
more at large. 'Tis by way of accommodating my felf to the ordinary way of Speaking that I 
fay, in the Procefs of my Difcourfe, the Senfes perceive ; but by the word Senfe I mean nothing 
but that paffive Faculty of the Soul before-mention'd, that is, the Underftanding perceiving any 



thing, 



Chap. I. The Search after Truths 3 

thing, onoccafion of what happens in the Organs of her Body, according to the Inftitution of Ma- 
ture, as (hall be explain'd in another place. 

The other Refemblance between the paflive Faculty of the Soul, and that of Matter, is this* 
That as Matter receives no real alteration by the change which happens in its Figure ; I mean, for 
inftance, that as Wax receives no confiderable change by becoming Round or Square ; fo the Mind 
receives no change by the diverfity of Idea's it contains-, I would fay, the Mind receives no confi- 
derable change though it receives the Idea of a Square, or a Circle, in perceiving a Square, 
or a Circle. 

Again, As it may be faid that Matter receives confiderable Changes, when it lofes the Configu- 
ration, peculiar to the parts of Wax, to take that which is proper to thofe of Fire and Smoak, when 
the Wax is chang'd into Fire and Smoak ; fo it may be faid that the Soul undergoes very confide- 
rable Changes, when it alters its Modifications, and fuffers Pain after it has felt Pleafure. Whence 
we ought to conclude, That Idea's are to the Soul, in a manner what Figures are to Matter, and 
that Configurations are to Matter, almoft what Senfations are to the Soul. 

There are ftill other Corrfepondencies betwixt the Figures and Configurations of Matter, and 
the Idea's and Modifications of the Mind ; for Matter feems to be an Image, or Reprefentative of 
the Mind, I mean only that there are Properties in Matter which have fome mutual Refpe&s 
between them, not unlike thofe which we find between the Properties belonging to the Mind ; 
though the Nature of the Mind is very different from that of Matter, as we fhall clearly fee in 
that which follows. 

From what I have faid I would have it well remember'd, That byVnderfianding I mean that 
pajfive Faculty the Soul has of Perceiving, that is of receiving not only different Idea's, bat alfo an 
abundance of different Senfations, as Matter has a capacity of receiving all forts of external Figures, 
and internal Configurations. 

The other Faculty of Matter is that of its being capable of receiving many Motions, and the T j # 
other Faculty of the Soul is that Power it has of receiving many Inclinations. Let us make the Com- of the' m- 
parifon between them. ture and. 

As the Author of Nature is the Univerfal Caufe of all thofe Motions which we find in Mat- F £ f e ^L e -J, 
ter, fo alfo he is the general Caufe of all thofe natural Inclinations which are found in the Mind : andlfits* 
And as all Motions proceed in a right line, unlefs otherwife determin'd by the Rencounter, of Liberty* 
fome foreign and particular Caufes, which by their Oppofition, put them into a Circular courfe; 
fo all the Inclinations we receive from God, have a dired tendency, and could only aim at the 
pofleffion of Good and Truth, were there not fome extraneous caufe, which biafs'd that natural 
Imprejfion towards corrupt and mifchievous Ends : Now 'tis that foreign Caufe which is the caufe of 
all our Evils, and depraves all our Inclinations. 

To underftand this rightly, we muff; know, there's a very confiderable difference, between the 
Imprejfion or Motion the Author of Nature produces in Matter, and the Imprejfion or Motion to- 
wards Good in general, wherewith the fame Author of Nature continually influences our Soul: For 
Matter is wholly inactive ; it has no power of retarding, or flopping its Motion, or determining 
and turning it one way rather than another. Its Motion, as I have faid, proceeds always in a right 
line, and if at any time it is hindred, from continuing it in that manner, it defcribes the greateft 
circular Line it can, and confequently that which comes nearefl to a right, becaufe 'tis God that 
imprefTes its Motion, and rules its Determination. But 'tis not fo with the Will, which may in 
one fenfe be faid * to be A&ive, and to have a Power in it felf of giving a different Determination *s eet h6 
to the Inclination, or Impreffion it receives from God ; for though it cannot flop this Impreflion, iUujirm-^ 
it may in one fenfe caufe a Deviation to what fide it pleafes, and thereby produce all thofe Difbr- ons. 
ders, which happen in its Inclinations, and all the Miferies which are the certain and neceflary 
Consequents of Sin. 

So that by the Word WILL, I would be conceiv'd to defign, That natural Motion or Im- 
preffion which carries us towards Good univerfal, and undetermined. And by that of LIBERT Y, I 
mean nothing more than The Power the Mind has of turning that Imprejfion towards agreeable ObjeEls j 
and terminating our natural Inclinations upon fome particular ObjeEh, which before were loofe and undeter- 
mined, except towards general or univerfal Good ; that is to fay, towards God, who is alone 
univerfal Good, fince 'tis he alone who comprehends in himfelf all Goods. 

Whence it is eafie to difcover, That though our natural Inclinations are Voluntary, yet they 
are not Free with that Freedom of Indifference I am fpeaking of ; which contains a Power of wil- 
ling or not willing, or rather of willing the contrary to what our natural Inclinations carry us. For 
though it is Voluntarily and Fi - eely that a Man loves Good in general ; fince there is no Love but 
proceeds from the Will, and 'tis a contradi&ion, for the Will to fuffer violence or conftraint : 
However 'tis impoffible to Love it with that Freedom I have jufr. explain'd, fince 'tis not in the 
Power of. the Will not to wiffi to be Happy. 

But it muff: be obferv'd, that the Mind confider'd under fb ftrong a bent towards Good in ge- 
neral, cannot determine its Motion towards a particular Good, unlefs the fame Mind, confider'd 
as fufceptible of Idea's, has knowledge of that particular Good -, I would fay, to make ufe of the 
ordinary terms, that the Will is a blind Power, that can make no advances to things but what are 
reprefented to it by the Vnderfianding ; fo that the Will can not diverfly determine its Propenfity 
to Good, or over-rule the direct Bent of his natural Inclinations, but by * commanding the Vnder- 4 Sg& ^ 
ftanding to reprefent it to fome particular Objeft. The power then that the Will has of determi- lUuftra- 
ning its Inclinations, neceffarily contains an ability of applying the Uderftanding to the Objefts tions* 
which it likes. That 



F. Malebranche Concerning Book I. 

That what I have faid concerning the Will, and Liberty maybe better underftood, I will make it 
familiar by an Inftance: A Man reprefents to himfelf an Honour or Preferment under the Notion 
or a Good, which he may hope for, and immediately his Will wills this Good : that is, the ImprefTion 
which is continually carrying the Soul towards Univerfal and undetermin'd Good, inclines it to- 
wards this Honour; But whereas this Honour is not the Univerfal Good, nor is confider'd by 
a clear anddiftinft view of the Mind, as Univerfal Good, ffbr the Mind can never fee clearly 
That which is not) thelmpreffion we have towards Univerfal Good is not ftoptby this particular- 
Good : The Mind has a tendency to go farther ; it is not necelfarily and invincibly in Love with 
this Honour,but lsmtirely at its Choice and Liberty in this refpeft.Now its Liberty confifts in this 
that being not fully convmc'd that this Honour comprehends all the Good it is capable of Lovine' 
it may fufpend both its Judgment and its Love ; and thereupon, as (hall be (hewn in the Third Book* 
may,through the Union it has with the Univerfal Being,or that Being which contains all Good think 
of other things, and eonfequently Love other Goods : Finally, it may compare all Goods' toge- 
ther, and love them according to that order, in the Proportion they are lovely, and refer them 
all to that one which contains all, and which alone is fit to fix bounds to our Love, as being the 
only one, that is capable of filling all the Capacity we have of Loving. 

Almoft the fame thing may be faid of the Knowledge of Truth, as of the Love of Good. We 
Love the Knowledge of Truth, as the Injoyment of Good, through a natural Impreffion ; and 
that Impreffion is no more invincible, than that which carries us towards Good ; that which 
makes it fo, is only Evidence, or a perfed and intire Knowledge of the Object. And we have 
equal Liberty in our falfe Judgments as in our inordinate Afetlions, as (hall be made to appear in the 
next Chapter. 



CHAP. II. 

I. Of our Judgments, and Reafonings. IT. That they depend upon the Will. 
III. The Vfe which fiiould be made of its Liberty on their account. YV.Two 
general Rules for the avoiding Error and Sin. V. Some general Refle- 
ctions upon thofe Rules. 



i. 



i 



T might be readily inferred from what has been faid in the precedent Chapter, that the 

of our Underftanding never judges, (ince it goes no farther than Perception; or that the Judgment s 

Judgments an( l Reafonings which the Underftanding makes, are nothing but pure Perceptions: That 

'•ivd^ea- 'tis the Will alone which 'really judges, by acquiefcing in, and voluntarily refting upon, what 

j'onings. xh^ Underftanding reprefents: And thus it is the Will alone which leads us into Error: But 

this requires a larger Explication. 

I fay then, there is no other difference on the part of the Underftanding, between a (imple 
Perception, a judgment, and a Reafoning, than that the Underftanding perceives a fimple thing, with- 
out relation to any thing whatfoever, by a fimple Perception; that it perceives the Relations be- 
tween two things or more, in its Judgments: And laftly, that it perceives the Relations, which 
are betwixt the Relations of things, in its Reafonings ; wherefore all the Operations of the Under- 
ftanding, are nothing but pure Perceptions. 

In Perceiving, for Example, twice 2, or 4, there is only a fimple Perception. In Judging that 
twice 2 are 4, or that twice 2 make not 5, the Underftanding only perceives the Relation of 
Equality found between twice 2 and 4; or the Relation of Inequality between twice 2 and 5- 
Thus the judgment, in point of the Underftanding, is only the Preception of the Relation which is 
found between mo things or more. But Reafoning is the Perception, not of the Relation which is found 
between two things or more, for that would be a Judgment; but, of the Relation which is found 
between two or more Relations of two or more Things. Thus when I infer that 4 being lefs than 5, 
twice 2 being equal to 4, are eonfequently lefs than 6, I not only Perceive the Relation of Ine- 
quality between 1 and 2, and 6, for that would be only a Judgment-, butthe Relation of Inequa- 
lity which is between the Relation of twice 2 and 4, and that Relation between 4 and 6, which 
is a Reafoning: The Underftanding then does only perceive, and 'tis the Will alone which 
judges and reafonshy voluntary refting upon what the Underftanding reprefents to it; as has 
been already faid. 
II. Notwithstanding, when things which come under our Confideration, are palpably Evident, our 

Tl.ii fitig- Confent feems to be no longer Voluntary, whence we are ready to believe that 'tis not our Will but 
TTaSm mx Vnderflanding that .judges thereof. 

h'/end. up- But that we may be fenlible of our Error, we muft know that the things we confider never 
01. ihiWill appear with that Convincing Evidence, till the Underftanding has throughly examin'd all their 
Parts and Relations neceffary to form a Judgment of them ; whereupon it happens that the Will, 
which can will nothing without knowledge, can act no longeron the Underftanding; that is, 
cannot defire the Underftanding to reprefent fomething new in its Object, (ince it has already 
confider'd all the parts of it any ways relating to the queftion to be decided, it is therefore ob- 

lig'd 



Chap. II. The Search after Truth. 5 

lig'd to reft upon what has been already reprefented, and ceafe from its Agitation and Calling 
about ; 'tis this Acquiefcence of the Will which is properly i judgment or Reafoning. Thus be- 
caufe this Acquiefcence or Judgment is not left Free, when things ftrike us with that Evident Con- 
viction, we fanlie likewife that it is not Voluntary. 

But as long as there is any Obfcurity in the Subject we confider, and we are not perfectly afflir'd, 
we have difcover'd all that's neceflaryto the Refolution of the Queftion, as it moft commonly 
happens in thofe which are abftrufe -and difficult, and include many Relations; we are free to 
deny our Confent, and the Will may ftill command the Vnderftanding, to apply it felf tpfomething ' 
new : Which makes us not fo averfe to believe that the Judgments we form on fuch kind of Subjects 
are Voluntary. 

Howbeit, the generality of Philofophers fuppofe that even the Judgments we form upon things 
obfcure, are no ways Voluntary, and will have the Confent to Truth in general, to bean Action, 
of the Vnderftanding, which they call Affenfus, to diftinguilh it from the Confent to Good, 
which they attribute to the Will, and term Confenfus ; but fee the caufe of their Diftindtion 
and Miftake. 

Which is, That in this irate of Life, we often evidently perceive fonie Truths, without any 
realbn to Doubt of them •, and fo the Will remains not indifferent in the Confent it gives to Truths 
lb manifeft, as has been juft explain'd : But 'tis not fo in point of Good, there being no Particu- 
lar Good we know, but we have reafon to doubt, whether we ought to Love it. Our Paflions 
and Inclinations, which we naturally have for Senfible Pleafures, are, though confus'd, yet, through 
the Corruption of our Nature, very ftrong Reafons, which render us cold and indifferent even 
in the Love of God himfelf : And fo we are manifeftly fenfible of our Indifference, and are inward- 
ly convinc'd, we make ufe of our Liberty in our Loving GOD. 

But we do not in like manner apprehend that we imploy our Liberty in Confenting to 'Truth, 
efpecially when accompanied with full Evidence and Convitlion ; which induces us to believe our 
Confem to Truth is not Voluntary : As if it was neceflary our Actions fhould be indifferent to be* 
come Voluntary, and that the BlefTed did not love God molt Willingly, without being diverted 
from it by fomething or other ; in like manner as we Confent to that evident Proportion that 
mice 2 are 4, without being diverted from the Belief of it by any (hew of a contrary Reafon. 

But to the end we may diftindtly difcover, what the difference is between the Confent of the Will 
to Truth, and its Confent to Goodnef , it is requifiteto know the difference which is found between 
Truth and Goodnefs, taken in the ordinary acceptation, and with reference to us. That difference 
confifts in this, That we have an Intereft and Concern in Goodnefs, but Truth does not at all 
affect, us: For Truth confifts only in the Relation which two things or more have between them* 
but Goodnefs confifts in the Relation of agreement which things have with our felves, Gcometri- 
which is the reafon that the Will has but One Action in refpect of Truth, which is its Acquie- «<*»* love 
icence in, or Confent to, the Reprefentation of the Relation which is betwixt things ; and that n . ot Truth > 
it hasraw in refpect of Goodnef, namely, its Acquiefcence in, or Confent to, the Relation of agree- ^llwkdg 
ment the thing has with our felves, and its Love or Tendency towards that thing, which actions of Truth, 
are extreamly different, though they are ufually confounded : For there is a great deal of diffe- tbo it be 
rence betwixt limply Acquiefcing, and being carried to love the thing which the Mind repre- otberwife 
fents, fince we often Acquiefce in things we could gladly wifh were not, and which we have an^' 
averfion to. 

Now upon a due confideration of things, it will vifibly appear; That 'tis ever the Will which 
Acquiefces, not only in things if they be agreeable to it, but the Reprefentation of things ; and 
that the reafon of the Will's Acquiefcing always in the Reprefentation of things of the cleareft 
Evidence, is, as we have already faid, becaufe there is no farther Relation in them neceflary to 
be confider'd, which the Vnderftanding has not already throughly difcufs'd : Infottiuch that 'tis, as 
it were, neceffary for the Will to leave off difquieting and tireing it felf in vain, and to reft fatis- 
fy'd in a full aflurance, that it is not deceived, fince there is nothing left, to put the Vnderftdriek 
ing upon a frefh Inquiry. 

This is efpecially to be obferv'd, that in the Circumftances we are under, we have but a very 
imperfect Knowledge of things, and confequently there is an abfolute neceflity we fhould have 
this Liberty of Indifference whereby we are impower'd to withold our felVeS from giving 
our Confent. 

For the better difcovering this Neceflity, it muft be confider'd, that we are carry'd by our 
Natural Inclinations to the im bracing Truth and Goodnef ; fo that the Will, never reaching after 
things, but what the Mind has fome notice and apprehenfion of, muft needs purfue that which 
has the Face and Abearance of Truth arid Goodnef. But becaufe all that has the look of Truth 
and Good, is not always what it appears to be ; it is plain that if the Will had not this Liberty, 
but muft infallibly and neceffarily have embrac'd every thing that came cloath'd with an Abea- 
rance of Truth and Goodnef, it would have almoft ever been Deceived. Whence probably it 
might be concluded, That the Author of its Being, was the Author of its Errors and Seducements. in. 

We have therefore a Liberty given us by God, that we might avoid falling into Ejror, and all tvbat ufe 
the Evils confequent upon Errors, by not refting with a full Aflurance upon Probabilities, but-^°" w i s 
only upon Truth ; that is, by commanding the Mind, with an indefatigable Application, to Mrlihem 
examine every thing till it has fully enlightned and unravell'd all that comes under its Examina- tbatwene- 
tions. ' For Truth generally comes attended with Evidence, and Evidence confifts in a clear vermayte 

C and *««''• 



6 K Male bran ch-e Concerning Book I; 

and diflinft View of all the Parts and Relations of the Object which are neceflary to give a cer- 
tain and well-grounded Judgment. 

The ufe then we fhould make of our Liberty is to I M PLOY IT AS FAR AS IT 
WILL GO. That is, never to confent to any thing whatever until we are, as it were, forc'd 
^o't, by the fecret Reproaches of our Reafon. 

To lttbmit our felves to the falfe Appearance of Truth, is to inflave our felves contrary to the 
Will of God} but honeflly to yield to the inward Reproaches of our Reafon, which accom- 
pany the Denial of our Submiffion unto Evidence, is to obey the Voice of Eternal Truth, which 
fpeaks within us. Here then are Two Rules founded upon what I have been faying, which are the 
moll neceflary of all others, both for Speculative Sciences and Morality, and which may be look'd 
on as the Foundation of all Humane Sciences. 
IV* The First which refpecls the Sciences is this : A Manfiiould never give an entire Confent, but only 

General f0 p ro pft t i ons which appear fo evidently true, that he cannot deny it them without feeling an internal Pain y 
*E"voL- an d the fecret Vpbraidings of his Reafon: that is, without being plainly convinc'd, he would make 
ing Error an ill life of his Liberty^ in cafe he mould refufe to give his Confent, or would extend its Power 
and. sin. over things where it has no Right, or Jurifdi&ion. 

The Second relating to Morality is this* A Man ought never to fix his Love abfolutely on any Good, 

if he can without Remorfe refufe to Love it. From whence it follows, That nothing but God ought 

to be Loved abfolutely, and independently. For He alone it is, that we cannot forbear Loving in 

that Nature without an inward Remorfe,that is,without evident Convi&ion of doing Ill,upon Sup- 

pofition we have arriv'd to the Knowledge of Him, through the means of- Reafon or of 

Faith. 

A necepry But it muft here be obferv'd, That when things which we perceive come recommended with 

inflexion ftrong Probability, we are extreamly ready to Believe them. We feel our felves in Pain, when 

°Fu!es tW ° vve w *^ not f u ^ r Perfuafion to Break in upon us ; infomuch that were we not very cautious,, 

we mould be in danger of Confenting to them, confequently of being Deceiv'd •, for 'tis a great 

Chance, whether Truth be found entirely to agree with the Probability. And for this Reafon, I 

haveexprefly put in the two Rules ; That nothing fiwuld be confented to, without palpable Convittion, 

that Evil ufe would be made of a Marfs Liberty in not Confenting. 

But though we find our felves moll readily inclin'd to Confent to a Probability, or a likelihood, 
- yet if we would be at the pains of making Reflexion, whether we perceive our felves evidently 
oblig'd to confent to it, we fhould doubtlefs find we were not. For if this likelihood be founded 
upon the Impreflions of our Senfes, (a likelihood by the way that very ill deferves the Name) a 
Man finds himfelf readily difpos'd to yield confent to it. But no other Caufe can be aflign'd for 
this, but fome Paflion or general Affection he has for that which affects or concerns the Senfes, as 
fhall be fufficiently Ihewn in the following Difcourfe. _ 

But if the likelihood proceeds from fome Conformity with Truth, as ordinarily Probable No- 
tices are True, taken in a certain Senfe ; then if a Man examines his own Breafl, he will find 
himfelf inclin'd to do two things ; The one is to Believe, and the other to make farther Inquiry 
Hill : But he will never find himfelf fo fully perfuaded, as to think he does evidently ill, if he does 
not Confent at all. 

Now thefe two Inclinations, a Man has in refpect of Things Probable, are very Good. For He 
may and ought to give his Confent to Things Probable or Verifimilar taken in a Senfe which de- 
notes the Image of Truth ; but he ought not however to yield an entire Confent, as we have 
precaution'd in the Rule ; and he mull examine all the latent lides, and faces yet undifcover'd ; 
fo as to enter fully into the Nature of the thing, and to diflinguifh what is True from what is 
Falfe, and then to give an entire Confent if the Evidence oblige him to it. 

He muft then be well accuftom'd to diflinguifh Truth from Probability, by examining himfelf 
inwardly, as I have been Explaining : For 'tis for want of this Care of Examining a Man's felf 
in this Nature, that he perceives himfelf Touch'd and Affected almofl in the fame manner, by 
two different things ; For, in fine, 'tis of thegreatefl Confequence to make a good ufe of this 
Liberty by perpetually bridling in our Confent, and Affection to things, till we find our felves, 
as it were, forc'd to let them go, by the Commanding Voice of the Author of Nature, which I 
call'd before the Reproaches of our Reafon, and the Remorfe of our Confciences. 

All the Duties of Spiritual Beings, as well Angels as Men, confift principally in the good ufe 
of this Liberty ; and we may fay, without any fcruple, That if they carefully Imploy their Li- 
berty, and not prepofleroufly render themfelves Haves to Lyes and Vanity, they are in the ready 
way to the greatefl Perfection they are naturally capable of ; Provided, in the mean time, their 
Vnderftanding Hands not idle, and that they are careful continually to excite it to new Difcove- 
ries, and that they render themfelves difpos'd for the Reception of greater Truths, by perpetu- 
ally Meditating on Subjects worthy of their Attention. 

For that the Mind may advance to its Perfe&ion, it will not fuffice a Man conflantly to make ufe 
of its Liberty, by Confenting to nothing at all ; like thofe Men who take Pride in knowing nothing, 
in doubting and boggling at every thing in Nature: Nor on the other hand muft he Confent to 
all things like many Others, who fear nothing fo much as to be Ignorant of any thing, and pre- 
tend to Univerfal Knowledge. But he muft make fo good ufe of his Vnderftanding, by continual 
Meditations, as to find himfelf in a Capacity of being able to Confent to what it reprefents, with- 
out Fear or Danger of being Deceiv'd. 

CHAP. 



Chap. III. The Search after Truth j 

CHAP. IIL 

I; The Anfwers to feme Obje&ions. II. Objervations upon what has been 

faid concerning the Necejfity of Evidence* 

V"~ ""l I S no hard thing to forefee that the Pra&ice of the Firft Rule, which I have been 
treating of in the foregoing Chapter, will not go very well down with a great part 
M of Mankind ; But efpecially with thofe Imaginary Philofophers, who pretend to the 
Knowledge of every thing, but really know nothing at all : Who pleafe themfelves in talking 
Pofitively upon the moft difficult Subje&s, and yet are certainly at the fame time Ignorant of 
the more Ordinary and Eafie. 

I queftion not but they would be ready to fay with Ariflotle, That Abfblute Certainty is no It 
where to be fought for, but in the Ma.therha.tich ; That Phyficks and Moral Philofophy are fuch Sci- The An* 
ences as take up with meer Probability. That Des-Cartes was very much out in his Delign dffeer to 
handling Phyficks like Geometry ; and that for that Reafonhehad no better Succefs. That 'tis^^' e ° 
not poffible for Men to arrive to the Knowledge of Nature, that her Secret Springs and Move- 
ments lie too deep to be pierc'd by an Humane Mind j with a great deal more of fuch fine Things 
as thefe, which they put off with Pomp and Oftentation, and which they fupport with the Au- 
thority of a vaft Flight of Authors, whofe Names they can repeat, and out of which they can 
quote a PafTage on Occaflon^ and this is fuificient for them to plume themfelves and look 
big upon. 

I would heartily beg of thefe Gentlemen, they would leave off talking of thofe things which 
they themfelves acknowledge they do not Underftand , and would put a flop to the ridiculous 
Motives of their Vanity, by ceafing to compofe large Volumes on thofe Subje&s which-, by their 
own Confeffion, they Know nothing of 

But I would have thofe Men ferioully examine, whether one of thefe two Things is not ab- 
folutely NecefTary, either to fall into Error, or never to give an entire Confent, except to things 
entirely Evident ; Whether the Reafon that Geometry is ever attended with Truth, may not be 
afcrib'd to the Geometricians Obfervation of that Rule : And whether the Errors fome have 
fallen into touching the Quadrature of the Circle, the Duplication of the Cube, and fome other 
very difficult Problems, have not proceeded from an heady and conceited rafhnefs which has pof- 
fefs'd them with Likelihoods, and made them pafs for Truths. 

Let them confider likewife on another hand, whether the Caufe of Error and Confufion's 
reigning fo much in the Ordinary Philofophy, may not be imputed to the Philofophers content- 
ing themfelves with Probability, very eafie and obvious to be met with, and highly advantagious 
to their Vain Humour and their Interefls ? Do not we almoft every where find an infinite Diver- 
fity of Opinions upon the fame Subjects, and confequently infinite Errors ? Notwithstanding a 
prodigious number of Difciples give way to their own Seducements, and fubmit themfelves 
blind-fold to the Authority of thefe Philofophers, without fo much as Underftanding what their 
Opinions are. 

It is true there are fome of them that after twenty or thirty Years time loft, confefs they have 
learnt nothing by their Reading ; but yet this their Confeffion is not fo Ingenuous as it fhould be. 
They think it requifite firft to prove after their falhion,that nothing can be known-, and after that 
they will make Confeffion of their Ignorance, as Believing then they have the Privilege of doing 
it without being laught at for their Pains. 

Yet were a Man difpos'd to entertain himfelf, he would not want a proper Subject for his 
Laughter and Diverfion, fhould he handfomely Interrogate them, concerning the Progrefs of 
their Learned Acquifitions : and were they in Humour to declare in particular all the Fatigues 
they have undergone in the Study and Purchace of Nothing. 

But though this their Learn'd and Profound Ignorance deferves to be well rally'd, yet it feems 
not amifs to fpare them at prefent, and to commiferate thofe who have fpent fo many Years in 
Learning nothing but that falfe Propofition, the irreconcileable Enemy to all Science and to all 
Truth, That nothing can be known. 

Since then the Rule I have eftablifh'd is fo neceflary as has been feen, in the Search after Truth^ 
let no Man Cavil at the propofing it. And let not thofe, who will not be at the pains of obferving 
it themfelves, be forward to condemn fo celebrated an Author as Des-Cartes for following it, or 
according to their Notion, for indeavouring fo zeajoufly to follow it. , . 

They would not be fo peremptory to condemn him, did they know the Man ori whom they 
pafs fo rafh and unadvis'd a Sentence, and did they not read his Works as they do Fables and 
Romances, which they take up to entertain their idle Minutes, but never to Study or be Inflru- 
dted in. Would they Meditate with that Author ,they might probably ftill find in themfelves fome 
Notions and Scatter'd Seeds of Truth, which he teaches, that would grow up, and unfold 
themfelves in fpight of fo difadvantagious a Load of miftaken Learning which oppreffes them." 
The Matter that fpeaks and teaches us within; challenges our Submiffion to him rather than to 
the Authority of the greateft Philofophers ; He takes pleafure in intruding us, provided we ap- 

w 



& F. Malebranche Concerning Book L 

ply our Minds to what he fays. 'Tis by Meditation and a very exaft Attention we Inquire of 
him •, and 'tis by a certain internal Convidion and the fecret Lafhes and Reproaches felt upon our 
Non-fubmiffion that he anfwers us. 

We ought in fuch wife to read the Works of Men, as not to expeft to receive Inftrudion from 
Men : We mult confult Him who Enlightens the World, that with the Reft of the World he 
may Enlighten us. And if he fails to Enlighten us, after we have cbnfulted him, 'tis dOubtlefs, 
becaufe we have ill confulted him. 

Whether then we read Anftotle or whether we read Des-Cartes, we muft not inftantly believe 
either Ariftotle or Des-Cartes: But we mould only Meditate as they have done, or as they ought 
to have done, with all the Earneftnefs and Attention we are capable of, and thereupon Obey the" 
Voice of our common Mafter, and honeftly yield up our Gonfent to that Internal Convidion, and 
thofe Motions we find in us upon our Meditation. 

This'bcing done, it may be allow'd a Man to pals a Judgment for or againft an Author. But 
he muft firft have digefted the Principles of Des-Cartes and Ariftotle's Philofophy before he can 
rejed the one, and approve the other ; before he can maintain concerning the Latter, that no one 
Phenomenon of Nature can eVer be explain'd by the Principles peculiar to him, as they have been 
of no nfe for this two thoufand Years, though his Philofophy hath been the Study of the molt In- 
genious Men in moft parts of the World : And on the contrary, before he can boldly pronounce 
of the Other, that he hath penetrated thofe recefles of Nature that lay deepeft conceal'd from the 
Eyes of Men, and hath open'd to them a moft certain and infallible way of Difcovering all the 
Truths 'tis poflible for a limited understanding to Comprehend. 

But not to dwell upon the Notion we may conceive of thefe two Philofophers, and of all others j 
let us ever look upon them as Men : And let not thofe of Arift ode's Party take it ill, if after they 
have travell'd fo many Ages in the Dark without finding themfelves one ftep farther advanced than 
at their fetting out ; there are fome at laft that have a Mind to fee clearly what they do : And if 
after the former have fuffer'd themfelves to be led like the blind, there are thofe who remember 
they have Eyes with which they will attempt to condud themfelves. 

Let us then be fully perfuaded that this Rule, viz. That an entire Confent ftwuld never be given, but 
to things evidently perceived, is the molt necefiary of all others in the Search after Truth; and let 
not our Mind embrace any thing as True, which is not accompany'd with all the Evidence it de- 
mands. 'Tis requilite we fhould be perfuaded of this to disburthen us of our Prejudices ; And 
'tis abfolutely necefiary we fhould entirely quit our Prejudices, to enter into the Knowledge of 
Truth, for as much as there is an abfolute Neceffity that our Mind be purify'd before it be inlight- 
ned. Sap entia prima Stultitia caruiffe. 
**■ But Before I conclude this Chapter, 'tis necefiary to obferve three Things. The Firft is, That 

xiomoT' 1 fP ea k not here of things of Faith, which have no Evidence attending them, as have Natural Sci- 
wbat has ences : The Reafon of which feems to be this, That we can have no Perception of Things but 
been fdi from the Idea's we have of them. Now the Idea's we have, are only given us by God, according 
concerning t0 our Exigencies and the need we have of them to conduct us in the Natural Order of Things, 
trJFSwt accordm S t0 w hich he has Created us. So that the Myfteries of Faith being of a Supernatural Or- 
denL. *'' der, we need not wonder if we want that Evidence, fince we want the Idea's of them ; becaufe 
our Souls were Created by vertue of a General Decree, through which we have all the Notions 
see then- that are necefiary for us, but the Myfteries of Faith have receiv'd their Eftablifhment only from 
luflrations. an Qr ^ er Q f Grace . wn j crij in our ordinary way of Conception, is a Decree pofteriour to this Or- 
der of Nature, 

Myfteries then of Faith muft be diftinguifiVd from things of Nature .- We ought equally to fub- 
mit to Faith and to Evidence ; but in the concernments of Faith, we muft not look for Evidence ; 
as in thofe of Nature, we ought not to take up with Faith : That is, with the Authority of Philo- 
fophers. In a word, to be a Believer, 'tis requir'd to Afent blindly, but to be a Philofopher, it 
is necefiary to See plainly. 

'Tis not however to be deny'd but there are^ fome Truths befides thofe of Faith, for which it 
would be unreafonable to demand indifputable Demonftrations, as are thofe which relate to Mat- 
ter of Fact in Hiftory, and other things which have their dependence on the Will of Men. For 
there are two kinds of Truth ; the one Necejfary, the other Contingent. I call Nccefary Truths 
thofe which are immutable by their Nature, and thole which have been fix'd and determin'd by 
the Will of God, which is not.fubjed to Change. All other forts of Truth are Contingent. Ma- 
thc.naticks, Phyficks, Metaphyfuks, as alfo a great part of Morality contain Necejfary Truths : Hi- 
ftory, Grammar, Private Right, or Cuftoms, and fuch other things as depend on the changeable 
Will of Man, contain only Contingent Truths. 

We demand therefore an exad Obfervation of the Rule we have been eftablifhing, in the Search 
of Necejfary Truths, the Knowledge of which may be calfd Science -, and we muft be content 
with the greateft Probability in Hiftory, which includes the Knowledge of things Contingent. 
For under the general Name of Hiftory may be concluded the Knowledge of Languages, Cuftoms, 
as alfo of the different Opinions of Philofophers ; when Men have only learnt them by Memory, 
without having either Evidence or Certainty concerning them. 

The Second thing to be Obferv'd, is that in Morality, Politicks and Medic'me, and in all Pratti- 
c'al Scienter, we are obliged to be content with Probability; Not Univerfally, but upon occalion -, 
not becaufe it fatisfies the Mind, but becaufe the Inftance is preffing : And if a Man fhould al- 
ways delay Actine ti'1 *e had nerfefl: Allurance of Succefs, the Opportunity would be often 

loit. 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. $ 

infl- Rut thourfi it falls out that a Man muft inevitably aft, yet he, fhould in afting doubt of the 
iiirrrfsof what he does : A"d he fhould indeavour to make foch Advances in Sciences, as to be 
able on Emergencies to aft with greater Certainty $ For this fhould be the conftarit end of all 
Mens Stndv and Employment, who make any ufe of Thought. >. J - - ■■>.-■ 

The Third and laft thing is this, That we fhould not abfolutely defpife Probabilities, fince it 
often happens that many of them in Conjunction, have as convincing a force, as nloft evident 
Deraonftrations. Of which Nature there are infinite Examples to be found in Phyfich and Mo- 
rality ' So that 'tis often expedient to amafs together a fufflcient number ot them in fubje&s not 
otherwife Demonftrable, in order' to come to the Knowledge of Truth, impoffible to be found 

^Aiidnov/ 1 muft needs confefs that the Law I impofe is very Rigorous" and Severe ; That there 
are abundance of Thofe who had rather renounce Reafoning at all, than Reafon on fuch Condi- 
tions • That 'tis impoffible to run fo faff, with fuch retarding Circumfpedions. However, it 
muft be granted me, that a Man (hall walk with greater Security in obferving it, and that hither- 
to thofe who have march'd fo haftily, have been oblig'd to return upon the fame Ground l Befides^ 
there are a great number of Men who will agree with me inthis,That fince Monfieur Des-Cartes has 
difcover'd more Truths in Thirty Years, than all the Phibfophers that preceded him, meerlyforhis 
Submiffion to that Law ; if many others would ftudy Philofophy as he has done, we fhould in time 
be acquainted with the greateft part of thofe things which are necelfary to make Life as happy s§ 
is poffible, upon an Earth which God has Curs'd. 



CHAR IV. 

I. Of the Occafional Caufes of Error y whereof there are Five Principal 
II. The general Defign of the whole Work. III. The particular Defign 
of the Fir% Book. 

WE have feen from what has been faid, that a Man falls not into Error, but for want 
of making a due ufe of his Liberty ; that 'tis for want of curbing that eagernefs of 
the Will, and moderating its Paffion for the bare appearances of Truth, that he is cte- 
ceiv'd : And that Error confifts only in the Confem of the Will, which has a greater Latitude than 
the Perception of the Underftanding, fince we fhould never err if we only fimply jadgd according 
as we perceived. 

But though, to fpeak properly, there is no other caufe of Error, than the ill ufe of our Li- L 
berty, it may notwithstanding be faid, we have feveral Faculties that are the Caufes of our ~&r- f the0e - 
rorsi not Real Caufes, biit fuch as may be term'd - Occafional : All the ways of our Perceiving are caZfof 
fo many occafions of Deceiving us. . For fince our falfe judgments include two things, namely the nYBriots\ 
Confent of the Will, and the Perception of the Vnder funding, it is manifeft that all the ways of our and that 
Perception, may afford us fome occafion or other of falling into Error, forafmuch as they may in- there f* 
cline us to rafli and. precipitate Confents. . ciwl™' 

But becaufe it is neceffary firft to make the Soul fenfible of her WeaknefTes and Wandrings, in " p 
order to poffefs Her with juft Defires of a Deliverance from them, and that fhe may with grea- 
ter eafe fhake off her Prejudices ; We will endeavour to make an exaft Divifion of her Mariners 
of Perception ; which may ferve as fo many Heads, to one or other of which, may be referr'd 
as we proceed, the different Errors whereunto we are obnoxious. 

The Soul has three feveral ways of Perception : By Pare Intelletl, by Imagination, and by the 
Senfes. 

By Pare Intellects, fhe perceives things Spiritual, Univerfals, Common Notions, The Idea of 
Perfe&ion, that of a Being infinitely perfed, and in general ^11 her own thoughts, when fhe 
knows them by a Reflexion made upon her felf : 'Tis likewife by Pare Intelletl fhe perceives Ma- 
terial things, Exteniion with its Properties. For 'tis the pure Underftanding only which is capa- 
ble of Perceiving a Circle, and a perfect Square, a Figure of a thoufand fides, and fuch like 
things. Such fort of Perceptions bear the name of Pare Intellections or Pare Perceptions, fince 
there is no neceffity of the Mind's forming Corporeal Images in the Brain to reprefent 
them by. 

By Imagination, the Soul only perceives things Material, when being Abfent (he makes thent 
prefent to her, by forming the Images of them in the Brain. This is the way whereby a Man 
Imagines all forts of Figures, a Circle, a Triangle, a Face, an Horfe, Towns and Fields,' whe- 
ther he has already feen them or not. This fort of Perceptions, we may call Imaginations^ be- 
caufe the Soul reprefents to her felf thefe things, by framing Images of them in the Brain. And 
for as much as Spiritual things canrtot be reprefented by any Image, it follows, the Soul cannot 
imagine them \ which is a thing worthy to be remember'd. 

Laftly, By Senfc, the Soul perceives only Senfible, grofs, and ruder Objects, when being prefent- 
they caufe . an Impreffion on the external Organs of her Body.' Thus it is the Soul fees things' 

E> plait* 



10 K Malebranche Concerning Book I. 

plain and rugged prefent to her Eyes-- thus me knows the Hardnefs of the Iron, the point of a 
Sword, and the like ; and this kind of Perceptions one may call Sentiments or Senfations. 

The Soul then has no more than thefe three ways of Perceiving ; which will eafily be granted 
if we confider that the things we perceive are either Spiritual or Material. If they be Spiritual 
they are perceptable only by the Pure Vnderfianding : If they be Material, they are either Pre- 
fent or Abfent. If they be Abfent, the ordinary way of the Soul's reprefenting them is by the 
Imagination i But if they be Prefent, the Soul can perceive them by the Impreffions they make upon 
her Senfes. And thus Our Souls are not capable of more than a three-fold Perception, by Pure 
Intellect, by Imagination, and by Senfe. 

Thefe three Faculties therefore may be lookt upon as fo many certain Heads, to which we may 
reduce the Errors of Men, and the Caufes of their Errors, and fo avoid the confufion into 
which the multitude of them would infallibly call us, mould we talk of them without Order or 
Method. 

But moreover, our Inclinations and our Paflions aft very ftrongly upon us : They dazzle our 
Mind with their falfe Lights, and overcafl and fill it with Clouds and Darknefs. Thus Our In- 
clinations and our Paflions engage us in an infinite number of Errors, when we fuffer our felves 
to be guided by that falfe Light, and abufive Glare which they produce within us. We muft 
then, together with the three Faculties of the Mind, confider them as the Sources of our Devia- 
tions and Delinquencies, and add to the Errors of Senfe, Imagination, and Pure Intellect, thofe 
which may be charg'd upon the Paflions and Natural Inclinations. And fo all the Errors of Men 
and the Caufes of them, may be reduc'd to five Heads, and we fhall treat of them according to 
that Order. 5 

II. Firft, We fhall fpeak of the Errors of the Senfes; Secondly, Of the Error? of Imagination • 

lie Gent- Thirdly, Of the Errors of the Pure IntelkEl ; Fourthly, Of the Errors of our Inclinations ; and 
r *r jf e { g ? Fifthly, Of the Errors of the Paflions. And thus, having made an Eflay to rid the Soul of the Errors 
Work. ° C which flie ' s fub J ea to, we hztt-) Laflly, lay down a General Method to Conduct her in the Search 
cf Truth. 
HI. We will begin with an Explication of the Errors of our Senfes, or rather, of the Errors into 

the pani- which We fall for want of making the due ufe, we fhould do of our Senfes : And here we fhall 
mlar p e - not f muc h defcend to our Particular Errors, which are almoft infinite, as fix upon the general 
S Y 00 j; Caufes of thefe Errors, and fuch things as feem moft neceffary to inform us of the Nature of the 
' Humane Mind. 




CHAP. V. 

. e Senses. 

I. Two ways of explaining bow they were corrupted by Sin. IT. That y th 
our Liberty , and not our Senfes^ which u the true Caufe of our Errors. 
III. A Rule for avoiding Error in the ufe of our Senfes. 



U 



P O N an attentive Confideration of the Senfes and Paflions of Man, we find them fo 
well proportioned to the End for which they were given us, that we can by no means 
agree with thofe who fay, they are to all intents and purpofes debauch'd and fpoil'd by 
Original Sin. But that it may appear it is not without Reafon we are of a different Opinion, it is 
neceflary to Explain, in what manner we may conceive the Order and Regularity which was to be 
feen in the Faculties and Paflions of our Firft Parent in his State of Righteoufnefs, and the Chan- 
ges, and Diforders that were confequent to his Fall. Now there are Two ways of Conceiving 
thefe things ; of which this is the Firft. 
I, That it feems to be a common Notion, That it is neceffary to the right ordering of Affairs, that 

Two ways the Soul fhould perceive lefTer or greater Pleafures, according to the proportion of the Littlenefs 
of explain- or Greatnefs of the Goods which fhe enjoys. Pleafure is an Inftinct of Nature, or to fpeak clea- 
oht senfes rer ' '^ an I m P reu ^ on °f G°d himfelf, who inclines us towards fome Good ; which Impreffion 
were cor- fhould be fo much ftronger, by how much that Good is greater. According to which Principle, 
rupted by it feems not to be contefted that our firft Parent before his Sin, coming frefh out of the Hands 
*'»• of his Maker, found greater Pleafures in the moft folid Goods, than in thofe that were not fo. 
Wherefore fince he was created in order to Love God who created him, and that God was his 
true Good ; it may be faid, God gave him a Tafte and Relifh of himfelf} That heinclin'd him 
to the Love of the Divine Perfection, by a Scnfe of Pleafure, and that he poffefs'dhim with 
thofe Internal Satisfactions in his Duty that counter- balanc'd the greateft Pleafures of the Senfes, 

whereof 



Chap. V. * he Search after Truth. \ j 

whereof fince the State of Sin, Man is altogether infenfible, without a Supernatural Ajfifiance and 
particular gift of Grace. , , ... 

Notwithftanding, fince he had a Body which God d.efign'd he fhould take care of, and look 
upon as a Part of himfelf, he gave him to Perceive by the Mediation of his Senfes, Plea- 
fures like thofe we our felves are fenfible of, in the ufe of things which are proper for, and adap- 
ted to the Prefervation of our Life and Being. , 

We prefume not here to determine whether the Firft Man before his Fall, had a Power to hin- 
der agreeable or difagreeable Senfations, in the inftant that the principal part of his Brain was 
agitated by the Aftual Impreffion of Senfible ObjeCts : Poffibly he had that Sovereignty over him- 
felf became of his Subjection to the Will of God, though the contrary Opinion feems more pro- 
bable. For though Adam might ftop the Commotions of the Blood and Spirits, and the Vibra- 
tions of the Fibres of his Brain, which Obje&s excited irt it, becaufe being in a Regular State, 
his Body muft needs fiibmit to his Mind \ yet it is not probable, he was able to prevent the Senfa- 
tions of Objedts at the time he had not ftopt the Motions they produe'd in that part of his Body, 
to which his Soul was immediately united. For the Union of the Soul and Body confuting prin- 
cipally in the mutual Relation there is betwixt Senfations, and the Motions of the Organs, this 
Union would rather feem Arbitrary than Natural, if Ada m had been capable of hind ring Senfa- 
tion when the Principal Part of his Body receiv'd.an Impreffion from thofe round about it. How- 
ever I declare for neither of the two Opinions. 

The Firft Man therefore felt Pleafure irt that which was Perfective of his Body, as he felt it in 
that which was Perfeftive of his Soul ; And becaufe he was conftituted in a Perfect State, he found 
that of the Soul far greater than that of the Body. Thus it was infinitely eafier for him to pre- 
ferve his Righteoufnefs, than for Us without the Grace of JESVS CHRIST-^ fince without 
this we have no Delight or Satisfaction in our Duty. Albeit, he misfortunately fuffer'd himfelf 
to be fedue'd : He loll that Uprightnefs by his Difobedience 5 and the Principal Change he un- j.Gregoro 
derwent, and which was the caufe of all the Confufion of his Senfes and his Paffions was,that GOD, homii. 3/0 
by way of punitive Juftice, withdrew himfelf from him, and would no longer be his Good-, or u pon the' 
rather Ceas'd to make him fenfible of that Pleafure, Which pointed out GOD, as his Sovereign Go fP sls ° 
Good. So that Senfible Pleafures, which only earry'd him to the Injoyment of the Goods of the 
Body, being left alone and no longer counterpois'd by thofe, which drew him before to his True 
and Proper Good ; the clofe Union that he had with GOD was wonderfully loofen'd, and that 
which he had with his Body, as much ftrengthned or increas'd. Senfible Pleafure, having got 
the Dominion, debauch'd his * Moral Powers, by fattening them upon all Senfible ObjeCts , and * Vr. Son 
this Corruption of his Morals darkned his -f- Intellectual Parts, by turning him from that Light t f ur - 
which Enlightned him, and inducing him to form his Judgments on things, only from the Rela- jZ^v Son 
tion or Analogy they could have to his Body. 

But as to the Nature of the thing it felf, it cannot be laid, That the Change which happen'd on 
Part of the Senfes was very confiderable. For as when two Weights are plac'd iri 'Equilibrium in a 
Balance, if you take away one of them, the oppofite Scale will be weigh*d down by the other, 
without any alteration on part of the former weight, fince that itill remains the fame : So after 
Sin, the Pleafures of Senfe bow'd and weigh'd down the Soul towards Senfible Objects, for 
want of thofe Internal Delectations which, before Sin, 'countei'pois'd that Inclination unto Sen- 
fible Good j but without any fo Siibftantial a Change in point of the Senfes, as is generally 
Imagin'd. 

I come now to the Second Way of accounting for the Diforders introdue'd by Sin, which is 
certainly more Reafonahle than that we have been explaining. It is very different from it, be- 
caufe it is founjied on a different Principle ; yet both thefe ways are very confiftent and agreeable, 
as to what refpects the Senfes. 

Being we are made up of a Body and a Mind, there are two forts of Goods to imploy our 
Refearches about ; the Goods of the Body, and the Goods of the Mind. We have likewife two 
means of Difcovering whether a thing be good or ill for us, either by ufing the Mind alone, or 
by the ufe of the Mind in Conjunction with the Body. We can difcover our Good by a clear 
and evident Knowledge ; we can difcover it likewife. by a dark and confus'd Senfation. Reafon 
teaches me that Righteoufnefs is Amiable 5 My Tafte informs me that fuch a Fruit is Good. 
The Beauty of Righteoufnefs is not Senfible, nor the Goodnefs of a Fruit Intelligible. The 
Goods of the Body deferve not the application of the Mind, which GOD has created only 
for himfelf: It mult needs be then, That the Mind difcovers fuch kind of Goods without 
Examination, and by the Ihort and incontroverted Proof of Senfation. Stones are not fit for 
Nourifhment, the Tryal is a convincing Argument, and the Tafte alone has made all Mankind 
agree to it. 

Pleafure then and Pain are the Natural and undoubted Characters of Good and Evil ; I con- 
fefs it : But 'tis only fo in refpect of thofe things, which, having no Power of being Good and 
Evil in themfelves, cannot be known for fuch by a Knowledge clear and evident ; 'tis fo in re- 
gard of thofe things only, which, being inferiour to the Mind, can neither Punifh nor Reward it, 
In fine, 'tis only fo in point of fuch things and Objelts as are undeferving of the Soul's Applica- 
cation, and concern about them ; fuch things as GOD, not willing we fhould be taken up with, 
inclines us to only by Jnftintl, that is, by Agreeable or Difagreeable Senfations. 

But as for GOD, who is the True and only Good of the Mind, who is alone above it, who 
alone can Reward it in a thou fand different ways j- who is only worthy of its Application, and 
who is under no Fear of not being found Amiable by thofe that know him j he is not con- 
tent 



12 F. Malebranche Concerning Book I. 

tent to be belov'd by a blind and InftinBive Love, he will be lov'd by a Rational Love, and a 
Love of Choice. 

If the Mind law only in Bodies what was really in them, without being fenfible of what was 
not therein, it could hot poflibly Love them, nor make ufe of them without great Pain and Re- 
.htttancy ; fo that it is as it were necettary they fhould appear Agreeable, by producing Senfations, 
of which themfelves are Dettitute. But 'tis far from being fo with GOD. 'Tis fufficient to fee 
him fuch as he is, to be inclin'd to love him as we ought : Nor is there any Neceffity he fhould 
imploy that Inflintl of Pleafure as a kind of Bait and Artifice to allure our Love, without de- 
ferving it: The Pleafiire which the Blefled enjoy in the Potteflion of G O D, is not fo much an 
Jnfiintl which inclines them to the Love of Him, as the Recommence of their Love. For it is not 
.for the fake of that Pleafure that they Love GOD, but becaufe they manifeftly know Him to 
be their True, their Only Good. 
see ibe ii- This being the Cafe, it ought to be concluded, That Adam was not invited to the Love of 
ivMrmons. q q j) inc \ t ^ e re ft f his Duty by a Preventing Pleafure ; forafmuch as the Knowledge which he 
had of G O D, as of his Good, and the Joy he was continually pottefs'd with, neceflarily confe- 
quent to the View of his Felicity, in his Uniting himfelf with GOV, were fufficient Motives 
to recommend his Duty to him, and to make his Actions more Meritorious, than if he had been, 
as it were, determin'd by a Preventing Pleafure : In this manner he was in perfect. Liberty. And 
'tis poflibly in this Capacity the Scripture means to reprefent Him to us in thefe words,- — - He 
Deus ab h' m f e tf wade Man from the beginning, and left him in the hand of his Counfel, to keep the Command- 
\n\i\o con- me nts, &c. Ecclef 15.14. That is, kept him clofely united to Himfelf, only through the clear 
ftituit ho- View he gave him of his Happinefs and his Duty, without alluring him to it by any Tafte of a 
minem, & Preventing Pleafure. But Experience has convine'd us, to the Eternal Reproach of Free Will, and 
[u • lt * tne Glory of G O D alone, of the Frailty Adam was obnoxious to, even in a State of fuch Perfect 
nuConfilii Order and Sublime Happinefs, as was that, he was poflefs'd of, before his Difobedience. 
Cm, adjecit But it cannot be faid Adam was inclin'd to the Searching out, and Ufing of Senfible things, 
mandata through a nice and exact Knowledge of the Relation and Correfpondence they might bear to his 
& prxcep- g oc jy. For, indeed, if it had been necefTary for him to have examin'd the Configurations of the 
Ec!t< u.° P arts °f an y F rurt ? thofe likewife of all the parts of his Body, and the Agreement and Difagree- 
" ment refulting to each other from their refpective Conttitution, before he could judge whether. 
as to the prefent Temperature of his Blood, and a thoufand other Difpolltions of his Body, 
that Fruit was good for his Nourifhment ;, it is plain that the whole Capacity of his Mind had 
been entirely fill'd up, with things altogether unworthy of its Application ; and that too to ve- 
ry little Purpofe, iince we fee he was not able to preferve himfelf long, though we fuppofe him 
fo accomplifh'd. 

Upon Confederation then that the Mind of Adam-was not Infinite, it fhould not betaken ill, 
that we fay he was not acquainted with all the Properties of Bodies that encompafs'd him ; flnce 
it is certain thofe Properties are Infinite. And if it be granted, which no Man of any Atten- 
tion can deny, that his Mind was not made to examine the Motions and Configurations of Mat- 
ter, but to be continually Intent on GO D; we need incur no Blame, in Maintaining, it had 
been a Diforder and Irregularity, at a time when all things fhould have been perfectly adjutted, 
if he had been oblig'd to call offhis Mind from the View of the Perfections of his Sovereign Good, 
to contemplate the Nature of a Fruit, and Examine whether it was fit to Nourifh him. 

Adam then was furnifht with Senfes like to ours, by which he was admonifh'd, without being 
taken off from the Contemplation of GOD, of what was necefTary for him to do for the Pre- 
servation of his Body : He was fenfible of Pleafures as we are, and alfo of preventing and inde- 
liberate Pains and Diflikes. But thofe Pleafures, and thofe Pains were incapable of- inflaving him, 
and rendring him Unhappy as they do us ; forafmuch as being abfolute Matter of all the Motions 
excited in his Body, he could quiet them in the fame inttant (if he defir'd it) that he was aware 
of them : And doubtlefs he always defir'd it in refpecl of Pain. Happy had we been, if he had done 
the fame thing in refpeft of Pleafure too, and had he not Voluntarily divore'd himfelf from the 
Union and Prefence of his GO D, by flittering the Capacity of his Mind to be fill'd with the Beau- 
ty, and the expected Sweets of a forbidden Fruit, or poflibly with a prefumptuous Joy kindled in 
his Soul,' upon Reflexion on his own Natural Perfections. 

But after he had Sinn'd, thofe Pleafures which before only refpectfully caution'd him •, and 
thofe Pains, which, not difturbing his Felicity, only gave him to underftand he was capable of lo- 
fing it, and becoming Miferable, preferv'd no longer that Deference and Submiffion. His Senfes 
and. his Paflions obey'd not his Orders, rebell'd againtt him, and enflav'd him as they do us to all 
kinds of Senfible Objects. 

Thus the Senfes and the Paflions in no wife ow'd their Birth to Sin, but only their Power of 
Tyrannizing over Sinners: And that Power was not fo much a Diforder on part of the Senfes, 
as it was of the Mind or the Will of Man, which having loofen'd the ftrift Union which they 
had with GOD, rccciv'd no longer that Light and that Strength, by means whereof they pre- 
ferv'd their Liberty and their Happinefs. 

Upon concluding thefe two Ways of Explaining the Diforders Sin has been the Caufe of, we 
ought to infer that there are two things necefTary to Re-inflate us in the Order of Nature. 
med? Thcfirftis this, That we fhould takeoff", from that weight which Jinks us down, and bends 
fortheDif-ui towards fenfible Goods, by a continual defalcation of our Pleafures, and by mortifying the 
"^'.^"^fenlibility of our Senfes by Repentance and Circumcilion of heart. 

■ ■ i in xbt World, and the FoundMion of Chrijiian Mortify. The 



Chap. VI. 3^ &m-& after Truth. i% 

The fecond is this,- That we ought to implore of G D the poize of his Grace, and that Pre- 
ventinz Deliffht which * JESVS CHRIST has particularly merited for us, without *Seettell~ 
which let us lighten the former Scale as much as we can, it will conftantly be lowermoft ; and lufiratior.:, 
(though never folittle heavier,) will infallibly fink us into Sin and Diforder. 

Thefe two things are absolutely neceflary to reftore us to, and continue us in our Duty. &ea* 
fon as we fee, agrees intirely with the Gofpel, by both which we are taught, that the Privation, 
Delegation, and Diminution of the Weight of Sin, are neceflary Preparatives for the Weight of 
Grace to re-eftablifh us and unite us unto GOD. 

But though in this State of Ours, we are under a Perpetual Obligation of warring with our 
Senfes yet we mould not conclude from thence, they are abfolutely corrupted, or diSorder'd. 
For if 'it be coniider'd, that they were given us for the Prefervation of our Body, we lhall find 
them acquit themfelves of their Duty fo excellently well, and conduct us in that juft and faithful 
manner to their End, that they feemtobe injurioully charg'd with Corrnptnefs and Irregularity i 
They fo readily advertife the Soul by Pleafure and Pain, by agreeable and difagi-eeable Tafts 
and other Senfations, of what fhe ought to do, or not to do, for the prefervation of life, 
that it cannot but be unreasonably faid, that this Order and this Exadtnefs are the confequents 

of Sin. . . ,'■•'« 

Our Senfes therefore are not fo Corrupted as is imagin'd, but 'tis that which is more Inward II. 
to the Soul, 'tis our Liberty which is corrupted. They are notour Senfes that deceive us, but rhiit our 
the Will, by its ralh and precipitate Judgments, leads us into Error. When, for inftance, we fee l ur er f^ s 
Light, it is molt certain that we fee Light •, when a Man feels Heat, he is not miftaken in be- u the true 
lievins; that he feels it, whether before or after the first Sin. But thus we deceive our felves caufiofout 
in judging that the Heat which is felt, is out of the Soul which feels it, as we fhall explain Errors - 

hereafter. . j 

The Senfes then would in no wife cart us into Error, did we not imploy our Liberty amifs, 
and judge of things upon their Report, without Sufficient Caution and Advertency. But becaufe 
it is very difficultto help this,and we are, as it were, fore'd to't, on the account of the Strift Union 
of our Soul and. Body, See in what manner we ought to behave our Selves in ufing them, that 
we may avoid falling into Error. 

We ought exaftly to obferve this Rule} Never to judge by the Senfes 'what things are in them- HI* 
felves, but only of the Relation they have to one another : Becaufe, indeed, the Senfes were not gi- r r A ^fr 
ven us for the knowing the Truth of things as they are in their own Nature, but only for the /^ ^rro'r 
Prefervation of our Body. in the ufi 

But that we may be altogether deliver'd from that- Facility and Inclination we have to follow of our sen* 
the Guidance of the Senfes in the Search after Truth, we fhall in the Succeeding Chapters, give a-'"* 
Summary of the moft Principal and General Errors into which they throw us, whereby the Truth 
of what we have been advancing wilt be manifeft and acknowledg'd. 



CHAP. VI. 

I. Of the Errors of Sight in refpeB of Extenfion abfolutely confiderd. 
II. A Continuation of thefe Errors about invifible Obje&s. III. Of the 
Errors of Sight touching Extenfion relatively confiderd. 

TH E Sight is the FirSt, the moft Noble and Comprehenfive of all the Senfes, infomuch 
that had it been given us for the Difcovery of Truth, it alone had had more to do 
than all the Other ; wherefore if we can overthrow the Authority the Eyes obtain over 
our Reafon, it will be Sufficient to undeceive us ; and to poffefs us with a general diftruft of all 
the other Senfes. 

Our bufinefs therefore is to make it appear, That we ought in no wife to rely on the TefHrrlo- 
ny of our Sight, in our Judgment of the Truth of things, as they are m their own Nature, but 
only in difcovering the Relation they have to the welfare and prefervation of our Body. That 
our Eyes generally deceive us in all the Representations they make of things, in the Magnitude, 
in the Figures, and Motions of Bodies, in Light and Colours, which are the only things we fee : 
That none of thefe things are really what they Seem to be, that all Mankind is miftaken in them, 
and that hereby we fall into other Errors numberlefs and infinite. - 

We begin with Extenfion. Lo ! then the Reafons that induce us to believe that our Eyes never of the Er* 
repreSent it to us Such as it is in it Self. With Glafles we difcover as often as wepleafe, Ani-ronofjigbt 
maismuch leSs than a grain of Sand, which is almoft invifible : * Nay, there have been Seen a;'^# eSo / 
thoufaad times lefs than they. Thefe animated Atoms walk and move no lefs than other Animals; E ™ e7, fi° n 
Therefore they muft have Legs and Feet, Bones in their Legs to Support them, Mufcles to move To^deTl 
them, Tendons and infinite Fibres in every Mufcle ; laftly, Blood or animal Spirits extreamly * Seethe 
Subtil and rehVd, either to fill or make thefe Mufcles move fucceffively. Without this it is imr'f° ur »*l <} 
pofiible to conceive they live, are nourifh'd, or tranflate their little Bodies into different places, r/ f ^ arh " 
according to the different Impreffions of Objeftsj or rather 'tis impoffible for thofe Men them- ^^g. 

E felves 



14 F. Male branch e Concerning Book I. 

felves have fpent all their Life in Anatomy, and in difclofing Nature, to imagine the number, 
the diverfity, the delicacy, of all the parts thefe little Bodies are necefTarily compounded of, 
whereby they live and perform all thofe things we fee them do. 

The Imagination is loft and confounded at fo incredible a littlenefs ; it cannot catch the va- 
nilhing parts, nor take hold of them, as being too little to be grafp'd by it : And though Reafon 
juftifies our AfTertion, the Senfe3 and Imagination withftand the Conviction, and bring us back to 
Doubt and Uncertainty. 

Our Sight is extreamly fhort and limited •, but it ought not to prefcribe limits to its Object : 
The Idea it gives us of Extenfion has very narrow bounds, but it does not from thence follow 
the bounds of Extenfion are fo. It is doubtlefs infinite in a certain Senfe ; and that diminutive 
part of Matter which is hidden from our Eyes is capable of containing a World, in which may 
be hid as many things, though lefs proportionably, as appear in this great World in which 
we live. 

Thefe little Creatures, which we have been fpeaking of, may poffibly have other little Ani- 
mals to prey upon them, and which are imperceptible to them by reafon of their unfpeakable 
fmallnefs, as the others are imperceptible to us. What an Hand-worm is in comparifon to us, 
That thofe little Animals are in refpecf of an Hand-worm ; and perhaps there may be in Na- 
ture lefs, and lefs ftill to infinity, proceeding in that prodigious proportion of a Man to an 
Hand- worm. 

We have Evident and Mathematical Demonftrations of the Divisibility of Matter in infinitum, 
and that's enough to perfuade us there may be Animals, ftill lefs and lefs than others in infini- 
tum, though our Imagination is frighted andftartsat fuch a conception. GOD made Matter 
only to frame his wonderful Works out of it; wherefore fince we are certain that there are 
no parts of it, the Minu^enefs whereof is capable of giving Limits to his power, in the forma- 
tion of thefe little Animals, why mould we unreafonably confine and lefTen the Idea of an In- 
finite Artift by meafuring the Greatnefsand Depth of his Power and Wifdom, by our finite and 
fhallow Imagination? 

We have been in part undeceiv'd by Experiment, which hath difcover'd to us fuch Animals as 
are a thoufand times lefs than an Hand-worm, why fliould we fuppofe that they are the Laft and 
the Leaft of all ? For my part, I fee no reafon to imagine : 'Tis much more reafonable to be be- 
liev'd, there are far lefs than thofe already difcover'd : For, in fine, little Animals are never 
wanting for the Microfcopes, but we want Mifcrofcopes for them. 
Pr. Le If one examines in the midft of Winter the Cicatricle of a Tulip-roop, with a plain Magni- 
germe. fying °r a Convex Glafs, or even with the bare Eye, one may eafily difcover it in the Leaves 
which are become green : Thofe which are to make the Flower or the Tulip, the little triangular 
part which contains the Seed, and the fix little Columns that incompafs it at the bottom of the 
Tulip. Thus it cannot be doubted but the Cicatricle of a Tulip-root contains in it a Tulip 
all entire. 

It's reafonable to believe the fame thing of the Cicatricle of a grain of Muftard, of that of 
the kernel of an Apple, and generally of all forts of Trees and Plants, though it cannot be dif- 
cern'd with the Eye, nor yet with a Microfcope ■-, and we may with fome fort of certainty affirm, 
That all Trees lye in Miniature in the Cicatricle of their Seed. 

Nor does it appear unreafonable to think that there are infinite Trees conceal'd in a fingle Ci- 
catricle - fince it not only contains the future Tree whereof it is the Seed, but alfo abundance of 
other Seeds, which may all include in them new Trees ftill, and new Seeds of Trees : Which new 
Seeds poffibly may be big with other Trees, and other Seeds of Trees as fruitful as the former, 
in an incomprehenfible littlenefs, and thus in Infinitum, So that, according to this Notion (which 
will not be thought impertinent or whimfical, except by thofe who meafure the Wonders of the 
Infinite Power of GOD, by the Idea's of their Senfes and Imagination) it may be faid, that in 
the fingle kernel of an Apple, may be involved Apple-trees, Apples and Seeds of Apple-trees, 
for infinite or almoft infinite Ages,in that proportion of a perfect Apple-tree to an Apple-tree in 
its Seeds. And, That Nature does only open and unfold thefe little Trees, by giving a fenfible 
growth to that which is out of its Seed ; and infenfible, but molt real increafes, to thofe which 
we conceive to be in their Seeds, in proportion to their Bignefs. For it cannot be doubted but 
there are Bodies little enough to infinuate themfelves between the Fibres of thofe Trees, which 
we conceive in their Seeds, and to be ferviceable to their Nourifhment. 

What has been faid of Plants and their Cicatricles, we have liberty to conceive of Animals, and 

of the Cicatricles of which they are produc'd. We fee in the Cicatricle of a Tulip-root an 

entire Tulip. * We fee in the Cicatricle of a new-laid Egg, and which had never 

* ike Outride or been brooded, a Chicken, which is poffibly compleatly form'd. We fee -f- Frogs in 

tbespermoj the Egg^ the £g gs f frogs, and we fhall fee other Animals ftill in their Cicatricles when we 

thTroTk.See^Mti- Iiave Art and Experience enough to difcover them. But 'tis not for the Mind to ftand 

nigh. deVpormationc ftill, when the Eyes can go no farther : For the view of the Soul is of a greater com- 

PulUinOva. pafs than the fight of the Body. Befides this therefore, we ought to think, That all 

+ See Swammer- tne Bodies of Men and of Beafts, which fhould be born or produc'd till the End of 

<dam\?Miracuiumna- the World, were poffibly created from the Beginning of it : I would fay, That the 

Females of the Original Creatures were, for ought we know, created together, with 

all thofe of the fame Species which have been, or fhall be, begotten or procreated whil it the 

World Hands. 

We 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. i^ 

We might pufii this Thought much farther yet, and it may be with a great deal of Reafon and 
Truth : But we have juft caufe to fear, left we mould be too defirous of penetrating too far into/ 
the Works of G D .- We fee nothing but Infinities round about us : And not only our Sen fa and 
our Imagination are too limited to comprehend them \ but the Mind it felf, however pure and dif- 
engag'd'from Matter, is too grofs as well as too feeble to pierce into the leaft of the Works of 
the Almighty. 'Tis loft, 'tis diflipated, 'tis dazled and amazed at the view of that, which, ac- 
cording to the Language of the Senfes, is call'd an Atom. Notwithftanding, the Pure Intellect 
has this advantage above the Imagination of the Senfes, that it acknowledges its own Wealmejs, 
and the Almightinefs of GOD: Whereas our Imagination and our Senfes bring down the works 
of G £>, and audacioufly fet themfelves above them, and fo throw us headlong and blind-fold 
into Error. For our Eyes furnifh us not with the Idea's of any of thofe things we difcover by 
Microfopes and our Reafon. We perceive not by our Sight any lefs Body than an Hand-worm, 
or a Mite. The half of a Hand-worm is nothing if we rely on the Report of our Eyes. A 
Mite is a Mathematical point in their account, which you can't divide, but you muft annihilate. 
Our Sight then does not reprefent Extenfion to us, as it is in it felf, but as it is in Relation to 
our Body : And becaufe the half of a Mite has no coniiderable relation to our Body, and has 
no influence either towards the Prefervation or Deftru&ion of it ; therefore our Eyes entirely 
conceal it from Us. 

But if we had Eyes made after the manner of Microfcopes, or rather, if we were as little as 
Hand-worms and Mites, we fliould judge of the Magnitude of Bodies in a far different manner- 
For, without doubt, thefe little Animals have their Eyes fo difpos'd as to fee the Bodies that fur- 
round them and their own Bodies, far greater than we fee them, for otherwife they could not 
receive fuch impreflions as were neceflary to the Prefervation of Life, and fo the Eyes they have 
would be altogether ufelefs. 

But that we may throughly explain thefe things, we muft confider, that our Eyes are in effeft 
only Natural Spectacles •, that their humours have the fame way of Operating as the Glafles in the 
Spectacles, and that according to the figure of the Cryftalline, and its diftance from the Retina^ 
we fee Objefts very differently ; infomuch that we cannot be aflur'd there are two Men in the 
World that fee Bodies of the felf-fame blgnefsj fince we cannot be aflur'd there are two Men's'- 
Eyes altogether made alike. 

'Tis a Propofition that ought to be imbrac'd by all thofe who concern themfelves with Opticks^ 
That Objefts which appear equally diftant are feen fo much bigger, as the figure which is deli- 
neated in the fund of the Eye is bigger. Now it is certain that in the Eyes of thofe Perfons 
whofe Cryftalline is more convex, the Images are painted lefler, in proportion to the convexity. 
Thofe then who are fhort-fighted having their Cryftalline more convex fee the Objedts lefler than 
thofe whofe Cryftalline is of the common ftandard, or than old People, who want Spectacles to 
read with, but fee perfectly well at a diftance j fince thofe whofe Sight is fhort muft neceflarily havd 
the Cryftalline more convex, on fuppofition their Eyes, as to the other parts, are equal. 

'Twere the eafieft thing in Nature to demonftrate all thefe things Geometrically , and were they 
not of the number of thofe which are very well known, I would infift longer upon them to make 
them evident. But becaufe feveral have already handled this Subject, I defire fuch as are willing 
to be inftru&ed therein, to turn to them and confult .them. 

Since it is not manifeft that there are two Men in the World who fee Objects in the fame bulk 
and magnitude, and generally the fame Man fees them bigger with his left Eye than his right, 
according to the Obfervations which have been made, and are related in the Journal of the Lear- 
ned from Rome , in January 1 669, it is plain we ought not to build upon the Teftimony of our 
Eyes, fo as to pafs our judgment from it. It is much better to attend to Reafon, which proves 
to us, That we are unable to determine what is theabfolute Magnitude of Bodies which encom- 
pafsus, or what Idea we ought to have of the Extenfion of a Foot-fquare, or of that of our 
own Body ; fo as that Idea may reprefent it to us as it is. For we learn from Reafon," that the 
leaft of all Bodies would be no longer little, if it were alone, fince it is compounded of an infi- 
nite number of parts out of each of which GOD could frame an Earth, which yet would be 
but a fingle Point in comparifon of the reft in conjunction. Thus- the Mind of Man is incapable 
of forming an Idea great enough to comprehend and embrace the leaft Extenfion in the World, 
fince the Mind has bounds, but that Idea fhould be infinite. 

It is true, The Mind may come very near the Knowledge of the Relations thefe infinites have, 
to one another, which conftitute the World j it may know, for inftance, one of them to be dou-| 
ble to another, and that a Fathom is the meafure of fix Foot. Yet for all this it cannot form an. 1 
Idea to it felf that can reprefent thefe things as they are in their own Nature. " 

Well, but let it be fuppos'd that the Mind is capable of Idea's, which equal or which meafure 
the Extenfion of Bodies, which we fee j for it would be a difficult undertaking to convince Men 
of the contrary : Let us fee what may be concluded from the Suppofition. Doubtlefs this will be 
the Conclufion, That GOD does not deceive us : That he has not given us Eyes like Glafles, to 
magnifie or diminifh the Objedt, and therefore we ought to believe that our Eyes reprefent things 
as really they are. 

'Tis true, GOD ntver deceives us, but we often deceive our felves^ by judging of things 
with an unwarrantable rafhnefs. For we often judge that the Objects whereof we have Idea's 
exift, and likewife that they altogether refemble their Idea's j when yet it often falls out that the 
Objects are neither like their Idea's,- nor do they exift at all 

the' 



1 6 F. Malebranche Concerning Book I. 

The Exiflence of a thing does no ways follow from our having an Idea of it, much lefs does 
it follow that the thing is perfectly like the Idea which we have thereof. It cannot be concluded 
from G O D's giving us fuch a fenfible Idea of Magnitude upon the prefentation of a fix Foot-rule 
to our Eyes, that this Rule has the fame Extenfion, as it is reprefented to us by that Idea ? For 
firft,All Men have not the fame fenfible Idea of this fame meafure,lince all Men have not their Eyes 
difpofed in the fame manner. Again, The fame Perfon has not the fame fenfible Idea of a fix 
Foot-rule,, when he beholds it with his left Eye, as when he views it with his right, as has been 
already faid. Finally, It often happens that the felf-fame Perfon, entertains quite different Idea's 
of the fame Objects at different times, according as they are fuppos'd nearer or farther off, as 
fhall be explain'd in its proper place. 

It is then nothing but prejudice grounded upon no good reafon to think we fee Bodies accor- 
ding to their real Magnitude:, for our Eyes being not given us for any other purpofe than the fe- 
curity of our Body, they difcharge their Duty admirable well, in giving us fuch Idea's of Ob- 
jects as are proportion'd to its magnitude. 

But the better to conceive what ought to be our judgments concerning the Extenfion of Bodies, 
from the Report of our Eyes, let us imagine GOD to have created in Epitomie, out of a por- 
tion of matter of the bignefs of a fmall Globe, an Heaven and Earth, and Men upon this Earth, 
■with all other thin is, the fame proportion being obferv'd, as in this Grand World. Thefe little 
Men would fee each other, and the parts of their Bodies, as likewife the little Animals which 
were capable of incommoding them. Otherwife their Eyes would be ufelefs to their preferva- 
tion. It is manifeft then from this Suppofition, thefe little Men would have Idea's of the magni- 
tude of Bodies quite different from ours ; fince they would look upon their little World, which 
would be but a Ball in our account, as ftretch'd out into infinite fpaces, juft as we do in refped 
of the World in which we are. 

Or if this is not fo eafie to be conceiy'd, let us fuppofe GOD had created an Earth infinitely 
vafter than this which we inhabit, fo that this new Earth fhould be to ours, what ours would be 
to that we have fpoken of in the fore-going Suppofition. Let us moreover conceive GOD Almighty 
to have obferv'd in all the parts which went to the Compofition of this New World, the very 
fame proportion he has done in thofe which make up Ours. It is plain, that the Inhabitants of thft 
latter World would be Taller,than the fpace betwixt our Earth and the moft diftant Stars we can 
difcover : And this being Co, it is manifeft that if they had the fame Idea's of Extenfion of Bo- 
dies as our felves, they would be able to difcern fome of the parts of their own Bodies, and 
and would fee others of a prodigious unweildinefs ; fo that 'tis ridiculous to think they would fee 
things in the fame Eignefs as they are feen by us. 

It is apparent in thefe two Suppofitions we have made, that the Men, whether of the Great or 

Little World, would have Idea's of the Magnitude of Bodies very different from ours, fuppofing 

their Eyes to furnifh them with Idea's of the Obje&s round about them, proportion'd to the 

Magnitude of their own Bodies. Now if thefe Men fhould confidently affirm upon the Teftimo- 

ny of their Eyes, that Bodies were of the very fame bignefs whereof they faw them, it is not to 

be doubted but they would be deceiv'd ; and I fuppofe no Man will make aqueftion of it : And 

yet it is certain that thefe Men would have as Good Reafon to juftifie their Opinion, as we have 

to defend our Own. Let us acknowledge then, from their Example, That we are very uncertain 

of the Magnitude of Bodies, which we fee, and that all which can be known by us concerning 

them from the Teftimony of Sight, is only the mutual Relation there is between Them and Us. 

In a word, that our Eyes were never given us whereby to judge of the Truth of things, but 

only to give us notice of fuch as might either moleft or profit us in fomething or other. 

JL But 'tis not thought fufficient for Men to credit their Eyes only, in order to judge otVifible 

AComi- Objeds : They think they are to be trufted farther, even to judge of thofe which are Tnvifble. 

?iuatio>i o/Becaufe there are fome things which they cannot fee, they conclude they do not exifi, attributing 

thefe Er- t0 ^heir sight a Penetration in a manner Infinite. This is an Impediment which prevents their 

InviftiT ''difcovering the real Caufes of abundance of Natural Effects : For that they afcribe them to Ima- 

objeEhs g' mar y Faculties and Qualities, is often meerly for want of difcerning the True, which confift in 

the different Configurations of thefe Bodies. 

They fee not, for Inftance, the little parts of Air or Flame, much lefs thofe of Light, or of 
a matter frill more fine and fubtil : And upon this fcore they are ready to believe, they are not 
in being, at leaft, conclude them void of force and a&ion. They betake themfelves to Occult Qua- 
lities, or Imaginary Faculties to explain all the Effects, whereof thofe Imperceptible parts are The 
True and Natural Caufe. 

They had rather have recourfe to the horror of a Vacuum to Explain the Elevation of water in 
the Pump, than impute it to the Gravitation of the Air. They chufe to afcribe the Flux and Re- 
flux of the Sea, to the dualities of the Moon, rather than to the prefTure of the Atmofphere, that 
is, to the Air which furrounds the Earth ; and the Elevation of Vapours to the Attractive Facul- 
ties of the Sun, than to the iimple Motion of Impulfe, caufed by the parts of the Subtil Matter , 
which it continually diffufes abroad. 

They look upon thofe as Men of trifling and impertinent Thought, who have recourfe only to 
the Flefh and Blood, in accounting for all the Motions of Animals : Likewife for the habits, and 
the Corporeal Memory of Men : And this partly proceeds from the Conception they have of 
the littlcncfs of the Brain, and its incapacity thereupon to.preferve the Traces of an almoft in- 
finite number of things, lodg'd in it. They had rather admit, though they can't conceive how, 

a Soul 



Chap. VI. The Search after Truth. . ij 

a Soul in Beafls, which is neither Body nor Spirit ; Qualitiesand Intentional Sfecies, for the Habits 
and Memory of Men; or fuch like things, notwithftanding they have no particular Notion of 

them in their Mind. 

I mould be too tedious mould I Hand to reckon up all the Errors we fall into through this Pre- 
judice. There are very few in Natural Philofophy, to which it has not given fome occafion •, and 
if a Man mould make a confederate Reflexion thereupon, he would poffibly be aftonifh'd at it. 

But though 1 am not willing to dwell too long upon thefe things,yet I cannot fo eafily pafs by the 
contempt Men generally have for Infects, and other little Animals which are produc'd out of a 
Matter call'd by them Corrupted. 'Tis a very unjuft contempt, founded only on the Ignorance 
of the thing defpis'd, and the fore-mention'd Prejudice. There is nothing defpicable in Nature, 
and all the Works of G O D are worthy of our Refpeft and Admiration ; efpecially if we attend 
to the wouderful way she takes both in making, and perferving them. The leaft of Flies are as 
corapleat, as Animals of an exceflive bulk or ftature : The proportions of their Limbs are as 
juft as thofe of the other : And it feems moreover that GOD has defign'd them greater Orna- 
ments to recompenfe them for the Littlenefs of their Bodies. They have Coronets and Plumes, and 
other Attire upon their Heads, which but-fhine all that the Luxury of Men can invent. And I 
dare venture to fay, that all thofe who have never made ufe of any thing but their Eyes, have 
never feen any thing fo fplendid, fo exad,or fo magnificent in the Palaces of the greateft Princes, 
as may be feen with Glaires on the Head of an ordinary Fly. 

'Tis true, thefe things are. exceedingly Little, but it is ftill more furprizing to find fuch a Col- 
lection of Beauties in fo little Room ? and though they are very common, yet that is no Diminu- 
tion to their Value •, nor are thofe Animals thereby lefs perfeft in themfelves - 7 but on the contrary, 
the Power and Wifdom of GOD appear more wonderful, who with fuch Profufion and Magnifi- 
cence has fhewnan almoft infinite number of Miracles in their Production. 

And yet our Sight conceals all thefe Beauties from us : It makes us defpife all- thefe Works of 
G D fo worthy of our Admiration : And becaufe thefe Animals are little in Relation to our Bo- 
dy, it caufes us to confider them as little abfilutely, and confequently as defpicable by reafbn of 
their Littlenefs \ as if Bodies could be little in themfelves. 

Let us ftrive then to forbear following the Impreffions of our Senfes, in the judgment which we 
pafs on the Magnitude of Bodies : And when we fay, for Inftance, That a Bird is little, let it 
not be abfolntely underftood : For nothing is Great or Little in it felf: Even a Bird is great in 
comparifon of a Fly \ and if it be little in refpett of dur Body, it doth not follow it is abfilutely 
fo; fince our Body is not the moil per fed Rule by which we ought to meafure others. It is it 
felf" very little in reference to the Earth, as is the Earth it felf in refpecf of the Circumference 
which the Sun or Earth defcribe round each other : And fo is that Circumference in relation to 
the fpace contain'd betwixt us and the fix'd Stars ; and fo continuing the progreffion on. For we 
may ftill imagine fpaces greater and greater ad infinitum. 

But it muffc not be imagin'd that our Senfes exactiy inform us of the Relation other Bodies have III. 
to our own: For Exadtnefs and Juftnefs are no ways eflential to fenfible Notices, which mould oftheEr- 
only be Inftrumental to the Prefervation of Life. It is true we know exadl ly enough the Rela- rors °f 
tion Bodies, which are near us, have with our own. But in proportion to the diftance thefe Bo- ^ ht ^ ouci " 
dies are remov'd from us, we know lefs of them, becaufe then they have lefs relation to our Bo- fifn rda-" 
dy. The Idea or Senfation of Magnitude, which we have upon fight, of a Body, leffens in pro- tively cow- 
portion to the Body's being in. a lefs capacity of hurting us: And that Idea or Senfation increa-^ er '^ 
fes proportionabiy as the Body approaches nearer, or rather, as the Relation it has to our Body, 
is augmented. Finally, If this Relation altogether ceafes ; that is, if any Body is fb little or fo 
diftant from us, as to be incapable of hurting us, we forthwith lofe the Senfation of it. So that 
by our Sight we may fometimes judge pretty nearly of the Relation other Bodies have to ours : 
And of that which they have to one another : But 'we ought never to think they are of the fame 
Magnitude they appear to us. 

Our Eyes, for Example, reprefent the Sun and Moon of one or two Feet diameter but we 
fhould not imagine with Epicurus and Lucretius, that they are really of that dimenfion. This fame 
Moon feems to us upon fight far greater than the greateft Stars, yet no Man doubts but it is in- 
comparably lefs: Thus we fee daily on the Earth two things or more, of whofe magnitude we 
can have no exact affurance; becaufe to make a judgment of this Nature, 'tis necefTary to know 
the precife diftance of thefe Bodies, which is very difficult to be known. 

We are even hard put to't to judge with any kind of certainty of the Relation there is betwixt 
two Bodies though never fo near us. We are forc'd to take them in our hands, and hold them 
one againft the other to compare them ; and after all, we often heiltate without being able iuftlv 
to determine any thing. This'is vifibly acknowledge as often as a Man would examine which 
are biggeft of fome pieces of Coin that are almoft equal ; for he is then oblig'd to put them one 
upon another, to difcover by, a furer Method than by Sight whether they correfpond in bi^nefs 
Our Eyes therefore not only deceive us in the Magnitude of Bodies absolutely confider'd but even 
m the Relation thofe Bodies have betwixt themfelves. y ' l evea 



CHAR 



i8 K Malebranche Concerning Book L 

CHAP. VII. 

t: Of the Errors of Sight about Figures. It. We have no Knowledge of the 
leap of them. III. The Knowledge we have of the greater, is not exacl. 
IV. An Explication of fome Natural Judgments which prevent ourDeceptU 
on. V. That thefe very Judgments deceive us in fome particular junBures. 

*• /"^\^ ^ s *Sh £ * s * e *" s liable tp deceive us in the Reprefentatiori of Figures, than in the Repre- 

Tcrsoff?h\ J J * entat ^ oa °f an y otner thing j becaufe Figure is not a thing of an abfoiute kind, but its 

about n- ^^-^ Nature confifts in the Relation which is between the parts which terminate fome (pace, 

gures. and a certain point, which we conceive in that fpace, and which we may call, as in a Circle, the 

Centre of the Figure. Notwithftanding, we are miflaken a thoufand ways in Figures, and the 

Knowledge we receive from our Senfes, is not exceedingly exact concerning any one of them. 

**• We have already prov'd that our Sight difcovers not to us all forts of Extcnfion, but only that 

W \t. iVt ~ wmcn * s m f° me confiderabte proportion to our Body ; and that for this reafbn we fee not all the 

ledge of the P arts °f the minuteft Animals, nor thofe that conftitute all hard and liquid Bodies, Thus, not 

leafl of being able to perceive thefe parts by reafon of their Littlenefs, it follows we are as unable to 

them, perceive their Figures ; fince the figure of Bodies is nothing but the Term that bounds them. 

See here what an infinite number of invifible figures prefent themfelves in an inftant, which are 

far more numerous than thofe our Eyes acquaint us withal : which yet induce the Mind, that 

trulls too much to their reach and capacity, and Hands not to examine things to the bottom, to 

believe thefe Figures don't exift. 

IIT. As for Bodies proportion'd to our Sight, (the number whereof is very inconflderable in com- 

Tfofenoir-parifon of the other) we difcover their figure tolerably well, but never know it exa&ly by our 

Uige we Senfes. Nay, we cannot fo much as be aflur'd from our Sight if a Circle or a Square, which 

inater is are tw0 °^ tne rao ^ ^ m P^ e figures that are, be not an EUipfis and a Parallelogramme, though thefe 

not exit}, figures be both in our Hands, and very near our Eyes. 

I add farther, that we cannot exactly difcern whether a Line be Right or not, efpecially if it 
be fomewhat long. We mull then have a Rule for it : But to what purpofe ? we know not whe- 
ther the Rule it felf be fuch as we fuppofe it ought to be ; nor can we be fully fatisfy'd concern- 
ing it. And yet without the knowledge of this Line, we can never know any figure, as is ev£ 
dent to all the World. 

This is what may be laid in general of Figures, which we have before our Eyes, and in our 

Hands. But if we fuppofe them at a diflance from us, how many changes do we find in the 

proje&ion they make in the fund of our Eyes. I will not Hand to defcribe them here ; they may 

eafily be learnd in any Book ofOpticks, or by examining the Figures which we fee in Piftures. 

For fince the Painter is oblig'd to change them almoil all, to the end they may appear in their 

Natural lite, and to paint, for inftance, Circles like Ellipfes: 'Tis an infallible fign of the Errors 

of our Sight, in Objetts that are not Painted j But thefe Errors are corre&ed by frefh Senfati- 

ons, which poffibly may be lookt upon as a fort of Natural Judgments, and may be term'd the 

Judgments of the Senfes. 

IV. In beholding a Cube, for Example, it is certain that all the fides we lee of it never caufe a 

AnExdj.' p r oje&ion, or an Image of an equal dimenfion in the fund of our Eyes ; fince the Image of all 

SIJ at«»- theI " e fides > when painted in the Retina or the Optick Nerve, nearly refembles a Cube piftur'd 

rd \udg- in Perfpettive', and confequently the Senfation we have of it, ought to reprefent the faces of a 

memsvoh'uh Cube nneqaal ; becaufe they are fo in Perfpedtive. This notwithftanding, we fee them all equal, 

prevent our n0r are we j n an £ rr0 r. 

deception. jyj ow j t m ig nt b e faid, That this is occafion'd by a kind of Judgment, which we are naturally 
inclin'd to make - 7 namely, That the Faces of the Cube which arefartheft from us, ought not to 
call on the fund of our Eyes fo large Images as the Faces which are nearer j but whereas Senfa- 
tion, is only peculiar to the Senfes, and Judgment jn propriety of Speech cannot be afcrib'd to them ; 
it is certain this Judgment is only a Compound-fenfation, which confequently may be fometimes 
falfe. 

However, fince that which is only Senfation in us, may in Relation to the Author of Na- 
ture, who excites it, be confider'd as a kind of Judgment, I fpeak fometimes of Senfations 
as of Natural Judgments; becaufe this form of Speaking is expedient in giving an ac- 
count of things ; as may be feen towards the End of the Ninth Chapter, and in feveral other 
places. 
V. Though the Judgments I fpeak of, are ferViceable in correcting our Senfes, a thoufand dif- 

Uat thefe f erent Ways, and without them we fhould hardly ever be in the Right, neverthelefs they tail 
"menu de- not t0 be fometimes the occafion of our Error. If it happens, for inftance, that we fee the 
ceiveutin Spire of a Steeple behind a great Wall, or beyond a Mountain, it will appear to us to be both 
fome parti- little and at no great diflance: But it' we fhould fee it at the fame diflance, but with many 
cuiarjun- fields and Houfes lying betwixt us and it, it would undoubtedly appear both much bigger and 
u more remote j although in both cafes the projection of the Rays of the Steeple or the Image of 

the 



Chap. VIII. The Search after Truth* , iy 

the Steeple, which is pidur'd in the fund of our Eye, is altogether the fame. Now it may be 
faid that the reafon why we fee it greater, is the judgment we naturally make, viz.. That be- 
caufe fo many Fields lie betwixt us and the Steeple, it muft needs be more remote, arid confe* 
quently greater. , • ,■■ • 

But if on the other hand, we faw no interjacent Lands betwixt our Eyes and the Steeple, tho' 
at the fame time we knew there were many, and that it was a great way off, which is very ob- 
fervable, it would notwithltanding feem to us to be very little and very near, as I have faid be- 
fore: which we may farther, fuppofe to happen from a kind of judgment natural to our Soul, 
whereby fhe fees the Steeple in this manner, becaufe (he judges it to be at five or fix hundred paces 
diftance. For generally our Imagination reprefents no greater fpace betwixt the objects and our 
{elves, unlefs affifted by a fenfible view of other intervening objects; and beyond which, it has 
ftill liberty to imagine fomething more. 

'Tis for this reafon that the Moon at the Rifing or Setting, is feen much bigger, than when See tke 
elevated a good height above the Horizon : For this elevation removes our view from oft the ob- ^'^Jf*l e 
jeds lying betwixt us and her, the dimenfioris whereof We know ; fo that we cannot judge of that en i m 
of the Moon by forming the compaqfon between them. But when ihe is juft rifen, or about to 
fet, we fee a great many Fields, betwixt her and us, of whofe extenfion we have a tolerable know- 
ledge j and thus it is that we judge her more remote, and upon that reafon fee her fo large as we 
do. 

And it muft be obfervM, That when fhe is elevated above oiir heads, though our Reafon molt 
infallibly afiures us, Ihe is vaftly diftant, yet we cannot avoid feeing her Very hear, and very, 
little ; becaufe indeed thefe Natural Judgments of the Sight, are founded only on the Percepti- 
ons of the fame Sight, and Reafon is unable to Corfed them : So that they frequently lead us in^ 
to Error, by making us form voluntary judgments, that go hand in hand along with them. For 
when we judge according to our Senfations, we are always deceiv'd, though we never err in judg- 
ing according to our Conceptions : becaufe the Body is no farther inftrudive, than is condu- 
cing to the Body, and 'tis only GOD who always teaches us the Truth, as fhaU be fliewn here- 
after. 

Thefe falfe Judgments not only deceive Us iri the Diftance and Magnitude of Bodies, which 
are not the Subject of this Chapter, but in reprefenting their Figure otherwife than it is. We fee, 
for Inftance, the Sun and Moon, and other very remote Spherical Bodies as if they were flat, and 
only circular: Becaufe at that great diftance we are unable to difcern whether the part oppofite 
to us, is nearer us than the others-, and on that account, we judge it is equally diftant from us % 
And thus upon the fame grounds we conclude the Stars with the Azure which appears in the 
Heaven, are rang'd in the fame juft diftance, in a vault perfectly convex, fince our Mind ever 
fuppofes Equality, where it difcovers no Inequality •, which yet it ought riot pofitively to admit, 
unlefs there be evident conviction for it. 

I fhall not here infift longer on the Errors of our Sight, in relpecr of the Figures of Bodies," 
fince a Man may be fufficiently inftruded in any Book of Opticks. That Science in efied does 
only inftrud us how to put fallacies on our Eyes; and its whole drift and artifice confifts meerly 
in finding means of making us form thofe Natural Judgments, I have been fpeaking of, at a time 
when they are moft impertinent and unfeafbnable. And this cheat may be aded in fb m^riy dif- 
ferent ways, that, of all the Figures that are in the World, there is not any fingle one, but may 
be painted in a thoufand different fafhions ; fo that the Sight muft unavoidably be deceiv'd. But, 
this is not the proper place of explaining thefe things more throughly. What I have faid is fuffici- 
ent, to let us fee we fhould not give over-much credit to the Teftimony of our Eyes, even in their 
Reprefentations of the Figures of Bodies^ though in point of Figures, their reports are much more 
faithful than in any other occafion. 




CHAP. VIII. 

I. That our Eyes are incapable of informing us of the Quantity or Swiftnefs 
of Motion conjidered in it felf II. That Duration^ which is neceffary to 
our Knowledge of the Quantity of Motion^ is unknown to us 6 III, An Id- 
fiance of the Errors of Sight about Motion and Reft. 

HAVING already difcover'd the moft Fundamental and General Errors of our Sight 
touching Extenfion and its Figures, I come now to correct thofe in which this fame 
Sight ingages us, about the Motion of Matter. And. this has no great difficulty in 
it, after what I have already (aid of Extenfion. For there is fo neceffary a relation and depen- 
dence betwixt thefe two things, that if we are deceived in the Magnitude of Bodies, we muft 
as certainly be deceiv'd in their Motion too. 

But, that I may advance nothing but what is clear and diftind, it is neceffary to take off what- 
ever is equivocal from the word Motion. For this Term has generally two fignifications* The 

firft 



20 F. Ma/lebranche C oncer ning . Book I, 

firft denotes a certain Paver ot Force, which we imagine in the Body movM, and which we fuppofe 
the caufeof its Motion : f he fecond is the Tranflation or continued Conveyance of a Body, either , 
in its removal fromj or approaching to another, which we coniider as at rcfi. 

When Ifay, for Inftance, That a Boul has communicated its Motion to another, the word Mo- 
rion is to be underftood in its firft fignification : But if I fay (imply, that I fee a Boul in a great - 
Motion, it is to be taken in the fecond. In a word, the Term Motion fignifies at once both Caufe 
and Effett, which are yet two things altogether different. 

I am perfwaded that Men are under moft palpaple and molt dangerous miftakes, concerning 
the Force that gives this Motion, and Tranflation to the Bodies mov'd. Thofe fine Terms, Na- 
ture and Imprefs'd Qualities, are good for nothing but to fhelter the Ignorance of the Falfly Learn- 
,. ,, ed, and the Impieties of the Libertine ; as I could eafily demonftrate. But this is not a place pro- 
ck. of the P er t0 difcourfe of the Power that moves Bodies, fince that is not of a.vifible Nature •, and I am 
■2d. Pm of only fpeaking here of the .Errors of our Eyes. I defer it till a time when it will be morefea- 
the &B'ook. fonable. 

Motion taken in the fecond fenfe, that is, for the Tranflation of a Body in its removal from an- 
other, is fbmething of a vifible kind, and the Subject of this Chapter. 
I. I have, I think, fufficiently demonltrated in the iixth Chapter, that our Sight does not ac- 

that our quaint us with the Quantity or Magnitude of Bodies, in themfelves^ but only with the mutual 
^itLibie Nation tn . e Y fend in, to each other, and efpecially to our own. From whence I infer, that 
of wfem- we are incapable of knowing the true and abfolute Magnitude of their Motion, that is, of their 
we, m of fwiftnefs or flownefs, but only the relation thefe Motions have to one another, and more efpe- 
the Quami- dally to the Motion ordinarily incident to our own Body. Which I thus prove. 
X^Fm' **■ * s certain that we know not how to* judge how great the Motion of a Body is, but by the 
tion conZ Length of the Space the Body has ran over. Thus our Eyes not informing us of the true Length 
dsr\i in h of the Space defcrib'd by the Motion, it follows that 'tis impoflible for us to know the true Qiian- 
f l f. tity of the Motion. 

This Argument is only a Corollary of that which I have faid of Extenfion, and all the force it has 
proceeds from its being a neceffary Conclufion of what I have there Demonftrated : I fhall now 
give one which depends on no Suppofition. I fay then, that fuppofing we were able clearly to dis- 
cover the true Quantity of the Space defcrib'd, it would no way follow, that we could know 
the Quantity of Motion alfo. 

The Greatnefs or the Swiftnefs of Motion includes two things. The firft is the Tranflation or 
Conveyance of a Body from one place to another, as from Paris to St. Germains: The fecond is 
the Time that necefiarily goes to the making this Conveyance. Now it is not enough to know 
exacf ly how far Paris is diitant from St. Germains, to know whether a Man has gone it with a Quick 
or a Slow Motion : But it muft moreover be known how much time he has imploy'd in his Jour- 
ney : Granting then that the Length of the Journey may be truly known •, I utterly deny we can 
have an exact knowledge by our Sight, or indeed any other way whatever, of the Time that is 
fpent in the paffage, and of the true Quantity of Duration. 

This is fufficiently evident, in that at certain times one Hour feems to us as long as four •, and 
lhat m-on the contrary at other times, four Hours flip infenlibly away: When, forlnftance, a Man's 
rmion Mind is filfd with Joy, Hours feem no longer than a Moment ; becaufe then the time paffes away 
which « without thinking of it. But when a Man is dejefted with Grief, and lies under fome fenfible Pain 
necepryto Qr Afflidion, every day is thought an entire Year. The reafon of which difference is, That in. 
fed /Tie this cafe the Mind is weary of its Duration, becaufe it is Painful. The more it applies it felf to * 
Quantity of the thought of it, the more it difcovers it, and thereby finds it longer than in the feafon of Mirth 
Motion, is and Joy, or fome diverting I.mployment,_ which as it Were carries the Soul out of it felf, to fix her 
unknown dofer to' the Object of her Joy, or her Diverfion. For as a Man finds a piece of Painting fo much 
larger by how much he ftands to confider all the little things reprefented in it, with greater at- 
tention- or as he finds the head of a Fly confiderably great, when he difcerns all the parts of it 
with a Microfcope ; fo the Mind finds its duration fo much longer, as it conliders it with greater 
Attention and is fenfible of all the parts of it. 

Jnfomuch that I dont at all doubt, but that GOD could fo apply our Mind to the parts of its 
Duration, by giving us abundance of Sulfations in a very little time, as to make one Hour appear 
as long as many Ages. For as there are no Indivijible Points in Bodies, fo there are no Indivijible In- 
Rants in Duration. But as the leafl parts of Matter may be divided to Infinity, fo the parts of Du- 
ration may be afllgn'd lefsand lefs to Infinity, as is eafy to demonftrate. If then the Mind were 
made Attentive to the minuteft parts of its Duration, by its Senfations which fhould leave fome 
Traces in the Brain, whereby to remember them, it would undoubtedly fecm much longer to it 

than it does. . -"■ - •. 

But finally, the ufe of Watches is a convincing proof, that there can be no exact knowledge 

{.'Duration, and 1 defire no more. For fince the knowledge of the abfolute Greatnefs or Intenfe- 

r ">f Motion depends on a preceding knowledge of the Length of Duration, as we have 

nf C ,'t docs ; it thence follows, that on Suppolition we can never exactly know the abfolute 

Ouatttitv of Duration, we fhall never be able to know exactly the abfolute Quantity of Motion. 

But becat'fe *° me Relations, which Duration, or one time has to another may be known, fome 

Relations lik\" wi ** e wnicn Motions have to one another may be equally underftood : For as we 

certainlv k» n ° w tnat theory Year is longer than the Lnnary ; fo we can certainly know 

W aCannonk llletiias g r ^ terMotiou thaua Tortoife. So that though our Eyos will not let 



to Ui, 



US 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. 

us fee the abfolute Quantity of Motion, yet they fail not to affift us in difeovering, nearly 
enough ' the Relative Intenfenefs of it ; I mean the Relation or Proportiori of one Motion to 
another: And we have no need of any farther knowledge thereof for the Prefervation of our 

There are many Inftances to be given, which manifeftly fhew that our Sight deludes us touch- 
ing the Motion of Bodies ; it very often happens, that the things which feem to us in Motion, 
are perfectly at Reft-, and on the contrary thofe which feem to us at Reft, notwithstanding, -are 
in Motion. As when a Man, for inftance, fits on fhipboard whilft the Veifelis under fail in a 
fwift and fteady Motion, he feems to fee the Lands and Towns fly from him ; they feem to be in 
motion, and the Veifel to ftand ftill. r 

So if a Man were plac'd upon the Planet Mars, he would conclude upon fight that the Sun, the 
Earth and the i"eft of the Planets together with all the Fixed Stars perform'd their circumvolu- 
tion in about 24 or 25 hours :, which is the fpace of time that Mars imploys in turning round his 
own Axis. And yet the Earth, the Sun, and the Stars never circuit round that Planet. So that 
this Man would fee things in Motion which were at Reft, and would think himfelf at Reft,, tho' 
he were in Motion a]] the time. 

I ftand not here to explain, how it comes to pafs that the Man on fhipboard would eafily cor- 
rect the miftake of his Eyes, but the Man fuppos'd on the Planet Mars would obftinately defend his 
Error. The Reafon of it is eafie to be known : and we mail more readily find it by reflecting on 
what would happen to a Man that were afleep in a Veifel, who ftarting on a fudden, faw no- 
thing when he wak'd, befides the top of a Maft of fome Veffel that made towards him. For in 
cafe he faw not the Sails fwell'd with the Wind, nor the Mariners at work, nor felt any Agitation 
or concuflion of the Ship, or the like, he would abfolutely be at a lofs and in doubt, without know- 
ing which of the two VefTelswas in Motion j and neither his Eyes nor his Reafon could give him 
any Information. 



21 



III. 

An In" 
fiance of 
the Errors 
of Sight in 
refpelt of 
MoiiotimA. 



C H A P. IX. 

A Continuation of the fame Subjetl. I. A general Demonftration of the Er- 
rors of our Sight concerning Motion. II. That the Difiance of Obje&s 
is neceffary to be known^ in order to judge of the Quantity of their Mo- 
tion. III. The Mediums, whereby we know the Diflances of Obje&s^ 
are Examind. 

I CO ME now to give a General Demonftration of all the Errors, into which our Sight I. 
leads us, in refpedt of the Motion of Bodies. A general 

Let A be the Eye of the Spectator ; Cthe Object, which I fuppofe at a convenient di- £^J" c 
ftancefrom A. I fay, that though the Object remains fix'd in C, it may be thought to be rc~ the Errors 
mov'd as far as D, or to approach as near as B. And though the Object recedes towards D, it ofoursight 

concerning 
Motion. 




may be believed immoveable inC, and even to approach towards B j and on the contrary, though 
it approaches towards B, it may' be thought to be immoveable in C, or even to recede towards D. 
That though the Object be advanc'd from C as far as E or H, or to G or K, it may be thought to 
have mov'd no farther than from C to F or I. And again on the other hand, that though the Ob- 
ject be mov'd from C unto F or I, a Man may think it mov'd to Eor H, or elfe unto G or K. That 
if the Object be mov'd in a line equally diftant from the Spectator, that is, in a circumference 
whereof the Spectator is the Centre j though that Objed be mov'd from C to P, it may be thought 
to be mov'd only from B to O : and on the contrary, though it be mov'd only from B to O, it may 
be thought mov'd from C to P. 



If 



33 KMalebranche Concerning Book I. 

If beyond the Object C there happens to Be another Object, fuppofe M \ which is thought at 
reft, and which notwithftanding is in motion towards N : Though the Object C remains unmo- 
ved, or is mov'd with a more gentle motion towards F, than M is mov'd towards N, it will yet 
feem to be oppofitely mov'd towards Y \ and on the contrary, if &c 
Tfat'tbe It ls V^ n tnat tne proof of all thefe Propofitions except the laft, in which there is no difficulty, 
Diftmce of depends on One Suppofition only, namely this, that we cannot with any affurance determine 
objetts w concerning the Diftance of Objects. For if it be true that we cannot judge thereof with any cer- 
necejptry to ta i n ty, it follows that we cannot be allured whether C is advanc'd on towards D, or has ap- 
JjjJ 0W t *'*proached towards B, and foof the other Propofitions; ; 

judge of Now to know whether the judgments we forrri of the Diftance of Objects are infallible, we 
ihsQuanti- have no more to do than to examine the means we make ufe of to judge concerning it. If thefe 
ty of their means are uncertain, 'tis not poffible the Judgment's depending on them mould be more infallible. 
Motion, -j- nere are man y of them, which it is neceffary to explain. 

ThMd'- ■ 1 ne ^ r ^-' t " ne mo ^- un i ver f a U an d fometimes the fafeft way we have, whereby to judge of the 
ums where- diftance of Objects, is the Angle made by the Rays of our Eyes, whereof the Object is the Verti- 
by we bww cal Point, that is, the Object is the Point, where the two Rays meet. When this Angle is very 
the Diftan- large, the Object appears near at hand, on the contrary when it is very acute, we fee the Object 
ces of ob- a g reat wa y off! ' And the change which happens in the fituation of our Eyes, according to the 
^exminei. changes of this Angle, is the means the Soul imploys to judge concerning the Diftance or Nigh- 
nefs of Objects. For juft as a Blind Man having two ftrait Sticks in his hands,the length whereof he 
did not know, may by a kind of Natural Geometry give a tolerable conjecture concerning the di- 
ftance of any Body, in touching it with the end of his two Sticks, by reafon of the Difpofition and 
77*? soul rjiftance he finds his hands in, with refpect to one another •, fo it may be faid that the Soul judges 
mike 11 "all of the Diftance of an Object by the Difpofition of her Eyes, which is different according as the 
thofe judg- Angle, whereby fhe fees, is great or little, that is, as the Object is nearer or farther off! 
menu I A Man would eafily be convinc'd oiwhat I fay, if he would be at the trouble of making a very 
attribute ea £ e Experiment-: As, let him hang a Ring at the end of a thread, fo plac'd that the hoop being 
Wefc'hii- turn'd directly towards him, The aperture of it may not appear ; or if he pleafe let him drive a 
turd judg- Stick in the ground, and t3ke another in his hand, that is curv'd at the end •, let him retreat three 
mems are or four fteps from the Ring or the Stick, and mutting one Eye with one hand, let him try to hit 
nothing t he aperture of the Ring, or with the bent end of the Stick in his hand to touch the other acrofs, 
thus and at an ne iS nt that is much upon a level with the Eye:, and he will be furpriz'd to find himfelf in- 
lonhfpeak capable of doing it at an hundred tryals, though nothing in the world feems ealier : Nay, though 
thus, the he ftiould lay afide the Stick, and only endeavour to direct his finger crofs-ways into the concavi- 
better to ty of the Ring, he would find it difficult enough to be done, though he flood very near it. 
explain g ut i t ought to be well obferv'd that I have faid, A Man mould endeavour to hit the aperture 

t mgs. Qjf tne Ring, or to touch the Stick crofs-wife, and not by way of a Right Line from our Eye to the 
Ring j for fo indeed there would be no difficulty at all : fo far from it, that it would be much 
eafier to effect it, with one Eye fhut, than with both of them open, fince that would be a Rule to 
direct him. 

Now it may be faid, that the Difficulty, which is found, when a Man tries to direct the end of 
the Stick through the Ring crofs-wife, with only one Eye open, proceeds from this, namely, that 
one Eye being fhut, the Angle I have mention'd is unknown. For to, know the Magnitude of an 
Angle, it is not enough to know the length of its Bafe, and the Bignefs of the Angle made by one 
of its Sides upon the Bafe j for this is known in the foregoing Experiment : But it is yet farther ne- 
ceffary to know the other Angle, which is made by the other Side upon the Bafe, or the length of 
one o{t\\t Sides. Which cannot be exactly known without opening the other Eye. And thus 
the Soul cannot make ufe of her Natural Geometry to judge of the Diftance of the Ring. 

The Difpofition then of the Eyes, which accompanies the Angle made of the Vifnal Rays which 
cut each other and centre in the Object, is one of the beft and molt univerfal means the Soul im- 
ploys whereby to judge of the Diftance of things. If then that Angle receives no fenfible Alterati- 
on, upon a little removal of the Object, whether it approaches nearer us, or recedes from us, it 
will thence follow, that it is a fallacious means, and unferviceable to the Soul whereby to judge 
of the true diftance of that Object. 

Now 'tis plain that this Angle is notably chang'd, when an Object at about a foot diftance from 
our Sight is tranflated four foot off: but if it be only tranflated from four to eight, the Altera- 
tion is muck lefs difcernible-, if from eight to twelve, lefs yet : if from a thoufand to an hundred 
thoufand, hardly at all: Laftly, in carrying the Object farther on, even to the imaginary fpaces, 
the change of the Angle grows imperceptible, and is quite loft. So that were there a conlidera- 
ble fpace betwixt A and C, the Soul could not by that means know whether the Object were near 
B or D. 

This is the Reafon why we fee the Sun and Moon, as if they were involv'd in Clouds, tho' 
they are vaftly diftant from them-, and that we naturally think all the Stars rang'd in an equal 
diftance from us j that we imagine the Comets are fixt, and almoft motionlefs, at the end of their 
courfe. We imagine too that Comets are entirely diflipated in fome Months time, becaufe they, 
recede from us in almoft a right Line, or a Line direct from our Eyes; and are going to lofe 
themfelves in the vaft fpaces, from whence they return not till after many Years, or even many 
Ages. 

The 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. 23 

The fecond Medium the Soul imploys to judge concerning the Diflance of Objeds, confiftsin ^ e / econtl 
a Difpofition of the Eyes, different from that I have been fpeaking of. In order to explain it, we Jg™ 
muft know it is abfolutely necefTary that the figure of the Eye be different, according to the diffe- iudge f 
rent Diftance of Objedswhich we fee : For when a Man fees an Objed near him, there is a necef- the Di- 
fitv of his Eyes being longer, than if the Object were farther off: Becaufe to the end the Rays Jiang of 
of this Objed may be colleded in the Optick Nerve, which is necefTary to its being feen, the di- ob P eSi 
ftance between this Nerve and the Cryftalline ought to be greater. • • >. 

It is true, If the Cryftalline became more convex when the Object were near, that would effeft 
the fame thing as the Elongation of the Eye. But 'tis not credible that the Cryftalline can 
eafily change its convexity ; and on the other fide, we have a moft evident Experiment for the E- 
lon^ation of the Eye : For Anatomy informs us, there are Mufcles that furround the middle of 
the^Eye ; and we are fenfible of the Effort thefe Mufcles make to Comprefs it, and lengthen it, 
when we have a mind to fee any thing very near. ... 

But it is not at all necefTary, we mould know here, by what way this is done;, it isenough 
that there happens a Change in the Eye, whether it proceeds from the Preffure of the Mufcles, 
that furround it \ or whether the little Nerves, which anfwer to the Ciliary Ligaments which hold 
the Cryftalline, fufpended betwixt the other Humours of the Eye, become relax'd, to augment the 
convexity of the Cryftalline -, or intenfe, to diminifh it. 

For this Change which happens, whatever it be, is only to collect, and unite the Rays of Ob- 
jects, with an exad juftnefs, upon the Optick Nerve. But it is certain that when the Object, is 
five hundred Paces, or ten thoufand Leagues diftant, we behold it with the fame Difpofition of 
Eyes, without any fenfible Change in the Mufcles which furround the Eye, or in the Nerves 
which anfwer to the Ciliary Ligaments of the Cryftalline: And the Rays of Objeds are very 
exadly collected upon the Retina, or the Optick Nerve. Thus the Soul judges, that Objects at 
ten thoufand or an hundred thoufand Leagues diftance, are no more than five or fix hundred 
Paces off ; when fhe judges of their Diftance, Only by the Difpofition of the Eyes, which I 
have been fpeaking of. _ 

However, it is certain this Medium is of ufe to the Soul, when the Object, is nigh at hand. 
If, for inftance, an Object is only at half a foot Diftance, we difcern its-Diftance well enough, 
through the Difpofition of the Mufcles which conftringe our Eyes, in order to make them fome- 
what longer : And this Difpofition is moreover painful. If the Object, be remov'd two foot, we 
can ftill difcern the Diftance, becaufe the Difpofition of the Mufcles is fomewhat fenfible Hill, 
although no longer painful. But if the Objed be remov'd ftill fome feet farther, this Difpofition 
of our Mufcles, grows fo imperceptible* that it is altogether ufelefs to us in judging of the Di- 
ftance of the Object.. 

Thefe then are two Means the Soul makes ufe of, to judge of the Diftance of the Objed, which 
are altogether ufelefs, when the Objed is remote to five or fix hundred Paces, and which are ne- 
ver infallible, though the Object, be much nearer. 

The third Medium confifts in the Greatnefs of the Image painted on the fund of the Eye, and The third, 
that makes the Reprefentation of the Objeds which we fee. 'Tis confefs'd that this Image Medium 
grows lefs in proportion as the Object, is remov'd to a greater Diftance, but this Diminution whereby to 
grows fo much lefs difcernable, as the Object, which changes itsDifta nee is more remote. For when ^C^«f of 
an Object, is at a confiderable Diftance, as of five or fiix hundred Paces, under or over in Pro- obietts. 
portion to its Bignefs, there happens very confiderable Changes in its remotenefs, without 
any confiderable Changes occafion'd in the Image which reprefents it, as is eafie to be demon- 
ftrated. Thus the third Medium has the fame defed as the other two, of which we have been 
fpeaking. 

It is farther to be obferv'd, That the Soul does not judge thofe Objeds the remoteft, that have 
the leaft Images painted on the Retina. When I fee, for inftance, a Man and a Tree at an hun- 
dred Paces diftance, or fuppofe many Stars in the Heaven, I do not judge the Man to be more 
remote than the Tree, and the Little Stars farther diftant than the Greater* though the Images 
of the Man, and the little Stars, that are pidur'd on the Retina, are lefs than the Images of the 
Tree and the Greater Stars. Befides it is neceflary to know the greatnefs of an Objed, to be 
able to judge nearly of its Diftance, and becaufe I know an Houfe is bigger than a Man, tho' 
the Image of the Houfe be bigger than that of a Man, I do not however judge the Houfe neareft 
upon that account. And fb it is in refped of the Stars * Our Eyes reprefent them to us equally 
remote, though it is very reafbnableto believe fome of them at a far greater diftance than others. 
Thus there are infinite Objeds, the Diftance whereof we cannot know, fince there are infinite 
Objeds with whofe Magnitude we are unacquainted. 

We judge farther of the remotenefs of an Objed by the Force wherewith it ads upon our Eyes, ^ c mrt ^ 
becaufe a remote Objed ads more languifhing and weakly than another * and again, by the Di- and fifth 
fiintlnefs and Cleamefs of the Image, which is form'd in the Eye * becaufe when an Objed is re- Mediums, 
mote, the Pupil of the Eye mult needs be more open and Capacious, and ConfeqUently the Rays 
muft be colleded fomewhat confufedly. 'Tis for this reafon that obfeurer Objeds, and fuch as 
we fee confufedly, appear remote * and on the contrary, that luminous Bodies, and fuch as we fee 
diftindly, feem near. It is plain enough, that thefe laft Means are too fallible whereby to judge 
with any kind of Certainty concerning the diftance of Objeds : and I fhall not any longer infift 
upon them, but come to the laft of all, as being that which helps the Imagination moft, and in- 
clines the Soul more eafily to judge that Objeds are very remote, 

The 



i /j- F. Malebranche Concerning Book I. 

Tkefixtb The fixth then and the Principal Medium of all, confifts in this, vil. that the Eye exhibits not 
wit T- to the Soij * a ^ n ^ e °^J e< ^ i" e P arate f rom others, but gives her View at once of all thofe which lye 
Judge "of" betwixt us and the Principal Obje<3 of our a&ual Confederation. 

the m- When for inftance, we behold a Steeple at a confiderable Diftance, we ufually fee a great many 
fiance of interjacent Lands and Houfes at the fame time : and becaufe we judge of the Remotenefs of thefe 
objeSs Lands, and Houfes, and in the mean time fee the Steeple beyond them, we judge likewife that 
it is not only more remote, but a great deal larger and taller, than if we faw it all alone : Not-, 
withftanding the Image which is proje&ed in the Fund of the Eye, is always of an equal Bignefs 
whether there are Lands and Houfes lying betwixt us and it, or whether there are none, pro- 
vided we fee it from a^ place equally Diftant, which is fuppos'd. Thus we judge of the Big- 
nefs of Obje&s, according as we believe them remote from us , and the Bodies which we fee 
betwixt us and the Objects, aftift the Imagination mightily in judging of their Remotenefs : juft 
as we* judge of the Extent of our Duration, or of the time that has pafs'd fince we have done 
any Action by the confus'd Remembrance of the things we have done, or of the Thou°hts 
we have had fucceflively fince that Attion. For they -are all thefe Thoughts and A&ions that* 
'have fucceeded one another, which are afliftant to the Mind in judging of the length of any Time 
Or of any part of our Duration i Or rather the confus'd Remembrance of all thefe fucceffive 
Thoughts, is the fame thing as the judgment of our Duration ; as the confus'd View of Lands 
betwixt us and a Steeple, is the fame thing as the judgment concerning the Remotenefs of the 
Steeple. 

Hence it is eafy to affign the true Reafon of the Moon's appearing larger at her Rifing, than 
when confiderably elevated above the Horizon. For at her Rifing fhe appears many Leagues di- 
ftant, and even beyond the fenfible Horizon, or the Lands which terminate our Sight. Where- 
as we judge her but at half a Leagues Diftance, or feven or eight times higher than our Houfes 
when fhe is afcended above our Horizon. Thus we judge her far greater when fhe is near the 
Horizon, than when at a great diftance from it ; becaufe we judge her to be far more remote 
from us, when fhe rifes, than when mounted very high above our Horizon. 

I confefs a great part of the Philofophers attribute what I have been faying to the Vapours 
arifing from the Earth. I agree with them in this, that the Rays of Objefts being refra&ed 
by the Vapours, are a reafon of the Objefts feeming larger. I know there are more Vapours 
betwixt us and the Moon when rifing, than when fhe is elevated a good height j and confequently 
fhe ought to appear fomewhat larger than fhe would feem , if fhe were always equally remote. 
But yet it cannct be faid, that this Refradtion of the Lunary Rays is the caufe of thofe apparent 
Changes of her Magnitude : For that Refraction is no Impediment why the Image delineated in 
the Fund of the Eyes when we fee the xMoon rifing, may not be lefs than that which ihe pro- 
jects, when fhe hath been a long time rifen. 

The Aftronomers who meafure the Diameters of the Planets, obferve that the Diameter of the 
Moon is magnify'd in proportion to her Diftance from the Horizon, and confequently in Pro- 
portion to her Appearing lefler to us : thus the Diameter of the Image which is painted in the 
Fund of our Eyes, it at that time leaftwhen we fee the Moon biggeft : Indeed, the Moon when 
fhe rifes,. is remoter from us by a Semidiameter of the Earth, than when fhe is perpendicular- 
ly over our Heads, and 'tis upon that account her Diameter grows greater in her Afcent above 
the Horizon, becaufe then fhe's approaching neareft us. 

The reafon then that we fee her Greater when fhe rifes, is not the Refradtion of her Rays 
meeting' with the Vapours which proceed from the Earth, fince the Image which is at that time 
form'd from thofe Rays, is leffer ; but 'tis the Natural Judgment we make of her Remotenefs, 
otcafion'd by her appearing beyond thofe Lands which we fee at a vaft Diftance from us, as 
has been before explain'd ; and I am amaz'd to find Philofophers aflerting that the reafon of this 
Appearance, and Delufion of our Sences, is harder to be difcover'd than the greateft Equations 
of Algebra. 

This Medium whereby we judge of the Remotenefs of any Objedt, by knowing the Diftance 
of the things betwixt us and it, is often of confiderable ufe, when the other means I have fpoke 
of, are wholly infignificant : for by this laft Medium, we can judge that certain objedts are ma- 
ny Leagues diftant which we cannot do by any of the other. And yet if we ftridtly furvey it, 
it will be found in feveral tilings deficient, 

• For, firft, we can only make ufe of it, about things upon the Earth, fince "it can be but very 
rarely, and then very unprofitably imploy'd upon thofe in the Air, or in the Heavens. Se- 
condly, it cannot be made ufe of on the Earth, but about things a few Leagues diftant. In the 
third place, we ought to be certain that there are neither Mountains^ nor Valleys, nor any thing 
of the like nature betwixt us and the Object, that hinders us from applying the afore-faid Me- 
dium. Laftly, lam perfwaded there is no body but has made fufficient Tryals upon the Sub- 
ject, to be convinc'd, that it is a thing extreamly difficult to judge with any certainty of the Re- 
motenefs of Objedts by a fenfible View of the things lying betwixt us and them : and we per- 
haps have dwelt two long upon it. 

Thefe then are all the Means we have to judge of the Diftance of Objedts \ in which, fince we 
have found confiderable Imperfedtions we cannot but conclude, that the Judgments that are 
grounded upon them, muft needs be very Precarious and Uncertain. 

Hence it is ,eafy to manifeft the truth of the Propofitions I have advane'd. The Objedt C was 
fuppos'd confiderably remote from A : Therefore in many Inftances it may be advane'd on to- 
wards 



Chap. X. The Search after Truth. 25 

wards D, or may have approach'd towards B, and no one Can difcover it, becaufe there is no 
infallible Means whereby to judge of its Diftance. Nay, it may recede towards D when it is 
thought to approach towards B ; becaufe the Image of the Objed is fometimes augmented, and 
inlarged upon the Retina ; whether it be becaufe the Air betwixt the Objed and the Eye occa- 
sions a greaterRefradion at one time than at another \ whether it proceeds from fome little Trem- 
lings, which happen in the Optick Nerve ; or laftly, that the Impreflion, which is caus'd by an 
unexad Union of the Rays upon the Retina, is diffus'd and communicated to the parts, which 
ought to receive no Agitation from it ; which may proceed from any different caufes. Thus the 
Image of the fame Objeds, being larger on thefe occafions, gives the Soulreafon to believe the 
Objed approaches nearer. The like may be faid of the other Propofitions. 

Before I conclude this Chapter, I would have it obferv'd, That it is of great concern to us, 
in order to the Prefer vation of our Life, to have a nicer Knowledge of the Motion or Reft of 
Bodies, in Proportion to their Nighnefs to us : and that it is a thing ufelefs and iniignificant, to 
know exadly the truth of thefe things, when happening in places very remote. For this evi- 
dently (hews that what I have generally advanc'd concerning all the Sences, how they never Dif- 
cover things to us as they are abfolutely, and in their own Nature •, but only in Relation to the Pre- 
fervation of our Body, is found exadly True in this particular: fince we know the Motion or 
Refts of Objeds proportionably better, as they approach nearer to us, and are incapable of 
judging of them by the Sences, when they are fo remote as to feem to have no Relation at all, 
or very little to our Body : as, for inftance, when they are five or fix hundred Paces diftant, 
if they be of a Moderate Bignefs^ or even Nearer than this, when they are Leflerj or fome- 
what farther off, when they are proportionably Greater. 



C H A. P. X. 

Of our Errors about fenjlble Qualities. I. The Diftin&ionofthe Soul and Bo- 
dy. II. An Explication of the Organs of the Senfes. III. To what part of 
the Body the Soul is immediately united. IV. An Inftance to explain the 
Ejfecl which Obje&s have upon our Bodies. V. What it is they produce in 
the Soul) and the Reafons why the Soul perceives not the Motions of the Fi- 
bres of the Body. VI. Four things which are generally confounded in every 
Sen fat ion. 

WE have feen in the fore-going Chapters that the judgments we form upon the Tefti- 
mony of our Eyes, concerning Extenfion, Figure, and Motion, are never exadly true. 
And yet it muft not be allow'd that they are altogether falfe j they contain fb much 
Truth at leaft as this amounts to, that there are Extenfion, Figures, and Motions, whatever they 
be, which are extrinfical, or without our felves. 

I confefs we often fee things that have no Exiftence, nor ever had, and it ought not to be 
concluded that a thing is Adually without us, from our Seeing it without us. There is no necef- 
lary Connexion between the Prefence of an Idea to the Mind of a Man, and the Exiftence of 
the Thing reprefented by the Idea. Which is manifeft enough from the Confideration of what 
happens to Men in a Dream or a Delirium: And yet we may fafely affirm, that ordinarily, Ex- 
tenfion, Figures, and Motions, are without us when we fee them fo. * Thefe things are not *Seetkeil- 
in the Imagination only, but are Real. And we are not deceiv'd in believing them to have luftmims. 
a Real Exiftence, and wholly independent on our Mind •, tho' it be a very hard thing to 
prove it. 

It is certain then that the Judgments we form concerning the Extenfion, the Figures, and Mo- 
tions of Bodies, contain fome Truth : But 'tis another cafe in point of thofe Judgments we make 
concerning Light, Colours, Tafts, Smells, and all other Senfible Qualities : For Truth has no- 
thing to do with them, as fhall be made manifeft, in the remainder of this Firft Book. 

We make not here any Diftindion between Light and Colours, becaufe we fuppofe them to 
have no great Difference ; and that they cannot be feparately Explain'd. We fhall likewife 
be oblig'd to fpeak of other Senfible Qualities in general, at the fame time we fhall treat of 
thefe Two in particular, becaufe they may be accounted for upon the fame Principles. The 
things which follow demand the greateft Attention imaginable, as being of the higheft Impor- 
tance, and very different, as to their Ufefulnefs, from thofe of the foregoing Difcourfe. 

We inftantly fuppofe a Man to have made fome Refledions upon two * Idea's which he , 
finds in his Soul : one that reprefents the Body, and the other which reprefents the Mind ; iie Di- 
and that he is able eafily to diftinguifh them by the pofitive Attributes they contain : In a word ,fimdioKof 
that he is very well fatisfi'd, that Extenfion is a different thing from Thought. Or we will fup- <*e soul 
pofe he has read and meditated on fome places of St. Auftin, as the 1 oth Chapter of the 1 oth Book, Tifffl 

the Name of Idea here whatever is the Immediate Objett of the Mini% 
H Concerning 



26 F. Malebranche Concerning Book I. 

Concerning the Trinity, the 4th and 1 4th Chapters of his Book concerning The Quantity J>f the Soul, 

at leaft Mr. Des-Canesh Meditations, efpecially that Part which treats of the Diftin&ion of the 

Soul and Body : or laftly Mr. Cordemofs fixth Diflertation, concerning the Difference of the 

Soul and Body. 

"!*• . We fuppofe farther, that he is acquainted with the An at omy of the Organs of the Senfes j and 

*}**$* 'knows that they confift of little Threads or Fibres, which derive their Origine from the middle 

liecrSs ot * the Brain : tlwt the y are dif P ers ' d trough all the Members wherein there is Senfation, and 

of the sen- being continued without any Interruption, are terminated upon the External parts of the Body, 

Jei. that whilft a Man is awake and in health, one of the Extremities cannot be mov'd but the other 

will, be mov'd in the fame time, 'becaufe they are always fomewhat Intenfe and upon the ftretch : the 

fame thing which happens to a Cord that is intenfe, one part whereof cannot be mov'd, but the 

other mult receive fome Vibration. 

'Tis farther neceflary to know that thefe little Threads or Fibres may be mov'd by two feve- 
ral ways, either by that end that is external to the Brain, or by the end which terminates 
in the Brain. If thefe Fibres are externally agitated byObje&s acting on them, and this Agi- 
tation be not communicated fo far as the Brain, as it happens in Sleep, the Soul receives no frefli 
Senfation from them at that time : But if thefe Fibres are moved in the Brain by the courfe of 
the Animal Spirits, or by any other caufe, the Soul has a Perception of fomething : though 
the Parts of thefe Fibres which are without the Brain, and aredifpers'd throughout all the Parts 
of the Body, are quiet and undifturb'd •, as it happens when a Man's afleep. 
IIT. it will not be amifs to obferve here, by the way, that Experience certifies us, it is not impof- 
ihe soul ^j e tQ f eel p a j n - m t-hofg p ar ts of our Body, which have been intirely cut off: Becaufe the Fi- 
tieh "^K. Dres or " the Brain, which correfpond to them, being Vibrated in the fame manner, as if thofe 
ted to that Parts were actually wounded, the Soul feels in thofe Imaginary Parts, a mofl real Pain. For all 
pan of the thefe things are a palpable Demonftration, that the Soul immediately refides in that Part of the 
Brain Brain in which all the Organs of the Senfes terminate and centre : I mean that in this Part fhe 
mZVtf receives the Senfation of all the Changes, that there occur, in reference to the Objects that have 
the" organs caus'd them, or have us'd to caufe them: and fhe has no Perception of any thing happening 
of the sen- in any other Part, but by the Intervention of the Fibres which terminate therein. This being 
f:s centre, j^ d own and well underltood, it will be no hard thing to difcoverhow Senfation is effected, 
which is neceflary to be explain'd by fome particular Inftance. 
IV. When a Man thrufts the Point of a Needle into his hand, this Point moves and feparates the 

if" In \ Fibres of the Flefh. Thefe Fibres are extended from that Place to the Brain and whilft he is 
explain ° awake, they are fo Intenfe, that they can receive no Concuffion or Vibration, but it is Cpra- 
the effect municated to thofe in the Brain: It follows then that the Extremities of the Fibres in the 
which ob- grain mult be in like manner mov'd. If the motion of the Fibres of the Hand is Moderate, 
)ecls have t ^ t Q ^ ^ pi Dres f the Brain will be fo too : and if this Motion is violent enough to break 
B^odielT fomething in the Hand, it will be more forcible and violent in the Brain. 

Thus if a Man holds his Hand to the Fire, the little parts of the Wood, whereof it continu- 
ally throws out innumerable quantities with great violence fas Reafon, upon the defect, of our 
Sight, demonftrat.es J beat againit the Fibres, and communicate a Part of their Agitation to 
them. If that Agitation be but moderate, that of the Extremities of the Fibres in the Brain which 
anfwer to the Hand will be moderate alfo. And if this Motion be violent enough in the Hand, 
to feparate fome Parts of it, as it happens when it is Burnt ; the Motion of the Internal 
Fibres of the Brain will be proportionably ftronger and more violent. This then is what 
occurs in our Body when Objects ftrike upon us : we muft now fee what happens to our Soul. 
V. She is principally Refident, if we may be permitted fo to fpeak, in that Part of the Brain, 

What it is w here all the Fibres of our Nerves are centred. She is feated there in order to cherifh and pre- 
that objects p erve a yj ^g p arts f our Body : and confequently it is neceffary fhe mould have notice of all 
thesoul andthz Changes that occur therein, and that fhe be able to diftinguifh thofe which are adapted 
the Keafons and agreeable to the Conftitution of her Body, from the contrary ; fince it would be to noufe 
■why the or purpofe for her to know them abfolutely and without Relation to the Body. Thus though all the 
soul per- changes of our Fibres do, in true fpeaking, confift merely in theMotions of them, which are ge- 
lle^Mofi- nera ^y no farther different, than according to the Degrees of more or lefs -, yet it is neceffary 
ens of the for the Soul to look upon thefe Changes as Effentially different: For though they differ very 
Hires of little in themfelves, they ought however to be confider'd as Effentially different, in reference 
the Body. t0 tne p r efervation of the Body. 

The Motion for inftance, that produces Pain, has rarely any confiderable difference from that 
Thiscon- wn i c h caufes Titillation : There is no neceflity there fhould be any Effential Difference betwixt 
fusd R$a- t j ie j- e twQ M ti onS5 DU t it is neceflary there fhould be an Effential Difference betwixt the Titil- 
thhNuu- lation and the Pain, which thefe two Motions caufe in the 'Soul. For the Vibration of the Fi- 
rai fudge- bres which accompanies Titillation, certifies the Soul of the good Conftitution of her Body, 
mem is on- an( \ affures her it has Strength enough to refift the Impreffionof the Object, and that fhe need not 
lj a Cam- k e un( ] er an y Apprehenfions of its being injur'd by it : But the Motion which accompanies Pain, 
fatHn. See being fomewhat more violent, is capable of breaking fome Fibre of the Body, and the Soul ought 
jfhat/have to be advis'd of it by fome Difagreeable Senfation ; fo as to be aware of it for the fu- 
faid before ture. Thus though the Motions, which are occalion'd in the Body, are no farther differe.it in 
of Natural themfelves than according to the Degrees of more or lefs; yet being confider'd with Relition 
tnems'and to the Welfare and Prefervation of our Life, they may be faid to differ Elfentially. 
t kefirft Ch. of the ^d. Booh 'Tis 



Chap. X. The Search after Truth. 27 

'Tis upon this account our Soul has no Perception of the Vibrations, which are excited by 
Obje&s, in the Fibres of our Flefh : It would be of very little ufe for her to know them ^ nor 
could (he from thence receive fufficient Light to judge, whether the things about us were capa- 
ble of Deftroying or Maintaining the aconomy of our Body. But (he feels her felf touch'd with 
Senfations efTentially different, which fhewing precifely the Qualities of Obje&s, as they are 
related to her Body, make her moft exa&ly fenfible in what capacity thefe Obje&s are in to 

hurt it. 

We may farther confider, That in cafe the Soul had no Perception, but of that which hap- 
pen'd in her Hand, when it were burnt, if fhe faw nothing there but the Motion and Separa- 
tion of fome Fibres, fhe would not much concern her felf about it: Nay, fhe might probably 
fometimes out of an Humour or a Frolick, take fome fatisfaction in doing it, like thofe Freakifh 
kind of Men, who divert themfelves in their Paflions or. Debauches, in breaking all things 
they light upon. 

Or as a Prifoner would not be much concern'd, to fee the Walls batter'd down about him, that 
confin'd him, but rather would be glad of it, upon the hopes of a Deliverance : So if we had 
no other Perception than of the Separation of the Parts of our Body, when we were burnt or 
hurt in any manner, we mould foon be perfwaded that our Happinefs was not confin'd to a Body 
which prevented our Injoying thofe things, which ought to make us Happy - 7 and fo Ihould be 
glad of feeing it deftroy'd. 

Hence it is apparent that the Author of the Union of our Soul and Body, hath with greateft 
Wifdom ordain'd, That we Ihould be fenfible of Pain , whenever any Change happen'd to our 
Body, capable of incommoding it ; as when a Needle pierced the Flefh, or the Fire feparated 
fome parts of it ^ and that we fhould be fenfible of a- Titillation, or an agreeable Heat, when 
thefe Motions were moderate, without perceiving the Truth of that which occur'd in our Body 
or the Motions of the Fibres, we have been fpeaking of. ■'_ 

Firft, becaufe in the Senfation of Pleafure and Pain, which are things far more different than 
in Decree, we diftinguifh with greater Eafe the Obje&s which occafion them. Secondly, be- 
caufe this way of Informing us, whether the Uniting our felves with the Bodies that encompafs 
as, or the Separating from them be moft convenient, is the fhorteft and the fpeedieft, and takes 
up' the capacity of the Mind the leaft ; which is only made for G O D himfelf. 

Laftly, becaufe Pleafure and Pain are Modifications of our Soul, which fhe feels with Relation 
to her Body, and which more nearly affeft her than would the Knowledge of the Motion of 
fome Fibres belonging to it :, this obliges her to be more follicitous about them : And this is a 
Reafon of the moft ftrift Union betwixt the two Confituent Parts of Man. From all which it is 
manifeft that the Senfes are given us, for the Prefervation of our Body only, and not for the 
Difcovery of the Truth. 

What hath been faid concerning Titillation and Pain, ought univerfally to be underflood 
of all other Senfations, as we (hall fee hereafter. I chofe to begin with thefe two Senfations ra- 
ther than others, becaufe they are more Strong, and Lively, and Proper to make my Meaning 
more SenfMy conceiv'd. 

It is at prefent a very eafie thing to fhew, That we fall into infinite Errors, concerning Light 
and Colours, and generally concerning all Senfible Qualities ; as Cold, Heat, Smells, Tafts, 
Sound, Pain, and Titillation ^ and if I would ftand to make a particular Enquiry into all thqfe 
we fall into about all the Obje&s of our Senfes, whole Years would not fufhceto make a De- 
duction of them •, becaufe they are in a manner Infinite. It will be fufficient therefore to (peak 
of them in general. 

In almoft air Senfations there are four different things which Men confound with One another, 
becaufe they happen altogether, and as it were in the fame Inftant : And this is the Prin- 
ciple of all the Errors of our Senfes. 

The fir ft is the Attion of the Object, that is in Heat, for inftance, the Impulflon or Motion vl * 
of the little parts of the Wood againft the Fibres of the Hand. . F ° Ur 

The Second is the PaJJion of the Organ of Senfe, that is to fay, the Agitation of the Fibres ij^fb m 
of the Hand caufed by that of the little Parts of Fire, which Agitation is communicated to the generally 
Brain, becaufe otherwife the Soul would have no Senfation of it. confound' 

The Third is the Pajfwn, the Senfation or Perception of the Soul, that is, What every one Feels ei i n ^ r 3 
in himfelf when he is near the Fire. Senfation. 

The Fourth is the Judgment the Soul makes, that what fhe feels is both in her Hand, and in the 
Fire : Now this Judgment is Natural, or rather is only a Compound Senfation. But this Senfation 
or this Natural Judgement, is for the moft part attended with another Free or Voluntary Judge- 
ment, which is fo cuftomary for the Soul to make, that fhe is almoft incapable of preventing it. 
Here then are four things of a very different Nature, as may be feen, which Men are not nice 
enough to diftinguifh, but are apt to confound, becaufe of the ftrict Union of the Soul and Bo- 
dy, which hinders them from making an exact diftribution of the Properties of Matter, and of 
the Mind. 

'Tis notwithftanding eafie to difcover, That of thefe four things, which occur within us, in the 
Senfation of an Object ; the two firft belong to the Body, and the two laft appertain to the 
Soul only, provided a Man has any whit meditated on the Nature of the Soul and Body, as he 
ought to have done, as I before fuppos'd him. But thefe things demand a particular Explication. 

CHAP. 



I 



I. 



2 8 F. Malebranche Concerning Book I. 

■< CHAP. XL 

I. The Error we fall into concerning the A&ion of Obje&s againft the Ex- 
ternal Fibres of our Senfes. II. The Caufe of this Error. III. An Ob- 
jection and Anfwer. 

*N this and the three fucceeding Chapters, I fhall treat of thefe four things above-mention'd, 
which I faid us'd to be confounded, and taken for a fimple Senfation : and I fhall only give 
a general Explication of the Errors we fall into, becaHfeif I would defcend to Particulars, 
there would never bean end of them: But I hope however to put the Mind of thofe, who will 
ferioufly confider what I am about to fay, in a condition of difcoverine; with a great deal of Eafe, 
all the Errors our Senfes can make Us Subje& to } But in order to this it is demanded, That they 
would attentively Meditate as well upon the following Chapters, as upon tha^ they have laft 

oftheEr- Deen Reading. 

rorwefall The firffc of the things we confound, in each of our Senfations, is the A&ion of Obje&s upon 
imo con- the External Fibres of our Body. It is certain a Man makes hardly any Difference betwixt the 
eerningthe Senfation of the Soul, and that A&ion of Obje&s •, which is fo plain as not to need any farther 
obeih - Pr0 °f- The generality of Men imagine that the Heat, tor inftance, which they Feel, is in the 
eJtoft the Fi re which caufes it ^ that Light is in the Air, and Colours are upon colour'd Obje&s. They 
External have no Thought of any Motions of Imperceptible Bodies which are the Caufe of thefe Sea- 
Fibres of fations. 

oursenjes. j t j s true t ^ e y £ not j u dge that Pain is in the Needle which pricks them, in like manner as 

11I# they judge that Heat is in the Fire : But the reafon of it is, That the Needle and its A&ion are 

thec'aufe vifible, but the little parts of the Wood that proceed from the Fire, and their Motion againft 

ofthuEr- ottr Hands are altogether invifible. Thus, feeing nothing that ftrikes upon our Hands when 

ror. we wa y m our felves, and yet feeling Heat in them, we Naturally judge this Heat to be in the 

Fire, for want of discovering any thing in it befides. 

So that it is generally true, that we attribute our Senfations to the Obje&s themfelves, when 

we are Ignorant of the Caufes of thefe Senfations.- And bccaufe Pain and Titiliation are pro- 

duc'd by Senfible Bodies, as by a Needle or a Feather, which we both fee and touch, we for 

this Reafon do not conclude, that there is any thing in thefe Obje&s like the Senfations which 

they caufe in us. 

m * And yet I confefs that we do not fail to judge Combuftion \s not in the Fire, but only in the 

Sion and Hand, though it proceed from the fame caufe, i. e. the A&ion of the little parts of the Wood, 

Anfwer. as well as Heat, which yet we attribute to the Fire. But the Reafon of this is, That Combuftion 

is a Species of Pain : For having often judg'd that Pain is not in the external Body which produces 

it, we are induc'd to form the fame Judgement of Combuftion. 

That which is another Reafon of our judging in this manner, is, that Pain or CombufHon, moffc 
ftrenuoufly applys our Soul to the confederation of the parts of her Body •, and this Imenfion of 

Se Soul turns off* her thoughts from any other thing : Thus the Mind attributes the Senfation 
1 Qombuflion to the Obje& that is moft prefent and nigh her felf. And becaufe we find pre- 
fently after, that the Combuftion has left fome vifible marks in the part in which we felt the 
Pain, this is a Confirmation of the Judgement we have made, that Combuftion is in the Hand. But 
this is no Impediment, why we fhould not embrace this general Rule, That roe are acvuftorrfd to 
attribute our Senfations to Objeils, vehen-ever they ail upon us by the Motion of fome Invifible Parts. 
And upon this ground it is, that we ufually believe Colours, Light, Smells, Tafts, Sounds, 
and fome other Senfations, to be in the Air, or in the External Obje&s which produce 
them : for as much as all thefe Senfations are produced in us by the Motions of fome Imper- 
ceptible Bodies. - 



CHAP. XII. 

I. Of our Errors concerning the Motions of the Fibres of our Senfes. II. 
That we have no Perception, of thefe Motions, or that we confound them 
with our Senfations. III. An Experiment that proves it. IV. Three kinds 
of Senfations. V. The Errors that accompanie them. 

f ** r " i """"""HE fecond thing thatoccurs in every Senfation is the Vibration of the Fibres of our Nerves, 
rorT'con-' 1 which is communicated to the Brain : And we err in confounding always this Vibration 
terningthe with the Senfation of the Soul, and in judging there is no fuch Vibration at all, when 

Motions or we have no Perception of it through the Senfes. 
Vibrations of the Fibres of our[Senfcs. We 



Chap. Xll. The Search nfter Truth. 29 

We confound, for inftance, the Vibration excited by the Fire in the Fibres of our Hand, with & 
the Senfation of Heat : And we fay the Heat is in the Hand i But becaufe we are infenfible of c J™J e 
any Vibration caus'd by Vifible Objects in the Optick Nerve, which is in the Fund of the Eye, j/; ,4 whh 
we think this Nerve is not vibrated at all, nor cover'd with the Colours that we fee. On the the Setifa- 
contrary, we judge thefe Colours are fpread only onthefurface of the External Objects. Yet tiom of our 
it is manifeft by the following Experiment, that the Colours are as ftrongly and lively exprefs'd soul, mi 
bn the Fund of the Optick Nerve as in vifible Objects. . hZTTo 

For take but the Eye of an Ox juft kill'd, and ftrip off the Coats that are oppofite to the Ptt-* perception 
pill and fituate near the Optick Nerve, putting a piece of very tranfparent Paper in their room : of them. 
This done, place the Eye in the hole of a Window, fo as the Pupiil may be towards the Air, in « 
and the hind-part of the Eye in the Chamber:, which mould be clofe fliut up and darken'd all r/w *j^° 
over : And upon this the Colours of Objects that are out of the Chamber will appear to be fpread r p roves $ 
upon' the Fund of the Eye, but painted topfy-turvy. If it fortunes that the Colours are not 
lively enough, on the account of the too little diftance of the Objects reprefented in the Fund 
of the Eye, the Eye mult be lengthened by conftringing the fides of it, or fhortned if the Ob- 
jects are too remote. 

We fee by this Experiment, that we Ought to judge or perceive that Colours are in the 
Fund of the Eye-, in like manner as we judge that Heat is in our Hands, if our Senfes were 
given us for the Difcovery of Truth, and if Reafon conducted us in the Judgments we make 
upon the Objects of our Senfes. 

But in accounting for this inconfiftent Variety of our Judgements about Senfible Qualities, it 
it mult be confider'd, That the Soul is fo intimately united to her Body, and moreover, has 
contracted fo much Carnality fince the Fall, that (he attributes a great many things to the Bo- 
dy which are only peculiar to her Self} and can hardly any longer diftinguifh her felf from 
it.' Infomuch that fhe does not only attribute to it all the Senfations we are at prefent fpeaking 
of but alfo the Force of Imagination j and even fometimes the Power of Reafoning .' For there 
have been a multitude of Philofophers, ftupid and fenfelefs enough to believe, the Soul was no- 
thing elfe but the more refin'd and fubtle part of the Body. 

A Man that fhall read Tertnllian conliderately, will be but too fenfibly convinc'd of what I fay: 
fince he fubfcribes to this Opinion, after a great number of Authors whofe Authority he al- 
ledges : This is fo true, that he endeavours to prove in his Book, Concerning the Soul, that we 
are oblig'd by Faith, Scripture, and particular Revelations, to believe' the Soul a Corporeal 
Being. I delign not a Refutation of his Notions, becaufe I have fuppos'd a Man to have read 
fome of St. Juftinh or Mr. Des-Cartes\ Works,* which will fufficiently difcover the Extravagance 
of thefe Thoughts, and confirm and corroborate the Mind in the Diftinction,of Extenfion and 
Thought, of the Soul and Body. 

The Soul then is fo blind, as not to know her felf, nor difcern that her own Senfations do . Iv * ■■■ 
belong to her. But to explain this, it is neceffary to diftinguifh in the Soul three kinds of ^j***?" 
Senfations, fome Vigorous and Lively, others Faint and Languifhing} and laftly, a Middle fort three fons 
between thefe two. t ■ of senfk- 

The Vigorous and Lively Senfations, are fuch as furprize and quicken .the Mind with a fort oV lonso f the 
Violence : as being either very grateful or difagreeable to it : Such as are Pain, or Titillation* Soul ° 
<*reat Cold, or vehement Heat ^ and, in general, all fuch as are not only attended with. Traces 
m the Brain, but moreover with fome Motion of the Animal Spirits towards the Internal 
Parts of the Body ■-, fuch a Motion as is proper to excite the Paffions, as fhall be explain'd in 
another place. 

The faint and languifhing Senfations are fuch as affect the Soul very little ; and are neither 
very Pleafant, nor very Difagreeable to her j as moderate Light, all Colours, weak and ordi- 
dinary Sounds, &c 

Laftly, The Middle kind, betwixt the Vigorous and Faint, I call fuch forts of Senfations, as 
moderately affect the Soul ^ as a great and glaring Light, a loud and mighty Sound, &c. But 
it is obfervable, that . a Weak and Languid Senfation may become a Middle one, and proceed 
to be a Vigorous and Lively one. The Senfation, for inftance, a Man has of Light is faint, 
when the Light of a Flambeau is but glimmering or remote^ but this Senfation may become & 
Middle one upon the approaching of the Flambeau nearer us : It may, laftly, grow moft ftrong 
and lively, by holding the Flambeau fo dole to the Eyes as to dazle them •, or fuppofe a Man 
beholds the Sun : Thus the Senfation of Light may be Vigorous or Faint, or neither, but Mo- 
derate, according to its different Degrees. 

Let us fee then the Judgments the Soul paffes upon thefe three forts of Senfations : wherein v. 
we may obferve that fhe almoft ever blindly and implicitly follows the fenfible Impreffions, or The Er^ 
the Natural Judgments of the Senfes - y and that fhe is delighted, if I may fo term it, to dif- rm tbat 
fufeher felf upon the Objects fhe confiders, by difmantling her own Being, to cloath and adorn 5£ w £j-* : 
External Objects. [ttons* 

The firft of thefe Senfations are fb Vigorous and Powerful, that the Soul mult, whether fhe 
will or not, acknowledge they do, in fome meafure, belong to her : So that fhe not only judges 
them to be in the Objects, but believes them alfo to be in the Members of her Body, which 
fhe confiders as a Part of her Self. Thus fhe judges that Heat and Cold are not only in the 

Fire and Ice, but in her own Hands alfo. 

1 

l As 



30 F. Malebranche Concerning Book I 

As to the Languid Senfations, they fo little concern the Soul, that fhe concludes they do 
not belong to her ; that they are neither in her felf, nor in her Body, but in Objects only. 
And for this Reafon it is we deveflour own Soul, and our own Eyes, of Light and Colours to 
cloath and beautifie the Objeds that are without us, though Reafon teaches us that the Idea we 
have of Matter does not include them in it. And Experience vifibly manifests, that we ought 
equally to judge them in our Eyes as on the Objeds ; fince we fee them no lefs upon the one 
than the other, as I have experimentally prov'd by the Eye of an Ox plac'd in the hole 
of a Window. 

Now the Reafon why Men do not fo readily perceive Colours, Smells, Talis, and all other 
Senfations, to be the Modifications of their Soul, is, becaufe we have not anydiftind Idea of 
the Soul. For when we know a thing by the Idea that reprefeuts it, we know clearly the Mo- 
difications it is capable of. All Men whatever agree that Rotundity, for initance, is a Modifi- 
cation of Extenfion ; becaufe all Men know what Extenfion is by a clear Idea that reprefeuts it. 
Thus, becaufe we know not the Soul by its Idea, as I fhall explain hereafter, but only by an 
Internal Senfation that we have of it, we can't underftand by a limple View, but by the force 
of Reafbning only, whether Whitenefs, Light, Colours, Sounds, and other faint and languish- 
ing Senfations are the Modifications of our Soul, or not. But as to the lively Senfations, as 
Pain and Pleafure, we eafily judge that they are within us ; becaufe we feel them feniibiy 
affed us ; and there is no need of our knowing them by their Ideas, to underftand that 
they belong to as. 

As for the Middle Senfations, the Soul feems dubious and at a Fault about them. For on one 
hand fhe is willing to follow the Natural Judgments of the Senfes, and thereupon ihe removes as 
far from her as poffible this kind of Senfations,to bellow them upon the Objeds : But,on the other 
hand, 'tis Impoffible but Ihe mult feel within her felf, and be confcious, that they belong to her; 
efpecially when thefe Senfations come up near to thofe, which I have named the Strong and Live- 
ly ; whereupon let us fee how (he behaves her felf in refped of the Judgments fhe makes con- 
cerning them : If fhe is fmartly touch'd with the Senfation, fhe judges it to be in her own Body, 
as well as in theObjed: If the Senfation afFeds her but a very little, Ihe judges it only in the 
Objed : If the Senfation be of a Middle fort, betwixt thofe we call the Strong, and the vVeak, 
the Soul then knows not what to think of it, whilft Ihe judges only by the Senfes. 

For inftance, If a Man fees a Candle at a good competent diftance, the Soul judges the Light 
to be only in the Objed; if he puts it very near his Eyes, the Soul judges the Light to be not 
only in the Candle, but likewife in the Eyes; but if he withdraws about a foot from it, the 
Soul is at a paufe without determining whether or not the Light be in the Objed only. But 
fhe is never fo wife as to think as fhe ought to do, that Light neither is, nor can be any Proper- 
ty or Modification of Matter; and that it is only within her felf; becaufe /he never thinks of 
imploying her Reafon in difcovering the Truth of the Matter, but only her Senfes, which 
never can difcover it, nor indeed were given us for any other ufe than the Prefervation of 
the Body 

Now the caufe why the Soul makes no more ufe of her Reafon, that is, of her pure IntelleElion, 
in considering an Objed which may be perceiv'd by the Senfes, is this, that the Soul is not at 
all mov'd or concern'd on the account of thofe things Ihe perceives by pure JmelUEHon^ but on 
the contrary, is molt nearly touch'd by things Senfiblc .- For the Soul applies her felf intenfely 
to that which affeds her molt ; but is too carelefs to apply her felf to things that work in her 
no Concernment. Thus fhe almoft univerfally fuites her Free judgments to the Natural Judg- 
ment of her Senfes. 

To judge aright then of Light and Colours, as of all other fenfibie Qualities, we mull care- 
fully diftinguifh between the Senfation of Colour, and the Motion of the Optick Nerve ; and 
we muft find out by our Reafon, that Motions and Impulsions, are Properties of Bodies, and 
therefore may polfibly be found both in Objeds, and in the Organs of our Senfes, but that Light 
and Colours which we fee, are Modifications of our Soul, very different from the other, and of 
which we have quite different Idea's. 

For it is evident that a Peafant, for inftance, fees Colours very well, and can diftinguifh them 
from all things elfe that are not Colour. It is evident too that he perceives nothing of Motion 
either in the colour'd Objeds, or in the Fund of his Eyes ; therefore Colour is not Motion : la 
like manner, a Peafant is very fenfibie of Heat, and he has knowledge clear enough to distinguish 
it from all thing clie, which are not Heat. Yet he never fo much as thinks of the Fibres of his 
Hand's being mov'd. Heat then which he feels is not Motion, fince the Idea's of Heat and Mo- 
tion are different, and one may be had without the other. For we have no other Reafon to af- 
firm a Square is not a Circle, but becaufe the Idea of a Square is different from that of a Circle, ' 
and we can think of one without thinking of the other. 

There needs but a little Attention to difcover, that it is not neceffary the caufe which occa- 
fions a Senfation of fiich or fuch a Thing in us, Should contain that thing in it felf. for, as 
there is no neceffity ^here Should be Light in my Hand, when I feeaflafh, upon giving my Eye 
a blow ; fo there is no need that Heat Should be in the Fire, to make me fenfibie of it, upon 
the approach of my Hand towards it; nor indeed that any other feniible Qualities, Should be 
in the Objeds that produce them. 'Tis enough that they caufe a Vibration in the Fibres of my 
Flefh, to the end my Soul which is united to it, may be modify'd by fomc Senfation. There 
is no Analogy, I confefs, between Motions and Senfations : Nor is there any betwixt Body and 

Spirit 



C ! iap. XIII. The Search after Truth. 2 1 

Spirit. Bat fince Nature, or the Will of the Creator, aflbciates thefe two Subftances, though 
efleatially different, we need not wonder if their Modifications are Reciprocal. It is neceffary it 
fhould be fo, that both of them might conftitute but one entire Being. 

It fhoald be well obfcrv'd, that our Senfes being given us only for the Prefervation of our 
Body, it is moil conveniently ordered that they fhould induce us to judge of fenfible Qualities 
juft as we do. It is abundantly more for our advantage to receive the Senfation of Pain and Heat 
as being in our own Body ,than to judge they were only in theObje&s that occafion'd them: Becaufe 
Pain and Heat being capable of injuring the Members of the Body, it is mofl requifite we fhould be 
warn'd of them whenever they attacqu'd us, to prevent our Body's being endammag'd by them. 

But in point of Colours 'tis another cafe ; for the generality, they are unable to hurt the Fund • 
of the Eye, where they are collected, and it is an ufelefs thing to us to know they are painted on. 
it. Thefe Colours are only neceflary to us, as far as they are conducible to a more diftinct Dii- 
covery of Objects 5 and upon that account our Senfes induce us to attribute them to Objects only. 
Thus the Judgments which the Impreffion of our Senfes incline us to make, are moft exact, if 
coufider'd only in Relation to the Prefervation of our Body. But yet they are altogether 
Phantaftical, and very remote from the Truth, as we have already feen in part, and fhall be more 
abundantly manifeft in that which follows. 



CHAP. XIII. 

I. Of the Nature of Senfations. II. That a Man knows them better than 
he thinks he does. III. An Obje&ion and Anfxver. IV. Why a Man 
imagines he has no knowledge of his own Senfations. V. That ^th an Er- 
ror to think all Men have the fame Senfations of the fame Obje&s. VI. An 
Objeclion and Anfwer. 

1 H E third thing which is found in each of our Senfations, or that which we Feel, for j 
inflance, when we are near the Fire, is a Modification of our Soul, in Relation or Cor- fhe Defini- 
rcfpondence to that which occurs in the Body, to which flie is united. This Modification is tion of the 
grateful or agreeable when that which occurs in the Body, is proper to promote the Circulation Sen faimf. 
of the Blood and other Vital Functions : And this is nam'd in an Equivocal Term, Heat : But 
this Modification is painful, and quite different from the other, when that which occurs in the 
Body, is capable of incommoding or burning it \ that is to fay, when the Motions which are in 
the Body are capable of breaking fome of it Fibres, and this generally goes by the Name of 
tain or tiombuftion ; and fo 'tis with the other Senfations : But now let us fee what are the 
Thoughts Men ufually have upon this Subject. 

The firft Error is this, that a Man unreafonably imagines he has no Knowledge of his Senfa- II. 
tions. We daily find a great number of fuch Men as are much concern'd, and very follicitous "MataMan 
to know what Pain and Pleafure, and the other Senfations are : Neither will they grant that*^j e ^_ 
they are only in the Soul, and the Modifications of it: I confefs thefe are a ftrange fort of Men, tions better 
who would needs be taught what they cannot be ignorant of : For 'tis impoffible a Man fhould be than he 
abfolutely ignorant what Pain is, when he is under the fenfe of it. ^inks be 

A Man, for example, that burns his Hand, does very well diftinguifh the Pain he feels from ' 
Light, Colour, Sounds, Tails, Smells, Pleafure, and from every other Pain befides that he 
feels. He diftinguifh.es it very well from Admiration, Deiire, and Love. He diftinguifhes it 
from a Square, a Circle, and a Motion , in a word, he finds 'tis very different from every thing 
which is not the Pain he feels. Now if he has no Knowledge of Pain, I would fain be fatisfy'd, 
how he can tell with any certainty of evidence, that what he feels is none of all thefe things. 

We know then in fome meafure what we are immediately fenfible of ^ as when we fee Colours 
or have-any other Senfation : And if it were not for this Knowledge, it is certain we could know 
nothing of any fenfible Object. For 'tis manifeft, for example, that we would be unable to 
diftinguifh Wine from Water, did we not know that the Senfations we have of the one were 
different from thofe we have of the other •, and fo 'tis with all other things which we know 
by our Senfes. 

'Tis true, fhould a Man be importunate in defiring me to explain what is Pain, Pleafure, Co- 
lour, or the like, I fhould not be able to define it in words as it ought to be. But it does not 
follow from thence, that if I fee a Colour, or burn my felf, I have no manner of Knowledge of 
that whereof I have an Actual Senfation. 

Now the reafon why our Senfations cannot be explain'd by words, as well as all other things, m 
is, becaufe it depends on the Arbitrary Will of Men, to joyn the Idea's of things to what Anohxs- 
Names they pleafe. They may call the Heavens Ouranos, Shamajim, as the Greeks and Hebrews .• (Hon ani 
But the fame Men have not an equal Liberty of affixing their Senfations to words, nor indeed -Anfmr, 
to any thing elfe. They fee no Colours, unlefs they open their Eyes, difcourfe to them what 
you will about them. They have no Reliih of Tafts, unlefs fome change happens in the difpo- 

fition 




32 K Malebranche Concerning Book I. 

fition of the Fibres of their Tongue and Brain : In ftiort, the Senfatiorts have no manner of De- 
pendence upon the Will of Men : And 'tis only he that created Men, that ftilf preferves them 
In that mutual correfpondence of the Modifications of their Soul to thofe of their Body. So 
that if a Man would have me reprefent to him Heat, or Colour, I cannot make ufe of words to 
do it : But I mull imprefs in the Organs of his Senfes, fuch Motions as Nature has affixt thefe 
Senfations to. I rauft bring him to the Fire, and fhew him a piece of Painting. 

And this is the reafon why 'tis impoffible to give Men that are born Blind the leaft Know- 
ledge of that which we underftand by Red, Green, Yellow, or the like. For fince 'tis impof- 
fible for a Man to make another underftand him, when he that hears, has not the fame Idea's as 
he that fpeaks ', it is manifeft that fince Colours are neither conjoyn'd to the found of words, nor 
to the Motion of the Auditory, but to that of the Optick Nerve, we can never reprefent them to 
Men that are Blind, fince their Optick Nerve cannot be Vibrated by colour'd Objeds. 

We have therefore fome fort of Knowledge of our Senfations. Let us now fee how it comes 
to pafs that we are flill cafting about to know them, and that we believe our felves deflitute of 
any Knowledge of them. The reafon of it undoubtedly is this. 

IV. The Soul, fince the Original Sin, is now, as it were, Corporeal in her Inclination •, the Love 
From fhe has for feniible Objects, is perpetually lefTening the Union or the Relation (he has with thofe 

vfame it tnat are intellectual. She is difgufted and uneafy in conceiving things that will not enter by the Sen- 

IIZZm .-, ^K anc * is prefently for leaving the Confideration of them. She imploys her utmoft endeavour 

imagine to produce the Images that reprefent them in her Brain, and fhe is fo throughly inur'd to this 

he has no kind of Conception from our Infancy, that fhe thinks that fhe can have no Knowledge of what fhe 

inowkdge can nave no imagination. Notwithanding there are a great many things, which, being not Cor- 

fJicms Sen ~ P oreal ? cannot be reprefented to the Mind by Corporeal Images j as, to inftance, our Soul with 

all her Modifications. At what time therefore our Soul would reprefent to her felf her own 

Nature, and her own Senfations, fhe endeavours to form a Corporeal Image thereof. She is in 

fearch of her felf amongft all Corporeal Beings . One while fhe takes her felf for one Thing, 

and another while for Another j fometimes for Air, fometimes for Fire, or for the Harmony of 

the parts of her own Body. And being thus defirous of finding her felf among the mafs of 

Bodies, and of imagining her own Modifications, which are her Senfations, as the Modifications 

of Bodies, we need not wonder if fhe's bewildred in her wandrings, and is mifguided out of the 

Knowledge of her felf. 

see the Tnat wmcn induces the Soul to be flill more fond of Imagining her Senfations, is her judging 

jUuftrati-" them to be in the Objects: And moreover, that they are the Modifications of them j and con- 

ons upon fequently that they are fomething Corporeal, and fit to be Imagined. She judges then that the 

the j. ch. j\j atllr e of her Senfations confifts only in the motion -which produces them, or in fome other 

Fmoftt Modification of a Body, which is manifeflly different from what fhe feels ; this being nothing 

-id. Book. Corporeal, nor poffible to be reprefented by Corporeal Images: This is what confounds her, and 

makes her believe fhe is altogether ignorant of her own Senfations. 

As for thofe who make none of thefe fruitlefs Attempts, to reprefent the Soul and its Modifi- 
cations by Corporeal Images, and yet are defirous of having their Senfations explain'd to them ; 
they rauft underftand that neither the Soul nor its Modifications can be known by Idea's, taking 
the word Idea in its moft proper fignification, as I have detennin'd and explain'd it, in the third 
Book } but only by Conference or Internal Senfation. So that when they ask us to explain the Soul 
and her Modifications by any Idea's, they demand what is impoffible for all the Men in the World 
put together to give them : Becaufe Men cannot inflruct us by giving us Idea's of things, but 
only by making us attentive to thofe we have already. 

The fecond Error whereinto we fall about our Senfations, is the attributing them to Objects \ 
which has been explain'd in the XI and XII Chapters. 

V. The third is our judging that all Mankind have the fame Senfations of the fame Objects. We 
That 'tis believe, for example, that all the World fees the Sky Azure, the Meadows Green, andallvifible 

an Error to objects in the fame manner as we fee them j and fo likewife all the other feniible Qualities of 
*Men fav tne otller Sen *~ es ' T nere are man Y wno w ^ wonder even that we call in queftion thofe things, 
thTfmT which they believe indubitable. However, I can certify them they have not any Reafon to judge 
senfations of thefe things as they do. And though I cannot Mathematically demonftrate they are in an Er- 
of the fame for, I can neverthelefs demonftrate, 'tis the greateft chance in the World, if they are not : 
objelis. ^ n( j j j iave Arguments flrong enough to convince them tjiey are certainly deceiv'd. 

That the Truth of what I here advance may be here acknowledg'd, we muft call to mind 
what has been already prov'd j namely, That there is a vaft difference betwixt our Senfations 
and the caufesof our Senfations. We may conclude from thence, that abfolntcly fpeaking, it is 
poffible for fimilar Motions of the Internal Fibres of the Optick Nerves, to produce in different 
Perfons, different Senfations, that is to caufe them to fee different Colours : And it may fo fall 
out, that a Motion which fhall produce in one Perfon the Senfation of Blew, fhall caufe the 
Senfation of Green or Gray in another, or perhaps a new Senfation, which never any man had 
befides. 

It is certain, I fay, that this is poffible, and there is no reafon in the World that can prove the 
contrary: However, we will grant that it is not probable it fhou Id be fo. It is much more rea- 
fonable to believe that GOD acts always uniformly in the Union he haseftablifiYd betwixt our 
Souls and our Bodies ; and that he has affixtthe fame Idea's and the fame. Senfation to fimilar Mo- 
tions of the Internal Fibres of the Brain of different Perfons. 

Let 



Chap. XIII. ' 'Ike Search after Truth. 33 

Let it be granted then that theTame Motions of the Fibres which terminate in the middle of the 
Brain are accompany'd with the fame Senfations in all Men } if it fortunes that the fame Ob- 
jects produce not the fame Motions in their Brain, they will not, by confequence excite the 
fame Senfations in their Soul : Now to me it feems indifputable, that the Organs of the Sen- 
fes of all Men, being not difpos'd in the fame manner, cannot receive the fame Impreffions from 
the fame Objefts. 

The blows, for inftance, that Porters give one another by way of Complement, would 
cripple fome fort of People : The fame blow produces very different motions, and confequently 
excites very different Senfations, in a Man of a Robuft Conftitution, and in a Child or a Woman 
of a tender make : Thus, iince we cannot be afcertain'd that there are two Perfons in the World, 
who have the Organs of their Senfes exactly match'd } we cannot be affur'd there are two Perfons 
in the World who have altogether the fame Senfations of the fame Obje&s. 

This is the Original caufe of the'ftrange Variety which is found in the Inclinations of Men. 
Some there are who are extremely pleas'd with Mufick, others find nothing agreeable in it : And 
even between thefe'who delight in it, fome one fort of Mufick, fome another, according to that 
almoft Infinite Diverlity which is found in the Fibres of the Auditory Nerve, in the Blood, 
and the Animal Spirits. How great, for inftance, is the difference between the Mufick of Italy, 
of France, of the Chinefe, and other People } and confequently between the Relifh thefe diffe- 
rent People have of thefe different forts of Mufick? It is ufual likewife for the fame Men at 
feveral times to receive different Impreffions from the fame Conforts. For if the Imagination 
be well warm* d by a great plenty of brisk and a&ive Spirits, a Man is much more pleas'd with 
a bolder Hand or a Voluntarie, wherein there are many Difcords } than with a fofter Mufick, 
that is compos'd with exafter Rules and a Mathematical Nicenefs. Experience proves this, and 
'tis eafie to give a Reafon for it. 

'Tis juft the fame with Smells. He that loves an Orange-flower, poffibly cannot endure a Rofe % 
and fo on the contrary. 

As for Tafts, there is no lefs a Diverlity in them than in the other Senfations. Sawces muft 
be made wholly different, equally to pleafe different Men, or equally to pleafe the fame Perfon 
at different times : One loves Sweet, another Sowre ; One loves the Tafte of Wine, another 
abhors it } the fame Perfon who thinks it pleafant when he's in Health, finds it bitter in a 
Fever } and fo 'tis with the other Senfes. And yet all Men are fond of Pleafure - ? they all 
delight in agreeable Senfations : And in this have all the fame Inclinations. They receive 
not therefore the fame Senfations from the fame Objects, fince they do not love them equally 
alike. 

Thus, that which makes one Man fay, he likes fweet things, is the agreeable Senfation he has 
of them-, and that which makes another fay, he does not love fweet things, is, indeed, becaufe 
he has a different Senfation from him that loves them. And fo in faying he loves not fweet 
things, k is not impl'y'd that he would not have the fame Senfation as the other ; but only that 
he has it not. Wherefore 'tis an Impropriety of Speech for a Man to fay, he loves not what 
is Sweety he fhould fay, he loves not Sugar, or Honey, or the like, which, to others, feem fweet 
and agreeable } and that he has not the fame Tafte as others, becaufe the Fibres of his Tongue 
are differently difpos'd: 

But to give a fenfible Inftance j Let us fuppofe that among twenty Men there were fome one 
of them whofe Hands were Cold, and that he was unacquainted with the words they make ufe 
of in England to explain the Senfation of Heat and Cold by ; and on the contrary, that the Hands 
of all the reft were extreamly Hot. If in Winter fome Water fomewhat frigid fhould be brought 
them all to wafh in, thofe whofe Hands were very Hot, waffling after each other, might very 
well fay, This Water is very Cold, I can't endure- it : But when the other, whofe Hands were 
extreamly Cold, came to wafh at laft, he might fay on the contrary, I can't imagine, Gentle- 
men, why ye like not the Cold Water} for my part, I take pleafure in feeling it Cold and 
warning in it. 

It is manifeft in this particular inftance, That the laft, in faying he lov'd the Cold, could 
mean nothing elfe but that he lov'd the Heat, and that he felt the Water Hoi^ whilft others 
felt the contrary. 

Thus when a Man fays, I love what is bitter, and can't endure fweets \ no more is meant 
thereby, than that he has not the fame Senfations, as thofe who fay they love fweets, and have 
an averfion to what is bitter. 

It is certain therefore, that a Senfation which is agreeable to one Man, is fo to all others Who 
have the fame} but the fame Objefts does not caufe the fame Senfation in all Men; becaufe of 
the different difpofition of the Organs of the Senfes} which is a thing of greateft confequence to 
be obferv'd both as to Natural and Moral Philofophy. 

To this only one Objection can be made, and that very eafie to be anfwer'd } which is this : jy. 
It fometimes happens that thofe very Perfons, who love extreamly fome forts of Meat, at length An obje- 
fhall hate them in as great a degree, either becaufe in eating they met with fome uncleanlinefs #'<»» <*»<* 
in the Difh, which furpriz'd and difgufted them } or becaufe they furfeited on them by eating to An fo er ' 
excefs, or for feveral other reafons : Thefe Men (°tis obje&edj love not the fame Senfations as 
they lov'd before : For ftill, though they eat the fame Meats, yet they find them no longer plea- 
fant and palatable. 

K la 



34 K Malebranche Concerning Book I. 

In anfwering this Obje&ion, it mult be obferv'd, that thefe Men upon eating thofe Meats, to 
which they have fo great an abhorrence and loathing, have two very different Senfations at the 
fame time. They have that of the Meat which they eat,as 'tis fuppos'd in the Obje&ion : And they 
have yet another Senfation of Diftafte or Loathing, which proceeds, for inftance, from a ftrong 
imagination of fome uncleanlinefs they have formerly feen mingled with what they eat. The 
reafon of this is, that when two Motions are occafion'd in the Brain at the fame time :, one of 
them is never excited without the other, unlefs it be fome confiderable time after. Thus becaufe 
the Agreeable is always accompany'd with theLoathfome Senfation:, and we ufually confound 
things which happen at the fame time, we imagine with our felves, that this Senfation which 
was formerly pleafant and agreeable is no longer fo. And yet if it were always the fame, it mull 
neceflarily be always agreeable : Wherefore fuppofing it to be difagreeable and impleafant, 'tis 
becaufe it is joyn'd and confounded with another Senfation, which is more diftaftful than it is it 
felf agreeable. 

There is much more difficulty to prove that Colours, and fuch other Senfations, which I 
term'd the Faint and Languid, are not the fame in all Mankind. Becaufe all thefe Senfations af- 
fect the Soul fo weakly, that a Man cannot diftinguifh as he may in Tafts or other more power- 
ful and lively Senfations, whether one is more agreeable than another \ nor difcover the di- 
verfity of Mens Senfations by the variety of Pleafure or Diftaft, which might be found in dif- 
ferent Perfons. Yet Reafon which fhews that the other Senfations are not all alike in different 
Perfons, does likewife fhew there mull; neceflarily be variety in the Senfations we have of Co- 
lours. And, indeed, it cannot be doubted but there is much diverfity in the Organs of Sight 
of different Perfons, as well as in thofe of Hearing and Tafting. "For, what reafon is there to 
fuppofe an exaft conformity and refemblance in the difpofition of the Optick Nerve of all Men, 
fince there is fuch an infinite variety in all the things of Nature, but efpecially in thofe that 
are Material. There is then great probability that all Men do not fee the fame Colours in the 
lame Objefts. 
7his Fa- Neverthelefs I am of Opinion that it never happens, at leaft very rarely, that any Perfons fee 
graft is Black and White of a different Colour from what our felves fee them, though they do not fee 
wantingin th em equally Black or White. But as to middle Colours, fuch as Red, Yellow, Blue, andefpe- 
^ e ^* f £ daily thofe that are compounded of thefe three, I am perfuaded there are very few Men that 
cbfcure in have exa&ly the fame Senfations. For there are Men fometimes to be met with, who fee fome 
the French fort of Bodies of a yellow Colour, for inftance, when they view them with one Eye, and of a 
and there- Green or Blue when they behold them with the other. And yet fuppofing thefe Men to be bora 
f° r . e ! } , as f . re ' with one Eye only, or with two Eyes fo difpos'd as to fee that of a Red or Yellow Colour, 
"herJtimi which others call Green or Blue, they would believe they faw Objects of the fame Colours as 
that h * others do, becaufe they would always have heard the Name Green given to that which they fee 
might be Yellow, and Blue to that which to them feems Red. 

perfpuMtti j t might, as a farther proof, be alledg'd, that all Men fee not the fame Obje&s of the fame 
Colour, becaufe, according to the Obfervations of fome Men, the fame Colours are not equally 
pleafing to all forts of People \ fince on fuppofition thefe Senfations were the fame, they would 
be equally agreeable to all Mankind : But becaufe very ftrong Objections might be urg'd againft 
this Argument founded on the Anfwer I gave to the former Objection, I thought it not folid 
enough to be propos'd. 

Indeed is is very rarely found that a Man is much more pleas'd with one Colour than another, 
as he takes greater pleafure in one Tafle than another. The reafon of it is, That the Senfations 
of Colours, are not given us to judge whether the Bodies about us are fit tonourifh us or not: 
This is the part of Pleafure and Pain, to fhew which are the Natural Chara&ers of Good and 
Evil. Obje&s in point of Colours^are neither good nor bad to eat : If Objects, on account of 
their Colour, mould either feem agreeable or difagreeable, the Sight of them would con- 
itantly be fucceeded with the courfe of the Animal Spirits, which excite and accompany the Paf- 
iions j fince the Soul cannot be affe&ed without fome Commotion. We fhould often hate good 
Things, and be fond of the bad ; fo that our Life could not be long preferv'd. In fhort, the 
Senfations of Colour are given us meerly to diftinguifh Bodies from one another ; and this is 
effeded well enough, whether a Man fees Grafs green or red, provided the Perfon who fees it 
green or red, lees it always in the fame manner. 

But fb much for our Senfations : Let us now fay fomething of our Natural Judgments, and our 
Voluntary Judgments that attend them. The fourth thing to be confider'd which we confound 
with the three others, whereof we have been fpeaking. 



CHAP. 



Chap. XIV. The Search after truth: ' j 5 

CHAP. XIV. 

I. Of the Falfe Judgments that accompany our Senfations^ and which w£ 
confound with them. II. The Reafons of thefe Falfe Judgements. 
III. That Error w not in our Senfations^ but only in thefe Judgments. 

WE inftantly fore-fee, that there are very few Perfons who will not be offended at this T. 
general Propofition we lay down, namely, That we have not any Senfation of Exter- of the falfe 
nal things, but contains one or more Judgments. We kftow well enough too that W 1 ^ 
the generality of Men are of opinion that there is not any Judgment True or Falfe in our 5en- Jj^JJJ*" 
fations: Infomuch that thefe Perfons, furpriz'd with the Novelty of this Propofition, will rajr- sevfttiwtt 
doubtedly fay with themfelves ; How is this poffible? I do not judge the Wall to be white, I and n>hich 
fee well enough it is fo. I do not judge that Pain is in my Hand, I feel it raoft infalliby there. ^ e ""-, , 
And who can doubt of things fo certain, unlefs he has a different Senfation of Obje&s from ^"^ w "* 1 
what I have my felf ? In fine, their Inclinations for the Prejudices of Childhood will carry therh 
much farther. And if they proceed not to Contumely, and to the Contempt of thofe whom they 
believe of a contrary Sentiment to themfelves, they will doubtlefs deferve to be reckon'd 
amongft the moderate fort of People. 

But 'tis not our bufinefs to ftand prophefying any longer what ill Reception and Succefs our 
Thoughts (hall meet with \ 'tis much more expedient to draw them out with fuch convincing 
Arguments, and to fet them info clear a Light, as to leave it impoffible for a Man to engage them 
with his Eyes open, or to confider them attentively, without fubmitting to them. We are to 
prove that we have no Senfation of External things, which does not include fome falfe judg- 
ment or other. And the Proof is as follows. 

To me it feems paft Controverfie, that our Souls take not up fuch vaft fpaces as are thofe we fee 
betwixt us and the fix'd Stars, though itfhould.be allow'd that they are extended. Thus it is 
unreasonable to believe our Souls are in the Heavens,whenthey lee the Stars there: Nor is it more 
credible that they depart out of their Bodies a mile, fuppofe, when they fee the Houfes at that di-* 
fiance : The Soul then muft necefTarily fee Stars and Houfes where thejr are not, fince fhe goes 
not out of the Body wherein fhe is, and neverthelefs fees them out of it. Now whereas the 
Stars which are immediately united to the Soul, and which are the only Stars the Soul can fee, 
are not in the Heavens, it follows that all Men who fee the Stars in the Heavens, and thereupon 
voluntarily judge that they are there, make two falfe Judgments , the one Natural, and the 
other Free and Voluntary. The one is a Judgment of the Senfes, or a Compound Senfa- 
tion which ought not to be a meafure for us to judge by. The other is a Free Judgment of 
the Will, which a Man may avoid making, and confequently muft not make, if he would avoid 
falling into Error. 

But let us fee upon what grounds a Man believes thofe fame Stars he immediately fees, to it 
be out of the Soul, and in the Heavens : The reafon is this, That it is not in the power of the Thezeafin 
Soul to fee them when fhe pleafes : For fhe can perceive them only at fuch times as thofe Motions fj h f e j & 
are excited in her Brain, to which the Idea's of thefe Objeds are affix'd by Nature. Now be-^y" "«" 
caufe the Soul has no Perception of the Motions of her Organs, but only of her own 
Senfations, and is confident thefe fame Senfations are not of her own producing in her ; fhe is 
indue'd to judge they are without her, and in the Caufe that reprefents them to her. And fhe 
has fo often made thefe kinds of Judgments, at the time of her perceiving Objefts, that 'tis 
hardly in her power at laft to prevent them. 

In order to explain more throughly what I have been faying, it would be neceffary to fhew 
the unufefulnefs of thofe infinite numbers of little Beings, which we call Species and Idea's, 
which are, as it were, Nothing, and yet reprefent all things -, which we Create and Annihi- 
late at our pleafure, and which our Ignorance has caus'd our Imagination to invent, that we 
might account for thofe things which we do not underftand. We fhould fhew too the folidity 
of thofe Mens Opinion, who believe GOD to be the True Father of Light, who alone en- 
lightens all Men, without whom, the moft fimple and eafie Truths would not be intelligible, nor 
the Sun, as bright and glorious as he is, be vifible - 7 who acknowledge no other Nature, than the 
Will of the Creator j and who, upon thefe Confiderations, have difcover'd that Idea's which re- 
prefent the Creatures to us are nothing but the Perfe&ions of G O D himfelf, which are corre- 
fpondent to the fame Creatures', and which reprefent them. 

Laftly, It would be neceffary to treat of the Nature of what we call Idea's ; and afterwards 
we might with greater eafe, difcourfe more diftin&ly of the things I have been fpeaking of i 
But this would lead us too far \ and thefe things fhall be referv'd for the Third Book only, 
becaufe our method will require them there. At prefent let it fuffice, that I bring a moft fen- 
fible and uncontroverted Inftance •, wherein we find many Judgments confounded with one and 
the fame Senfation. 

I fuppofe there is no Man in the World, who, looking on the Moon, does not fee her about 
a mile's diftance from him, and finds her greater at her Riling and Setting, than in the Meri- 
dian., 



g 6 F. Malebranche Concerning Book I. 

dian, or when a good way Elevated above the Horizon .• And perhaps too he fancies he only fees 
her larger, without thinking there is any Judgment in his Senfation. However, it is undoubted- 
ly certain, that if he had no kind of Judgment included in his Senfation, he would not fee 
her at that diflance fhe appears to him ; and befides, would fee her leffer at her Riling, than 
when in her Exaltation above the Horizon \ fince we only fee her greater at her Riling, be- 
caufe we judge her more remote by a Natural Judgment which I have Ipoke to in the fixth 
Chapter. 

But befides our Natural Judgments, which may be regarded as Compound Senfations, there 
occurs in almofl all our Senfations a Free or Voluntary Judgment. For Men do not only judge 
by a Natural Judgment, that Pain, for inflance, is in the Hand, they judge it is by a Free and 
Voluntary Judgment alfo, They not only Feel it there, but Believe it there too , and they 
are fo flrongly habituated to form fuch fort of Judgments, that they find great difficulty to for- 
bear them when they would. 

And yet thefe Judgments are moll falfe in themfelves, though very advantageous to the 
Welfare and Prefervation of Life. For our Senfes do not inftruct us but with reference to the 
Body: And all our Free Judgments which are conformable and adapted to the Judgment of 
the Senfes, are very remote from Truth. 

But not to leave thefe things without fhewing how to difcover the Reafons of them ; we mult 
take notice that there, are two forts of Beings .- Beings which our Soul immediately fees, and others 
which fhe knows only by the Mediation of the former. When, for inflance, I perceive the Sun 
arifing, I firfl perceive that which I immediately fee j and becaufe my Perception of the for- 
mer, is only occafion'd by fomething without me, which produces certain Motions in my Eyes 
and in my Brain, I judge the former Sun which is in my Soul, to ht without mz, andtoExifl. 

It may notwithstanding happen that we may fee the firfl Sun which is intimately united to 
our Soul, though the other were not above the Horizon, or though it did not Exift at all. And 
thus we may fee the firfl Sun greater when the other rifes, than when elevated high above the 
Horizon, and though it be true that the firfl Sun, which we fee immediately, be greater at the 
other's Riling, it doth not follow that the other is fo too. For 'tis not properly that which 
Rifes which we fee, fince that is many Millions of Leagues remote ; but 'tis the former, which 
is truly greater, and fuch exactly as we fee it} becaufe all the things we immediately fee, are 
always fuch as we fee them : And we fhould not be Deceiv'd, did we not judge that what we 
immediately fee is to be found in External Objects, which are the caufe or occafion of what 
we fee. 

In like manner, when we fee Light by beholding the Firfl Sun, which is immediately united to 

our Mind, we are not miflaken in believing that we fee it : 'Tis even impoffible to doubt of it. 

But herein confifls our Error, that without any Reafon, and indeed againfl all ReafOn, we will 

have this Light, which we fee immediately, to exift in the Sun, which is without us ; and thus it 

is with the other Objects of our Senfes. 

Upon a due Attention to what has been faid from the Beginning,and in the Procefs 

III. That Error & not in f this Work, it will be eafie to fee, that amoneft all the things which occur in 
our SinutWHs, but only in _ ,. . ' _ . , . , £ ,. i i j 1 ... 

thefe judgments. every Senfation, Error is only to be round in the Judgments we make, that our 

Senfations exifl in the Objects. 

Firfl : 'Tis an Error not to know that the Action of Objects confifls in the Motion of fome of 
their Parts, and that That motion is communicated to the Organs of our Senfes, which are the 
two firfl things obfervable in every Senfation : For there is a great deal of difference between 
not knowing a Thing, and being in an Error in refpeft of that thing. 

Secondly, We are right as to the third thing, which is properly Senfation. When we Feel 
Heat, when we fee Light, Colours, or other Objecls, it is certainly true that we fee them, 
though we are Mad or Phrentick, for there is nothing more infallibly true, than that your Vifi- 
onary People fee what they think they fee ; and their Error confifls only in the Judgments 
which they make, that what they' fee has a real Exiftence without them, becaufe they fee it wit h- 
out them. 

This is the Judgment that implies a Confent of our Liberty, and which confequently is lia- 
ble to Error. And it is our Duty ever to refrain from making it according to the Rule which 
was given in the beginning of this Book : That we fhould never judge of any thing whatever, 
when we could avoid it, and were not oblig'd to't by the certainty and evidence thereof , a^ it 
.happens in this place : For though we feel our felves extreamly difpos'd by a confirm'd and inve- 
terate Habit to judge our Senfations are in the Objects, as that Heat is in the Fire, and Colours 
in the Pictures } yet we can fee no evident and convincing Reafon, or forcible enough to oblige 
us to believe it. And thus we voluntarily fubjedt our felves to Error by the ill ufe we make of 
our Liberty, when we freely form fuch Judgments as thefe. 



£ H A P. 



Ghap. XV. The Search after Truth 37 

CHAP. XV. 

An Explication of the Particular Errors of the Sight^ which may ferve as 
an Exemplar of the general Errors of our Senfes. 

Have, if I am not miflaken, given a fufficient inlet to the Difcovery of the Errors of our 
Senfes in refpett of fenfible Qualities in general, of which I have fpoken, on the account 
of Light and Colours, which our Method oblig'd us to explain. It may now be expe&ed 
I mould defcend to Particulars, and examine the refpective Errors into which each of our Sen- 
fes calls us : But I Ihall not infill: long upon thefe things, becaufe after what I have already faid, 
a little Attention will do the bufinefs of thofe tedious Difcourfes I Ihould be oblig'd to make. 
I fhall only recount the general Errors our Sighj occafions us to fall into, touching Light and 
Colours-, and this Example will, I believe, fuffice togiveusaninfightinto the Errors of all our 
other Senfes. 

When we have fixt our Eyes upon the Sun for fbme moments, this is what occurs both in our 
Eyes and in our Soul, and thefe are the Errors into which we fall. 

Thofe who are acquainted with the Firfl Elements of Dioptrkh, and with any thing of the 
admirable Contexture of the Eyes, know that the Rays of the Sun are refra&ed in the Cryftal- 
line, and in the other Humours; and that they are thence recolle&ed upon the Retina or the 
Optick Nerve, which cloathes all the Fund of the Eye ; in the lame manner as the Rays of the 
Sun palling through a convex burning Glafs, reunite in the Focus, or in the burning point of the 
Glafs at three or four Inches diftance from it, in proportion to its convexity. Now we are 
taught by Experiment, that if we place in the Focus of the Glafs a piece of fluff or Brown paper pre remit 
brown Paper, the Rays of the Sun make fo great an Impreffion on the fluff or on the takes fin; but the Glafs 
Paper, and agitate the little parts thereof fo violently, as to break and feparate mufl be larger or more 
them from one another; or, in a word, to burn them, and reduce them into fmoak convex, to bum white 
and allies. *'*"• 

So we ought to conclude from this Experiment, that if the Optick Nerve were black, and the 
Pupil or the Aperture of the Vvea, through which the Light enters into the Eyes fhould widen 
and enlarge it felf, to take in freely the folary Rays, inflead of which it contracts and flraitens 
it felf to prevent their palfage, the fame thing would happen to the Retina, as to the fluff or the 
black or brown Paper, and its Fibres would be fo violently agitated as to be fpeedily broken, 
and burn'd in pieces. And for this reafon it is, that the generality of Men feel great Pain in be- 
holding the Sun for a moment; becaufe they cannot fo clofely fhut the Aperture of the Pupil, 
but there will flill pafs Rays enough to agitate the Fibres of the Optick Nerve fo violently, as to 
give us Reafon to apprehend their breaking. 

The Soul is altogether ignorant of all this we have faid ; and when fhe beholds the Sun, fhe 
neither has any Perception of her own Optick Nerve, nor of any Motion in the Nerve : But this 
cannot be call'd an Error, 'tis purely Ignorance: The firfl Error fhe falls into, is her judging the 
Pain fhe feels, to be in the Eye. 

If inflantly upon a Man's beholding the Sun, he withdraws into a dark place with his Eyes 
open, that Concuffion of the Fibres of the Optick Nerve, caus'd by the Rays of the Sun, de- 
creafes and wears off by little and little ; and this is all the alteration we can conceive in the Eyes. 
But the Soul perceives nothing of this in them, but only a whitifh or a yellowifh Light ; and the 
fecond Error is, her judging this Light which fhe fees, to be in her Eyes, or in the Neighbour- 
ing Wall. 

Finally, The Agitation of the Fibres of the Retina conflantly decreafes and dwindles away by 
degrees : For after a Body has been vibrated or fhaken, we fhould confider nothing in it more 
than the Diminution of its Motion. But this is not the thing the Soul is fenfible of in her Eyes. 
She fees the whitifh Colour metamorphos'd into Orange, after chang'd into Red, and laftly into 
Blue. And the third Error into which we fall, is our judging there are in our Eye, or on the 
next Wall, fuch alterations as differ more than Secundum magis & minus ; becaufe the Colours 
Blue, Orange, and Red, which we fee have a more confiderable difference than according to de- 
grees of more or lefs. 

Thefe are fome of the Errors into which we fall in point of Light and Colours ; and thefe are 
the occafion of our falling into many others, as we are going to explain in the following 
Chapters. 



CHAP, 



3 S : v K Maxebranche Concerning Book I. 

CHAP. XVI. 

I. That the Errors of our Senfes ferve us inftead of general and very fruit- 
ful Principles, from whence to draw falfe Conclufions ; and thefe Conclusi- 
ons again become other Principles in their turn, II. The Origine of Ejfen- 
tial Differences. IIL Concerning Subftantial Forms. IV. Of feme other 
Errors of the School-Philofofhy. 

I. "IT H A V E, I think, given a Sufficient Explication f to unprejudic'd Perfons, and 

that the Erms of our fa h as are capa ble of Thinking any thing Attentively) of the Nature of our 

saifesferve us inftead of 1 enfations an d f the general Errors that accompany them : It is not amifs 

§33*? fZ fr :ite to mew at prefent that thefe general Errors are made ufe of as uncontroverted 

ItSfilji^cvSZ Principles, to explain all things by: That infinite falfe Confequences. have been 

and thefe Conciufwns again ^rawn from them, which in their Turn have ferv'd as Principles tor a train ot other 

become other rrincipks in ron r eauences . an d thus by little and little thofe imaginary Sciences void of Body 

m their mm. ^ R 4 haye been eftabiifllt) which have fuch multitudes of blind Followers ; 

but which like Fantoms leave nothing in their Embraces, but :the Shame and Confufion of fuffer- 

ine Zemfelves to be feduc'd, or that Brand and Character of Folly, which makes Men delight to 

feed on Delufions and Corner *V. This is what we muft lhew in particular by fotne Examples. 

It has been already faid, that we are us'd to attribute to Objefts our own Senfations and we 
judge that Colours, Smells, Tails, and other fenfible Qualities, are in the Objefts which we call 
Colour'd, and fo ot the reft. We have found this to be an Error. At prefent 'tis our Bufinefs to 
fhew that we make ufe of this Error by way of Principle, to deduce falfe Confequences from: 
which laft Confequences afterwards we refpeft as other Principles, upon which we go on to found 
our Reafoninss. In a word, we fhall here manifeft what Progrefs and Advances an Humane 
Mind makes in the Search of fome Particular Truths, when once this falfe Principle has been taken 
for granted, That Our Senfations are in Objects. ■ . _ * 

But in order to render this more fenfibly manifeft, let us fuppofe fome Particular Body, whofe 

Nature fome Perfon is in Search, of : Let us fee what a Man would do, who has a mind to know 

what Honev or Salt is. The firft thing this Man would do, would .be to examine the Colour, 

the Tafte and Smell, and the other fenfible Qualities of them : What are the Properties of 

Salt and what of Honey: Wherein they agree, and wherein they differ ; and the Analogy there 

may be betwixt thefe, and thofe of other Bodies. Which done, he would doubdefsreafon and 

infer much after this manner, fuppofing he laid this down as an uncontroverted Principle, That 

our Senfations were in the Objefts of our Senfes. ''-..■"♦L 

IT. Whatever I have a Senfation of in Tailing, Seeing, and in Handling Salt and Honey, .is in the 

rhe 0r >- Salt and in the Honey. But it is certain that what I fenfibly perceive in the Honey eflentially dif- 

fr'nt fers from what I fenfibly perceive in the Salt: The whitenefs of the Salt differs more doubtlefs 

Zcfst than according to the degrees of more or lefs, from the Colour of the Honey ; and the Sweetnefs 

tSLl of the Honey from the pungent Tafte of the Salt; and confidently there muft be an eflential dif- 

objeSs : fe r rence betw y ixt Salt an d Honey, fince all that I am fenfible ot both in the One and the Other, not 

That thef diff acC ording to more or lefs, but has an eflfenual Difference. 

fs'stTm This s the firft flip this Gentleman would make. For doubtlefs he could not judge there was 
the soul an eflential Difference between Salt and Honey, did he not think the SenfMc -appearances of the 
One eflentially differed from thofe of the Other: that is to fay, That the Senfations he has 01 
Honey eflentially difTerr'd from thofe he has of Salt j for as much as he only judges ot them by 
the Impreflion they make upon the Senfes. Hence he looks upon this his Conclufion as a new 
Principle from whence he deduces other Conclufions in like manner. 
J U ' ■ Seeine then Salt and Honey, and other Natural Bodies differ eflentially from one another, it 
Zl7 follows, that thofe are grofly deceiv'd, who would have us believe That all the difference which 
SftlaJis found in Bodies, confifts only in the different Configuration of the little parts that go to their 
Form. conftitution. For fince Figure is not eflential to a figured Body, let the Figure of thefe little parts, 
which they imagine in the Honey, change how they will, the Honey will ftill continue Honey 
even though the parts of it fhould take the Figure of the little parts ot Salt. And thus there muft 
ofneceffity befomefubftauce or other, which being joyn'd to the firft Matter, that is common 
to all different Bodies, muft caufe an eflential difference betwixt them. 

This then is the fecond Advance this Gentleman would make, and the happy Difcoyery otSw*- 
(tantial Forms : Thofe fruitful fublfances which caufe every thing we fee in Nature, though they 
have no fubfiftence of themfelves, except in the- Imagination of our Philofopher. But let us lee the 
Properties which he goes fo liberally to bellow on this Being of his own Creation ; tor doubtlels 
he will rob all other Subftances of their molt eflential Properties, to cloath this Creature of his 
withal!. 

Since 



Chap. XVII. The Search after Truth. 39 

Since then there is found in every Natural Body, two Subftances which go to its Compofition ; IV* j 
the one which is common to Honey and Salt, and all other Bodies; and the other which makes ^f J?^ 
Honey to be Honey, and Salt to be Salt, and all other Bodies to be what they are ; it follows % e J her 
that the firft of them which is Matter, having no Contrary, and being indifferent to the Recepti- moregene- 
on of all Forms, muff, remain without Force and A&ion, fince it has no occafion to defend it felf : r *l Errors 
But as to the others, which are the Subftamial Forms^ they have need always of being attended with ^ f 
Qualities and Faculties, for their own defence. They mult neceffarily be always upon their guard, philosophy. 
for fear of being furpriz'd: They muft belabouring continually for their Prefervation, and ex- 
tending their Dominion over the bordering Matters, and pufhing their Conquefts as far as poffi- 
bly they can •, becaufe if they were forcelefs, or fhonld defift from their Activity, the other Forms 
would fall upon them by furprize, and forthwith reduce them to Nothing. They muft then be 
always fighting; and nourifhing thefe Antipathies and irreconcilable Hatreds againft their Rival 
Forms, which are continually feeking to deftroy them. 

Let it happen that a Form fhould feize the Matter of another : Let the Form of a Carcafs, for in- 
ftance, feize the Body of a Dog ; it is not enough for this Form to reft fatisfy'd in the Annihila- 
tion of the Form of the Dog, fhe muft gratifie her Hatred and Revenge with the Deftruftion of 
all the Qualities which have fided with her Enemy: The Hair of the Carcafs muft immediately 
turn white with the whifenefs of a new Creation-, the Blood muft be red with the rednefs, which 
was never dreamt of; and the whole Body muft be furrounded with Qualities faithful to their 
Miftrefs, whom they muft defend according to the fmall ftrength and capacity, which may be fup- 
pofed in the Qualities of a dead Body, which in their turn muft quickly perifh too. But becaufe 
it is impoffible to be always in Battel, and all Bodies have a place of Reft ; the Fire, for inftance, 
muft undoubtedly have its Centre, where it ever ftrives to go by its Own Levity, and Natural 
Inclination, in order to Reft, to burn no longer, and alfo to refign its Heat, which it preferv'd 
here below, meerly for its own fafety and defence. 

Thefe are a fmall part of the Confequences which are deduced from thislaft Principle, that 
there are Subftamial Forms ; which Confequences we have brought in Our Philofopher, fomewhat 
too frankly and airily concluding ; for generally others fay the fame things, in a more ferious 
ftrain than he hath clone here. 

There are ftill infinite other Confequences, which Philofbphers daily infer according as their 
Humour and Inclination leads them, or according as they are determin'd by the Fruitfulnefs or 
Barrennefs of their Imagination ; for this is all the Difference that is between them. 

I fhall not ftand here to ingage thefe Imaginary Subftances^ others have fufficiently examin'd 
them. They have made it evidently appear, that there were never Subftantial Forms in Nature ; 
and that they ferve for no other ufe, than to infer abundance of Falfe, Ridiculous, and even 
Contradictory Concluflons. I am fatisfy'd to have difcover'd their Origine, in the Mind of Man, 
and to have fhewn that they are at prefent altogether owing to that Prejudice common to all Men^ 
That Senfations are in the ObjeEts of their Senfes. For if what I faid before beconfider'd with any 
attention, namely, that it is neceflary for the Prefervation of our Bodies, we fhould have Senfa- 
tions effentially differing, though the Imprefiions which Obje&s make upon our Bodies, differ ve- 
ry little ; it will manifeftly appear he his much in the wrong, who imagines fuch wide differences 
in the Objefts of our Senfes. 

But, by the way, I think it not amifs to declare, that no fault is to be found with thefe Terms, 
ofForm, and Efential Difference. Honey is doubtlefs Honey, by its Form, and thus it is that it 
differs effentially from Salt ; but this Form or this Ejfential Difference confifts only in the different 
Configuration of its Parts. 'Tis this different Configuration, which makes Honey to be Honey, 
and Salt to be Salt : And though it be accidental to Matter in general, to have the ConfiguratK 
on of the parts of Honey or Salt, and fo to have the Form of Honey or Salt ; yet it may be faid to 
be effential to Honey or Salt, that they may be what they are, to have fuch or fuch a Configurati- 
on in their parts; juft as the Senfations of Cold, of Heat, of Pleafure, and Pain, are not effential 
to the Soul, but only to the Soul which feels them; in as much as by thefe Senfations, fhe is faid 
to feel Heat, Cold, Pleafure, and Pain. 



CHAP. XVII. 

I. Another Inftance taken from Morality , which Jhews that our Senfes offer 
us nothing but falfe Goods. II. That GOD alone Is our true and proper 
Good. III. The Origine of the Error of the Epicureans and Stoicks. 

IH A V E, I think, brought fufficient Arguments to prove that this Prejudice, That our Sen- 
fations are in the ObjetTs, is a molt fruitful Principle of Errors in Natural Philofophy. It is 
my Bufinefs at prefent to bring others drawn from Morality, wherein the fame Prejudice 
joyn'd with this other, That the ObjeBs of our Senfes are the true and fole Caufes of our Senfations^ is 
molt highly dangerous. 

There 



40 R Malebranche Concerning Book I # 

I- There is nothing fo common in the World, as to fee Men devoted to fenfible Goods ; fome 

„^1 * n r love Mufick, fome Banquetting, -and others have a Paflion tor other things. Now this is the way 
ken%om °^ Reafoning thefe Men mull have taken to perfwade themfelves that thefe Objeds are their 
Morality, ■ Goods. All the pleafant Tafts we are delighted with in Feafting, the Sounds which gratifie the' 
wfcfe/fcew* Ear, and thofe other Pleafures we are fenfible of, upon other occafions, are dou briefs contain'd 
1 r M r ° ur # m fenfible Objects , or, at leaft, thefe Obje&s give us the Senfation of them ; or, laftly, are the 
uY whiZ on ^Y means of Conveying them to our Senfes. Now it is impoflible to doubt that Pleafnre is good, 
but faife and Pain evil. We receive a Convidion from within, and confequently the Objeds of our Paffions, 
goods. are moll real goods, to which we mull cleave, if we will be happy. 

/ will ex- This is the Reafoning we generally fall into almoft without being aware of it ; Thus, becaufe 
plain in the we believe that our Senfations are in Objeds, or that the Objects are of themfelves capable of 
laft Book, giving us the Senfation of them, we confider thefe things as our own Goods, though we are inn"- 
fenfi ob- n it:ely exalted above them ; fince they are able to aft only upon our Bodies, and to produce 
jetfj aft fome Motion in their Fibres, but are incapable of ading upon our Souls, or making us fenfible 
upon the either of Pleafure or Pain. 

Boi J- Certainly if our Soul ads not upon her felf, on occafion of what happens in the 

II. Body, it is GOD alone who hath that Power : And if Ihe be not the Caufe of her 

ThatGODonij U our own Pleafure and Pain, according to the Diverfity of the Vibrations of the Fibres 

Goody and that all fenfi- f j )er g oc jy 7 as i t i s m ofl highly probable lhe is not, -fince Ihe feels Pleafure and 

%°S oT'lkaf^l!" Pain w i thout confenting thereunto - 7 I know no other Hand potent enough to make 

J } [ her fenfible thereof, except that of the Author of Nature. 

Certainly it is GO D alone who is our true Good : He only is able to fill us with all the Plea- 
fures we are capable of enjoying ; and it is only by the Knowledge of Him and Love of Him 
He has refoly'd to make us fenfible of them. Such as He has affixt to the Motions which hap- 
pen in our Body, to make us the more follicitous for its Prefervation, are very 'little in themfelves 
very weak as to their Capacity, and very Ihort in their Duration. Notwithstanding in the 
eitate Sin has redue'd us to, we are, as it were, become their Vaflals. But thofe which He Ihall 
make His Eled fenfible of in Heaven, will be infinitely greater, fince He hath Created us that 
■we might know and love Him. For whereas ORDER requires the Perception of the grea- 
tefl Pleafures in the Pofiefiion of the greateft Goods, GOD being infinitely above all other 
things, the Pleafure of thofe who Ihall enjoy Him, will certainly exceed all other Pleafures. 
HI. What we have faid of the Caufe of our Errors in refped of Good,gives us a fufficient Knowledge 

tine of the °^ ^ ^ lt Y °f l ^ e Opinions the Epicureans and Stoicks embrae'd, touching the Sovereign Good. 
Errors of The Epicureans placed it in Pleafure ; and becaufe a Man is fenfible of this no lefs in Vice than in 
the Epicu- Vertue, and more generally in the former than in the other, it has been commonly thought they 
reans and \ e t loofe the Reins to all forts of Senfible Pleafures. 

Stoicks. Now the firil caufe of their Error is this, That judging falfly there is fomething pleafant and 
agr ee able in the Objeds of their Senfes, or that they were the real Caufes of the Pleafures they 
felt ; and being moreover convine'd by an Internal Senfation, which they naturally had, that Plea- 
fure was good for them, at leail for the time wherein they enjoy'd it, they let themfelves loofe 
to all forts of Paffions, from which they had no Apprehenfions of receiving any dammagein the 
Confequence. Whereas they ought to have confider'd, that the Pleafure they reap'd from fenfi- 
ble things, could not exifl in thofe things as their true Caufes, nor any other way, and confe- 
quently that fenfible Goods could not be Goods in refped of the Soul, and they ihould have 
thought of the things we have already explained. 

The Stoicks on the other hand, being perfwaded that fenfible Pleafures were only feated in, 
and fitted for the Body, and that the Soul ought to have a peculiar Good of her own, plac'd 
Felicity in Vertue ; fee then the Origine of their Errors, Viz.. 

They believ'd that Senfible Pleafure and Pain were not in the Soul, but in the Body only •, and 
made ufe of this their falfe Judgment as a Principle for other falfe Concluilons^ as that Pain was 
not an Evil, nor Pleafure a Good : That the Pleafures of the Senfes were not Good in their own 
Nature, that they were common to Men and Bealts, &c. Notwithflandiug it is eafie to fee, 
that though the Epicureans and Stoicks were in the wrong in many things, they were in the right 
in fome} for the Happinefs of the Blelfed confifls only in a perfed and accompliih'd Vertue, that 
is to fay, in their Knowledge and Love of G O D, and in a molt exquifite Pleafure that never 
fails to accompany them. 

Let it then be well remembred, That External Objeds contain nothing either Pleafant or Trou- 
blefome in themfelves ; that they are not the Caufes of our Pleafures ; that we have no reafon ei- 
ther to fear or We them ; but it is GOD alone, whom 'tis our duty to fear, and our duty to 
love i fince 'tis only He that has Power enough to Punifh and Reward us j to make us fenfible of 
Pleafure and of Pain : Finally, it is only in GO D and from GOD, we ought to hope to receive 
the Pleafures, towards which we have foflrong, fo natural, and fo jult an Inclination. 



CHAP. 




Chap. XVIII. The Search after Truth ' \ ■ ' %f 

CHAP. XVIIL 

I. That bur Senfes make us liable to Error , even in things which are not fen* 
fible, II. An Example taken from the Converfation of Men. III. That 
fenfible Manners are not to be regarded. 

E have diffidently explain'd the Errors of our Senfes, in refpedt. Of their Objects \ as 
of Light, Colours, and other Senfible Qualities. Now let us fee how they mifguide 
us^ even in regard to thofe Objects which are not of their Jurifdi&ion, by diverting 
us from an attentive Confideration of them, and inclining us to judge of them from their Tefti- 
mony and Report ; a thing that well deferves to be throughly explain'd. _ 

Attention and Application of the Mind to the clear and diftind Idea's we have Of Objects, is fi,# out > 
the moil neceflary thing in the World, to difcover what truly they are : For as it is impoffible to fenfesmale 
fee the Beauty and Excellency of any piece of Art, without opening the Eyes, and looking fixed- «* liable to 
jy upon it : So the Mind cannot evidently fee the moft part of things, with the Relations they Ewrfven 
bare one to another, uhlefs it confiders them with Attention. But it is certain that nothing calls ™i!% l fe s 
us off more from our Attention to clear and diftindt Idea's, than our Own Senfes,and confequently n0 t fenfible 
nothing fets us fo remote from Truth, or fo foon throws us into Error. 

For our better conceiving thefe things, 'tis abfolutely neceflary to know, That the three ways 
the Soul has of perceiving, viz*, by the Senfes^bj the Imagination, and by Intelletl, do not all equally 
affect her} and confequently, fhe does not fix an equal Attention on every thing fhe perceives 
by their means: For fhe applies her felf moil to that which touches her neareft, and fhe is care- 
lefs enough of that which affects her but a little. 

Now what fhe perceives by the Senfes affe&s her much, and takes up all her Application \ 
what fhe knows by her Imagination, touches her lefs pathetically : But that which the Vnderftan* 
ding reprefents to her*, I would fay, whatlhe of her felf perceives independently on the Senfes 
and Imagination, fcarce quickens or awakens her at all. No body doubts but that the leafi fenfi- 
ble Pain is more prefent to the Mind, and makes it more attentive than the Meditation of a thing 
of far greater Importance. 

The reafbn which may be given for this, is, That the Senfes reprefent the Objects as prefentj 
the Imagination reprefents them as abfent. Now the order of things requires that among ma^ 
ny Goods, or many Evils propos'd to the Soul, thofe which are prefent ihould give her more 
concern or application than others which are abfent ; becaufe 'tis neceflary for the Soul fudden- 
ly to determine what ought to be done on this occafion. And thus fhe is more intent to a fimple 
prick of a Pin, than to the moft exalted Speculations. And the Pleafures and Evils of this 
World make a greater Impreffion on her, than the ineffable Pains and infinite Pleafures of 
Eternity. 

The Senfes then do extreamly warp and bend down the Soul to what they reprefent to her : 
"But whereas fhe is of a limited and finite Nature, and fo cannot conceive diflinctly many things 
at once} fhe cannot have a diftinct Perception of what the Underflanding reprefents to her at 
the fame time her Senfes offer any thing to her confideration. She forfakes then the clear and di- 
flincl: Idea's of the Underftanding, however proper to difcover the truth of Things in their own 
Nature, to apply her felf intirely to the confus'd Idea's of the Senfes, which affect her tenderefl 
part, and give her not a reprefentation of things as they are in their own Nature, but only as 
they fland related to her Body. s 

If a Man, to give an inflance, would explain any Truth, he muft neceffarily make ufe of it 
Speech and exprefs his Notions and Internal Senfations by Motions and Manners fenfible. Now An Exa ^- 
the Soul is incapable of perceiving many things diltinct ly at the fame time ; fo having always a p l e tdke ? 
great Attention to what comes in to her by way of the Senfes, fhe is fcarce at leifure to covA- clnvtrfl- 
der the Reafons which fhe hears alledg'd : But her greateft Application is confin'd to the fenfible tion of 
Pleafure fhe receives from the finely turn'd Periods, the Conformity of the Geftures to the Men > 
Words, from the Genteel Mein of the Face, from the Air, and the Way and Manner of the 
Speaker: Yet after fhe has heard, fhe will needs judge, becaufe it is the Cuflom. And thus 
her Judgments muft be different, according to the diverfity of the Impreffions fhe has receiv'd 
through the Senfes. 

If, for example, the Speaker has a voluble Tongue, and eafinefs of Delivery } if he obferves 
the numeroufnefs of Words, and a delightful Cadence in his Periods ; if he has the Look of a 
Gentleman, or of a Man of Parts ; if he be a Perfon of Quality, oris attended with a great Re- 
tinue ; if he dictates with Authority, or fpeakes in a grave decifive Manner ; if others liflen to 
him with Silence and Refpedt. j if he has fome Reputation in the World, or is acquainted with 
the great Wits of the Age •, In fine, if he has the happinefs to pleafe, or to be efleem'd, he will 
have Reafon in every word that he advances ; and there fhall be nothing even to his Band and 
Cuffs, but fhall prove fomething or other. 

M But 



41. F« Malebranche Concerning Book h 

But if he be fo unfortunate as to have the Qualities quite contrary to thefe, let him demon- 
ftrate as long as he pleafes, he fhall prove nothing. Let him fay the fineft things in the World, 
no Man fhall ever regard them. The Attention of the Auditors being imploy'd upon that only 
' which (hikes their Senfes, the Difguft they conceive at the fight of a Man fo uncouth and ill-con- 
triv'd, will wholly take them up, and hinder the Application they ought to allow to his Thoughts - 7 
A dirty or a rumpled Band is enough to make the Wearer defpis'd, and all that comes from him ;■ 
and that way of talking like a Dotard or a meer Philofopher, will make the moll noble and ex- 
alted Truths, which are above the reach of the generality of Mankind, be look'd on as Ravings 
and Extravagances. 

Such are the ordinary Judgments of Mankind. Their Eyes and their Ears fet 7 4ip for Judges of 
Truth, and not their Reafon, even in things that depend only on Reafon} becaufe Men apply 
themfelves meerly to the Senfibie and Agreeable Manners of Men, and feldom afford any Atten- 
tion that is Refolute and Serious, towards the Difcovery of Truth. 
Ut. Yet what greater Injuftice is there, than to judge of things by the Manner of them, and to 
That s'evfi- defpife Truth, becaufe it comes not drefs'd in thofe Ornaments that pleafe us and indulge and 
bk'ani flatter our Senfes? It mould be reckon'd a Reproach to Philofophers, and fuch as pretend to 
Agreeable s en f C) t be more inquifitive after thefe agreeable out-fide Manners, than Truth it felf •, and ra- 
ouThTZt *her to entertain their Mind with the Noife and Emptinefs of Words, than with the Solidity of 
to be re- Things. 'Tis for Men of a Vulgar Stamp, 'tis for Souls of Flefh and Blood, to fuffer themfelves 
garded. to be won with Rhetorical Periods, and captivated with Figures and Motions that awake and 
excite the Pafllons. 

Omnia enim flolidi niagU admirantnr amantque, 
Inverfis qu& fub verbis latitantia cernunt : 
Veraque confiitnnnt, qua, belle t anger e pojfnnt 
uiures^ & lepido qua funt fucata fonore. 

But wife Men endeavour to arm themfelves againft the malignant force, and the powerful 
charms of thefe fenflble Manners. The Senfes impofe on them as well as on other tyLen, fince 
they are no more than Men, but they have the Wifdom to difregard the Reports they make. 
They imitate that famous Example of the Judges of the Areopagus, who, upon a fevere Penalty, 
forbad their Advocates the ufe of any fallacious Words and Figures, and never heard them plead 
but in the dark } for fear the Pleafantnefs of their Words and Infinuating Geftures mould per- 
fwade them to any thing prejudicial to Truth and Juftice, and to the end they might apply them- 
felves with lefs diftradtion to the Solidity of their Reafons. 



CHAP. XIX. 

Two other Examples. I. The firft^ concerning our Errors about the Na- 
ture of Bodies. II. The fecond, concerning thofe which refyeB the Qua- 
lities of the fame Bodies. 

WE have been fhewing that there are a vaft multitude of Errors, which are originally 
owing to the ftrong Application of the Soul to that which enters by the Seafes, 
and that Lukewarmnefs and Indifference to things reprefented by the Under/landing. 
We have given an Inftance of very confiderable Importance in Morality, taken from the Conver- 
fation of Men ; we fhall produce fome others drawn from the Commerce we have with the reft; 
of Nature, which are abfolutely neceflary to be obferv'd in Natural Philofophy. 
T# One of the Principal Errors we fall into in point of Natural Philofophy, is our Imagining 

the Errors there is much more Subftance in Senfibie, than in Imperceptible Bodies. The generallity of Men 
concerning are of Opinion there is much more Matter in Gold and Lead, than in Air and Water : And 
the JJature children who have made no Obfervation by their Senfes of the EfFe&s of Air, ordinarily imagine 
cjnoaies. k has nothing of Realit y in it. 

Gold and Lead are extreamly ponderous, very hard, and very fenfible - 7 Water and Air, on 
the contrary, are fcarce perceptible by the Senfes. Whence Men conclude the former are more 
real than the other. They judge of the Truth of things by the Senfibie Impreffion, which is 
ever fallacious ; and they neglect the clear and diftind Idea's of the Intelled which never deceives 
us} becaufe that which is fenfible affecfs us, and challenges our Application ;, but that which is 
Intelligible lays us to fleep. Thefe falfe Judgments refpect the Subftance of Bodies ; let us now fee 
the others about the Qualities of the fame Bodies. 
II. 'Tis the way for Men, almoft univerfally, to judge that the Obje&s which excite in them the 

Errors con- m oft Pleafant Senfations, are the molt Perfect, and Pure of all others ? without fo much as know- 
cer "j T 'K the 'mg wherein the Perfection and Purity of Matter confifts, and, indeed, without caring whether 
fntTer- they do or not. 
jetlion of Bodies. 

They 



Chap. "XIX. The Search after Truth. *i 

They fay, for inftance, that Mud is Impure, and that the cleareft Water is very pure. But Camels 
which love Muddy Water, and thofe Animals which delight to wallow in Mire, would be 
of another opinion. They are Beafts, 'tis true ; but thofe Men who love the Entrails of a Wood- 
cock, and the Excrements of a Civit-Cat, do not fay they are Impure, though they fay fo of the 
Excrements of all other Animals. Finally, Musk and Amber are in general Efteem with all Men, 
though they are fuppos'd to be nothing but Ordure. 

It is certain Men judge of the Perfedion and Purity of Matter, with Relation to their Owrt 
Senfes:, whence it falls out, that the Senfes being different in all Men, as has been abundantly . 
explain'd, they mult needs judge very differently of the Purity and Perfection of Matter. So 
that thofe Books which are daily compos'd upon the Imaginary Perfections attributed to cer- ' 
tain Bodies, mull: needs be fluff" 'd with Errors, in all the ftrange and odd variety that can be; 
fince the Reafonings they contain are founded only on the falfe, confus'd and irregular Idea's of 
the Senfes. 

It is not the Part of Philofophers to call Matter Pure or Impure, till they know what they 
precifely mean by the Words Rare and Impure. For a Man mould never talk without knowing 
what he fays ; that is to fay, without having diftind Idea's, which anfwer to the Terms he 
ufes. Now if they had fixt clear and diftind Idea's to each of thefe Terms, they would fee that 
what they call Pure would prove often very Impure, and what feems to them Impure would be 
found pure in an high degree. 

If, for inftance, they would have that Matter to be mofl Pure and Perfed, whofe 'Parts are 
moft fine and difunited and eafieft to be mov'd ; Gold, Silver and Precious Stones, would be 
extreamly Imperfed Bodies ; Air and Fire on the other hand would be the moft perfed, 
When Flefh began to putrifie, and caft a very noifom ftench, it would then be commencing 
its Perfection, .and ftinking Carrion would be a more perfed Body, than found and common 
Flefh. 

Again, if on the other hand they would have thofe to be the moft perfect Bodies, the parts where- 
of are moft grofs, folid, and difficult to be mov'd ; the Earth would be perfeder than Gold, 
and Air and Fire would be more imperfed Bodies. 

But if they are not willing to affix the clear and diftind Idea's I have mention'd, to the Terms 
Ture and TerfeEt, let them fubftitute others in their room. But if they pretend to define thefe 
words only by fenfible Notions, they will eternally confound things with one another, fince the 
Signification of the Terms that exprefs them can never be fix'd and determin'd. All Men, as we 
have already prov'd, have very different Senfations of the fame Objeds: Wherefore a Man ought 
not to define thefe Objeds by the Senfations he has of them, unlefs he has a mind to be unintelli- 
gible, and to put all things in confufion. 

But at the bottom, there is no matter to be found, fnot that which the Heavens are fram'd 
of J which has more Perfedion in it than any other. All that Matter feems capable of, are Fi- 
gures and Motions, and 'tis indifferent to it whether it has Figures and Motions regular or irregu- 
lar. Reafon does not tell us that the Sun is more Perfed or more Luminous than Dirt ; nor that the 
Celebrated Beauties of Romancers and Poets, have any advantage over the moft corrupted Car- 
caffes ; they are our falfe and treacherous Senfes thot tell us this. It is in vain for Men to cry out 
againft what we fay ; all their Railleries and Exclamations will appear frigid and ridiculous, to 
fuch as fhall ferioufly examine the Reafons we have alledged. 

Thofe who are us'd to no other Preception than that of their Senfes, believe the Sun to abound 
with Light ; but thofe who can be Senfible and Reasonable at the fame time, are of another opinion 5 
provided they have as good a Faculty of Reafbning, as they have of Senfation. I am very well 
perfwaded, that even thofe who pay the greateft Deference to the teftimony of their Senfes, 
would clofe with our Opinion, had they well confider'd the things that we have laid: But they 
are too much in love with the Delufion of their Senfes; they have obey'd their Prejudices too 
long, and their Soul is too unthoughtful, or forgetful, to acknowledge or remember that all the 
Perfedions fhe imagines fhe fees in Bodies, belong only to her felf. 

But it is not to this fort of Men we addrefs our felves, we are very little concern'd for 
their Approbation and Efteem : They refufe to hearken to us, and confequently are incompe- 
tent Judges ; we are fatisfy'd in defending Truth, and having the Approbation of thofe who 
ferioufly labour to rid themfelves of the Errors of their Senfes, and to employ the Light of their 
Underftanding. We only require of them, that they would ferioufly Meditate on thefe Thoughts, 
with the greateft Attention they can, and then let them judge of them : Let them condemn them 
or acquit them; we fubmitthem to their Judgment, fince by their Meditation they have ob- 
tain'd a Supreme Power and Jurifdidion over them, which without Injuftice cannot be eoritefted 
with them. 



CHAP* 



44- K Malebranche Concerning Book L 

CHA P. XX. 

The Conclufton of the Firfi Book. I. That our Senfes are given us only 
for the Prefervation of our Body, II. That we ought to doubt of the Re~ 
ports they make. III. That 'tis no little thing to doubt, as we ought to do. 

H A V E, if I am not miftaken, made a fufficient Difcovery of the General Errors into 
which our Senfes lead ns, whether in regard to their own Obje&s, or in refped of Things, 
which can only be perceiv'd by the Underftanding : And I am of an Opinion, that we fall 
into no Error by their Conduct, the caufe whereof may not be difcover'd by the things that have 
been laid, in cafe a Man will bellow a little Meditation upon them. 
I. ? We have hitherto feen, that our Senfes are moll faithful and exa& in inftru&ing us in the Re- 
list our lations, which all the Bodies which furround us have with our own, but are incapable of teach- 
Senfes are i n g us what thefe Bodies are in their own Nature-, that to make the beft: ufe of them, they muffc 
fniTfcr on ^ ^ e imploy'd to the Prefervation of our Health and Life ; and that they can't be fufficiently 
the Prefer- defpis'd, when they pretend to raife themfelves to a Sovereignty above the Underflanding. This 
vaxlon of is the Principal Thing I would gladly have well remembred in all this Firfl Book, viz.. Let a 
our Body. Man throughly confider, that our Senfes were only given us for the Prefervation of our Body, let 
him fortifie himfelf in this Notion •, and in order to free himfelf from the Ignorance he is under, 
let him feek out other Succors and Affiltances, than thofe his Senfes furnifli him withall. 
H. But fuppofing there be fome fuch Men to be found, (as doubtlefs there be but too many of 

T ^ at we them ) who will not be perfwaded of thefe lail Propofitions by what we have hitherto faid, we 
doubt of demand °f tn em flill much lefs than this \ we only defire of them to enter into fome Diflruft 
the sports °? their Senfes, and if they cannot entirely reject their Teflimonies as falfe and treacherous, 
which our let them only ferioufly doubt, left thefe Reports fhould not be abfolutely true: And certainly, 
senfes [ n m y Opinion, enough hath been faid, to call at leaft fome Scruple in the Mind of Reafonable 
Thin J ^en, anc * confequently to excite them to the Employing their Liberty otherwife than they have 
s hitherto done : for if they could once begirt to doubt, that the Reports of their Senfes were not 
true, they might with greater Eafe with-hold their Confent, and fo prevent their falling into 
thofe Errors, into which they have hitherto fallen efpecialJy if they could remember that Rule 
We have given at the Beginning of this Difcourfe, That we ought not to give an entire Confent, ex- 
cept to Things that appear entirely evident, and to which we could not forbear confentin/r, without beina 
certainly convinced, wejlwuld make an ill ufe of our Liberty in not consenting . 
Iir^ y p or whai- rema i 11Sy let not a Man imagine he has made but an inconfiderable Progrefs, if he has 
no little" on ty te* m, & t0 Doubt. To know how to Doubt with Judgment and Reafon, is not fb fmall a 
thing to thing as is fuppos'd. For we muft needs fay, there is a great deal of difference betwixt Doubt- 
doubt as ing and Doubting. Some Doubt out of a Rafh Paflion, and a Brutifh Refolution ; others out 
we ought of Blindnefs and Malice, out of Humour and Fancy, and becaufe they will do fo; But there are 
others likewife, that Doubt out of Prudence and Caution, out of Wifdom and Penetration of 
Mind. The Academich and Atheifts Doubt after the former manner ; but true Philofophers Doubt 
in the latter. The firfl Doubt is a Doubt of Darknefs, which never condu&s us towards the 
Light, but fets us at a greater Diflance from it. The fecond Doubt proceeds from Light, and 
is affiftant in fome meafure, to the production of it, in its turn. 

Thofe who only Doubt in the former manner, know not what it is to Doubt with Under- 
flanding : They Laugh at Monfieur Des Cartesh teaching us to Doubt, in the firfl of his Metaphy- 
sical Meditations , becaufe it feems to them, that it is no other, than a Fantaftick Doubting j 
That it can only be faid in general, that our Nature is Infirm, that our Mind is full of Blind- 
nefs, that we ought to be very careful to rid our felves of our Prejudices, and fome fuch things 
as thefe. They fuppofe that this is enough to prevent being feduc'd by their Senfes, and not to 
be deceiv'd at all. But it is not enough to complain, that the Mind is weak ; we muft make her 
fenfible of her Weakneffes: It is not enough to fay, She is fubjeft unto Error \ we muft difcover 
to her wherein her Errors confifi, to which I think we have given an Introduction in this firfl 
Book, by accounting for the Nature and Errors of our Senfes ; and we will flill purfue the fame 
Defign, in explaining the Nature and Errors of our Imagination in the Second. 



F. MALE- 



[ 45 1 . 

■ 1 *-J — • 

■ 

R MJLEBRJNCHE'S 

TREATISE 

CONCERNING 

The Search after TRUTH. 

BOOK the SECOND, 

Concerning 

Imagination. 

the' first part. 




CHAP. J. 

I. A General Idea of the. Imagination. II. That it includes two Faculties^ 
an ABiiie and a Pajfive. III. A General Caufe of the Changes which hap- 
pen in the Imagination of Men, and the Foundation of the Second Book. . 

N the foregoing Book I have treated concerning the Senfes; I have endeavour'd to Ex- 
plain their Nature, and precifely to determine the life that ought to be made of them. 
I have difcover'd the Principal and moil Genei'al Errors, wherein they ingage us : and 
have attempted fuch a Limitation of their Power, as to put Man in a capacity of Hoping 
much, and Fearing nothing from them ; whilft they keep them within thofe Boundaries I 
have prefcrib d them. In this Second Book I mall Difcourfe concerning the Imagination, as the 
Natural Order of things obliges me. For there is fo near a Relation and Affinity betwixt the 
Imagination and the Strifes^ that they in no wife ought to be feparated. We lhall fee too in the Sequel 
of the Difcourfe, that thefe two Powers are no farther Different than according to Degree of 
more or lefs. 

This then is the Method which I have Obferv'd in this Treatife .• It is divided into three Parts. 
In the Firft I Explain the Natural Caufes of the Diforder and Errors of the Imagination : In the Second 
I make fome Application of thefe Caufes to the more General Errors of the Imagination •, and I Difcourfe 
of fuch as may be term'd the Moral Caufes of thefe Errors. In the Third I treat of the Contagi- 
ons Communication of Strong Imaginations. 

Though the greateft part of the things contain'd in this Trad may not be fo new, as thofe 
I have already deliver'd in Explaining the Errors of the Senfes, yet their life and Advantage will 
be no lefs considerable. Men of bright and clarify'd Underftandings can eailly difcover the Er- 
rors, and the Caufes of the Errors I am treating of: But there are few fuch Men as can make 
fufficient Reflection thereupon: I pretend not to give Inftru&ions to all the World, my defign 
is only to Inform the Ignorant, and to Caution and Remind the reft, or rather I try to be my own 
Inftru&our and Remembrancer. 

It has been faid in the Firft Book, that the Organs of our Senfes were compos'd of little Fi- 
bres, which terminate, on one hand, upon the External parts of the Body, and on the Skin;, and on A Gene- 
the other, center in the middle of the Brain. But thefe Fibres may be moved in a two-fold manner ^ ral idea of 
either by commencing their Motion at thofe Extremities which terminate in the Brain, or at thofe the imtgi- 
which terminate on the Surface of the Body. Being the Agitation of thefe Fibres cannot be com- natic '"> 
municated to the Brain, but the' Soul muft have fome Perception or other ^ if the Agitation be 
begun by the Impreffion of Obje&s, made upon the External Surface of the Fibres of the Nerves, 

N and 



T. 



4-6 F. Male bran Che Concerning Book II. 

and be communicated to the Brain ; the Soul thereupon receives a Senfation, and 

* By a N*m-*J fn&g- judges * what fhe has the Senfation of, to be without 5 that is to fay^ She perceives 

te^ret7£w5r an Object as Prefent: bmrif it be only the Internal Fibres that are agitated by the 

preceding Book. Courfe of the Animal Spirits, or in fome other manner, the Soul Imagines and 

judges what fhe imagines to be not without r but within the Brain ; that is, fhe 
perceives an Object, as Abfent. And this is the difference there is between Senfation and Ima- 
gination. 

But it ought to be obferv'd, That the Fibres of the Brain are more violently agitated by the 
Impreffio.n of External Obje&s, than by the Courfe of the Animal Spirits ; and that, for this reafon 
the Soul is more nearly toucVd by External Objeds, which fhe judges as prefent, and, as it were, 
capable of making her inftantly fenfible of Pleafure or Pain, than by the Courfe of the Animal Spi- 
rits. And yet it happens fometimes inPerfbns whofe Animal Spirits are put in extream Commotion, 
by Fallings, Watchings, a fcorching fever, or a violent Paffion, that thefe Spirits move the Inter- 
nal Fibres of the Brain with as great a force, as External Objefts , fo that thefe Perfons have "the 
Senfation of what they mould onlf have the Imagination, and think they See Objects before their 
Eyes, which they only Imagine in the Brain. Which evidently fhews, that, in regard of what oc- 
curs in the Body, the Senfes and Imagination differ but in Degree of more or lefs, as I have before 
declar'd. 

But in Order to give a more diftinct and particular Idea of the Imagination, we mufb know that 
as often as any Change happens in that part of the Brain where the Nerves unite, there happens 
a Change alfo in the Soul : That is, as has* been already explaiu'd, if there happens any 
Motion in this part which alters the Order of its Fibres, there happens, at the fame time, a new 
Perception in the Soul ; and fhe either Feels or Imagines fomething afrefh : And that the Soul is in- 
capable of receiving any frefh Senfation or Imagination, without fome Alteration in the Fibres of 
that part of the Brain. 

So that the Vacuity of Imagining, or the Imagination, confuts only in the Power the Soul has of 

framing the Images of Objects, by effecting a Change in the Fibres of that part of the Brain, 

which may be call'd the Principal Part, as being that which correfponds to all the Parts of our 

Body ; and is the Place where the Soul keeps her immediate Refidence, if I may be fo al- 

low'd to fpeak. 

IL - This manifeftly. fhews that this Power which the Soul has of Forming thefe Images, includes 

Two Fa- two things ; one that has its Dependence on the Soul, and the other on the Body. The firffc is 

cutties in the Action and the Command of the Will, The fecond is the ready Obedience paid to it by the 

the Magi- Animal Spirits which delineate thofe Images, and by the Fibres of the Brain wherein they muft 

^AtTveaul ^ e i ra P rmtec ^ In this Tract, both one aud the other of thefe two things go indifferently by 

a Pajfive. tne N ame of Imagination ; nor are they diftinguifh'd by the Terms Attive and Pajfive, which 

might be given them ', becaufe the Senfe of the thing fpoken of, eafily determines which of the 

Two isunderftood, whether the Ailive Imagination of the Soul, or the Pajfive Imagination of 

the Body. 

I fhall not here particularly determine which is that Principal Part of the Brain before-men- 
tion'd ; Firft, Becaufe it would be but an ulelefs thing to do it. Secondly, Becaufe it is not perfectly 
and infallibly known. And laflly, Since I could not convince others, it being a Matter incapa- 
ble of Probation in this place ; though. I fhould be infallibly affur'd which was this Principal Part, 
I fhould think it more advifeable to fay nothing of it. 

Whether then it be according to the Opinion of Dr. Willis, in the two little Bodies, call'd by 
him Corpora Striata, that the common Senfe refides ; and the Cells of the Brain preferve the Spe- 
cies of the Memory, and the Corpus Callojum be the Seat of Imagination. Whether it be according 
to Femelius's Opinion, in the Pia Mater, which involves the Subftance of the Brain : Whether 
it be in the Pineal Gland, according to the Notion of Dcs-Cartes ; or, laflly, in fome other part 
hitherto undifco'ver'd, that our Soul exercifes her Principal Functions, is of no great concern 
to know. '.Tis enough to be affur'd that there is a Principal Part, fand this is moreover abfo- 
lutely neceflaryj and that the Bafis of Mr. Des-Cane$\ Syfiem flands its ground. For 'tis to be 
well obferv'd, that though he fhould be miflaken in alluring us it is the Pineal CLmd, to 
which the Soul is immediately united, this could no ways injure the Foundation of his Syfiem t 
from which may ever be dedue'd all the profit that could be expected from the true, to make all 
neceflary advances in the knowledge of Man. 
rn. Since then the Imagination confifts only in the Power the Soul has of Forming the Images of 
A general Obje&s, by imprinting them (as I may fo fay) in the Fibres of the Brain •, the greater aud more 
caufiofthe diftindf. the Impreffes of the Animal Spirits are, which are the ftrokes of thefe Images, the 
Ck w¥ S C more Wrongly and diflinctly the Soul will imagine Objects. Now, as the Largenefs, and Depth, 
7eninthe ant( * Ckavernefs of the flrokes of any Sculpture depend upon the Forcible Acting of the Gia- 
imaginati- ving Inftrument, and the plyable yielding of the Plate ; fo the Depth, and the Diftinctnefs of 
en; and the the Imprefles of the Imagination, depend on the Force of the Animal Spirits, and the 
foundation Conftitution of the Fibres of the Brain : And 'tis the Variety that is found in thefe two 
"Lfl Se ,' things, which is almoft the univerfal Caufe of that great Diverfity we obferve in the Minds 
of different Men. 

For 'tis no hard thing to account for all the different Characters to be met with in the Minds 
of Men: On the one hand, by the Abundance and Scarcity, by thellapidnefs and Slownefs, by 
the Groffnefs and the Littlenefs of the Animal Spirits ; and on the other hand, by the Finenefs 

and 



Chap. IL The Search after Truth. 

and^Courfenefs, by theMoiilure and Drinefs, by the Facility and Difficulty of the yielding of 
the Fibres of the Brain ; and laftly, by the Relation the Animal Spirits may poffibly have with 
thefe Fibres. And it would be very expedient for every one, forthwith to try to Imagine to 
himfclf all the different Combinations of thefe things, and to apply himfelf ferioufly td the 
Confideration of all the Differences we have obferv'd between the Minds of Men. Becaufe it is 
ever more Ufeful, and alfo more Pleafant for a Man to employ his own Mind, and to accuftom 
it to the finding out Truth by its own Induftry, than to fuffer it to gather Ruft by a carelefs La- 
zinefs, in applying it only to things wholly digefted, and explain'd to his hands. Befides that, 
there are fbme things fo delicately nice and fine, in the different Character of Minds, that a Man 
mayeafily fometimes difcover them, and be fenfible of them himfelf, but is unable to reprefent 
them, or make them fenfible to others. 

But that we may explain, as far as poffibly we can, all the Differences that are found in diffe- 
rent Minds, and that every Man may more eafily obferve in his own, the ciauf^ of all the Chan- 
ges, he fenlibly perceives in it at different times ; it feems convenient to make a general En- 
quiry into the Caufes of the Changes, which happen in the Animal Spirits, and in the Fibres 
of the Brain : Since this will make way for the Difcovery of all thofe, which happen in the 
Imagination. 

Man never continues long like himfelf; all Mankind have fufficient Internal Convidions-of 
their own Inconftancy. A Man judges one while in one manner, and another while in another, 
concerning the fame Subject. In a word, the Life of a Man confifts only in the Circulation of the 
Blood, and in another Circulation of Thoughts and Defines. And I am of Opinion, a Man can't em- 
ploy his Time much better, than in Searching for the Caufes of thefe Changes we are fubject to, 
and entring into the Knowledge of our Selves. 



47 



CHAP. II. 

I. Of the Animal Spirits^ and the Changes they are fibjetl to in general 

II. That the Chyle entering the Hearty occajions a Change in the Spirits. 

III. That Wine does the fame thing. 

»T~ ""^ I S confefs'd by all the World, that the Animal Spirits are nothing, but the more fub- . *• 

til and agitated parts of the Blood ; which Subtilty and Agitation is principally owing Jj^j} 11 ^-. 
m ' to the Fermentation it receives in the Heart ; and the violent Motion of the Mufcles, rhs^ndthn 
which conftitute that part: That thefe Spirits, together with the reft of the Blood, are condu- changes 
fted through the Arteries to the Brain : And that there they are feparated from it, by fome parts £% are 
appropriated to that purpofe ; but which they are, it has not been yet agreed upon. fubjefc to 

From whence we ought to conclude, that in cafe the Blood be very fubtil, it will have abun- n & eKera ' 
dance of Animal Spirits ; but if itbegrofs, the Animal Spirits will be few : That if the Blood 
be compos'd of parts eafie to be inflam'd in the Heart, or very fit for Motion, the Spirits in the 
Brain will be extreamly heated and agitated : And, on the contrary, if the Blood admits little 
Fermentation in the Heart, the Animal Spirits will be languid, ' unaclive, and without force 5 
And laftly, according to the Solidity, which is found in the parts of the Blood, the Animal-Spi- 
rits will have more or lefs lolidity, and confequently greater or lefTer force in their Motion. But 
thefe things ought to be explain'd more at large, and the Truth of them made more fenfibly ap- 
parent, by Examples and uncontroverted Experiments that prove them. 

The Authority of the Ancients has not only blinded fome Mens Underftandings, but we may jj 
fay, has feal'd up their Eyes. For there are ftill a fort of Men that pay fo fubmiffive a deference to ihat the 
Ancient Opinions, or poffibly are fo ftiff and obftinate, that they will not fee thofe things which ckjie en- 
they could not contradict, would they but pleafeto open once their Eyes. We daily fee Men, tr ™£ *"* 
in good Reputation and Efteem for their Study, Write and Difpute publickly againft the Vilibie eg r ms "^ 
and Senfible Experiments of the Circulation of the Blood, againft that of the Gravitation and change in 
Elaftick force of the Air, and others of the like Nature. The Difcovery Mr. Packet has made thespms, 
in our Time, and which we have here occafion for, is of the number of thofe that are mif-for- 
tunate, meerlyfor want of being Born Old ■, and, as a Man may fay, with a Venerable Beard. 
I fliall not, however, omit to make ufe of it, and am under no Apprehenfion of being blam'd 
by Judicious Men for doing fo. 

According to that Difcovery; it ismanifeft that the Chyle does not immediately pafs from the 
Vtfcera to the Liver, through the Mefaraick Feins, as was believ'd by the Ancients ; but that it 
pafles out of the Bowels into the Lacteal Veins, and from thence into feveral Receptacles, where 
thefe Veins coterminate : That from thence it afcends through the Ductus Thoracic us along the 
Vertebra of the Back, and proceeds to mix with the Blood in the Axillary Vein, which enters into 
the Superiour Trunck of Vena. Cava ; and thus being mingled with the Blood, it difcharges it felf 
into the Heart. 

It ought to be concluded from this Experiment, that the Blood thus mingled with the Chyle, 
"being very different from that which has already circulated feveral times through the Heart, the 

Animal 



4-8 F. Malebunche Concerning Book II, 

Animal Spirits, that are only the more fine and fubtil parts of it, ought to be very different in 
Perfons that are raftings and others after they have eaten. Again, becaufe in the Meats and 
Drinks that are us'd, there is an infinite Variety, and likewife thofe that Ufe them, have Bodies 
diverfly difpos'd : Two Perfons after Dinner, though rifing from the.fame Table^ muft fenfibly 
perceive in their Faculty of Imagining, fo great a Variety of Alterations, as is impoflible to be 
defcrib'd. 

I confefs thofe who are in a perfect: ftate of Health, perform Digeftion fb eafily, that the Chyle 
flowing into the Heart, neither augments nor diminifhes the Heat of it, and is fcarce any Ob- 
ftruct ion to the Blood's fermenting in the very fame manner, as if it enter'd all alone : So that 
their Animal Spirits, and confequently their Imaginative Faculty admit hardly any Change there- 
by. But as for Old arid Infirm People, they find in themfelves very fenfible Alterations after a 
Repaft: They generally grow dull and fleepy^ at leaft, their Imagination flags and languifhes, 
and has no longer any Brisknefs or Alacrity. They can conceive nothing diftin&ly, and are 
unable to apply themfelves to any thing. In a word, they are quite different and other fort of 
People from what they were before. 
in. But that thofe of a more found and robuft Completion, may likewife have fenfible proofs of 
effJn Wl '"h Wfiat I nave ^d '■> r h e y nee d °nly make reflection on what happens to them in Drinking Wine 
fame thine, fomewhat more freely than ordinary ; or on what would fall out upon their drinking Wine at one 
Meal, and Water at another. For it is certain, that unlefs they be extreamly ftupid, or that 
their Body be of a make very extraordinary, they will fuddainly feel in themfelves fbme Brisknefs, 
or little Droufinefs, or fome fuch other accidental thing. 

Wine isfo fpirituous,that it is Animal Spirits almoft ready made : But Spirits a little too libertine 

and unruly,that not eafily fubmit to the orders of the Will,by reafbn of their Solidity and exceffive 

Agitation. Thus it produces even in Men that are of a moft ftrong and vigorous Conftitiition 

Vinum hi- greater Changes in the Imagination, and in all the parts of the Body, than Meats, and other Li- 

ftator do- quors. It gives a Man a Foil, in Plantus's Expreffion •■, and produces many Effafts in the Mind, lefi 

lofus eft. advantagious than thofe defcrib'd by Horace in thefe Lines, 

Quid non Ebrietas defignat i open a recludit : 
Spes jubet ejfe ratas : in pr&lia trudit inermem : 
Sollicitis animis onus eximit : addocet artes. 
Fcecundi calices quern non fecere difertum ? 
Contrdtla quern non in paupertate joint um ? 

It would be no hard matter to give a Reafon for all the Principal Effects produc'd in the Ani- 
mal Spirits, and thereupon in the Brain, and in the Soul it felf, by this Commixture of the Chyle 
and Blood ; as to explain how Wine exhilarates, and gives a Man a certain Sprightlinefs of Mind, 
. when taken with Moderation ; why it Brutifies a Man in procefs of time, by being drunk to 
excefs j why a Man is droufie after a good Meal, and a great many others of like Nature, for 
which very ridiculous Accounts are ufually given. But befides that I am not writing a Tract of 
Fhyficks, I muft have been neceffitated to have given fome Idea of the Anatomy of the Brain, or have 
made fome Suppofition, as Monfieur Des-Cartes has done before me in his Treatife concerning Man t 
without which it were impoflible to explain ones felf. But finally, if a Man fhall read with At- 
tention that Difcourfe of Monfieur Des-Cartes, he will poffibly be fatisfy'd as to all thefe particu- 
lar Inquiries •, becaufe that Author explains all thefe things \ at leaft, he furnifhes us with 
fufficient Knowledge of them, to be able of our felves to difcover them by Meditation, provided 
we are any whit acquainted with his Principles. 



CHAP. III. 

That the Air imployd in Refpration caufes fome Change in the 
Animal Sprits. 

THE fecond general Caufe of the Changes which happen in the Animal Spirits, is the Air 
we breath, For though it does not forthwith make fuch fenfible Impreffions as the 
Chyle, yet it caufes at long run, what the Juices of Meats do in a much fhorter time. 
This Air paffes out of the Branches of the Trachea into thofe of the Arteria Vcnofa : Hence it 
mingles, and ferments with the reft of the Blood in the Heart ; and, according to its own par- 
ticular Difpofition^ and that of the Blood, it produces very great Changes in the Animal Spirits, 
and confequently in the Imaginative Faculty. 

I know there are fome Perfons, who will not be perfuaded that the Air mixes with the Blood 
in the Lungs and Heart} becaufe they cannot difcover with their Eyes, the Paffagesin the Bran- 
ches of the Trachea, and in thofe of the Arteria Venofa, through which the Air is communicated. 
But the Action of the Jntellett ought not to ftop, when that of the Senfes can go no farther. It 
can penetrate that which to them is impenetrable, and lay hold on things which have no handle 

for 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. 49 

for the Senfes. 'Tis not to be queftion'd, but fome parts of the Blood continually pafs 
through the Branches of the Vena Arteriofa, into thofe of the Trachea. The Smell and Moifture 
of the Breath, fufficiently prove it ; and yet the Paflages of that Communication are imperce- 
ptible. Why then may not the fubtil parts of Air be allow'd to pafs through the Branches of 
the Trachea, into the Aneria Venofa though the PafTages of this Communication be undifcerni- 
ble ? In fine, a much greater quantity of Humours tranfpire through the imperceptible Pores of 
the Arteries and the Skin, than efcape through the other Avenues of the Body ; and even the 
Pores of the moll folid Metals r are not fo clofe, but there are found Bodies in Nature little 
enough to find a free pafTage through them ; fince otherwife thefe Pores would quickly be en- 
tirely ftopt. 

It is true that the conrfe and ragged parts of the Air cannot penetrate through the ordinary 
Pores of Bodies ; and that Waterit felf, though extreamly grofs,can glide through thofe crannies, 
which will not give admittance to them. But we fpeak not here of the courfe or branch'd and 
ra a ged Parts of Air •, they feem to be of little ufe to Fermentation : We only fpeak of the lit- 
tle^ ftiffand pungent Parts, and fuch as have none or very few Branches to impede their pafTage, 
becaufe thefe are the fitteft for the Fermentation of the Blood. 

I might notwitfiftanding affirm upon the Teftimony of Silvias, that even the courfeft Air pafTes 
from the Trachea to the Heart, who teftifies he has feen it pafs thither by the Art and Ingenuity 
of Mr. de Swammerdam. For 'tis more reafonable to believe a Man who fays he has feen it, than 
' a thoufand others who talk at random. It is certain then that the moft refin'd and fubtil Parts of 
Air which we breath, enter into the Heart-, and there, together with the Blood and Chyle, 
keep up the Fire which gives Life and Motion to our Body .; and that according to their different 
Qualities, they introduce great Changes in the Fermentation of the Blood, and in the Animal 

Spirits. 

We daily difcover the Truth of this by the various Humours, and the different Characters of 
the Minds of Men of different Countries : The Gafcons, for inftance, have a more brisk and 
lively Imagination, than the Normans: Thofe of Rkoan, and Dieppe, and Picardie, differ all from 
one another : And yet farther from the Low-Normans, though at no great diflance from each 
other. But if we confider Men that live in Countries more remote, we fhall find much ftranger Numqnid 
Differences between them : For inftance, an Italian, a Flemming, and a Dutch-Man. To con- n ° n ult . ra 
elude, there are places celebrated in all Ages for the Wifdomof their Inhabitants, as Themant . ^-f n " 
and Athens, and others, as notorious for their Stupidity,, as Thebes and Abdera, and fome others. ma n?^er. 

Athenls tenue caelum, ex quo acutiores etiam putantur Attici, crajfum Thebis. GiC de Fato. 

Ahderitan& peilora plebis habes. Mart. 
JS&otum in craffb jurares a'ere natum. Hor. 



CHAP. IV. 

I. Of the Change of the Spirits caused by the Nerves, which go to the 
Heart and Lungs. II. Of that which h caused by the Nerves, which go 
to the Liver , to the Spleen ^cTVifcera. IIL That all that, is performed 
without the concurrence of our Will, but yet it cannot be done without a 
Providence. 

THE third caufe of the Changes, which happen to the Animal Spirits, is the moft ordi- 
nary, and moft a&ive of them all, becaufe it is this which produces, maintains and 
corroborates all the Paffions. For our better underftanding this, we muft know that 
the Nerves of the fifth, fixth, and eighth Conjugation fhoot out the greateft part of their Bran- 
ches into the Breaft and Belly, where they are moft advantagioufly imploy'd for the Prefer- 
vationof the Body, but moft dangeroufly in regard to the Soul: Becaufe thefe Nerves in their 
Action depend not on the Will of Men, as do thefe us'd in moving the Legs and Arms, and 
other External Parts of the Body : And they have a greater influence upon the Soul, than the 
Soul has upon them. 

We muft know then, that many of the Branches of the Nerves of the eighth Conjugation, fall J- 
in among the Fibres of the Principal of all the Mufcles, the Heart ; that they encircle its Orifi- ,°f f e r 
ces, its Auricles and its Arteries. That they expatiate alfo into the Subftance of the Lungs, and the" spirits 
thus by their different Motions produce very confiderable Changes in the Blood. For the Nerves caus'd by 
which are difpers'd among the Fibres of the Heart, caufing it to Dilate and Contrail it felf in too the Nerves 
hafty and violent a manner, throw, with an unufual force, abundance of Blood towards the ^t^J 10 
Head, and all other External Parts of the Body. Though fometimes thefe fame Nerves have a Jy /^ 
. quite contrary Effect. As for the Nerves which furround the Orifices of the Heart, its Auricles 
and Arteries, their ufe is much the fame with that of the Regifters, wherewith the Chymifts mode- 

O rate 



5° Pi Malebranche Concerning feook If J 

rate the Heat of their Furnaces ; of of Cocks which are inflrumental in Fountains, to regulate the 
Courfe of their Waters. For the ufe of thefe Nerves is to contrail and dilate diverfly the Orifices 
of the Heart, and by that manner to haften, and i-etard the Entrance and the Exit of the Blood, 
and fo to augment and diminijh the Heat of it. Laftly, The Nerves which are difpers'd over the 
Lungs, have the fame employment : For the Lungs being made up only of the Branches of the Tra- 
chea, of the Vena Arteriofa, and the Aneria Venofa, interwoven one among another, it is plain 
that the Nerves which are difpers'd through their Subftance, by their Contraction, muft obftrudt- 
the Air from paffing fo freely out of the Branches of the Trachea, and the Blood out of thofe of 
the Vend Arteriofa, into the Arteria Venofa, to difcharge it felf into the Heart. Thus thefe Nerves 
according to their different agitation, augment and diminifh ftill the Heat and Motion of the 
Blood. 

All the Paffions furnifh us with very fenfible Experiments of thefe different Degrees of Heat 
of our Heart ; we. manifeftly feel its Diminution and Augmentation fometimes on a fudden : 
And as we falfly judge our Senfations to be in the Parts of our Body, and by occafion of them to 
be Excited in our Soul, as has been explain'd in the foregoing Book ; So the generality of Philo- 
fophers imagine the Heart to be the Principal Seat of the Paffions of the Soul, and 'tis even at 
this day the moft common and receiv'd Opinion. » 

Now becaufe the Imaginative Faculty receives confiderable Changes by the Changes which hap- 
pen in the Animal Spirits ; and becaufe the Animal Spirits are very different, * according to the 
different Fermentation of the Blood, perform'd in the Heart ; it is eafie to difcoverthe Reafon 
of Paffionate People's imagining things quite otherwife, than thofe who confider'd the fame fe- 
dately, and in cold Blood. 

The other Caufe which exceedingly contributes to the Diminution and Augmentation of 

thefe Extraordinary Fermentations of the Blood, in the Heart, confifts in the Action of many 

other Branches of the Nerves, whereof we have been fpeaking. 

y- Thefe Branches are difpers'd throughout the Liver, which contains the more fubtil part of the 

Chinee of Blood, or that which is commonly calFd the Bile ; through the Spleen, which contains the groffer 

the spirit, P art ) °r the Melancholy ; through the Pancreas, which contains an acid Juice, moft proper for 

cans' A by Fermentation ; through the Stomach, thecTm, and the other parts, which contain the Chyle. Fi- 

the Nerves nally, They are difpers'd and fpread about all the parts, that can any ways contribute to the 

7heLive°r u> vai 7* n S tne Fermentation of the Blood in the Heart. There is moreover nothing even to the 

the spleen, Arteries and Veins, which has not a Connection with thefe Nerves ; as Dr. Willis has difcover'd 

And other of the Inferiour Trunck of the Great Artery, which is connected to them near the Heart ; of the 

.Vifcera. Axillary Artery on the right fide-, of the Emulgent Vein, and feveral others. 

Thus the ufe of the Nerves being to agitate the parts (to which they are faftenedj diverfe 
ways, it is eafie "to conceive how, for inftance, the Nerve which furi-ounds the Liver may, by 
conftringing it, drive a great quantity of Bile into the Feins, and the Canalvs Cyfyicus, which 
mingling with the Blood in the Veins, and with the Chyle, through the Canalis Cyfticus, enters the 
Heart, and produces a Heat therein much more fervent than ordinary. Thus when a Man is 
mov'd with fome kind of Paffions, the Blood boyls in the Arteries and in the Veins, and the Heat 
is diffus'd throughout the Body, the Fire flies up into the Head, which is prefently fill'd with 
fuch a prodigious quantity of over-brisk and rapid Animal Spirits, as by their impetuous 
Current, hinder the Imagination from reprefenting other things, than thofe, whofe Images they 
form in the Brain ; that is, from thinking on other Objects than thofe of the Predominant Pajfion. 

'Tis fo again with the little Nerves which run into the Spleen, or into other parts which 
contain a Matter more grofs, and courfe, and lefs capable of Heat and Motion ; they render the 
Imagination wholly Languid, Droufy and llnactive, by pouring into the Chanels of the Blood 
a Matter that is grofs and difficult to be put in Motion; 

As for thofe Nerves which environ the Arteries and Veins, their Ufe is to put a flop to the cur- 
rent of the Blood, and, by their Preffure and Conftri&ion of the Veins and Arteries, oblige it 
to flow into thofe places, where it meets with a paffage more free and open. Thus that part of 
the great Artery, which furnifhes all the parts of the Body, below the Fleart, with Blood, being 
bound and ftraitned by thefe Nerves, the Blood muft neceffarily enter the Head in. greater quan- 
tities, and fo produce a Change in the Animal Spirits, and confequently in the Imagination. 
III. But it ought to be well obferv'd, that all this is perform'd by mere Mechanifm ; I mean, that all 

That thefe the different Movements of thefe Nerves in all the different Paffions, are not affected by the Corn- 
things are m andoi the Will; but on the contrary,are perform'd without its orders, and even in contradiction 
K h^rd r to t * lem : I n f° muc h t ^ at a Body without a Soul difpos'd like that of a found Man,would be capable 
of Frovi- r °f au * the Movements which accompany our Paffions : And thus Beafts themfelves might have 
dencefnith- fuch as nearly refembled them, though they were only pure Machines. 

out the con- This is the thing for which we ought to admire the Incomprehenfible Wifdom of Him, who 
mrTt w$ ^as *° regularly rang'd and contriv'd all thefe Natural Wheels, and Movements, as to make it 
our Will. f u ft} c i ent - f or an object, to move the Optick Nerve in fuch and fuch a manner, to produce fo ma- 
ny diverfe Motions in the Heart, in the other inward parts of the Body, and on the Face it felf. 
For it has lately been difcover'd, that the fame Nerve which fhoots fome of its Branches into 
the Heart, and into other Internal parts, communicates alfo fome of its Branches into the Eye, 
" the Mouth, and other parts of the Face; fo that no Paffioir can rife or mutiny within, but it 
muft betray prefently it felf without, becaufe there can be no Motion in the Branches extended 
to the Heart, but there muft another happen in thofe, which are fpread o'er the Face. 

The 



Chap. Vo The Search after Truth. 

TheCorrefpondence and Sympathy, which is found between the Nerves of the Face, and fome 
others, anfvvering to other places of the Body, not to be nam'd, is ftill much more Remarkable j 
and that which occasions this great Sympathy, is as in the other Paffions, becaufe thefe little Nerves 
which climb into the Face, are only Branches of that which defcends lower. 

When a Man is overtaken with fome violent Paffion, if he is careful to make a Reflection upon. 
what he feels in his Entrails, and in other parts of his Body, where the Nerves infinuate themfelves, 
as alfo upon the Changes of Countenance, which accompany it; and if he confiders that all thefe 
divers Agitations of the Nerves, are altogether involuntary, and that they happen in fpite of all 
the Refiftance that our Will can make to them, he will find it no hard matter to fuller himfelf to 
embrace this fimple Expofition, that hath been given of all thefe Relations and Correfponden- 
cies betwixt the Nerves. 

But if a Man examines the Reafbns and, the End of all thefe things, fo much Order and Wifdom 
will be found in them, that a little Sobernefs of Thought and Attention will be able to convince 
the moft devoted Admirers of Epicurus and Lucretius, that there is a Providence that governs the 
World. When I fee a Watch, I have reafon to conclude, that there is fome Intelligent Being, 
fince it is Impofli ble for Chance and Hap-hazard to produce, tp range and pofture all its Wheels. 
How then could it be poffible, that Chance, and a conf us'd Jumble of Atoms, fhould be ca- 
pable of ranging in all Men and Animals, fuch abundance of different fecret Springs and Engines, 
with that Exafltnefs and Proportion, I have juft Explain'd : and that Men and Animals fhould 
thereby procreate others exactly like themfelves. So ridiculous it is to think or to fay with Lu- 
cretuu, That all the parts which go to the Compofition of Man, were pack't together by Chance 5 
that his Eyes were not made with any defign of Seeing, but that he afterwards thought of See- 
ing becaufe he found he had Eyes ; And thus with the other parts of the Body. Thefe are his 
Words. 

Lamina ne facias oculorum clara creata i 

Pr officer e ut pojfimus: &, ut proferre vidL 

Vroceros pajfus, ideo fafiigia pojfe 

Surarum, ac fmmirmm pedibus fundata plicari : 

Brachia turn poro vaiidis ex apt a lacertis 

EJJ'e, manufque datas utraque a parte minifiras, 

IJt facer e advitam pojfimus, qu&foret ufus. 

C&tera de genere hoc inter qu&cunque pretantur : 

Omnia perverfa prapofiera funt ratione. 

Nil adeo quoniam natum '_/? in corpore, ut uti 

Tojfemtis : fed quod natum 7 ft idprocreat ufumi 

■ Muft not he needs have a ftrange Averfion to a Providence, who would thus voluntarily put 
out his Eyes for fear of feeing it, and endeavour to render himfelf infenfible to Arguments fo 
ftrong and convincing, as thofe Nature furnifhes us withal? Iconfefs, when once Menaffe&to 
be thought bold, or rather Atheiftical Wits, as did the Epicureans, they prefently find themfelves 
benighted in darknefs, and fee only falfe glimmerings for the future ; they peremptorily deny the 
moft clear and Self-evident Truths, and as haughtily and Magifterially affirm the falfeft and ob- 
fcureft Things in the World. 

The Poet I have juft cited, may ferve as a Proof of that Blindnefs of thefe venturous Wits , 
he confidently pronounces, and againft all appearance of Truth, about the moft difficult and ob- 
fcureft Queftions : when at the fame time it may well be thought, he has no Preception of Idea's, 
that are moft clear and evident. If I fhould ftand to tranfcribe paffages of that Author tp jufti- 
fie what I fay, I fhould make too long and tedious a Digreffion ; for though it may be permitted 
me to make fome Reflections, which ftay and faften the Mind for a Moment upon effential Truths, 
yet I fhould never attone for making Digreffions, which throw off the Mind a conliderable time, 
from its Attention to its principal Subject, to apply it to things of little or no Importance. 



C H A P. V. 

I. Of the Memory. II. Of the Habits. 

WE have been explaining the general Caufes, as well External as Internal, which effect 
a Change in the Animal Spirits, anil confequently in the Imaginative Faculty. We 
have fhewn that the External are the Meats we feed upon, and the Air we take in, 
for Refpiration. And that the Internal confift in the Involuntary Agitation of certain Nerves. 
We know no other general Caufes, and we are confident there are none. In fo much that the Fa- 
culty of Imagining, as to the Body, depends only on two things, namely, the Animal Spirits, 
and the Difpofition of the Brain, whereon they aft. There nothing more remains at prefent to 
to give us a perfecT: Knowledge of the Imagination, than the manifeftation of the different Chan- 
ges, that may happen in the Subftance of the Brain. 

They 



5^ 



i. 

Of the 
Mexvcrj. 



II. 

Of the 
Habits. 



* I ex- 
plain elfe- 
where 
wherein 
this Power 
confifts. 



F. Malebranche Concerning Book II. 

T hey fhall be examined by us, as foonas we have given forae Idea of the Memory and Habits, that 
is to fay, of that facility we have of thinking upon things which we have already thought upon* 
and doing the fame things we have already done : The Methodical Order of our Difcourfe will 
have it fo. 

In oTder to give an Explication of the! Memory, itfhould becall'dto Mind, what has been fe- 
veral times already inculcated \ that all our different Preceptions are affix'd to the Changes which 
happen to the Fibres of the Principal part of the Brain, wherein the Soul more particularly refides. 

This one Supposition being laid down, the Nature of the Memory is Explain'd : for as the 
Branches of a Tree, which have continued for fome time bent after a particular manner ; prelerve 
a readinefs and facility of being bent afrefh in the fame manner \ fo the Fibres of the Brain, ha- 
ving once receiv'd certain Impreffions from the current of the Animal Spirits, and from the. 
Adionof Objeds upon them, retain for a considerable time, fome Facility of receiving the fame 
Difpofitions. Now the Memory confifts only in that Promptnefs or Facility ; fince a Man thinks 
upon the fame things, whenever the Brain receives the fame Impreffions. 

And whereas the Animal Spirits aft fometimes more, and fometimes lefs ftrongly upon the Sub- 
ftance of the Brain :, and External Objeds make far greater Impreffions, than the Imagination 
fingly \ it is from hence eafie to difcover, why a Man does not equally remember all the things he 
has formerly perceiv'd \ how, for inftance, it comes to pafs, that what a Man has often percei- 
ved, is generally reprefented livelier to the Soul, than what a Man has had but now and then 
a Preception of: why he more diftindly remembers the things he has feen, than thofe he has only 
imagin'd j and fo why, for example, a Man fhall know better the diflribution of the Veins in the 
Liver by once feeing the Difledion of that part, than by often reading it in a Book of Anatomy - 7 
and fo of other things of like nature. 

But if a Man would make reflexion upon what has been formerly faid, concerning the Imagi- 
nation ; and upon the little which has juft now been fpoken concerning the Memory; and if he be 
rid of that prejudice, that our Brain is too little for the hoarding up and preferring fuch abun- 
dance of Traces and Impreffions, he will take pleafure in difcovering the caufe of all thofe won- 
derful EfFeds of the Memory, St. Aufiin with fo much admiration fpeaks of, in the Tenth Book of 
his Confeffwns. But I fhall not explain thefe things more at large ; as believing it more expedi- 
ent for every Man to explain them to himfelf by fome Eflay of Thought ; for as much as the things 
that way difcover'd, are always more grateful and agreeable, and make greater Imprefllon on us, 
than thofe we learn from other Men. 

It is neceflary to the Explication of the Habits, to know the manner whereby ( we have reafbn 
to think) the Soul moves the parts of the Body, to which fhe is united \ and that is this : Accor- 
ding to all appearances in the World, there are always in fome places of the Brain, whatever 
they be, a very great Quantity of Animal Spirits, very rapidly mov'd by the Heat of the Heart, 
from whence they proceeded ; and moft readily difpos'd to glide into thofe places, where they 
find an eafie and an open pafiage. All the Nerves terminate in the Receptacle of thofe Spirits,' 
and the Soul has the * Power of determining their Motion, and conducing them through the 
Nerves, into all the Mufcles of the Body. Thefe Spirits entering therein fwell them up, and 
confequently contract them : And thus they move the parts to which the Mufcles are affix'd. 

We fhall readily be perfwaded, that the Soul moves the Body in the manner thus explain'd, if 
it be obferv'd, that when a Man has been a long time fafting, let him try, how he will, to give 
certain motions to his Body, he will be unable to effed them, and even will be at fome pains to 
ftand upon his Legs. But if fo be he find a way of conveying into his Heart fomething very Spi- 
rituous, as Wine or any like nutriment, he forthwith perceives that his Body obeys his Defires 
with far greater facility, and that he is able to move it how he pleafes. For this fingle Experi- 
ment makes it, one would think, fufficiently manifeft, that the Soul is incapable of giving Moti- 
on to her Body for want of Animal Spirits •, and that by their means fhe re-affumes her Sove- 
reignity and Dominion over it. 

Now thefe Inflations of the Mufcles are fo plain and palpable in the Motions of our Arms, and 
other parts of our Body ; and 'tis fo reafonable to believe thefe Mufcles cannot receive any Infla- 
tion, without the admiffion of fome body into them ; as a Bladder cannot be blown and extended, 
without the entrance of the Air, or fomething elfe ; that it feems not to be doubted but the Ani- 
mal Spirits are driven from the Brain, through the Nerves into the Mufcles, to dilate them, and 
to produce in them all the Motions we defire. For a Mufcle being full is neceflarily fhorter than 
when it is empty ; andfoattrads and moves the part to which it is conjoin'd ; as may be feen 
explain'd more at large in Mr. Des Cartes Treatife of the Paffions, and in that Concerning Man. I do 
not however deliver that Explication as perfedly demonftrated in all its parts : To render it en- 
tirely evident , there are many things farther requifite to be demanded : without which, it is next 
to impoflible to explaio»ones felf. But the Knowledge of them is not fo ufeful for our Subjed -, 
for let the Explication Be true or falfe, it will not fail to be of equal ufe to acquaint us with the Na- 
ture of the Habits. Since if the Soul moves not the Body in that manner, it neceflarily moves it 
in fome other, that comes up near enough to it, to deduce thofe confequences from it, which 
we fhall infer. 

But to the intent we may purfue our Explication, it is necefTary to obferve, that the Spirits 
find not the paths, through which they ought to pafs, always fo free and open, as they fhould be \ 
which is the occafion, for example, of the Difficulty we meet with in moving the Fingers wit,h 
that Nimblenefs as is neceflary to play on Mufical Inftrumentsj or the Mufcles imploy'd in 

Pronun- 



Chap. VI. The Search after Truth. 55 

Pronunciation, to pronounce the Words of a ftrange Language: but that the Animal Spirits by 
little and little, fo open and plain the Ways by their continued fucceffion, as to take away in 
time all manner of Refiftance. Now /the Habits confift in that Facility the Animal Spirits have 
of paffing into the Members of our Body. 

'Tis the eafieft thing imaginable, according to this Explication, to refolve a multitude of Que- 
ftions relating to the Habits .• As why, for inftance, Children are more capable of acquiring 
new Habits, than Perfons of a more confnmmate Age. Why it is a thing of fuch Difficulty, to 
lay afide an inveterate Cuftom. Why Men by ufe of Speaking, obtain fo great a Dexterity at it, 
as to pronounce their Words with an incredible fwiftnefs, and even without confidering them ; 
as is but too often cuftomary with thofe, who fay the Prayers which they have been us'd to, fe- 
veral Years together. And yet many things go to the Pronunciation of one Word ; many 
Mufcks rauft be mov'd at once, in a certain time, and a definite Order, as thofe of the Tongue^ 
the Livs, the Throat, and Diaphragm. But a Man may with a little Meditation give himfelf fatis- 
faction upon thefe Queftions, ^ upon many others very curious, and no lefs ufeful, and it is not 
neceflary to dwell any'longer upon them. 

It is manifeft from what has beenfaid, that there is a great affinity between the Memory and Ha- 
bits ; and that in one fenfe, the Memory may pafs for a Species of Habit. For as the Corporeal 
' Habits confift in the Facility the Spirits have acquir'd, of paffing into certain places of our Body : 
So the Memory confifts in the Traces the fame Spirits have imprinted in the Brain, which are the 
caufe of that Facility we have of Recollecting and Remembring things. In fo much that were 
there no Perceptions affix'd to the courfes of the Animal Spirits, and the Traces they leave be- 
hind them ; there would be no difference between the Memory and the other Habits. Nor is there 
greater difficulty to conceive how Beafts, though void of Soul, and incapable of any Perception, see the 
may remember after their way, the things that have made an Impreffion in their Brainy than to iUuflrati- 
conceive how they are capable of acquiring different Habits •, and after what I have explain'd con- ons u pn 
cerning the Habits, I fee no greater difficulty to reprefent to a Man's felf, how the Members f e g.^i el ' 
of their Body procure different Habits by degrees ; than how an Engine newly made, cannot fo Memory 
eafily be play'd, as after it has been fome time made ufe of. and Habits 



A 



G H A P. VL 

I. That the Fibres of the Brain are not fuh'jetl to fo fudden Changes^ as the 
Spirits. II. Three different Changes incident to the three different Ages. 

LL the Parts of Animate Bodies are in a continual Motion, whether they be Solid, or *• 
Fluid, the Flefh no lefs than the Blood : There is only this difference between the Motion ™ at ™i 
of one and the other, that the Motion of the parts of the Blood is fenfible and vifible, J }e grain 
and that the Particles of the Fibres of our Flefh are altogether Imperceptible. There is then this are not 
difference between the Animal Spirits, and the Subftance of the Brain , That the Animal Spirits fub]e& to 
are very rapidly mov'd, and very fluid, but theSubftance of the Brain has fome Solidity and fof u /f en 
Confidence. So that the Spirits divide themfelves, into little Parts, and are difpers'd in a few as m t ^f s L 
Hours, by tranfpiring through the Pores of the Veffels that contain them ; and others often fuc- r /w. 
ceed in their Place, not altogether like the former : But the Fibres of the Brain are^not fo ealie 
to be diffipated, there feldom happen any confiderable Alterations in them ■■, and their whole Sub- 
ftance can't be chang'd, but by the fucceffive trad of many Years. 

The moft confiderable Differences, that are found in the Brain of one and the fame Perfon, du- 
ring his whole Life, are in his Infancy, in his Maturity, and in his Old Age. 

The Fibres in the Brain in a Man's Child-hood, are foft, flexible and delicate : A Riper and n. 
more confnmmate Age dries, hardens, and corroborates them ; but in Old Age, they grow altoge- Three con- 
ther inflexible, grofs, and intermix'd with fuperfluous Humours, wich the faint and languifliing^ e ^ Wff 
Heat of that Age is no longer able todifperfe. For as we fee that the Fibres which compofe the ^J^f/l. 
Flefh, harden by Time, and that the Flefh of a young Partridge is without difpute more tender, ^n\ n % e 
than that of an old one; fo the Fibres of the Brain of a Child, or a young Perfon muft be much Three dffe- 
more foft and delicate, than thofe of Perfons more advane'd in Years. re ? n ^ges 

We fhall underftand the Ground and the Reafon of thefe Changes, if we confider that the Fibres °f Mun - 
are continually agitated by the Animal Spirits ; which whirl about them in many different man- 
ners. For as the Winds parch and dry the Earth by their blowing upon it, fo the Animal Spi- 
rits by their perpetual Agitation, render by degrees, the greateft part of the Fibres of Man's 
Brain, more dry, more clofeand folid ; fo that Perfons more ftricken in' Age, muft neceflarily 
have them almoft always more inflexible, than thofe of a leffer Handing. And as for thofe who 
are of the fame Age, your Drunkards, which for many Years together have drank to excefs, either 
Wine or fuch Intoxicating Liquors, muft needs have them more folid and more inflexible, than 
thofe who have abftain'd from the ufe of fuch kind of Liquors all their Lives. 

Now the different Conftitutions of the Brain in Children, in Adult Perfons, and in Old Peo- 
ple, are very confiderable Caufes of the Difference obfervable in. the Imaginative Faculty of thefe 
Three Ages, which we are going to fpeak of in the following Chapters. 

P C H A P. 



54 ft Malebranche Concerning . Book II.- 

C H A P. VII. 

I. Of the Communication there u between the Brain of a Mother, and that 
of her Infant. II. Of the Communication that is between our Brain, and 
the other Farts of our Body, which inclines us to Imitation, and to Com' 
pajfion. III. An Explication of the Generation of Monfirous Children- 
and the Propagation of the Species. IV. An Explication of fome Ir- 
regularities of the Vnderfianding, and of feme Inclinations of the Will, 
V. Concerning Concuptfcence, and Original Sin. VI. Objections and 
Anfwers. 



I 



T is, I think, fufficiently manifefl that there is fome kind of Tye and Connexion between . 
us, and all the reft of the World ; and that we have fome Natural Relations to, or Corre- 
. fpondencies with all things that encompafs us : which Relations are very advantagious, both 
as to the Prefervation, and welfare of our Lives. But all thefe Relations are not equally binding^ 
There is a clofer Connection betwixt us and our Native Country, than China , we have a nearer 
Relation to the Sun, than to any of the Stars j to our own Houfes, than that of our Neighbours: 
There are invifible Ties, that fallen us with a flridter Union unto Men, than Beafts ; to our Re- 
lations and Friends, than Strangers - 7 to thofe on whom we have our Dependence for the Prefer- 
vation of our Being, than to fuch as can neither be the Objects of our Hopes or Fears. 

That which is more efpecially remarkable in this Natural Union, betwixt us and other Men, 
is, That it is fo much greater, by how much we ftand more in need of their Kindnefs, or Affi- 
itance. Relations and Friends are intimately united to one another : We may fay that their Pains 
and Miferies are common, as well as their Pleafures and Happinefs \ For all the Paffions and Sen- 
timents of our Friends, are communicated to us by the Impreffion their Mein,and Manner,and the 
Air of their Countenance make upon us : But becaufe we may abfolntely live without them, the 
Natural Union betwixt them and us is not the greateft that is poffible. 
I. Children in their Mother's Womb, whofe Bodies are not yet compleatly form'd, and who are 

cf the Com- of themfelves in a ftate of the greateft Weaknefs, Impotency, and Want, that can pofiibly be 
munimion CO nceiv'd, ought to be united likewife to their Mothers in the ftricteft manner imaginable. And 
tmm the' tnou g h tneir Soul be Separate from that of their Mothers, yet fince their Body is not loos'd, and 
Brain oftbe difengaged from her's, it ought to be concluded, they have the fame Sentiments and the fame Paf- 
Mother,and fions \ in a word, all the fame Thoughts as are excited in the Soul, on occaflon of the Motions 
that of her w hich are produc'd in the Body. 

infant. -p^us i n f ants f ee wnat their Mothers fee, they hear the fame Cries, they receive the fame Im- 

preffions of Objects, and are agitated with the fame Paffions. For iince the Air of the Face of A 
Man in a Paflion, pierces thofe which look upon him, and Naturally impreffes in them a Paffion 
refembling that with which he is pofiefs'd, though the Union of that Man with thofe that confi- 
der him, be not very great and binding ; one Would think there were good Reafon, to believe 
the Mothers capable of imprinting on their Infants all the fame Sentiments they are touch'd with, 
and all theaTame Paffions themfelves are adted withal. For, in fhort, the Body of an Infant in 
the Womb, is all of a piece with the Body of the Mother - 7 the Blood and the Spirits are com- 
mon to them both , the Senfations and Paffions are the Natural Refult and Consequents of the 
Motions of the'Blood and Spirits, and thefe Motions are neceilarily communicated from the Mo- 
ther to the Child : Therefore the Paffions and Senfations, and generally all the Thoughts occa- 
fion'd by the Body, are common to the Mother and the Child. 

Thefe things feem to me beyond exception true, for feveral Reafons , which yet I advance not 
here but as a Suppofition, which I think will be fufficiently demonftrated by what follows : For 
every Suppofition that can ftand the fhock of all the Difficulties poffible to be rais'd againft it, 
and repel them , ought to pafs for an indifputable Principle. 

The invifible Bonds and Cements wherewith the Author of Nature has united all his Works, 

are worthy of the Wifdom of GO D, and the Admiration of Men \ there is nothing in the World 

at once more furprizing and inftru&ing than this ; but we are too inconfiderate to regard it. We 

leave our felves to be conducted, without confidcring who conducts us, or how he does it : Na- 

oftheCom- ture * s concea ^ from our Eyes, as well as its Author ; and we feel rhe Motions that are pro- 

munkation duc'd in us, without confidering from what Springs they are : And yet there are few things 

betweenour more neceffary to be known by us •, fince upon the Knowledge of them it is, that the Explication 

Brain, and f a \\ things relating to Man, depends. 

the other There are certainly in our Brain fome fecret Springs and Movements, which naturally incline 
cur Body, us t0 Imitation , for this is neceffary to Civil Society. It is not only neceflary for Children to 
which in- believe their Fathers - 7 for Difciples to believe their Maflers ; and Inferionrs, their Superiours : 
tiine us to it is moreover neceffary, that all Men fhould be inclinable to take up the like Exteriour Manners,. 
Imitation an( j t0 ^ Q t j lc f ame Actions, asthofe with whom they mean to live. For to the intent that Men 
pMonT' fhould have a Connexion and Dependance on each other, 'tis neceffary they come near to one 

another 



Chap. VII. The Search after Truth. . j. 

another in the Characters both of Body and Mind. This is the Fundamental Principle of AbuH« 
dance of things we (hall treat of in the following Difcourfe : But as to what we have to fay hi 
this Chapter, it is farther neceflary to know, that there are in the Brain fome Natural Difpofi- 
tions, which incline us to Compaffion, as well as to Imitation. 

It ought to be known then, That the Animal Spirits do not only Naturally convey themfelves 
into the Parts of our Body, for the performing the fame Actions, and the fame Motions whicli 
we fee others do ; but farther, for the Receiving, after a manner, their Hurts and Injuries, and 
participating of their Miferies, For Experience teaches us, that when we very attentively con- 
sider a Man violently ftruck, or dangeroufly wounded, the Spirits impetuoufly haften to the 
Parts of our Body correfpondent to thofe we fee wounded in another, provided we turn not 
the current of them another way, by a voluntary and forcible Titillation of a different Part from 
that which we fee hurt or wounded : Or that the Natural Courfe of the Spirits towards the 
Heart and Vifcerous parts, which is ufual in fudden Commotions, changes not the Determina- 
tion of the Flux of the Spirits we are fpeaking of, and hurries them along with them : Or laftly, 
unlefs fome extraordinary Connection of the Traces of the Brain, with the motions of the Spi- 
rits, effects the fame thing. 

This Tranflation of the Spirits into the Parts of our Body, which are Analogous to thofe we 
fee injurioufly treated in others, makes a very fenfible Impreffion on Perfons of a fine and delicate 
Conftitution, who have a lively Imagination, and very foft and tender Flefh. For they feel, for 
inftance, a kind of fhivering or trembling in their Legs, by an attentive beholding any one that 
has a Sore there, or actually receives a blow in them. 

( For a confirmation of this, take what a Friend of mine wrote to me to the fame purpofe. An 
Old Gentleman that liv'd with one of my Sifters, being fick, a Toung Maid held the Candle whiVs~l he 
was Blooded in the Foot : But as Jhe faw the Surgeon (trike in the Lancet, jhe was feiz?d with fuch an- 
Apprehenfion,. as to feel three or four days afterwards fuch a piercing Pain in the fame part of her Foot, 
tts forced her to keep her Bed all that time?) 

The Reafon whereof is this, That the Spirits impetuoufly diffufe themfelves into thefe parts of 
our Body } that by keeping them more intenfe, they may render them more Senfible to the Soul -, 
and may put her upon her guard, and make her felicitous to avoid thofe Evils which we behold 
in others. ' 

This Compaffion in Bodies produces another Companion in Minds : It induces us to Condole 
and Comfort others in their Troubles, becaufe in fo doing, we Comfort and Solace our felves : 
In fine, it gives a check to our Malice and Cruelty. For the horrour of Blood, and the fear of 
Death, in a word, the fenfible impreffion of Compaffion often prevents thofe Perfons from 
Butchering beafts, who are the moft convincingly perfwaded they are meer Machines : Becaufe a 
great many Men are unable to Kill them, without Wounding themfelves by a Repercuffive ftroke 
of Compaffion. 

But that which here is moft efpecially remarkable, is, That the Senfible View of a Wound 
receiv'd by another, produces in thofe which behold it, a fo much greater Wound, as their Con- 
ftitution is more weak and delicate : Becaufe that fenfible View impetuoufly throwing the Animal 
Spirits into the Parts of the Body, which are correfpondent to thofe they fee hurt or wounded, 
they muft needs make a greater Impreffion in the Fibres of a tender and delicate Body, than in 
thofe of a more ftrong and robuft Complection. 

Thus Men who abound with Strength and Vigour, are not at all hurt with the fight of a Mafla- 
cre ; nor fo much inclm'd to Compaffion, becaufe the fight of it is an offence to their Body, as 
becaufe it fhocks their Reafon : Thefe Perfons have no Pity for a Condemned' Criminal, as being 
both Inflexible and Inexorable } Whereas Women and Children fuffer much Pain by the Hurt 
and Wounds they fee receiv'd by others. They are machinally difpos'd, to be very Pitiful and 
Compaffionate to the Miferable. And they are unable to fee a Beaft beaten, or hear it cry, 
without fome difturbance of mind. 

As for Infants which are ftill in their Mother's Womb, the delicacy of the Fibres of their Flefh 
infinitely exceeding that of Women and Children, the Courfe of their Spirits muft neceffarily 
produce more confiderable Changes in them, as will be feen in the Sequel of the Difcourfe. 

We will ftill fuffer what we have faid to go for a fimple Suppofition, if Men will have it fb. 
But they ought to endeavour well to comprehend it, if they would diftimftly conceive the things 
I prefiime to explain in this Chapter. For thefe two Suppofitions I have juft made, are the Prin- 
ciples of an infinite number of things, which are generally believ'd very difficult and abftrufe. 
And which indeed feem impoffible to be explain'd and clear'd up without them. I will here give 
ibme inftances of what I have faid. 

It was about feven or eight Years ago, that there was feen in the Incurable, a young . J 11 '-/ 

Man who was born an Idiot, and whofe Body was broken in the fame places that Male- , *? -tExpiicmm of 
factors are broken on the Wheel. He lived near twenty Years in the fame condition : firmctiMnn and lie 
many Perfons went to fee him •, and the late Queen-mother going to vifit the Hofpi- propagation oftbesps* 
tal, had the Curiofity to fee him, and alfo to touch his Legs and Arms, in the places ties. 
were they were broken. 

According to the Principles I have been eftablifhing, the caufe of this Calamitous Acci- 
dent was, That his Mother hearing a Criminal was to be broken, went to fee the Execution. 

*,AU 



5^ F* Malebranche Concerning J&ocik If. 

dt Aec °h'* ^ t ^ ie ^ ows which were given to the Condemned, ftruck violently the Imagination of the 
frfisv-tl* Mother j and by a kind of Repercuifive blow, the tender and delicate Brain of her Infant. The 
fnion. Fibres of this Mother's Brain receiv'd a prodigious Concuffion, and were poflibly broke in fome 
places, by the violent courfe of the Spirits, produced at the Sight of fo frightful a Spectacle. 
But they had Confiflency enough to prevent their total Diholution. The Fibres, on the contrary, 
of the Infant's Brain not being able to refift the furious torrent of thefe Spirits, were broke and 
fhattered all to pieces. And the havock was violent enough to make him lofe his Intellect for 
ever. This is the Reafon why he come into the World deprived of Senfe. Now for the other, 
why he was broken in the fame parts of his Body as the Criminal, whom his Mother had feen 
put to Death. 

.At the Sight of this Execution, fo capable of difmaying a timorous Woman, the violent courfe 
of the Animal Spirits of the Mother, made a forcible defcent from her Brain, towards all the 
* Accor- Members of her Body, which were Analogous to thofe of the Criminal, and * the fame thing 
ding to the happened to the Infant. But becanfethe Bones of the Mother were capable of withstanding the 
ZZiJy' violent Impreflion of thefe Spirits, they receiv'd no dammage by them ; it may be too fhe felt 
not the leaft Pain, nor the leaft Trembling in her Arms or Legs, upon the Breaking of the 
Criminal : But the rapid courfe of the Spirits was capable of burfling the foft and tender parts 
of the Infant's Bones. For the Bones are the laft parts of the Body that are form'd ; and they 
. have very lit tleConfiflence, whilft Children are yet in their Mother's Womb. And it ought to 
be obferv'd, that if this Mother had determin'd the Motion of thefe Spirits, towards fome other 
part of her Body, by fome powerful Titillation, her Infant would have efcaped the Fracture of 
his Bones. But the part which was correfpondent to that, towards which the Mother had de- 
termined thefe Spirits, would have been feverely injured j according to what I have alrea- 
dy faid. 

The Reafons of this Accident are general enough, to explain how it comes to pafs that Wo- 
men, who whilft big with Child, fee Perfons particularly mark'd in certain places of their Face, 
imprint on their Infants the very fame Marks, and in the felf-fame places of the Body. And 
'tis not without good Reafon, that they are caution'd to rub fome latent part of the Body, when 
they perceive any thing which furprifes them} or are agitated with fome violent Paffion. For 
by this means, the Marks will be delineated rather upon the hidden parts, than the Faces of 
their Infants. 

We mould have frequent Inftances of like Nature with this I have here related, if Infants could 
live after they had receiv'd fb great Wounds or Difruptions j but generally they prove Abor- 
tions : For it may be faid that rarely any Child dies in the Womb, if the Mother be not diftem- 
per'd, that has any other caufe of its ill fortune, than fome fright or impotent Defire, or other 
violent Paffion of the Mother. This following is another Inftance, very unufual and particular. 
It is no longer than a Year ago, that a Woman, having with too great an Application of 
Thought, contemplated the Picture of St. Pins, at the Celebration of his Feafl of Canonization, 
was deliver'd of a Child perfectly featur'd like the Reprefentation of the Saint. He had the 
Countenance of an Old Man, as near as was poffible for an Infant that was beardlefs.. His Arms 
were folded acrofs upon his Breaft j His Eyes bent up towards Heaven, and had very little Fore- 
head, becaufe the Picture of the Saint, being poftur'd as looking up to Heaven, and elevated 
towards the Roof of the Church, had fcarce any Fore-head to be feen : He had a kind of Mi- 
tre reclining backwards on his Shoulders, with many round prints in the places, where the Mi- 
tres are imbofs'd with Precious Stones. In fhort, this Infant was the very Picture of the Pi- 
cture, upon which the Mother hadform'd it, by the force of her Imagination. This is a thing 
that all Paris might have feen as well as I, fince it was a confiderable time preferv'd in Spirit 
of Wine. 

This inftance has This remarkable in it, That it was not the Sight of a Man alive, and acted 
with fome violent Paffion, thatmov'd the Spirits and Blood of the Mother to the Production of 
fo Arrange an Effect ; but only the fight of a Picture j which yet made a very fenfible Impreffion, 
and was accompanied with a mighty Commotion of Spirits, whether by, the Fervency and Ap- 
plication of the Mother •, or whether by the Agitation, the noife of the Feafl caus'd in her. 

This Mother then beholding the Picture with great Application of Mind, and Commotion of 
Spirits, the Infant, according to the firft Suppolition, faw it with the like Application, and Com- 
motion. The Mother being fenfibly fmitten imitated the Picture, at leaft in outward pofture ; 
according to the fecond Suppofition : For her Body being compleatly form'd, and the Fibres of 
her Flefli hard enough to withftand the torrent of the Spirits, fhe could not poffibly imitate it, 
or become perfectly like it in all things : But the Fibres of the Infant's Flefh, being extreamly 
foft, and confequently capable of being moulded into any Figure, the rapid courfe of the Spirits 
produc'd in his Flefh, all that was necefiary to render him entirely like the Image which he law : 
And the Imitation, to which Children are the moft difpos'd, was almoft as perfect as it poflibly 
could be. But this Imitation having given the Body of the Child a lhape too extraordinary, was 
the occafion of its Death. 

There are many other Inftances to be met with in Authors of the Power of the Mother's Ima- 
gination j and there is nothing foodd or extravagant, but they fometimes mifcarry of : For they 
not only bring forth Deform'd and Mif-fhapen Children, but the Fruits they have long'd to Eat, 
as Apples, Pears, Grapes, and the like. The Mother ftrongly imagining, and impatiently long- 
ing to Eat Pears, for inftance 7 the Infant receives the fame impatient Longings, and ftrong Ima- 
gination 



Ghap. VII. The Search after Truth. $j 

ginations-, and the Current of the Spirits, aduated with the Image of the defir'd Fruit, dirRifmg 
it felf through the little Body^. which by reafon of it flexibility and foftnefs, is readily difpos'd 
for a change of its Figure; the. poor Infant is fafhion'd in the fhape of the thing it too ar- 
dently defives. But the Mother fuffers not in her Body by it, becaufe it is not foft and plyable 
enough, to receive the Figure of the thing imagined ; and fb fhe cannot imitate, or make her felf 
entirely like it. . . .'. 

Now it ought; to be fuppos'd that this Correfpondence I have been explaining, and which is 
fometimes the caufe of fuch great Diforders, is an unufeful thing, and an inconvenient Ordi- 
nance in Nature. On the contrary, it feems to be very advantagious to the Propagation of art 
Humane Body, and the Formation of the .Foetus ; and it is abfolutely neceflary to the Tranfmit- 
ting feveral Difpofitions of the Brain, which ought to be different at different Seafons, and. in dif- 
ferent Countries. For it is neceflary, for inftance^ that Lambs in particular Countries, fliould have 
their Brain altogether difpos'd for the avoiding and flying Wolves; by reafon of their abounding 
in thofe places, and being very formidable Creatures to them. 

It is true, this Communication between the Mother's and the Infant's Brain, is fometimes at- 
tended with unlucky Confequences; when the Mothers fuffer themfelves to be tranfported with 
fome outragious Paffion. Notwithstanding it feems to me, that without this Communication, 
Women and other Creatures could not eafily Propagate their Young Ones in the fame Species. For 
though fome Reafon may be given for the Formation of the Fcetw in general, as Monfieur Des- 
Curtes has happily enough attempted •, yet it is molt difficult, without this Communication of the 
Mother's Brain with that of the Infant, to explain why a Mare does not produce a Calf, and a 
Hen an Egg which contains a little Partridge, or fome other Bird of a new Species. And I am of 
opinion, that thofe who have thought much upon the Formation of the Foetus, will agree in the 
fame Notion. ( 

'Tis true, that the molt reafonable Opinion, and that which is molt agreeable to Experience, 
touching that very difficult Queftion, about the Formation of the Foetus, is this ; That Infants 
are already wholly form'd, even before the Action whereby they are conceiv'd; and that their 
Mothers only beftow upon them the ordinary Growth, in the time of their being big with them. 
Nevcrthelefs, this Communication of Animal Spirits, and of the Brain of the Mother, with the 
Spirits and Brain of the Infant, feems however to be ferviceable in regulating this Growth, and 
determining the parts imploy'd in its Nourilhment, to the poflruring themfelves almoft in the 
fame manner, as in the Body of the Mother. That is, in rendring the Infant like to, or of the 
fame Species. This is manifeft enough by the Accidents which occur, when the Imagination of 
the Mother is difbrdered, and fome tempeftuous Paffion -changes the Natural Difpoficion of her 
Brain. For then, as we have juft explain'd, this Communication alters the Natural Formation of 
the Infant's Body, and the Mother proves Abortive fometimes of her Foetus, fo much more refem- 
biing the Fruits fhe longed for, as the Spirits find lefsRefiftance in the Fibres of the Infant's Body, 

We deny not however, but GO D Almighty, without that Communication we have been men-' 
tioning, might have difpos'd all things neceflary to the Propagation of the Species, for infinite 
Ages, in fo exad and regular a manner, that Mothers fhould never have mifcarried, but have al- 
ways born Children of the fame Bignefs and Compledion ; and perfectly alike in all things. For 
we ought not to meafure the Power of G O D by our weak Imagination ; and we are ignorant of 
the Reafons, which might have determined Him in the Gonftrudion of his Work. 

We daily fee, that without the help and afliftance of this Communication, Plants and Trees 
produce regularly enough their like ; and that Birds, and many other AYtimals, Hand in no need 
of it for the Breeding and Hatching of their Young ones ; when they brood upon Eggs of a diffe- 
rent Species ; as when a Hen fits on the Eggs of a Partridge. For though we have reafon to fup- 
pofe, that the Seeds and Eggs have originally contained in them the Plants and Birds, which pro- 
ceed from them ; and that the little Bodies of thefe Birds may have receiv'd their Conformation, 
by the Communication before- mentioned ; and the Plants have receiv'd their's by another Commu- 
nication, which is equivalent : yet this perhaps would be but a Conjedure. But though it fhould 
be more than Conjedure, yet we ought in no wife to judge by the things which G O D has made, 
what thofe are which it is poflible for Him to make. 

Yet if it beconfider'd, that Plants which receive their Growth from the Adion of their Mo- 
ther-plant, refemble it much more, than thofe which proceed from the Seeds ; that the Tulips, 
for inftance, which arife from the Root, are of the fame colour with their Mother-Tulip ; and 
that thofe which are deriv'd from the Seed, are generally very different : It cannot be doubted, 
but that if the Communication of the generating Plant with the generated, is not .abfolutely ne- 
ceflary to make it of the fame Species • it is always neceflary to make it of the fame Likcnefs. 

So that, though it were fore-feen by GOD, that this Communication of the Mother's Brain, 
with the Brain of her Child, would fometimes be the occafion of the Death of the Foetus, and 
the Generation of Monfters ; by reafon of the diforderly Imagination of the Mother : Yet this 
Communication is fo admirable, and fo neceflary, for the Reafons I have alledg'd, and for feve- 
ral others that might ftill be brought, that the fore-knowledge of thefe inconveniences ought not 
to have prevented G O D from executing his Defign. It may be affirrn'd in one Senfe, that GOD 
had never a Defign of making Monfters; for it feems evident to me, that fuppofinghe fliould 
make but one Animal, he would never make it Monflrous: But his Delign being to produce an 
admirably contriv'd Work, by the moft fimple means ; and to unite all his Creatures to one 
another ; he fore-faw certain Effeds, that would neceffarily follow from that Order, and Na- 

Q. ture 



58 K Malebranche Concerning Book II 

ture of Things.* and that was not fufficient to make him change his Purp~bfe and Defign. For 
though, in conelufion, aMonfter, confider'd disjunctively, be an imperfect Work, yet when con- 
joyn'd with the reft of the Creation, it renders not the World imperfect. 

We have fufficiently explain'd, what the Imagination of a Mother is capable of working, up- 
on the Body of her Child : Let us now examine the influence file has upon his Mind, and let us 
try to difcover the firft and topmoft irregularities of the Vnderfianding and Will of Men in their 
Original. For this is our main and principal Defign. 
IV. 'Tis certain that the Traces of the Brain are accompany'd with Senfations, and Idea's of the 

An Expti- g ou j ^ anc j t [ iat tne ]\/i ot i ons of the Animal Spirits are never excited in the Body, but there are 
fme 'ire- Motions in the Soul correfpondent to them. In a word, it is certain that all the Corporeal Paf- 
guhrhies fions and Senfations, are attended with real Senfations and Paffions of the Soul. Now, according 
of theVn- to our firft Supposition, Mothers communicate to their Children the Traces of their Brain, and 
derfiani- CO nfequendy the Motions of their Animal Spirits. Therefore they breed in the Mind of their 
™MMio>n I n f ants the fame Senfations and Paffions themfelves are affe&ed with, and confeqiiently corrupt 
of the Will, their Moral and Intellectual Capacity fever al ways. 

If it be fo common for Children to bear imprinted in their Faces the Marks, or Traces of the 
Idea, that made an impreffion on their Mother ; though the Cutaneous Fibres make a ftronger re- 
finance to the current of the Spirits, than the foft and tender parts of the Brain, and the Spirits 
are in a greater Agitation in the Brain, than towards the Surface of the Body ; it can't be rea- 
fonably doubted, but the Animal Spirits of the Mother produce in the Brain of their Children 
many Tracks and Footfteps of their diforderly Motions. Now the great Traces of the Brain, 
and the Emotions of the Spirits anfwering to them, being a long time preferv'd, and fometimes 
for the whole courfe of a Man's Life ; it is plain, that as there are few Women but have 
their Weakneffes and Failings, and are difturb'd with fome Paffion or other during the Sea- 
fon of their Breeding, there muft needs be but few Children, but what bring into the 
World with them, a Mind fome way or other prepofteroufly fram'd, and are born Slaves to 
fome domineering Paffion. 

We have but too frequent Experience of thefe things, and all Men know well enough, that 
there are whole Families fubjedf to great Weakneffes of Imagination, which have been heredita- 
rily tranfmitted from their Anceftors. But it would be unneceffary here to give particular in- 
ftances. On the contrary, it is more expedient for the Confolation of fome Perfons to affirm, 
that thefe Infirmities of their Fore-fathers, being not Natural, or effential to the Nature of Man, 
the Traces and Impreffes of the Brain, which were the caufe of them, may by degrees wear out, 
and in time be quite effac'd. 

Yet it will not be amifs to relate here an Inftance of James I. King of England, which is men- 
tion'd by Sir Kenelm Digby, in his Book that he publifh'd concerning Sympatbetick Powder. He af- 
ferts in that Book, that Mary Stuart being big with King James, fome Scotch Lords rufh'd into her 
Chamber, and kill'd her Secretary, who was an Italian, before her Face, though fhe interpos'd her 
fclf between them, to prevent the Affaffmation ; that this Princefs receiv'd fome flight hurts ; and 
that the Fright fhe was put into, made fuch deep impreffions in her Imagination, as were com- 
municated to the Infant fhe bore in her Womb ; infomuch that King James, her Son, was unable 
all his Life to behold a naked Sword : He fays he experimentally knew it, at the time he was 
Knighted. For the King, when he fhould have laid the Sword upon his Shoulder, run it directly 
againft his Face, and had wounded him with it, if fome one had not guided it to the proper place. 
There are fo many Examples of this kind, that it would be needlefs to turn over Authors for 
them : And, I believe, there is no body will difpute the truth of thefe things. For, in fhort, 
. we fee very many Perfons, that can't endure the fight of a Rat, a Moufe, a Cat, or a Frog, and 
efpecially creeping Creatures, as Snakes, and Serpents ; and who know no other Reafon of thefe 
their extraordinary Averfions, than the Fears their Mothers were put in, by thefe feveral Crea- 
tures at the time of their going with Child. 

But that which I would above all have obferv'd upon this fubject, is, That there are all ap- 

JinExpii- pearances imaginable of Men's preferving to this day in their Brain the Traces and Imprefliofls of 

cation of their firft Parents. For, as Animals produce others that are like them, and with the like im- 

concupi- prefles in their Brain ; which are the Caufe that Animals of the fame Species have the fame Sym- 

fiet/ce, mi pathies and Antipathies, and perform the fame Adtions, at the fame junctures, and the like occa- 

V»! na fi° ns : So our F " ^ Parents » a ^ ter the i r s in, receiv'd fuch great Prints and deep Traces m their 

Brain, through the impreffion of fenfible Objedts, as might ealily have been communicated to 

their Children. Infomuch that the great Adhelion which is found in us from our Mother's Womb, 

to fenfible Objedts, and the great diftance betwixt us and GOD, in this our imperfect ftate, may, 

in fome meafure, be accounted for, by what we have been faying. 

For fince there is a neceffity, from the eftablifh'd Order of Nature, that the Thoughts of 
the Soul fhould be conformable to the Traces of the Brain ; we may*affirm, that from the time 
of our Formation in our Mother's Belly, we are under Sin, and ftain'd with the Corruption 
of our Parents ; fince we Date from thence our vehement Application to fenfible Pleafures. 
Having in our Brain the like Characters and Impreffes, with thofe Perfons who gave us Being , 
we muft neceffarily have the fame Thoughts and the fame Inclinations, with refpedt to Scnfi- 
bleObjecU x 

Ail 



Chap. VII. The Search after Truth. fytf 

And thus we muft come into the World with Concupifcence about us, and infe&ed with Origi- 
nal Sin : We muft be born with Concupifcence, if Concupifcence be nothing but a Natural Effort 
made by the Traces of the Brain upon the Mind, to unite it to things fenfible : And we muft be R m. cL' 
born with Original Sin, if Original Sin be nothing but the Feign of Concupifcence, and that Effort 6.5.12,14, 
grown as it -were victorious, and Mailer of the Infant's Heart and Mind. Now there is great pro- &c. 
bability, that this Reign or Victory of Concupifcence is what we call Original Sin in Infants, and 
Actual Sin in Men that have liberty of Acting. 

It only feems as if one might conclude, from the Principles I have eftablifh'd, a thing repug- Q ^. 
riant to Experience •, to wit, that the Mother muft always communicate to her Infant Habits and m J e J^. 
Inclinations likethofe fhe has her felf, and the facility of Imagining, and learning the fame things/W™, 
fhe underftands •, For all thefe things depend only as have been faid on the Traces and Imprefles 
of the Brain. And it is certain, that the Traces and Imprefles of the Mother's Brain are com- 
municated to her Children. This has been Experimentally prov'd by the Inflances that have 
been related concerning Men ; and has been farther confirm'd from the Example of Animals, 
whofe young ones have their Brain fill'd with the fame Imprefles as thofe they proceeded from. 
Which is the Reafon that all thofe of the fame Species have the fame Voice, the fame way of mo- 
ving their Limbs, in fhort, the fame Stratagems for feizing their Prey, and of defending them- 
felves againft their Enemies. From hence it muft follow, that fince all the Traces of the Mother 
are engraven and imprinted on the Brain of the Child, the Child mult be born with thefame Ha- 
bits and the other Qualities of the Mother : And alfo muft preferve them generally through the 
courfe of his Life \ fince the Habits which have been contracted in our more tender Age, are more 
lafting than the other ; which notwithstanding contradifts Experience. . , 

In Anfwer to this Objection, we muft underltand that there are two kinds of Traces in the 
Brain : The one Natural, or peculiar to the Nature of Man •, the other Acquired. The Na- 
tural are Extraordinary deep, and 'tis impoffible they mould be quite effaced. The Acquired, on 
the contrary, may be eafily loft ; becaufe ordinarily they are not fo deep. Now though the Na- 
tural and Acquired differ only in Degree of more or lefs, and often the former are lefs forcible 
than the latter, fince we daily accuftom Animals to the doing thofe things, which are quite con- 
trary to thofe their Natural Traces lead them to : (A Dog, for inftance, has been train'd up not 
to touch the Bread before him ; and not to purfue a Partridge, which he is in fcent and fight ofj 
Yet there is this Difference between thefe Traces ■, that the Natural are, as one may fay, con- 
nected with imperceptible Ties to the other parts of our Body. For all the Wheels and Contri- 
vances of our Machine are affiftant to each other, to their continuing in their Natural ftate. All 
the parts of our Body mutually contribute to all things necefTary to the Prefervation or Reftaura- 
tionof thefe Natural Traces ; thus they can never be wholly abolifh'd ; and they begin to revive 
again, when we thought them quite deltroy'd. 

On the contrary, the Acquired Traces, though greater, and deeper, and ftronger than the Na- 
tural, are loit, and vanifh by degrees 5 unlefs care be taken to preferve them, by a perpetual 
application of the Caufes which produce them : becaufe the other parts of the Body lend no 
affiftance to their Prefervation, but contrariwife, continually labour to expunge and blot them 
out. We may compare thefe Traces to the ordinary wounds of a Body : they are hurts which 
our Brain has receiv'd which clofe up of themfelves, as other wounds do, by the Admirable 
Conftruction of the Machine. 

As then there is nothing in the whole Body, but what is friendly and conformable to thefe 
Natural Traces •, they are delivered down to the Children in all their force and ftrength. Thus 
Parrots breed their young with the fame cries and the fame Natural Notes with themfelves. But 
becaufe the Acquired Traces are only in the Brain, and make no Radiations into the reft of the 
Body or very little, (as fuppofe, when they are impreft on it by the Motions which accompany 
violent Pafiions) they ought not to be tranfmitted to their Infants. Thus a Parrot, who bids his 
Mailer Good Morrow and Good Night, produces not a Young one fo expert as himfelf ; nor 
do Men of Senfe and Learning beget Children anfwerable to their Fathers. 

So that though it be true, that all that happens in the Mother's Brain happens likewife at the 
fame time in the Brain of her Infant ; and that the Mother can neither fee, nor feel, nor imagine, 
but the Infant muft fee, and feel, and imagine the fame thing : And laftly, that»all the illegi- 
timate Traces of the Mother, Corrupt the Imagination of the Child ; yet thefe Traces being not 
Natural, in the Senfe we have jnft explain'd it ; 'tis no wonder if they ufually clofe up as foon 
as the Child proceeds from the Mother's Womb. For then the Caufe which delineated thefe 
Traces and fed and nourifh'd them, fubfifts no longer ; the Natural Conftitution of the whole 
Body lends an hand to their Deftruction-, and Senfible Objects produce a new Set extraordinary 
deep and numerous, which efface the greateft part of thofe the Child had in its Mother's Womb. 
For it daily happening that a great Pain makes us forgetful of thofe that have preceded fc.3 'tis 
not imaginable but fuch lively Senfations, as are thofe of Infants, when firft the delicate Or- 
gans of their Senfes receive the Impreffions of External objects, muft deftroy the greateft part 
of thofe Traces, which they only receiv'd before from the fame Objedts, by a kind of rebound 
from their Mother, when they lay as it were fheltred from them by the inclolmg of the Womb. 
Notwithflanding, when thefe Traces are form'd upon a ftrong Paffion, and are accompany'd 
with a molt violent Agitation of the Blood and Spirits in the Mother, they ad fo forcibly on the 
Brain of the Child,- and the reft of its Body, as to imprint therein Characters as deep and durable 
as the Natural Traces. As in the inftance of Sir Kenelm Digbyfm that^f the Child who was born 



an 



6o F. Malebranche Concerning Book II. 

an Ideot arid a Cripple ; in whofe Brain and all his Members fuch ravage was made, by the 
Imagination of the Mother ; and laftly, in the inftance of the general Corruption of the Nature 

of Mankind.- 

And we need not wonder, that the King of England's Children were not fubject to the fame In- 
firmity as their Father : Firft, Becaufe this fort of Traces diffufe not their Impreffion fo far into 
the Body as the Natural. Secondly, Becaufe the Mother having not the fame Infirmity as the 
Father, by her good Conftitution prevented its defcending to her Children. And laftly, Be- 
caufe the Mother acts infinitely more on the Brain of the Child, than the Father, as is evident 
from what has been already faid. 

But it muil be obferv'd, That all thefe Reafons which fhew that King James's Children might 
efcape the Infirmity of their Father, make nothing againft the Explication of Original Sin • or of 
that predominant Inclination towards things fenfible : nor of that great Alienation from G O D, 
which we derive from our Parents: becaufe the Traces which fenfible Objects have imprinted 
on the Brain of the firft Founders of Mankind; were ftamp'd extreamly deep; were accompa- 
nied and augmented with violent Paffions \ were fortified and corroborated by the continual ufe 
of things fenfible and neceffary to the Preservation of Life ; not only in Adam and Eve; but alfo, 
which is very remarkable, in the greateft Saints ; in all Men, and in all Women, from whom wh 
are defcended. So that there is nothing which could put a flop to this Corruption of our Na- 
ture. And thus if is fo far from being pofiible for thefe Traces of our Firft Parents to wear out 
by Degrees ; that on the contrary, they muft needs be continually renewing and increafuig ; and 
without the Grace of JESVS CHRIST, which is continually oppofing this unruly tor- 
rent, it would be abfolutely true to fay in the words of an Heathen Poet : 

■*s£tas parent urn, pejo r avis, tulip 
Nos nequiores, mox daturos 
Vroqeniem vitiofiorem. 

For great notice fhould be taken, that the traces which quicken the moft Devout Mothers 
with the fentiments of Piety, communicate not any Pietf to the Children in their Womb •, and 
that the Traces, on the other hand, which excite the Idea's of Senfible things, and which are 
purfued with Paffions, fail not to communicate to their Children the Senfation, and love of Sen- 
fible things. A Mother, for example, who is ftirr'd up to the love of G O D, by a Motion 
of Spirits, accompanying the Traces which the Image of a Venerable Old Man occafions in her 
Brain ; becaufe this Mother has affix'd the Idea of G O D to the Trace of an Old Man ; (for as 
we fhall fhortly fee in the Chapter concerning the Connection of Idea's, this may eafily be done, 
though there is no Analogy at all betwixt the Image of G D and an Old ManJ This Mother, 
I fay, can only produce in the Brain of her Infant the Trace of an Old Man; and an Inlina- 
tion for Old Men •, which is not the love of G D, wherewith fhe was her felf affected. For, 
in fine, there are no Traces in the Brain that can naturally excite any other Idea's, than thofe 
of Senfible things : becaufe the Body was not made to inftruct the Mind, and it never fpeaks to 
the Soul but in its own favour and behalf. 

Thus a Mother, whofe Brain is fill'd with Traces, which by their own Nature correfpond 
to Senfible things, and which cannot be extirpated by reafon of Concupifcence abiding in her ; 
and becaufe fhe has not her Body in fubjection, by an un-avoidable Communication of them to 
her Infant, fhe brings forth a Sinner, though her felf be Righteous. This Mother is Righteous^ 
for as much as loving GO D actually, or having lov'd him by a Love of Choice, this Concupi- 
fcence makes her not a Criminal, tho' Ihe may follow the Motions of it in her fleep. But the In- 
fant fhe bears, having not loved G D by a. Love of Choice, and his Heart having never been 
turn'd towards GOD, 'tis plain he is in diforder, and in a State of Corruption ; and that there 
is nothing in him but what deferves the Wrath of GOD. 

But when Children are Regenerated by Baptifm, and Jufcified by a Difpofition of Heart, much 
like that which remains in the Righteous, during the Illufions of the Night: or, it may be, by a 
Free Atl of loving G O D ; which ad was performed vvhilffc they were for fome Moments delt- 
ver'd from the Dominion of the Body, by the Vertne of the Sacrament. (For iince G D has 
made their Loving him, to be the end of his Creating them, it cannot be conceiv'd how they can 
be actually Juftified, and in the Divine Order; unlefs they actually love him, or- have formerly 
loved him, or at leaft have fuch a Difpofition of Heart as they would have if they had actually lo- 
ved himj Then though they obey Concupifcence in their Infancy, their Concupifcence is no longer 
Sw. It renders them not culpable, nor deferving of the Wrath of GOD: They fail not to be 
Righteous and Acceptable to G 01); by the fame reafon, that a IVlan falls not from the State 
of Grace, though in his fleep he follows the Motions of Concupifcence. For Infants have a Brain 
fofoftand pliable, and receive fo lively and foftrong Impreffions from Objects never fo weak; 
that they have not Liberty of Mind fufheient to relift them. 

But I have infilled too long upon things, which do not properly belong to the Subject of my 

Difcourfe. 'Tis enough, if I can conclude from the Explication I have given in this Chapter, 

that all thofe Spurious Traces which Mothers imprint in the Brain of their ^Children, adulterate 

Se the n- t h e i r Minds, and corrupt their Imaginations. And thus the generality of Men are wont to Ima- 

m ' ginc tilings otherwife than they are, by giving fome falfe colour, and fome irregular ftroke to the 

Idea's of things which they perceive. 

CHAP. 



Chap. Vllt The Search ifier Truth. if 

CHAP. VIII. 

L ''The Changes which happen in the Imagination of an Infant after his Birth <i 
by bis accompanying with hk Mother, his Nurfe and other Perfins. II. Some 
Inflru&ions for their good Education. 

'N the preceding Chapter we have confidered the Brain of an Infant in his Mother's Wombj 
let us at prefent examine what Changes it is fubject to after his Departure from it. Ar the 
fame time that he quits his darkfome Habitation, and firft beholds the Light, the cold of the 
Exteriour Air takes hold of him : the tendered Embraces of the Woman that receives him, are 
offenfive to his nice and delicate Body : All External Objeds roundabout aftonifh and confound 
him : they are all occafions of his fears, fince he does not as yet know them, nor is in a capa- 
city of refilling or avoiding them. His Tears and Cries wherewith he bemoans himlelr, are in- 
fallible Indications of his Pains and Fears. For thefe are in effect the Supplications which Nature 
makes to the Affiflants tor him, that they would deliver him from the Evils that he fullers, and 
from thofe he is apprehenfive of. 

But the better to conceive what confufion his Mind is under in this condition, I. 

it muft be remembred that the Fibres of his Brain are moft ibft and tender, and pe changes which hap^i 
confequently that all External Objeds make moll profound Impreffions on them. %£ a f t tfZ7ir!{Z 
For fince the leafl things are often capable of Hurting a weak Imagination, fuch his accompanying with his 
a multitude of furprizing Objects cannot fail to wound and embroil that of a new Mother, hi* Nurfe ini o J 
born Child. m ther Fer f ons ' . 

But to form a more lively Imagination of the Perturbations and Pains, Children are expos'd 
to at their Coming into the World, and the wounds their Imagination mull receive ; Let us re- 
prefent to our felves, what aflonifhment would feize thofe Men, who Ihould fee at fome fmall di- 
ftance Giants five or fix times as tall as themfelves approaching towards them without knowing 
any thing of their Defign. Or Ihould they behold fome new Species of Animals, that had no 
Analogy to any that they had already feen, or if only a Flying Horfe, or fome other Chimera of our 
Poets Ihould, defcending from the Clouds on a fudden, light upon the Earth. What deep ftrokes 
would thefe Prodigies leave in the Mind, and how would they perplex and confound the Brain, 
though at a fingle View ? 

It daily happens that an unexpected Event, that has any thing terrible in its circumflances, de- 
prives of their Senfes, Men of a Mature Age, whofe Brain isnotfo fufceptible of new Impref- 
fions, who are experienc'd in the World, who can make a Defence, or at leall are capable of ta- 
king up fome Refolution. Childien at their firlt Arrival in the World, fuffer fomething from eve- 
ry Object thatflrikes upon their Senfes, wherewith they are not yet acquainted. All the Animals 
they fee, are Creatures of a new Species on their Regard, fince nothing of what they fee at prefent 
was ever feen by them before. They are dellitute of Strength, and void of Experience ;, the Fibres 
of their Brain are of a moll fine and flexible temper. How then is it poffible their Imagination 
Ihould continue whole, when expos'd to the Impreffions of fo many different Objects ? 

'Tis true the Mothers have fomewhat pre-accuflomed their Children to the Impreffions of Ob- 
jects, by having already imprinted them in the Fibres of their Brain before they left the Womb-, 
and this is the reafon they receive much lefs damage when they behold with their own Eyes, what 
they in fome manner have perceived already with their Mother's. 'Tis farther true that thefe 
adulterate Traces and wounds, their Imagination receives upon the fight of fo many Obje&s, to 
them frightful and terrible, clofe up and heal again in time} for as much as being unnatural, the 
whole Body is againfl them, and all the parts confpire to their Deftruction, as has been feen in 
the preceding Chapter. And this is the caufe that all Men in general are not Fools from their Cra- 
dles. But this hinders not but that there may be ever fome Traces fo flrong and deep imprefs'd ■ 
as can never be effae'd, but will remain as' long as Life it felf. 

If Men would make ferious Reflections upon what happens in their own Breafl, and contem- 
plate their own Thoughts, they would not want an Experimental Proof of what I have faid. They 
.would generally difcover in themfelves fome fecret Inclinations and Averfions, which are not in 
others, whereof there feems no other Reafon to be given than thefe Traces of our Infancy. For 
fince the caufes of thefe Inclinations and Averfions are peculiar to us, they have no foundation in 
the Nature of Men ', and fince they are unknown to us, they mud needs have acted on us at a 
time, when our Memory was not yet capable of regiflring the circumflances of things, which 
might have affifted us in calling them again to Mind ; and that time could be only that of our 
tendered Age. ' • 

Monfieur Des-Cartes has acquaintedus in one of his Epiftle j, that he had always a particular fancy 
for all Squint-ey'd People \ and having diligently fearch'd into the Caufe ol it, at length understood 
this Defect, was incident to a young Maid he lov'd, when he was a Child ^ the Affection lie retain- 
ed for her diffufing it felf to all others that any way refembled her. 

But 'tis not thefe little irregularities of our Inclinations which fubjecr. us moil to Error, 'Th 
our having univerfally, or almofl univerfally, our Mind adulterate in fomething or other, and our 
being generally fubjecr. to fome kind of Folly, though perhaps we are not aware of it. Leu ...an 

R . but 



6i K Malebranche Concerning Book It 

but examine carefully the Temper of thofe People he converfes with, and he will eafily be per* 
fwaded into this Opinion, and though himfelf bean Original for others to Copy after, and be 
look'd upon as fuch ; yet he will find all others to be Originals too, and all the difference to con* 
lift in the Degree of \ )more or left. 

Now o:ie of the Caufes of the different Characters of Mens Minds, is doubtlefs the diffe- 
rence of Impreffions received by them in their Mother's Womb, as has been. manifefted touch- 
ing peculiar and nnufual Inclinations: becaufe thefe being Specie s of Folly, that are fettled and per- 
manent for the moft part , they cannot have their Dependence on the Constitution of the Ani- 
mal Spirits, which is of a flux and alterable Nature. And confequently they mult needs proceed 
from the Bafe and Spurious Impreffions made in the Fibres of the Brain, at fuch time as our Me- 
mory was incapable of preferving the Remembrance of them, that isinthie beginning of our Lives* 
Here then is one of the com moneft Caufes of the Errors of Mankind ; I mean that Subverfion or 
their Brain, caufed by the Impreffion of External Objedts, in making their Entrance into the 
World j and this Caufe does not fo fnddenly.ceafe, as may bepoffibly imagined. 

The ordinary Commerce Children are obliged to have with their Nurfes, or even with their 
Mothers that frequently have had no Education, puts the laft hand, and gives the finiftiing Itroke 
to the corruption of their Mind. Thefe filly Women entertain them with nothing but Foole- 
ries, with ridiculous Tales, and frightful-Stories: Their whole Difcourfe to them is about 
things fenfible \ and they deliver it in a way moft proper to confirm them in the falfe Judgments 
of their Senfes. In a word, they fow in their Minds the Seeds of all the Follies and Weaknefles 
themfelves are fubjedt to \ as of their extravagant Fears and Apprehenfions, their ridiculous Su- 
perftitions, and other the like Feeble fes of Mind. Which is the Reafon, that not being accuftom- 
ed to fearch for Truth, nor to tafte and relifh it, they at laft become incapable of difcerning it, 
and of making any ufe of their Reafon. Hence they become timerous and low-fpirited, which 
Temper for a long time fticks by them: For there are many to be feen, who when fifteen or 
twenty Years old, retain the Character and Spirit of their Nurfe. 

'Tis true, Children feem not to be greatly qualified for the Contemplation of Troth, and for ab- 
ftract and fublime Sciences: becaufe the Fibres of their Brain being extreamly fine, are moft ea- 
fily agitated by Objects, even -the moft weak, and Leaft fenfible that can be; and their Soul ne- 
celfarily admitting Senfations proportioned to the Agitation of thefe Fibres, leaves Metaphyficd 
Nations, and pure IntelleVzion, to apply her felf wholly to her Senfations. And thus ChHdnea 
feem improper for, and incapable of an attentive Application to the pure Idea's of Truth, be- 
ing fo frequently and fo eafily drawn off, by the confus'd Idea's of their Senfes. 

Yet in Anfwer to this it may be faid : Firft, that 'tis eafier for a Child of feven Years old, 
to be freed from the Errors his Senfes lead him to, than for a Man at fixty, who all his Life long 
has been mif-guided by the prejudices of Childhood : Secondly, that a Child, though incapable ,qf 
the clear and diftinct Idea's of Truth, is at leaft capable of being admonifh'd, that his Senfes 
deceive him upon all occafions: and if he cannot be taught the Truth, he fhould not however 
be encouraged and fortified in his Errors : Laftly, the youngeft Children, though never fo ta- 
ken up with Pleafant and Painful Senfations, yet learn in little time, what Perfons more advane'd 
in Years cannot in much longer-, as the Knowledge of the Order and Relations, which all the 
things and words, they fee and hear, ftand in to one another. For though thefe things depend 
moftly on the Memory, yet 'tis very evident they make great ufe of their Reafon, in the manner of 
their Learning their Language. 

But fince that Aptnefs and Facility there is in the Fibres of a Child's Brain, to receive the Pa- 
l ^'.jhetick Impreffions of fenfible Objects, is the caufe of our judging them incapable of Speculative 
cm for the Science \ it is eafie to be redrefTed. For it muft be acknowledge, that were the Fears, Defires, 
good Edu- and Hopes of Children removed or prevented j were they never cans'd to fuffer Pain, and remo- 
catlon of ved as far as poffible from their little Pleafures, they might be taught as foon as they could fpeak, 
children, things moft difficult and abftradt, or at leaft ienfible Matlismtkiek^ Mechankks, and fuch like 
Sciences, as are neceffary in the conduct of their Life. But they have but little concern for ap- 
plying their Minds to abftradt Sciences, whilft they are hurried with Defires, or molefted with 
Fears : which is worth while to be well confidered. 

For as a Man of Ambition, who had jult loft his Eftate or Honour, or was fuddenly rais'd to 
an unexpected Preferment, would not be in a Capacity of xttdxiw^ Metaqhyficd Ojieftions, or 
Equations of Algebra \ but only to do thofe things, to which he was influenced by his prefent 
Paflion: So Children in whofe Brain an Apple or a Sugar-plumb makes as deep an Impreffion, 
as a great Poft, a Title, or Preferment, in that of a Man of Forty Years old j are not quali- 
fied to attend to abftracted Truths, that are taught them. So that we may affirm, there is no- 
thing fo oppOfite to Children's Advancement in Science, as thofe continual Diverlions we give 
them as Rewards, and the Pains we conftantly are inflicting, and threatning them withal. 

But that which is infinitely more confiderable is, that the fears of Correction, and the de- 
fires of fenfible Gratifications, which fill the Capacity of a Child's Mind, utterly alienate him 
from the fenfe of Piety and Religion ; Devotion is ftill more abftradt than Science, it has lefs of the 
relifh of corrupted Nature in it. The Mind of Man is ftrongly enough inclin'd to Study, but has 
no Inclination to Piety at all. If then great Agitations will not give us leave to Study, tliough 
we Naturally find Pleafure in it; how is it Poffible for Children, whofe Thoughts are con- 
tinually intent and bufied about fenfible Pleafures wherewith they are rewarded, and fenfible Pains 
with which they arc affrighted, to preferve amongll all thefe Avocations a Liberty of Mind to relifh 
the things belonging to Religion ? The 



Ghap. VtlL The Search after Truth U 

The Capacity of the Mind is very If rait and limited, 'twill contain but a little furniture » and 
when once 'tis full, it has no farther room for any Novel Thoughts, unlefs it empties itfelf fidt 
of the former to receive them. But when the Mind is filled with fenfible things, it does not eva» 
cuate it felf at its Pleafure, . • ° ' 

In order to conceive this, it m lift be confidered, that we are all inceffantly carried towards 
Good by oar Natural Inclinations ; and that Pleafure being the Character whereby we diftinguifh 
it from Evil, Pleafure mult unavoidably be more our concern and bufinefs than all things befides 
Pleafure therefore being conpyn'd to the ufe of Senfible things, becaufe they are the Goods of 
the Body of Man, there is a kind of neeeffity thefe Goods mould fill up the whole extent of 
our Mind,, till GOD diffufes fome bitternefs upon them, which creates in us a diflike and 
averfion, by given us, through his Grace, a Senfation of thofe Heavenly Delights which ex 
tinguifh all Earthly Enjoyments ^ Dando menti Ccelcflem deleclationem, qn& omnif terrena deletla- S Aueuft' 
iib fitpcratur. « •" • 6 a 

But becaufe we are as much inclin'd to fly Evil, as to love Good, and Pain is the Character 
which Nature has affix'd to Evil - 7 all that has been faid of Pleafure ought, in a contrary fenfe to 
be nnderltood of Pain. ' 

Seeing therefore tl^ things which make us fenfible of Pleafure and Pain, fill the capacity of 
the Mind :, and 'tis not in our Power to quit them, and to be unconcern'd about them, when we 
wou'd: Tis plain that we cannot give Children a relifh of Piety (no more than we can any 
other Men J unlefs we begin, according to the Precepts of theGofpel, with a Deprivation of all 
thofe things which affect the Senfes) and promote great Defires and Fears. Since all the Paflions 
obnubilate and extinguifh Grace, and that internal Delegation which GOD makes us fenfible of 
in our Duty. 

The leaft Children are inftructed with Reafon no lefs than perfect Men, though they want 
Experience. They have too the fame Inclinations, though they are carried by them unto diffe- 
rent Objects. They fhould then be accuftomed to follow the conduct of Reafon, unce they have 
it in them , and they ought to be excited to their Duty by a dexterous management of their good 
Inclinations. 'Tis the way to extinguifh their Reafon, and to debauch their belt Inclinations, 
to hold them to their Duty by fenfible Impreffions. They feem to be jn the performance of 
their Duty, but they are only fo in fhew and appearance : t Vertue is not at the bottom of their 
Heart or Mind, their Moral or their htelletlual Part : They know Vertue very little, but they 
love it much lefs. Their Minds abound with nothing but Fears and Defires, with Averfions and 
fenfible Fondneffes, which they cannot get rid of, to come to the ufe of their Liberty and Exer- 
cifeof their Reafon. Thus Children who are Educated in that dif-fpirited and flavifh manner, 
grow harden'd by degrees, and become infenfible to all the Sentiments of an Floneft Man and a- 
Chriftian } which infenfibility cleaves to them all their day. And when they are in hopes offecuring 
themfelves from the Lafli, by their Authority, or their management ; they give themfelves up 
to every thing that flatters their Concupifcence and their Senfes j becaufe indeed they know no other 
Goods than the Goods of the Senfes. 

It is true, there are fome particular Junctures, in which it is necefTary to inftrud Children 
by their Senfes ^ but this ought never to be done but where Reafon is defective. They ought at 
firftto be perfwaded by Reafon of what their Duty is ; and if they have not Light enough to 
difcover their Obligations to it, it feems belt to let them alone for fome time. For this would 
not be to inftrudt them, to force them upon an External Performance of what they do not con- 
ceive their Duty : Since 'tis the Mind which ought to be inftructed, arid not the Body. But if 
they refufe to do what Reafon tells them they ought to do, they are no longer to be born with : q u; . 
But rather Severity fhould beufed to fome excefs. For in fuch Conjunctures, He that [pares his virga?,odit 
Son, according to the Wife Man, has a greater degree of hatred than of love for him.. filium fu- 

If Chaftifements be not inftructive to the Mind, nor conducive to the love for Vertue ^ they in- um - mv. 
ftruct, at leaft, the Body in fome meafure, and prevent their tafting Vice, and confequently their I3- 2 4* 
becoming Slaves to it. But that which is more efpecially obfervable, is, That Pains fill not the 
Capacities of the Mind as Pleafures do. We ealily ceafe to think of them, when we no longer 
fufter them, and are out of the danger and fear of them. For then they importune not the Inva- 
gination ; they excite not the Paflions, nor provoke Concupifcence. In fine, they leave the Mind. 
at liberty to think of what it pleafes j and thus we may difcipline Children with them, to keep 
them in their Duty, or in the Appearance of it. 

But though it be fometimes ufeful to affright and punifh Children with fenfible Corrections •, 
it ought not to be concluded, that they fhould be allured by fenfible Rewards. There fhould no 
means be made ufe of, that any whit forcibly affect the Senfes, but in a cafe of extreme neceffity : 
Now there can be none of beftowing Senfible Rewards upon them, and reprefentirig thefe Re- 
wards as the End of their Employment. This, on the contrary, would be the means of vitia- 
ting their belt Actions j and inclining them rather to Senfuality than Vertue. The Traces of 
Pleafures which they have once tafted, remain ftrongly imprinted in their Imagination : They 
continually quicken and awaken the Ideas of Senfible Goods :, they conftantly excite importun-:-: 
Defires, which difhirb the peace of the Mind. Laftly, They provoke Concupifcence or 
occafions, which is the Leaven that corrupts the whole mafs. But this is not the place of e>, 
ning thefe things according to their Defert. 



Th 



e ■ 



64. K Male bran cue Concerning Book it 



■■ 



The SECOND PART: 

Concerning 

The IMAGINATION. 



C H A P. I. 

I. Of the Imagination of Women. II. Of the Imagination of Men. 111. Of 

the Imagination of Old Men. 



w 



'E have in the Firfl Part, in fome meafure, explain'd the Phyfical Caufes of the Difbr- 
ders of Man's Imagination : We mail endeavour in this to make fome Application of 
thefe Caufes to the more general Errors of Imagination, and fhall treat likewife of the 
Gaufes of thefe Errors, which may be call'd Moral. 

It may be underflood from what has been faid in the fore-going Chapter, that the Delicacy of 
the Fibres of the Brain,is one of the principal Caufes that difables us,from bringing an Application 
fufficient for the Difcovery of Truths, that lye any whit deep or conceal'd. 

This Delicacy of the Fibres is more ufually incident to Women ; and this is the Principle of 
of be'i - ^ tir **° exai ^ aC( l uamtance w ^ tn au< things that ftrike upon their- Senfes. 'Tis the Woman's Pro- 
ginationof v i Qce t0 determine concerning the Fafhions, to judge of Language, to diftinguifh the genteel 
Women. Mein, and the fine and courtly Behaviour: They far out-do Men in the Science, Skill, and Dex* 
terity about thefe things. All that depends upon the Tall falls under their Jurifdi&ion \ but ge- 
nerally they are incapable of Penetrating into Truths that have any Difficulty in the Difcovery. 
All things of an abftra&ed Nature are Incomprehenfible to them. They cannot imploy their 
imagination in difentangling compound and perplex'd Queftions. Their Conflderation ter- 
minates on the furface and out-fide of things: and their Imagination has neither Itrength nor 
reach enough to pierce to the bottom of them, and to make a Companion of their parts, without 
Diftra&ion. A Trifle or a Feather fhall call them off, the fmalleft out-cry difmay them, and 
any little Motion gives them Imployment : In fhort, the Mode and not the Reality of things, is 
enough to take up the whole Capacity of their Mind} becaufe the leaffc Obje&s producing great 
Motions in the delicate Fibres of their Brain, by a neceffary confequence excite fuch lively and 
great Senfations in their Souls, as wholly poffefs and take them up. 

But though it be certain, that this Delicacy of the Fibres of the Brain is the principal Caufe of 
all thefe Effects-, yet it is not equally certain, that it is univerfally to be found in all Women. 
Or if it be to be found, yet their Animal Spirits are fometimes fo exactly proportion'd to the 
Fibres of their Brain, that there are Women to be met with, who have a greater folidity of Mind 
than fome Men. 'Tis in a certain Temperature of the Largenefs and Agitation of the Ani- 
mal Spirits, and Conformity with the Fibres of the Brain, that the ftrength of parts confifh: 
And Women have fometimes that jufl Temperature. There are Women Strong and Conftant, 
and there are Men that are Weak and Fickle. There are Women that are Learned, Couragious, 
and capable of every thing. And on the contrary, there are Men that are Soft, Effeminate, 
incapable of any Penetration, or difpatch of any Bufinefs. In fine, when we attribute any Fai- 
lures to a certain Sex, Age, or Condition, they are only to be underftood of the generality j it 
being ever fuppos'd, there is no general Rule without Exception. 

For it ought not to be imagin'd, that all Men, or all Women of the fame Age, Country, or 
Family, have their Brain of the fame Conftitution. It is more pertinent to believe, that as there 
are not two Faces in the World, in every thing refembling one another ; fo there are not two 
Imaginations exactly alike : And that all Men, Women, and Children differ from one another, 
only more or lefs, in the Delicacy of the Fibres of their Brain. For as we ought not too lvaftily 
to fuppofe an Effemial Identity in thofe things, between which we fee no Difference ; fo we ought 
not to make Ejfential Differences, where we cannot find perfect Identity. For thefe are the common 
Faults Men ufually fall into. 

That which may be faid of the Fibres of the Brain, is, That in Children they are very foftand 
cxtreamly tender , that with Age they harden and corroborate: Yet notwithstanding the gene- 
rality of Women, and fome Men, have them extreamly delicate all their Lives. To determine 
any thing farther,we dare not. But this is enough to be laid of Women and Children/That as they 
are not concern'd with fearching after Truth and the Inftrudion of others - 7 fo their Errors do 
not occafion much Prejudice •, fmce little credit is given to things by them advane'd. Let us fpeak 

of 



fcliap. t. The Search after Truth. 6$ 

of Men grown up t, of fuch as hare their Mind in its Strength and Vigour - 7 fuch as may be thought 
capable of finding out Truth* and teaching it to others. 

The ordinary Seafon for the greateft Perfection of the Mind, is, from the Age of Thirty, to *L 
thatof Fifty Years. The Fibres of the Brain in that Age have ufually attain'd a tolerable confi- °f tbe ^' 
itence ; the Pleafures and Pains of the Senfes make hardly any more Impreffion on them. So ^^-^n in the 
a Man has no more to do, than to ward off violent Paflions, which rarely happen ; and from verfeBion 
which a Man may fcreen himfelf, if he diligently avoid all manner of occafion : And thus the of their 
Soul meeting with no more Diverfion from things fenfible, may, with greater eafe and leifure, A &° 
give her fell' to the Contemplation of Truth. 

A Man in this capacity, who had not his Mind fill'd with the Prejudices of Childhood - who 
from his Youth upwards had obtain'd a Facility for Meditation ; who would only take up with 
the clear and diftindf Notions of Intellect, and induftrioufly reject all the confus'd Idea's of Senfe; 
and who had both Time and Inclination for Study , would dou briefs very rarely fall into Er- 
ror. But fuch a Man as this is not the fubject of our. Difcourfe ; 'tis Men of the vulgar ftamp, 
who ufually have nothing of this in them. 

I fay then, that the Solidity and Confiftence accruing with Age to the Fibres of Men's Brains, 
gives the Solidity and Confiftence to their Errors, if I may fo fpeak. 'Tis the Seal that feals up 
their Prejudices, and all their falfe Opinions, and locks them from the Attempts and Force of 
Reafon. In fine, by how much this Conflitution of the Fibres of the Brain is advantagious to 
well Educated Perfons, by fo much it is prejudicial to the greateft part of Mankind ; becaUfe it 
confirms each of them in the Notions they have taken up. 

But Men are not only confirmed and ftrengthened in their. Errors, when they have attained to 
the Age of Forty or Fifty Years. They are ftill more liable to fall into new ones every day ; for 
believing themfelves competent Judges of every thing, as indeed they ought to be, they perem- 
ptorily determine, yet only confult their Prejudices to give a decifion: For Men reafon only up- 
on things with relation to the Idea's they are molt familiar with, and accuftomed to. When a 
Chymiit would reafon about any Phyficd Body, immediately his three Principles are prefent to his 
Mind. A Peripatetick has recourfe forthwith in his Thoughts to his four Elements, and the four 
Primitive Qualities : And another Pbilofipher drives every thing up to other Principles. And fo 
there can nothing enter into the Mind of a Man, but is inftantly tinged with the Error he is fub- 
ject to, and augments their number. 

This Confiftence of the Brain has befides a very mifchievous Effect, efpecially on more Aged 
fort of People, which is, to incapacitate them for Thought and Meditation : They are unable 
to faften their Attention upon any thing they have a Mind to know, and fo are incapable of reach- 
ing to Truths that are any thing obfcure or intricate, They are utterly infenfible to the molt rea- 
fonable Opinions, when founded upon Principles that to them feem Novel, though as to thofe 
other concerns, that Age has given them Experience in, they are very underftanding Men. But 
all that I here affirm is only to be underftood of thofe, who have ipent their younger days with- 
out the due life and Improvement of their Mind, and applying it as they mould do. 

To illuftrate thefe things, 'tis neceflary to know, that not any thing whatever can be learned 
without Advertencyand Attention ; and that 'tis impoflible we fhould be attentive to any thing, 
unlefs we Imagine it, and frame a lively Reprefentation of it in our Brain. But to the end we 
may Imagine any Objects, 'tis neceflary we fhould inflect fome part of our Brain, or imprefs fome 
other kind of Motion in it, that we may frame the Traces, whereuntoare confociated the Ideas 
that reprefent thefe Objects to us : So that if the Fibres of our Brain were any whit hardned, 
they would be capable of no other Inflection or Motions, than thofe they were formerly us'd to. 
And thus the Soul could form no Imagination of, nor confequently be attentive to what Ihe plea- 
fes ; but only to fuch things as are cuftomary and familiar to her. 

Hence we ought to conclude, that 'tis of very great Advantage to ufe a Man's felf to Medi- 
tate upon all forts of Subjects, in order to acquire an Habitual Facility of Thinking on what he 
will- For as we acquire a great Readinefs at moving our Fingers all manner of ways, and with 
a prodigious Nimblenefs, by the frequent life we make of them in playing on a Mulical Inftru- 
mentj fo the parts of our Brain, the Motion whereof is neceflary to the Imagining what 
we pleafe, attain by Ufe a certain Facility of Plying and Inflecting themfelves, which makes 
us imagine the things we have a Mind to, with a great deal of Eafe, Readinefs, and Di- 
stinction. 

Now the beft means of procuring this Difpofition, which caufeth the Principal Difference be-^ 
tween a Man of Parts,and another \ is to accuftom a Man's felf from his Youth totheDifquilitionof 
the Truth of things very abftrad and difficult: Becaufe in that Age the Fibres of the Brain are 
pliable and flexible all manner of ways. 

I fuppofe not however, that this Facility can be acquir'd by thofe we call Men of Books and 
Learnings who only apply themfelves to Reading, without Meditation, and without fearching v 
out the Refolution of Queftions themfelves, before they Read them in Authors. 'Tis palpable 
enough, that hereby they only acquire a Facility of Remembring what they have read, 'lis 
daily obferv'd, that Men of much Reading, are unable to bring Advertency of Attention to 
things that are new to them, and unheacd of •, and that the Vanity of their Learning, inclining 
them to form a Judgment of them, before they conceive them, makes them fall into grofs Errors, 
to which other Men are not obnoxious. 

S But 



r * ■ * 1 

66 K Maleuasche Concerning Book IL 

But though the want of Advertency is the main Caufe of their Errors, there is one ftill that id 
peculiar to them \ which is, that finding ever in their Memory abundance of confus'd Notions^ 
they prefently felect fome one of them, and confider it as the fubject. of the Queftion » And be- 
caufe the things a Man fpeaks, are not conformable to it •, they ridiculouily conclude he is irt 
an Error. Should you endeavour to reprefent to them that they are deceiv'd themfelves, and 
that they underftand not fo much as the ftate of the Queftion } they fall into a Paffion, and not 
being able to conceive what is faid to them, they perfift to embrace that falfe Notion their Me- 
mory has fuggefted. But fhould the falfity of it be made too manifeftly apparent, they fubfti- 
tute afecond, and a third in its room, which they defend fometimes againft all appearances of 
Truth, and even againft their own Conference ; as having but little Refped or Love for Truth, 
but a great deal of Shame and Confufion in acknowledging, there are things another knows bet- 
ter than themfelves. 
rn. All that has been faid concerning Men of forty or fifty Years old, ought with greater allow- 
concermng ance to be underftood of Aged Men ; becaufe the Fibres of their Brain being ftill more inflexible^ 
the Magi- anc [ wanting Animal Spirits to imprint new Traces in it j their Imagination is altogether faint 

OhiM ° f and lan § uid - 

And whereas generally the Fibres of their Brain are loaded with abundance of fuperfiuous Hu- 
mours, they lofe by degrees the Memory of things part, and return to the Weaknefles ufual- 
ly incident to Childhood. Thus in this Decrepid Age, they have the Defects which de- 
pend on the Conftitution of the Fibres of the Brain ; which are found both in Children and in 
grown Men. Though it may be laid they have more Prudence than either of them, becaufe 
they are lefs fubjed to their Paffions, which proceed from the Commotion of the Animal 
Spirits. 

I (hall not explain thefe things more at large, becaufe it is eafie to judge of this Age, by the 
others before treated of j and to conclude that Old Men have more difficulty than others at 
conceiving what is laid to them , that they are more zealoufly devoted to their Prejudices and 
Ancient Opinions ; and confequeijtly are more confirmed and ftrengthened in their Errors, in 
their corrupt Habits, and other things of like Nature. 'Tis only to be advertis'd, That the 
ftate of Old Age is not precifely determined to Sixty or Seventy Years j that all Old Men are 
not Dotards •, and that thofe who have pafs'd the Sixtieth Year, are not always delivered from 
the Paffions of Youth ; and that we ought not to draw too general Confluences from the Prin- 
ciples eftablifh'd. 



CHAP. II. 

That the Animal Spirits generally run in the Tracks of Ideas that are 
moft familiar to «j, which is the Reafon of our prepofierous Judg- 
ments, 

I Have, I think, explain'd in the fore-going Chapters, the various Changes happening in the 
Animal Spirits, and in the Conftitution of the Fibres of the Brain, according to diffe- 
rent Ages: Wherefore fuppofing a Man to have meditated a little upon what has been faid 
upon that Subject, he muft neceflarily have a'diftind Knowledge enough of the Imagination, 
and of the moft common Natural Caufes of the differences obfervable between the Minds of 
Men ; fince all the Changes happening in the Imagination and the Mind, are only the Con- 
fequences of thofe which are to be found in the Animal Spirits, and the Fibres that compofe 
the Brain. 

But there are many particular, and fuch as we may call Moral Caufes of the Changes which 
happen in the Imagination of Men j namely, Their different Conditions, their various Employ- 
ments ; and, in a word, their feveral ways of Living •, which deferve to be attentively con- 
fider'd} becaufe thefe forts of Changes are the Caufes of a numberlefs multitude of Errors, every 
Man judging of things with reference to his own Condition : We think it not fo much our Bull- 
nefs to ftand to explain the Effeds of fome lefs cuftomary Caufes j fuch as great Difeafes, fur- 
prizing Misfortunes, and other unexpected Accidents, which make very violent Impreifions in 
the Brain, and which fometimes totally fubvert it ; becaufe thefe things are of very rare occur- 
rence-, and befides, the Error fuch fort of Perfons fall into, are too grofstobe contagious, fince 
they are palpable and difcernible to all Mankind. 

But that we may perfectly comprehend all the Changes the different conditions and ftates of 
Life produce in the Imagination ; 'tis abfolutely neceffary to be call'd to mind, that our Imagi- 
ning Objects is only the framing Images thereof to our Selves ; and that thefe Images are nothing 
but the Traces delineated by the Animal Spirits in the Brain ; that we Imagine things fo much 
ftronglier as thefe Traces are more deep and better cut, and as the Animal Spirits more fre- 
quently and violently pafs through them j that thefe Spirits, by their frequent com fe, fo plain 
and open the PafTage, as to enter the fame Tracks with greater readinefs than any other neigh- 
bouring parts, through which they either have nut pafs'd, or not fo frequently. This is the 
molt ordinary Caufe of the Confuiion and Falfity of our Idea's. For the Animal Spirits which 

were 



Chap. tl. The Search after Truth. £j 

were direfted by the Action of External Obje&s, or even by the orders of the Soul to the pro- 
duction of certain Traces, frequently produce others, which indeed have fome refemblance with 
them, but are not altogether the Traces of thefe fanie Objeds, nor thofe the Soul defir'd 
to reprefent - y becaufe the Animal Spirits finding fome Refiftance in the parts of the Brain through 
which they ought to pafs, are eafily diverted to throng into the deep Traces of Idea's which are 
moft familiar to us : Here are fome very grofs and fenfible Inflances of thefe things. 

When thofe who are not extraordinary fhort-fighted behold the Moon, they fee in her two Eyes, 
a Nofe, and a Mouth \ in a word it looks to them as if they faw a Face, tho there be nothing in 
her of what they fancy they perceive. Many Perfons fee in her quite another thing. And thofe 
who believe the Moon to be fuch as fhe appears, would quickly be undeceived, did they but be- 
hold her with felefcopes, though of a moderate fize \ or did they only confult the Defcriptions 
Heveliw, Riccioli, and others have made Publick. Now the Reafon why a Man ufually fees a Face 
in the Moon, and not thofe irregular Blotches that are in her, is becaufe the Traces of a Face, 
which are imprinted in the Brain, are very deep, for that we frequently look on Faces, and with 
great Attention. So that the Animal Spirits meeting with oppofition in the other parts of 
the Brain, eafily fwerve from the Direction the Light of the Moon imprefleson them, when a 
Man beholds her ; to accomodate themfelves to the Traces whereunto Nature has affix'd the 
Idea's of a Face. Befides that the apparent Magnitude of the Moon differing not much from a 
common head at a certain Diftance •, She by her Impreffion forms fuch Traces, as have Connection, 
with thofe which reprefent a Nofe, a Mouth, and Eyes •, and fo fhe determines the Spirits to 
take their courfe in the Traces of a Face. There are fome who difcern in the Moon a Man on 
Horfe-back, or fomething elfe than a Face, becaufe their Imagination having been briskly fmit- 
ten with fome particular Objects, the Traces of thefe Objects open at any thing that bears the 
leaft Analogy to them. 

'Tis upon the fame grounds we Imagine we fee Chariots, Men, Lions, and other Animals in 
the Clouds, when there is any little refemblance between their Figures and thefe Animals : and 
all Men, efpecially thofe who are ufed to Defigning, fee fometimes Heads of Men on Walls, 
whereon there are many irregular ftains. 

'Tis for the fame Reafon ftiil that the Spirits of Wine, entering without any Direction of the 
Will into the moft familiar Traces, make Men betray their Secrets of the greateft concernment j 
and that when a Man fleeps he ufually dreams of Objects he has feen in the Day-time, which have 
form'd very great Traces in the Brain : becaufe the Soul is ever reprefenting thofe things, where- 
of fhe has the greateft and deepeft Traces. But fee other Examples of a more complex kind. 

A Diftemper is new : and it makes fuch havock and deftrudtion, as amazes all Men. This im- 
prints Traces fo deep in the Brain, that this Difeafe is never abfentfrom the Mind. If this Di- 
feafe be call'd, for inftance, the Scurvy •, all Difeafes muft prefently be call'd Scurvy : the Scurvy 
is new, therefore all new Diftempers' is the Scurvy • The Scurvy is accompany 'd with a dozen 
Symptoms, whereof many are common to other Diftempers, that matters not : If a fick Per- 
fon fortunes to have any one of the Symptoms, he muft needs be fick of the Scurvy - 7 and other Di- 
ftempers are never fufpected, or thought of, that have the fame Symptoms. "Tis expected that 
all the Accidents which befal thofe that have been fick of the Scurvy, muft befal him too : The 
fame Medicines therefore are prefcrib'd him, and 'tis matter of amazement, to find they have 
not the lame Effect, as they have been known to have had in others. 

An Author applies himfelf to one kind of Study ; The Traces of the Subject he's imploy'd 
about, are fo deeply imprinted , and make fuch lively Radiations through the Brain, as to con- 
found and efface fometimes the Traces of things of a quite different kind. There has been a Man, 
for inftance, that has wrote many bulky Volumes on the Crofs- f this made him difcover a Crcfs'ui 
every thing he look'd upon ; and 'tis with Reafon, that Father Morinm handfomly rallies him, 
for thinking a Medal reprefented a Crofs, though it reprefented quite another thing. 'Twas by 
fuch another unlucky turn of Imagination Gilbert its and many others, after having ftudied the 
Load-ftone, and admir'd its properties, muft needs reduce to thefe Magnetick Qualities abundance 
of Natural Effects, that had no Relation to them in the World. 

The Inftances I have here alledg'd, fuffiee to prove that the great facility of the Imagination's 
reprefenting Objects that are familiar to it, and the difficulty it finds in Imagining thofe that are 
Novel, is the Reafon of Mens forming almoft ever fuch Idea's as may be ftyl'd mix'd and impure ; 
and of the Mind's judging of things only with Relation to it felf, and its former Thoughts. And 
thus the different Pafllons of Men, their Inclinations, Conditions, Imployments, Qualities, Stu- 
dies, finally all their different Ways and Scopes of Life, putting very confiderable Differences 
in their Idea's, occafion them to fall into innumerable Errors, which we fhall explain in the follow- 
ing Difcourfe : Which was the reafon of My Lord Bacon's fpeaking this moft judicious Sentence : 
Omnes perceptiones tarn fensus quam mentis funt ex analogia hominis, non ex analogia univerfi ': Eftque 
- Intelletlus humrnw infiar fpeculi in&qnaltf, ad radios return qui fitam Naturam natura renim immifcet, 
eamtfo diftorquet 9 & inficit. 



C HAP. 



£g F. MalebrAnche Concerning Bbok II. 1 

CHAP, til; 

Of- the Mutual CoMeclion between the Ideas, and the Trace* of the Brain j 
and of the Mutual Conne&ion there is between Traces and Traces^ Ideas 
and Idea s. 



A 



M O N G the whole Mafs of Material Beings, there is nothing more worthy of the Con* 
templation of Mten, than the Contexture of their own Body, and the Correfpondence 
found between the Parts that compofe it. And among all things Spiritual, there is 
nothing, the Knowledge whereof is more neceflary, than that of their Soul, and of all the Rela- 
tions ihe is indiftenfably under to GOD, and Naturally to the Body. 

'Tis not enough to have a confus'd Knowledge or Senfation, that the Traces of the Brain are 
mutually connected to each other, and that they are purfued by the Motion of the Animal Spirits 9 
that the Traces when excited in the Brain, excite the Idea's in the Underftanding, and that the 
Motions that arife in the Animal Spirits, raife the Paflions in the Will. We ought, as far as is 
poflible, to have adiftinct Knowledge oftheGw/^ of all thefe different Connexions; butefpeci- 
ally of the Effefls they are capable of producing. 

We ought to know the Canfe thereof, in as much as it is neceflary to know our Guide and 
Conductor, who alone is capable of acting in us, and of rendring us happy or miferable ; and we 
ought to know the Effetl of them, it being neceflary to know our felves as much as poflible, and 
other Men with whom we are oblig'd to live : So fhould we know the means, both of conducting 
our felves to, and preferving our felves in, the raoft happy and perfect flate we are capable of at- 
taining, by the order of Nature, and the Precepts of the Gofpel: and fo fhould we be able to 
frame our Lives fociably with Men, by exactly knowing the means of making ufe of them in 
our Exigencies, and aflifting them in their Miferies. 

I pretend not to Explain in this Chapter a Subject fo vaft: and Comprehenfive : nor have I that 
Opinion of my felf, as to think I fhould throughly do it in this whole Work. There are many- 
things I am ftill ignorant of, and defpair of ever knowing well : and there are others which I 
prefume I know, but am unable to explicate : For there is no mind fo little and fo narrow, but 
may by Meditation difcover more Truths, than can be deduc'd at length by the raoft Eloquent 
Man in the World. 
}■ We are not to imagine with a great part of the Philofophers, that the Mind becomes Body 
°f th i when united to the Body" and that the Body becomes Mind when united to the Mind. The Soul 
the'soui ls not ex P an ded through all the parts of the Body, in order to give Life and Motion to it, as the 
ani Body. Imagination reprefents: nor does the Body become capable of Senfation by its Union with the 
Mind, as our treacherous and abufive Senfes would feem to perfwade us. Either Subftance pre- 
fer ves its own particular Being, and as the Soul is incapable of Extenfion and Motions ; fo the Bo- 
dy is incapable of Thought and Inclinations. All the Affinity that we know between the Bo- 
dy and Mind, conlifts in the Natural and Mutual correfpondence of the Thoughts of the Soul, 
with the Traces of the Brain ; and of the Emotions of the Soul, with the Motions of the Animal 
Spirits. 

When the Soul receives fome new Idea's, fome new Traces are imprinted on the Brain ; and 
when Objects produce new Traces, the Soul receives new Idea's. Which is not faid, as if the 
Soul confider'd thefe Traces, fince (he has no knowledge of them; or, as if thefe Traces inclu- 
ded thefe Idea's, fince there is no Analogy betwixt them : or laftly, as if (he receiv'd her Idea's 
from thefe Traces; for 'tis inconceivable, as fhall be explain'd hereafter, how the Mind fhould re- 
ceive any thing from the Body, and become more enlightned than fhe is, by turning towards it, as 
the Philofophers pretend, who would have the Souls Perception of all things to be caus'd Per con- 
verfwnem ad fhantafmata, by the Converfion to the Phantafms, or Traces of the Brain. 

Thus when the Soul wills the moving of her Arm, the Arm is mov'd, though fhe not fb much 
as knows what ought to be done to the moving it : and when the Animal Spirits are agitated, the 
Soul finds a Commotion in her felf, though fhe is ignorant whether there be any fuch thing as Ani- 
mal Spirits in her Body. 

When I come to treat of the Paflions, I fhall fpeak of the Connection there is between the 
Traces of the Brain, and the Motions of the Spirits ; and of that which is between the Idea's, and 
the Emotions of the Soul : for all the Paflions have their Dependance thereon. I am to Difcourfe 
at prefent only of the Connection between Traces and Idea's, and the Connection Traces have 
with one another. 

Os'ofae T here are tnree ver y confiderable Caufes of the Connection of Idea's with the Traces of the 

Conne&ion Bran1, . T ^ e ^ r ^ anc * inoft general, is the Identity of time : for our having had certain thoughts 

tf Traces at tlic inffant of our having certain new Traces in the Brain, is oftentimes fufficient for our 

nUbliatt. having a-frefh the fame thoughts, as often as thefe Traces are re-prod ue'd in our Brain. If 

the Idea of G O D has been offer'd to my Mind, at the fame time my Brain receiv'd an Im- 

preflion from the fight of thefe three Letters Jab, or from the found of the fame word, 'tis 

enough that the Traces produe'd by the found or light of thefe Characters be re-printed, to 

caufc me to think on G O V ; nor can I think of G £>, but fome confus'd Traces of the Charaders ' 

or 



Chap. III. The Search after Truth. 

or founds, that the thoughts I had of G D were attended with, will be re-produc'd in my Brains 
For the Brain being never empty of Traces, there are conftantly fuch as are fomewhat related to 
what we think of, though thefe Traces are frequently very imperfect artd confus'd. 

The fecond Caufe of the Connection between Idea's and Traces, and which everfuppofes the 
former, is the Will of Men. This Will is necefTary to the intent this Connection of Idea's with 
the Traces, may be regulated and accommodated to ufe. For were not Men naturally inclin'd 
to a mutual Agreement about affixing their Idea's to Senfible Signs ; this Connection of Idea's 
would not be only abfolutely ufelefs to fociety, but would moreover be very irregular, and ex- 
treamly imperfedt. 

And that, firft becaufe Idea's have never any ftrong Connection with the Traces, except when 
the Spirits being agitated and fermented, make the Traces deep and permanent. So that, fince 
the Spirits are only agitated by the Paflions, had Men no Paflion for communicating their own 
thoughts and participating thofe of others, it is plain that the exadt Connexion of their Idea's to 
particular Traces, wou'd be very weak \ fince they would never ufe themfelves to thofe exact 
and regular Connections, were it not to become intelligible one to another. 

Secondly, the repeated concurrence of the fame Idea's with the fame Traces, being necefTary 
to make fo ftfong a Connedtion, as may be durable and lafting jj f fince a firft meeting, unlefs 
attended with a violent Motion of the Animal Spirits, cannot confederate them fo ftrongly 
as is requifite) it is manifeft, that fhould not Men contrive to agree, it would be the greateffc 
chance in the World, for the fame Traces and the fame Idea's to meet a fecond time. Thus 
the Will of Men is necefTary to regulate the Connexion and Alliance of the fame Traces 
with the fame Idea's ; though this Will of Agreeing is not fo much the refult of their Choice 
and Reafon, as an Impreffion of the Author of Nature, whd has difpos'd and made us all for 
the Benefit of each other, and given us a ftrong Inclination to unite in Mind, as much as we are 
united in our Bodies. 

The third Caufe of the Connexion of Idea's with the Traces, is the Nature* or the conftant 
and immutable Will of the Creator. There is, for inftance, a Natural Connection, and indepen- 
dent on our Will, between the Traces produc'd by a Tree or a Mountain which we fee, and the 
Idea's of a Tree or a Mountain : between the Traces produc'd in our Brain by the cry of a Man 
or an Animal fuffering Tains, and whofe Plaints we hear: by the mein of a Man's Countenance 
that threatens ox fears US} and the Idea's of Pains, Strength, Weaknefs-, and alio the Senfationsof 
Tity, Fear, and Courage, which are occafion'd in our felves. 

Thefe Natural Connections af e of all others the ftrongeft ; they are generally alike in all Man- 
kind: and they are abfolutely necefTary tothe Prefervation of Life. And this is the Reafon 
they have no dependence on our Will. For if the Connection of Idea's with Sounds and certain Cha- 
racters, is weak and very different in different Countries ; 'tis becaufe it depends on the weak and 
changeable Will of Men. And the Reafon why it depends thereon, is becaufe this Connection is 
not abfolutely necefTary to their Living ; but only to their Living as Men-, who ought to form 
themfelves into Civil and Rational Societies. 

It is here very obfervable, that the Connection of Idea's, which reprefent things Spiritual di- 
ftindt from us, with the Traces of our Brain, is not Natural, nor pofiible to be fo : And confe- 
quently that it is or may be different in all Men ; fince it has no other caufe than their own Will, 
and the Identity of time -, whereof I have fpoken before. On the Contrary, the Connection of 
Idea's of all things material with certain particular Traces, is Natural • and confequently there 
are particular Traces which excite the fame Idea in all Mankind. It cannot be doubted, for in- 
ftance, but all Men have the Idea of a Square upon fight of a Square, becaufe that Connecti- 
on is Natural : but it may be very well doubted whether all Men have the Idea of a Square, 
when they hear the word Square pronounc'd ; becaufe that Connection is altogether arbitrary. 
We ought to think the fame thing of all thofe Traces that are connected with the Idea's of things 
of a Spiritual kind. 

But becaufe the Traces which have a Natural Connection with Idea's, give the Mind concern 
andapplication, and confequently render it attentive ; the generality of Men are very ready at 
comprehending and retaining fenfible and palpable Truths : that is to fay, the Relations, which 
Bodies have to oneanother. And on the other hand, becaufe the Traces, which have no other 
Connection with Idea's, than that which the will has effected between them, ftrike notvigoroufly 
on the Mind •, all Men in general find it very difficult to comprehend, and harder yet to retain ab- 
ftradted Truths ; that is to fay the Relations which are between things which come not within the 
Verge of Imagination. . But when thefe Relations are any whit compounded, they feem-abfolutely 
incomprehenfible \ efpecially to thofe who are not us'd to them ; becaufe they have not ftrengthen- 
ed the Connection between thefe abftradr. Idea's and their Traces, by a pefpetual Meditation. And 
though others have perfectly comprehended them, they forget them again in a little time ; be- 
caufe the Connedion is hardly ever fo ftrong, as the Natural. 

'Tis fo true, that all the difficulty Men have to comprehend and retain things Spiritual and Ab- 
ftradt, proceeds from the difficulty they find to corroborate the Connection of their Idea's with 
the Traces of the Brain •, that when they find the means of Explaining by material Relations, 
thofe that are between things Spiritual, they make them eafily underftood ; imprinting them in 
fuch manner on the mind, as not only to be ftrongly convinc'd of them, but alfo to retain them 
without any trouble. The general Idea we have given of the Mind in the firft Chapter of this 
Work, is perhaps a fufficient Proof of what I fay. 

T On 



jo F» Malebranche Concerning Book lt« 

On the contrary, when the Relations that are between material things are fo exprelb, that there 
is noneceffary Connection between the Idea's of thefe things, and the Traces of their Expreffi- 
ons ; they are difficultly comprehended and eafily forgotten. 

Thofe, forinflance, who enter upon the Study of Algebra, or Analytkh, are incapable of ta- 
king ^^/rZ' Demonftrations without a great deal of pains ; and when they have once mafter'd 
them, tney retain them but a fhort time • becaufe Squares, (for example) Parallelograms^ Cubes y 
Solids, and the like, being expreft by aa, ab, ^3, abc, &c. the Traces whereof have no Natural 
Connection with their Idea's ; the Mind finds no hold to fallen the Idea's to , and to examine the 
Relations of them by. 

But thofe who begin to Study Common Geography, molt clearly and readily conceive the little 
Demonftrations that are explain'd to them ; provided they diftindtly underftand the Terms made 
rife of : Becaufe the Idea's or a Square, a Circle, or the like, are Naturally Connected with the 
Traces of the figures they fee defcrib'd before their Eyes. And it often happens, that the meer 
(hewing of the figure nfed in the Demonftration, makes them fooner comprehend it, than the 
Difcourfes made to explain it. Becaufe words being Connected to Idea's by an arbitrary 
inflitutipn only, excite not thefe Idea's readily and diftindtly enough, to make us eafily under- 
ftand their Relations. For 'tis chiefly upon that account, there is fo much difficulty found in 
learning the Sciences. 

By the way, it may be difcover'd from what I have been faying, that thofe Writers who coin 
abundance of new Words and Figures, to explain their Notions by ; fpendmuch pains to very lit- 
tle purpofe. They think to make themfelves intelligible, when indeed they take the way of -be- 
coming ineomprehenfible. We define, fay they, all our Terms, and all our Characters, and others 
ought to agree to them. It is true, others agree to them with their Will, but their Nature is re- 
pugnant. They cannot fallen their Idea's to thefe Novel Terms ; becaufe to that is required cullom 
and long practice. The Authors perhaps have attain'd that cullom, but the Readers have not : 
And when a Man endeavours to initruct the Mind, 'tis neceffary he firft know it ; fince he ought 
to conform to Nature, and offer her nothing provoking or offenfive. 

Yet we ought not to condemn the Indufhy and Care Mathematicians take in defining their - 
Terms ; for Definition is evidently neceflary to take away Equivocation. But the ordinary and 
receiv'd Terms ought to be imploy'd as far as poffibly they can ; or fuch whofe common figni- 
fi cation is not very remote from that which they pretend to introduce ; which is a thing not con- 
Handy obferv'd among the Mathematicians. 

Nor do we pretend by what has been faid, to condemn Algebra; efpecially fuch as Mr. Des- 
Cartes has reflor'd, and left it to us. For though the Novelty of fome Expreffions in that Science, 
give the Mind fome trouble at firft ; yet there is fo little variety and confufion in thefe Expreffions ; 
and the Affiftances the Mind receives from them fo much out-weigh the Difficulty found in them, 
that I am of Opinion 'tis impoffible for a Man to invent a way of Reafoning and Expreffing his 
Reafonings, more fuited or better accomodated to the Nature of the Mind, or that can carry it 
farther in the Difcovery of unknown Truths. The Expreffions of that Science do not diftracr, 
the Capacity of the Mind ; they burden not the Memory ; they contract and abridge in a won- 
derful manner all our Idea's and our Reafonings, and even render them in fome meafure fenfible 
by Practice. In fine, their ufefulnefs is much greater than the Natural Expreffions of the deline- 
ated Figures of Triangles, Squares, and others of like Nature ; which are inferviceable to the Dif- 
quifition and Unfolding of Truths any whit intricate and obfcure. But fo much for the Conne- 
ction of Idea's with the Traces of the Brain. Tis feafonable to fay fomething pf the Connection 
of Traces with one another, and confequently of the Connection between the Idea's correfpon- 
ding to thefe Traces. 
^ II. This Connection confifls in this, that the Traces of the Brain arefo firmly connected to one 

ojtheMu- another, as 'tis impoffible to excite them again, without the whole retinue which were imprinted 
tuaifon- at t i ie f ame t i me , if a Man for inftance, happens to be in fome publick Solemnity, in cafe he ob- 
rieTr f erves a N tne Circumftances, and all the Principle Perfons that affifted at, the time, the place, 
races ' the day, and all other Particularities ; the remembrance only of the Place, or fome other lefs ob- 
fervable Circumflance of the Ceremony, will be fufficient to bring the Reprefentation of all the 
other to his Mind. T is upon this account that when we can't recollect the Principal Name of 
a thing, we fufficiently fpecifie it by making ufe of a Name, which fignifies fome Circumflance of 
that thing ; as not being able to call to Mind the proper Name of. a Church, we can make ule 
of another Name, fignifying a thing that has fome Relation to it, We can fay, 'Tis that 
Church where there was fuch a Throng ; where Mr. fuch a one Preach'd ; where we went on 
Sunday. And thus not having the proper Name of a Perfon ready at hand} or when it is more 
convenient to denote him in another manner, we can do it by faying, He whofe Face was disfi- 
gured by the Small-pox -, the Portly and well-made Gentleman ; the little crooked Man, accor- 
ding as we Hand affected towards him ; though to exprefs a Man in terms of contempt, is nei- 
ther a fign of good Nature nbr good Manners. 

Now the mutual Connection of thefe Traces, and confequently of their Idea's one with an- 
other, is not only the foundation of all the Figures of Rhetorkk, but alfo of infinite other things of 
grcateft concernment in Morality, and Politicks, and in all Sciences in general, which are any 
ways related to Man} and confequently of many things we fhall treat of in the. fequel of our 
Difcourfe. 

The 



CHap. IV. The Search after Truth. 

The caufe of the Connection of many Traces together, is the Identity of time, wherein they 
were imprinted on the Brain. For 'tis enough for many Traces to have been produc'd at the 
fame time, to caufe that they mould never afterwards be excited, but in company of one another , 
becaufe the Animal Spirits, finding the Channel of thefe Co-temporary Traces gaping and half 
open, continue their courfes in them, by reafon of their meeting with a more free paffage through 
them, than through the other parts of the Brain. This is the caufe of Memory, and the Corpo- 
real Habits which are common to us with Beafts. 

The Connections of the Traces are not always conjoyn'd with the Emotions of the Spirits, be- 
caufe all the things we fee do not always appear either Good or Evil : Thefe Connexions too 
may change or break, becaufe being not of perpetual neceffity for the prefervation of Life, there 
is no need they fhould always be the fame. 

But there are certain Traces in our Brain which have a Natural Connection with one another 5 
as alfo with certain Commotions of the Spirits; that being neceflary to the Prefervation of 
Life. And this Connection can't be broken, at leaft not eafily, becaufe 'tis convenient it mould 
always be the fame. For inftance, the traCe of a great Precipice, which a Man fees under him, 
and from which there is danger of falling, or the Traces of fome bulky Body imminent over his 
Head, and ready to fall and crufh him, is naturally Connected with that which reprefents 
Death, and with a Commotion of the Spirits, which difpofes him to flight or the defire of fly- 
ing it. This Connection admits no alteration, becaufe 'tis neceflary it fhould always be the 
fame; .and it coniifts in a difpolltion of the Fibres of the Brain, which we bring with us into 
the World. 

All the Connections which are not Natural, may, and ought to break ; becaufe the different 
Circumftances of times and places ought to change, to the end they may be ufeful to the Pre- 
fervation of Life. 'Tis convenient the Partridge, for infrance, fhould fly the Sports-man with 
his Gun, at the feafon and the places of his purfuing the Game. But there's no neceffity it 
fhould fly him in other places, or at other times : Thus 'tis neceflary all Animals for their Pre- 
fervation fhould have certain Connections of Traces eafily made, and eafily broken; and that 
they fhould have others very difficult to be fever'd ; and laftly, others incapable of Diflb- 
lution. 

'Tis of very great ufe, to make diligent enquiry into the different Effects thefe different Conne- 
ctions are able to produce : For there are Effects, which as they are very numerous, lb they are no 
lefs important to the Knowledge of Man, and all things relating to him. We fhall fee hereafter, 
that thefe things are the principal Caufes of our Errors. But 'tis time to return to the Subject 
we have promis'd to Difcourfe on, and to explain the different Changes which happen to the 
Imagination of Men, by reafon of their different ways and purpofes of Life. 



7* 



C H A P. IV. 

I. That Men of Learning are the mo§l fubjeff to Error. II. The Cau-> 
. Jes why Men had rather be guided by Authority^ than make ufe of their 
own Reafon. 

THE Differences obfervable in Men, as to their Ways and Purpofes of Life, are almoft 
infinite. Their, different Conditions, different Employments, different Pofts and Offices, _ 
and different Communities are innumerable. Thefe Differences are the Reafon of 
Men's acting upon quite different Defigns, and Reafoning upon different Principles. Even in 
the fame Community, wherein there fhould be but one Character of Mind, and all the fame 
Defigns ; you fhall rarely meet with feveral Perfons, whofe Aims and Views are not different. 
Their various Employments, and their many Adhefions, neceffarily diverfifie the Method and 
Manner they would take to accomplifh thofe various things wherein they agree. Whereby 
'tis manifeft that it would be an impoffible Undertaking, to go about to explain in particular 
the Moral Caufes of Error •, nor would it turn to any great Account fhould we do it in this 
place. I defign therefore only to fpeak of thofe Ways of Living, that lead^us into great - 
multitudes of Errors, and Errors of moft dangerous Importance. When thefe fhall be ex- 
plain'd, we fhall have open'd the way for the Mind to proceed farther ; and every one may 
difcover, at a fingle View, and with the greateft eafe imaginable, the moft: hidden Caufes of 
many particular Errors, the Explication whereof would coft a world of Pains and Trouble. 
When once the Mind fees clearly, it delights to run to Truth ; and it runs to it with an inex- 
preffible fwiftnefs. . 

The Imployment that feems moft neceflary to be treated of at prefent, by Reaion or its pro- L 
ducing moft confiderable Changes in the Imagination of Men, and its conducting them into Er- mm of 
rors moft, is that of Men of Books and Learning; who make greater ufe of -their Memory, L ™™&„ 
than Thought. For Experience has ever manifefted, that thofe who have applied themfelves the ^ - J 
moft fervently to the Reading of Books, and to the Search ofTritth, are the Men that have fed J 
us into a very great part of our Errors. ,„. 



Error. 



«i F. Malebranche Concerning Book II* 

>-Tis much the fame with thofe that Study, as with thofe that Travel. When a Traveller has 
unfortunately miftaken .his way, the farther he goes, at the greater diftance he is from his 
Tourney's end • and he ft 1 11 deviates fo much more, as he is mduftnous and in halte to arrive at 
the place defied. So the vehement purfuits Men make after Truth caufe them to betake them- 
felves to the Reading of Books, wherein they think to find it j or put them upon framing fome 
Phantaftical Syftcm of the things they defire to know, wherewith when their Heads are full and 
heated they try by fome fruitlefs Sallies and Attempts of Thought to recommend them to the 
tafte of others, with hopes to receive the Honours that are ufually pay'd to the firft Founders of 
Syficms. Thefe two Imperfections are now to be confider'd* 

'Tis not eafie to be underftood how it comes to pafs, that Men of Wit and Parts ehoofe rather 
to trult to the Conduct of other Men's Underitanding in the Search of Truth, than to their own, 
which GOD has given them. There is doubtlefs infinitely more Pleafure as well as Honour, to 
be conduced by a Man's own Eyes, than thofe of others. And a Man who has good Eyes in his 
Head, will never think of (hutting them, or plucking them out, under the hopes of having a 
Guide. And yet the ufe of the Underitanding is to the ufe of the Eyes, as the Underitanding is 
to the Eyes ; and asxhe Underitanding is infinitely fupefiour to the Eyes, fo the ufe of the Un- 
deritanding is accompany'd with more folid Satisfactions, and gives another fort of Content, 
than Light and Colours give the Sight. Notwithftanding Men employ their Eyes in Guiding and 
Conducting themfelves, but rarely make ufe of their Reafon in Difcovery of Truth. 
■Il But there are many Caufes which contribute to this overthrow of Reafon. Firft, Men's Na- 

The c'avfes tural CarelelTnefs and Ofcitation, that will not let them be at the Pains of Thinking. - 
■why Men Secondly, Their Incapacity to Meditate, which they have, contracted, for want of applying 
had rather t h e mfelves to it from their Youth •, as has been explahfd in the Ninth Chapter. 
b b g Autho- Thirdly, The inconcernednefs and little Love they have for Abftraft Truths, which are the 
rty, tLn Foundation of all that can be known in this World, 

male ufe of The Fourth Reafon is the Satisfaction which accrues from the knowledge of Probabilities, 

their own w hich are very agreeable, and extreamly moving, as being founded upon fenfible Notions. 

Reafon. ^he p^ Caufe is that ridiculous Vanity, which makes us affecl: the feeming Learned. For 

thofe go by the Name of Learned, who have read molt Books: The Knowledge of Opinions is 

of greater ufe in Converfation, and ierves better to catch the Admiration of the Vulgar, than the 

Knowledge of True Philofophy, which is learned by Meditation. 

In the fixth place, we may reckon that unreafonable Fancy, which fuppbfes the Ancients were 
more enlightned, than we can be ; and that there is nothing left for us but what they have fuc- 
ceeded in. 

The Seventh is a Difingenuous RefpecT: mix'd with an abfurd Curiofity, which makes Men ad- 
mire things that are molt Remote and Ancient, fuch as are far fetch'd, or come from unknown 
Clarusob Countries, as alfo Books that are molt Mylterious and Obfcure. Thus Heraclitush Repute here- 
obfcuram tofore was owing to his Obfcurity. Men are very inquifitive after Ancient Medals, tho' corroded 
linguam. with rult ; and the Shoe or Slipper of one of the Ancients is refpedtfully preferv'd, though eaten 
Lucretius. U p w j t h Worms: Their Antiquity makes them Venerable. There are fome Men who' apply them- 
felves to the Reading the Rabbins, becaufe they wrote in an outlandifh, very corrupt, and ob- 
fcure Language. Ancient Opinions are in greater efteem, for being more remote from us. And 
doubtlefs if Nimrod had written the Hiltory of his Reign, all the molt refin'd Politicks, and even 
all the other Sciences, had been found contain'd in't •, jult as fome have been able to difcover 
in Homer and Virgil, the perfect Knowledge of Nature. Deference, fay they, is due to Anti- 
Veritas fi- quity : How could Arifiotle, Plato, Epicurus, thofe grand Sages be miftaken ? They do not confi- 
lia tempo- der,that Arifiotle,Plato,Epicurus,were Men like us, and of the fame Species with us ; and moreover 
A S ' n £" au " that the World fince their Time, is grown more than two thouiand Years older •, that it has 
or ^ ti3 ' gain'd greater Experience, and ought to be more enlightned ; and that 'tis the Age and Experi- 
ence of the World that makes the Difcovery of Truth. 

The Eighth Reafon is, That when a New Opinion or a modern Author is in Vogue, our own 
Glory feems to be obfcur'd, by being too near him : But we are under no fuch Apprehenfions 
from the Honour that is given to the Ancients. 

The Ninth is, That Truth and Novelty are inconfiltent in matters of Faith. For when Men 
will not diltinguifh between Truths which depend on Reafon, and thofe which rely upon Tra- 
dition, they don't confider that they ought to be learn'd in a very different manner., They con- 
found Novelty with Error, and Antiquity with Truth. Luther and Calvin, and others, fay they, 
have Innovated and Err'd ; therefore GalUUus, Harvey, and Des-Cartes, in what they have ad- 
vane'd as New, are deceiv'd. Luther's Confubftamiation is Novel, and is Falfe : Therefore Har- 
vey's Circulation of the Blood is Falfe, becaufe 'tis New ; and for this Reafon they indifcriminately 
give the odious Title of Innovators, to Heretkh and New Philofophers. The Idea's and Terms of 
Truth and Anticfuity, Faljljood and Novelty, have been Connected one with another : And this is 
the Effed of it ; the Vulgar part of Men no longer feparate them ; and Men of Senfe find fome 
difficulty to feparate them, as they fhould do. 

The Tenth is, That wc live in an Age wherein the Science of Ancient Opinions is ftill in great 
Repute : And 'tis only thofe few who can take the Liberty of Thinking, that are able, by the 
force of their Reafon, to fet themfelves above corrupt and evil Cuftoms. When a Man is in a 
prefs and a throng, 'tis a hard matter not to follow the torrent. 

Laltly, 



dhap. V. The Search after Truths h% 

Laftly, Becaufe Men are aded only by Intereft ; which is the Reafon that thofe themfelves who 
find out the Abufe, and difcover the Vanity of thefe forts Of Studies, flick clofe to them ftill *. 
Becaufe Honours, Preferments, and Benefices, are entail'd to them ; and thofe who are Eminent 
herein, have a greater fhareof them, than thofe that are ignorant of them. 

All thefe Reafons make it, one would think, eafie to be eonceiv'd, why Men implicitly follow 
the Ancient Opinions, as true; and rejed the New ones univerfally, asfalfe; finally, why they 
make no ufe, or very little of their Reafon. Undoubtedly there are abundance of other more 
particular Reafons, that contribute to it ; but if thefe we have brought be attentively confi- 
der'd, it will be no matter of furprize to find fome Men obftinately Bigotted to the Authority 
of the Ancients. 



CHAP. V. 

Two pernicious EjfecJs Reading has upon the Imagination. 

f~ "^HAT difingenuous and loofeRefped, which Men award the Ancients, is productive 
of abundance of very mifchievous Effeds, which 'tis worth while to confider. 

JL. TheFirftis, That by accuftoming them to a difufe of their Reafon, it by little and see the 
little puts them under an utter Incapacity of ufing it. For it ought not to be imagin'd, that thofe ftfi Anidt 
who grow Gray in the Study of Arifiotle and Plato, make much ufe of their Underftanding : °f the P re ~ 
They generally fpend fo much time in the Reading of thefe Books, meerly to enter into the c ^& cf>A " 
Sentiments of their Authors : And their main Scope and Purpofeis, to know truly the Opinions * 
they held, without troubling themfelves much about thofe of them which ought to be held, as 
fhall be prov'd in the fucceeding Chapter. Thus the Science and Philofophy they learn, is pro- 
perly a Science of Memory, and not a Science of the Vnderftanding. They know only the Hifto- 
ry, and the matter of Fad, and not the evident Truths ; and may more juftly be call'd Hiftori- 
ans, than true Philofophers. 

The Second Effed produe'd in the Imagination by the Reading Ancient Authors, istheftrange 
confufion it makes in the Idea's of moft Men that give themfelves to it. There are two different 
ways of Reading Authors : The one is very Advantagious and Ufeful ; the other very Ufelefs^ 
and alfo Dangerous. Reading is of great ufe, when one meditates on what one reads : When a 
Man by an EfTay of Thought endeavours the Refolution of the Queflions he fees in the Contents 
of the Chapters, before he begins to read them ; when he Methodizes and Collates the Idea's of 
things with one another ; in a word, when he ufes his Reafon. On the contrary, Reading is of 
no account, when he underftands not what 'tis he is about : But 'tis of dangerous confequence 
for a Man to read, and comprehend what he reads, when he does not flridly fearch and examine 
into it, fo as to be able to judge of it ; and efpecially if he has Memory enough to retain what he 
conceives, and Imprudence enough to confent to it. The firft way enlightens the Underftanding, 
it corroborates and enlarges it Capacity. The Second ftraightens its Capacity, and renders it by 
degrees weak, obfeure, and confus'd. 

Now the generality of thofe, who glory in the Knowledge of others Opinions, ftudy only 
the fecond Manner : And fo the more Reading they have, the more feeble, dark, and confus'd 
their Underftanding grows. The Reafon whereof is, that the Traces of their Brain are con- 
founded with each other; as lying in great numbers, and being never Poftur"d and Methodiz'd 
by Reafon •, which is the thing that hinders the Mind from imagining and reprefenting clearly the 
things it has occafion for. When the Mind would open fome particular Traces, finding others 
that are more familiar to it in the way, 'tis eafily impos'd upon. For the Capacity of the Brain 
being not infinite, 'tis hardly poffible a great quantity of Traces, form'd without Order and Me- 
thod, mould not entangle and perplex themfelves, and thereby put the Idea's in confufion. 'Tis 
upon this fcore, that Men of a great Memory are commonly incapable of judging well,concerning 
things that demand a great Attention, * 

But that which is efpecially remarkable, is, That the Knowledge Men acquire by Reading, 
without Meditation, and with defign only of retaining the Opinions of others; in a word, all 
Science that depends on Memory, is properly the Science that puffs up, and makes them Arro- 
gant; becaufe this is that which glitters moft to appearance, and makes the pofleffors vain and 
conceited, And thus we generally obferve thofe that are this way Learned, to be proud, haugh- 
ty, and prefuming ; pretending to have a right of judging of all things, though very little quali- 
fy'd for that purpofe ; which is the Reafon of their falling into multitudes of Errors. 

But this falfe Science is the Caufe of a greater mifchief ftill. For thofe Perfons fall not into 
Error along, but draw whole troops of Vulgar Minds along with them ; as alfo a vaft retinue of 
Young People, who Believe their Decifions, as Articles of Faith. Thefe falfly Learned, having 
opprefs'd and overborn them by the weight of their profound Literature, and maz'd them with 
the Dodrine of uncouth and extravagant Opinions, and the Names of Ancient and Unknown 
Authors, gain fuch an irrefiftible Sway and Authority over their Minds, that they reverence and 
admire as Oracles, whatever proceeds from their Mouth ; and blindfold, and implicitly fubferi be 
• to all their Sentiments. Nay, Men of far greater Underftanding and Judgment, who had 

U never 



74. F. M a l e b r a n c h e Concerning • Book Il a 

never known them, and who fhould not be inform'd what and who they were, feeing them talk 
info Magifterial a way and Decifive a ftrain, in fo haughty, fo imperious, and fo grave an 
Air, could fcarce forbear having a Refpeft and Efteem for what they fay, becaufe 'tis an hard 
matter to be unaffected with the Air, the Carriage, and Senfible manners of the Speaker. For as 
it often happens that your Arrogant and Confident Men are too hard for others of greater 
Abilities, but that are more Judicious and referved : fo thofe Men that maintain things nei- 
ther true, nor probable, often filence their Opponents, by talking in an Imperious, Haughty, 
or grave ftrain, that furprizes and amufes them. 

Now thofe of whom we fpeak, have fo much Value and Efteem for themfelves, and Contempt 
for others, as to be confirm "d in a certain Faftuous Habit, mix'd with a fort of Gravity, and 
Fictitious Modefty, which prepoffeifes and wins the Hearer's Mind. 

For it ought to be obferv'd, that all the different Airs and Behaviours of Men of different Con- 
ditions, are only the Natural Refults and Confequences of the Efteem every Man has for himfelf, 
in Relation to others : as is eafie to be feen if a Man confiders them a little. Thus an Haughty 
and a Brutal Air is peculiar to a Man that highly efteems himfelf, and difregards the Efteem of 
other Men : An Air of Modefty is the Air of a Man that fets little by himfelf, but has much E- 
fteem for others. The Grave Air is that of a Man who has a great Efteem for himfelf, and defire 
of being Efteem'd by others. The Simple and Down-right Air and Carriage is that of a Man 
neither folicitous about himfelf nor others. 

Thus all the different Airs, which are almoft infinite, are only the Effects which the different de- 
grees of Efteem every Man has for himfelf, and for thofe with whom he converfes, naturally pro- 
duce in his Face, and in all the External parts of his Body. We have explain'd in the Fourth Chap- 
ter, that Correfpondence which is between the Nerves which excite the Paffions within us, and 
thofe that evidence them outwardly, by the Air they imprint upon the Face. 



CHAR VI. 

That Men of Learning generally are fo Opinionated with an Author^ that their 
Principal Drift Is the Knowing what he held^ without caring to know what 
ought to be held. 

rnriHERE is ftill another Defect, of very great Importance, that Men of Reading are ordi- 
narily fubject. to : which is that they grow conceited with an Author. If there be any 

M thing true or good in a Book, they are prefently extravagant in extolling it. 'Tis all 
true ! 'tis all excellent, and admirable ! They pleafe themfelves in admiring what they do not un- 
derftand, and would fain have all the World to admire it with them. The Encomiums they be- 
llow on thefe obfcure Authors, they make redound to their own glory : Since others are here- 
by perfwaded, that they perfectly underftand them -, and this adminifters fuel to their Vanity. 
They efteem themfelves above the reft of Mankind, upon the ftrength of being perfwaded they 
underftand fome Impertinence of an Ancient Author, or of a Man perhaps that did not under- 
ftand himfelf. What a multitude have fweat and laboured, in the Illuftration of the obfcure Paf- 
fages of fome of the Ancient Philofophers and Poets ? And what abundance of fine Wits are there 
in thefe Days ftill, the main Pleafure ofwhofe Life confifts in Criticizing on a Word, or the 
Opinion of an Author? But 'twill not be amifs at prefent to bring fome Proof of what I fay. 

The Queftion concerning the Immortality of the Soul, is without doubt a Queftion of very great 
Importance. We cannot find fault with the Philofophers, for laying out themfelves fo induftriouf- 
ly towards the Refolution of it. And though they heap up mighty Volumes, to prove after a 
{lender fafhion, a Truth that may be Demonftrated in a few Words, or a few Pages \ yet 
they are excufable. But when they are very folicitous, and concern'd about deciding what 
Artftotle thought of it j they are as pleafant Gentlemen as one could wiffi . It is, in my" Mind, 
of very little ufe and benefit to thofe who live at prefent, to know whether there was ever fuch 
a Man as was call'd Ariflotle : whether this Man was the Author of thofe Books which go under 
his Name : whether he underftood this or that in fuch a part of his Works. This can neither 
make a Man wifer nor happier. But it is very material to know whether what he fays be true or 
falfe in it felf. 

'Tis then very ufelefs to know what was Anftotle\ Opinion concerning the Immortality of the 
Soul i though it be of great Advantage to know the Soul to be Immortal. Yet I make no fcruple 
to affirm, that there have been many Scholars more folicitous to know Aristotle's Sentiment on 
this Subjeft, than the Truth of the thing it felf. Since there have been thofe, who have wrote 
Books purpofely to explain what that Philofopher's Belief was of it j but have not clone fo much, 
to know what ought to be belicv'd concerning it. 

But though there have been a multitude of Men, who have harrafled and fatigued their Mind 
in refolving what Ariftotle's Opinion was; yet their fatigues and pains have been all in vain : fince 
they cannot yet agree about this ridiculous Queftion. Which evidenceth how mif-fortunate the 

followers 



Chap. VI. The Search after Truth. 

followers of Ariflotle are, in having a Man fo dark and obfcure to enlightenthem ; and who eVeii 
affefts Obfcurity, as he declar'd in a Letter that he wrote to Alexander. 



75 




ana 

and without foundation, I am oblig'd to tranfcribe a Paffage here of ^pr^/fomewhat long 
and tedious : wherein that Author has amafs'd together the different Authorities upon that Sub- 
ject, as upon a Queftion of greateft Importance. Thefe are his words upon the Second Chapter 
of Tertullian De Refurreitione carnis. 

Outcftio h&c in fcholis utrinque validis fufpicionibm agitatur, num animam immortalem, mortalemve 
fecerit Ariflotcles. Et qnidem Philofophi hand ignobiles affeveraverunt Arifiotelem pofaijfe noftros animos 
ab intent it allenos. Hi funt e Gracis & Latinis interpretibus Ammonias uterque, Olympiodorus, Philo- 
ponus, Simplicius, Avicenna, uti memorat Mirandula /. 4. De examine vanitatis, Cap. 9. l'heodorus z 
AfetochyteSf Themiftius, S. Thomas 2 Contra gcntes Cap 79. & Phyf. Lett. 1 2. & pr&terea 1 2. Metaph. 
Left. 3. & Quodlib. 10. Oil. 5. Art. 1. Albertus Traf}. 2. De Anirna Cap. 20. &TraB. 3. Cap. 13. 
nAigidim Lib. 3. De Anima ad Cap. 4. Ditrandus in 2 Difi. 1 8. Qu 3. Ferr arias loco citato contra gent es^ 
& late Eugubirms L. 9. De perenni Philofophi a Cap. 18. & quod pluris efij difcipuliis Ariftotelis Theo- 
phraflas, magiflri mcntem & ore & c alamo noviffe penitus qui poterat. 

Jn contrariam fatlionem abler c nonmdli Panes, nee infirmi Philofophi ; Jufiinus in fna paranefi y 
Origines in *MeeropB«V»> & ut fertur NazJ.anz.enM in Difp. contra Emom. & Nyffenus Lib. 2. de Anima, 
Cap. 4. Theodoretns de Curandis Gracorum AffecJibus Lib. 3. Galenns in Hiftoria Philofophica, Pompona- 
tiits L.de Immcrxalitate Anima^ Simon Fortius L. de Mente Humana, Cajetanus 3. de Anima Cap. 2. 
In eum fenfum, ut cadncum Animum no fir um putaret Ariftoteles, funt partim adduBi ab Alexandro 
Aphodi-s de Audit ore, qui ftcfolitus er-at intcrpretari Arifiotelicam mentem; quamvis Eugubinus Cap. 21 » 
& 22 eum excufet. Et qnidem unde collegiffe videtur Alexander mortalitatem, nempe ex 12. Afetap* 
inde S. Thomas, Theodoras Metochytes immortalitatem collegerunt. 

Porro Tertullianum neatram hanc bpinionem ample xum credo; fed putajfe in hac parte ambiguum 
Arifiotelem. Itaque it a citat ilium pro utraque: Nam cum hie adferibat Arifioteli mortalitatem anims^ 
tamen L. de Anima C. 6. pro contraria opinione immortalitatis citat. Ea^dem mente fuit Plutarchus^ 
■pro utraque opinione advocans eundem Philofophum in L. 5. de placitis Philofoph. Nam. Cap. 1. mor- 
talitatem tribuit, &" Cap. 25. immortalitatem. Ex Scholafiicis etiam, -qui in neutram partem Arifiote- 
lem conflantem judicant, fed dubium & ancipitem, funt Scotus in 4. Difi. ^.Qu, 2. Art. 2. Harveus 
quodlib. 1. O. 1 1. & I. Sent. Difi. 1. Q. 1. Niphus in opufcalo de Immortalitate Anima Cap. 1. & re- 
centes alii Interpret es : quam mediam exifiimationem credo verier em, fed Schoiii lex vet at, ut authori~ 
tatum yonder e Vibrato illud fuadeam. 

I deliver all thefe Quotations as true, upon the integrity of the Commentator •, as thinking 
it would be lofs of time to ftand to verifie them. Nor have I all thofe curious Books by me, from 
which they were taken. I add no new ones of my own, as not envying him the Glory of having 
made a good Colledion. And it would ftiil be a greater lofs of time to do it, though a Man mould 
only turn over the Indices of Ariflotle 's Commentators. 

We fee then in this Paffage of La Creda, that Men of Books and Study, that have pafs'd 
for the Ingenious of their Times, have taken abundant Pains to know whether Ariflotle belie- 
ved the Immortality of the Soul : and there have been fome of them who are able to write 
Books peculiarly on the Subject , as Pomponatius. For that Author's chief Defign in his Book is, ' 
to fhew that Ariflotle believ'd the Soul was Mortal. And poffibly there are others, who not only 
are folicitous to know what were Ariflotkh thoughts upon this Subject ; but who moreover look 
upon it as a very important Queftion to know, for inftance, whether Tertullian, Plutarch, or others, 
believ'd or not, whether it was Ariflotle's Opinion that the Soul was Mortal. As there is great 
Reafon to fuppofe from La Cerda himfelf, if we reflect only on the latter part of jthe Paffage we 
have quoted, Porro Tertulliannm, &c. 

Though it be an ufelefs thing, to know what Ariflotle believ'd concerning the Immortality of 
the Soul, and what were Tertullian^ and Plutarch' 's thoughts concerning Ariftotle\ belief j yet the: 
foundation of the Queftion, The immortality of the Soul, is at leaft a Truth very neceflary to be 
known. But there are infinite things, the Knowledge whereof is very impertinent and ufe- 
lefs ; and confequently more ufelefs ftill, to know what were the Ancient thoughts about 
them : and yet there are Men very anxious and inquifitive in conjecturing the Opinions of 
Philofophers on fuch fort of Subjects. There are found whole Books full of thefe ridiculous In-< 
quiries ; and 'tis thefe noifie trifles that have been the occafion of fo many Wars among the 
Learned. 

Thefe vain and impertinent Queftions, thefe ridiculous Genealogies of fruitlefs Opinions; are 
the important Subjects for the, Criticifms of the Learned. They think they have the Right and 
Privilege of difpifing thofe who difpife thefe Fooleries, and of treating as ignorant Perfons 
fuch as glory in being ignorant of them. They imagine they are perfect Mafters of the Hi- 
ftory and Genealogy of Subftantial Forms ; and the Age is ungrateful unlefs it acknowledge their 
Merit. Thefe things manifeftly difcover the weaknefs and vanity of the Mind of Man ; aad that 
when Reafon does not govern his Study, his Studies are fo far from perfecting his Reafon, that 
they darken, corrupt, and totally pervert it. 

Tis? 



y6 F. Malebranche Concerning Book IL 

'Tis worth while here to obferve, that in Queftions of Faith 'tis no fault to fearch into the 
Belief of St. Auk™ (for inftance) or any other Father of the Church', nor even to make Inquiry 
whether St. Auftirts Belief was the fame as his Predeceflbrs. Becaufe matters of Faith are only 
learn'd by Tradition, and Reafon is unable todifcover them. The moft Ancient Faith being 
the moft true •, we muft endeavour to know what was the Faith of the Ancients-, which cannot 
be done but by Examining the Opinion of feveral Perfons who have fucceeded one another in 
feveral times. But things which depend on Reafon are quite of another Nature ; and we ought 
not to be folicitous about the Opinion of the Ancients, to know what we ought to hold con- 
cerning them. Yet I know not by what ftrange fubverfion of Reafon fome Men are angered, if 
we (peak otherwife in Philofophy, than Ariftotle has done} and yet take it very patiently to 
hear a Man talk in Divinity contrary to the Gofpel, the Fathers, and Councils. I am of Opi- 
nion that thofe who make the greateft out-cry againft the Novelties of Philofophy, which ought 
to be had in Efteem, are the moft obftinate and zealous Patrons and Defenders of certain No- 
velties in Divinity - n which ought to be had in abhorrence. For 'tis not their Terms and Lan- 
guage we difapprove \ which (as unknown as they were to Antiquity J are Authoriz'd by Cuftom. 
'Tis the Errors they diffufe and fupport by the help of this Equivocal and confus'd Dialed which 
we condemn. 

In point of Divinity we ought to be fond of Antiquity, becaufe we ought to love the Truth •, 
which Truth is found in Antiquity. And all Curiofity ought to ceafe, when once we have taken 
hold of Truth. But in point of Philofophy we ought on the contrary to love Novelty % for the 
fame Reafon that we ought always to love the Truth •-, that we ought to retrieve it j and ought 
to have an Indefatigable Curiofity for it. If Plato and Ariftotle were believed Infallible, a Man 
fhould perhaps apply himfelf to the underftanding of them only : But Reafon oppofes the Be- 
lief of it. Reafon, on the contrary, would have us judge them more ignorant than the New 
Philofophers \ fince in the Age we live in, the World is two thoufand Years older, and has lear- 
ned greater Experience, than it had in the days of Ariftotle and Plato , as we have already 
faid : And the New Philofophers may know all the Truths the Ancients have left us \ and find 
out, and add a great many more to them. Yet Reafon will not have us believe thefe New Phi- 
lofophers any more than the Old upon their bare Word. It bids us, on the contrary,, examine 
attentively their Thoughts, and withhold our content, till there is no longer room for doubting, 
without being ridiculoully prepoflefs'd with the Opinion of their vaft Knowledge, or the other 
fpecious Qualities of their Mind. 



CHAP. VII. 

Of the Frepffejjion of Commentators. 



t |3 "i HIS PrepofTefTion is no where apparent in fo ftrange and exceffive a degree, as in the 
Commentators on an Author •, becaufe the Undertakers of this Task, which feems too 

JL low and fervile for a Man of Senfe, imagine their Authors merit the Praileand Ad- 
- miration of all the World. They look upon them as part of themfelves, and fancy they are 
Body and Soul to one another , and upon this View, Self-love admirably plays its part. They 
artfully accumulate Encomiums on their Authors, they fhed Light and Radiations round them, 
they load them with Glory, as knowing they fhall have it themfelves by reflection and rebound. 
This great and lofty Idea not only magnifies Ariftotle and Plato in the Mind of many of the Rea- 
ders, but imprints a refpecf in them for all that have Commented upon them j and fome of 
of them had never Deified their Authors, had they not fancy 'd themfelves incircl'd, as it were, 
in the Rays of the fame Glory. 

Yet I will not fay that all Commentators are fo liberal in their Panegyricks on their Authors, 
out of hopes of a Return ; fome of them would ftart at fuch an Apprehenfion, if they would 
confider a little : They are fincere and well-meaning in their Praifes, without any Politick defign, 
and without thinking what they do ; but Self-love thinks for them, and without their being aware 
of it. Men are infenfibleof the heat that is in their Heart, though it gives Life and Motion to 
all the other parts of their Body. They muft touch and handle themfelves to be conviuc'd of 
it, becaufe this Heat is Natural. The caufe is the fame in refpeft of Vanity, which is ib conge- 
nial to the Mind of Man, that he is infenfible of it ; and though 'tis this (as a Man may fay J that 
gives Life and Motion to the greateft part of his Thoughts and Defigns, yet it often does it in a 
manner imperceptible by him. He muft handle, and feel, and found himfelf inwards to know 
that he is vain. 'Tis not fufficiently underftood that 'tis Vanity which is the Firft mover, in the 
greateft part of Humane Aftions^ and though Self-love knows this well enough, it knows it on- 
ly to difguife it from the reft of Man. 

A Commentator then being fome ways related, and allied to his Author that he works upon - 7 
Self-love never fails to difcover in him notable Subjeds for Praife and Incenfe, with deiigu to 
make them redound to the advantage of the Offerer. And this is perform'd in fo Artificial, fo 
Subtil, and Delicate a manner, as to be wholly Imperceptible. But this is not the proper place 
of expofingall the Wiles of Self-love and Intereft. 

Nor 



Ghap. VII. The Search after Truth. jj 

Nor is the Prejudicate Efteem Commentators have conceiv'd for their Authors, and the Honour 
they do themfelves in praifing them, the only Reafon of Sacrificing to them : Cuftom is another 
Motive,- and becaufe they think the Pradtifc aeceffary. There are Men who have no great Efteem 
either 'for certain Sciences or Authors, who notwithstanding fall zealoufly to writing Comments 
on them ; becaufe either their Imployment, Chance, or perhaps a capricious Humour has engag'd 
them in the Attempt : and thefe too think they are under an Obligation to be exceffivein the Praifes 
of the Sciences, and Authors which they work on- whe nat the fame time the Authors are Silly and 
Impertinent j and the Sciences Ignoble and Ufelefs. 

And indeed what can be more ridiculous, than for a Man to undertake to Comment on an Au- 
thor whom he thought Impertinent, and to write Serioufly on a Subject he believ'd to be Infigr 
uincant and Ufelefs ? 'Tis neceflary therefore to the Preferving his Reputation, to Praife both 
the Authors and Sciences ; though both one and the other are Contemptible, and nothing worth : 
and the fault of Undertaking an ill work mult be mended with another. Which is the Reafon that 
when Learned Men Comment on different Authors, they fall into Abfurdities and Contradictions. 
• Upon this Account it is, that almoft all prefaces have as little of Truth in them as good Senfe. 
If a Man Comments upon Ariftotle, he is the Genius of Nature. If a Man writes upon Plato, 'tis the 
Divine Plato. They hardly ever Comment upon the works of Plain Men : but 'tis always of Men 
wholly Divine •, of Men who have been the Admiration of their Age, and who have beenblefs'd by 
Providence with Light and Underitanding above the reft of Mankind. 'Tis the fame thing too 
with the matter they treat on : 'Tis always the fineft, the m oft exalted, and moft necefTary of all 
other. . , 

But that I may not be credited upon my bare word, I will deliver here the way, where in a Fa- 
mous Commentator among the Learned, treats the Author that he Comments on. I mean Averroes 
who fpeaks of Ariftotle. He fays in his Preface upon the Phyftch of that Philofopher, that he was 
the Inventor of Logiri, Moral Philofophy, and Metapby/icks ; and that he has carried them to the 
top of their perfection. Complevit, (fays hernia nullus e or am, qui fecuti funt eumufque ad hoc tempus, 
euadest mi lie & quingentorum annorum, quidquam addidit; nee invenies in ejus verbis err or em alicujus 
quantitatis , & talem ejfe virtutem in individuo uno miraculofum & extraneum exiftit : & h<s.c difpofitio 
cum in mo homine reperitur, dignus eft ejfe Divinus magis quam humanus. And in Other places he ftill 
bellows more pompous and magnificent praifes on him: As Lib. i.de Generatione Animalium. Lau- 
demtts Deumquifeparavithunc virum ab aliis in perfeflione, appropriavitque eiultimam dignitatem huma- 
nam, quam non omnis homo potest in quacunque at ate attingere. The fame he fays of him, Lib. i . Deft. 
Difp. 3« Ariftotelis doEtrina est SV MM A VE R IT A S, quoniam ejus intellect us fuit finis humani 
intelletlus: quare benedicitur de Mo, quod ipfe fuit treat us & datus nobis Divina providentia, ut non />- 
nor emus pojfbilia fciri. 

Muft not a Man be mad in good earneft that will talk at this rate ? And muftnot his Bigottry 
for this Author be degenerated into Extravagance and Folly ? Ariftotle'^ Dotlrine is the S O V E- 
REIGN TRUTH. 'Tis impojfible for any man to equal him or come near him in Science. This is 
the Man that was fent us from Heaven, to teach us all that is poffibleto be known. This is he upon whom 
all the wife Men are form d; and they are fo much more lean id, as they better underftandhim. Ashe 
lays in another place : Ariftotelcs fuit Princeps per quern per ficiuntur omnes Sapientes, qui fuerunt poft 
eum: licet differ ant inter fe in intelligendo verba ejus, & in eo quodfequitur ex eis. And yet the Works 
of this Commentator have been difperfed over all Europe, and into Countries farther remote. 
They have been tranflated out of Arabick into Hebrew ; out of Hebrew into Latin, and it may 
* be i°.to many other Languages: Which Manifeftly fhews what Efteem the Learned have had for 
them. So that a more fenfible inftance than this, cannot be given of the Prepoffeffion of Men 
of Study. For it evidently fhews, that they are not only Opinionated with an Author themfelves, 
but alfo communicate their Bigottry to others, proportionably to the Efteem the World con- 
ceives of them - . And thus thefe falfe Praiies Commentators load him with, are often the caufe, ^ 
that Men of no very brightned Parts, who betake themfelves to the Reading of them, are pre- 
pofTefTed, and thereby led into infinite Error. See here another inftance. 

A Man renowned among the Learned, who Founded the Geometry, and Afironomy Le&ures in PradefliV 
the Vniverfty of Oxford, begins a Book, which he wrote upon the Eight firft Propolitions of Eu- nes 13 in 
did with thefe Words.' Confilium meum eft, Auditores, ft vires & valetudo fujfecerint, explicare P nnc JP'- 
Definitiones, Petitiones, communes Sententias, &oc~loprioresPropofttionesprimilibriElemcntorum; C£ - men ^ . 
terA pesl me venientibus relinquere. And he concludes with thefe words. Exolvi per Dei gratiam, Do- rum £ U . 
mini Auditores, promiffum^ liber avi fidem meam, explicavi pro modulo meo Dcfinitiones, Petitiones, com- clidis, 
munes Sententias, & otlo prior es Propofitiones Elementorum Euclidis. Hie annis feffus cyclos artemq; re- 
tono. Snccedent in hoc munus alii fortajfe magis vegeto corpore, vivido ingenio, &c. A Man of a 
competent Senfe would not require more than an hour's time, to learn of himfelf, or with the 
help of the meaneft Geometrician, the Definitions, Postulates, Axioms, and the Eight firft Propo- 
rtions of Euclid : they have very little need of any Explication : and yet here is an Author that 
talks of his Enterprize, as of fome very difficult and mighty Undertaking. He is apprehen- 
sive leaft his ftrenth mould fail him, 5/ vires & valetudo fujfecerint. He leaves the Profecution 
of them to his Succeflbrs. Cater a post me venientibus relinquere. He thanks GOD for having, 
through his particular Mercy, accomplifh'd and made good what he promised. Exolvi per Dei 
qratiampromiffium; liber avi fidem meam: Explicavi pro modulo meo. What? the Quadrature of the 
Circle ? the Duplication of the Cube ? This Great Man has explain'd pro modulo juo, the Defini- 
tions, Populates, Axioms, and the Eight firft propofitions of the firft Book of Euclid'.? Element?, 

^ Poffibly 



Xg KMalebranche Concerning Book II; 

Pofllbly amongft thofe who fhall fucceed him, there may fome be found of a ftronger and 
healthier Conftitution than himfelf, to carry on fo great a Work. Saccedent w hoc mums aln FOR- 
TASSE mam -oeaeto colore & vfaido ingenio. But as for his part, he has done enough to fit down 
and reft. HtQ athufeffm cyclos artemquereponit. _ 

Euclid never thought of being fo obfcure, or of faying fuch extraordinary things, when he 
* in Qujr- j-QJppos'd his Elements, as mould neccfiarily demand a * Book of near three hundred pages to 
t0 ' exp^in bis P<$riTt76ris, Axioms, Poftulates, and Eight fir ft Proportions. But this Learned Englijh- 

mln knew how to enhance the Science of Euclid, and if Age would have permitted him, and he 
had but continued in the fame Vigour, we mould at prefent have had a dozen or fifteen mighty 
Volumes iipc'ri Euclid's Elements only, which doubtlefs would have been very beneficial to No- 
vice Pretenders to Geometry, and had made much for the Honour of Euclid. 

See what whimfical defigns a falily term'd Learning can put Men upon. This Gentleman 
was vers'd in the Greek Tongue ; for we are oblig'd to him for a Greek Edition of St. Chryfoftom's 
Works. He poflibly had read the Ancient Geometricians : He could give an Hiftoricai Account 
of their Proportions, no lefs than their Defcent and Genealogy. He had all the refpedt for Anti- 
quity that ought to be had for Truth ; and what is it fuch a Difpofition of Mind produces ? A 
Commentary upon the Defnitions of Terms, the Demands, Axioms, and the Eight firft Propofi- 
tionsof Euclid; much harder to be underftood and remembred, I do not fay, than the Propofi- 
tions he commented on ; but than all that ever Euclid wrote on Geometry. 
There are many Men that out of Vanity talk in Greek, and even fometimes in a Arrange Lan- 
■ cua CT e they don' t themfelves underftand : For Ditlionaries no lefs than Indices, and Common Places^, 
are very great helps to fome forts of Authors : But there are very few of Prudence enough to 
keep in their Greek upon a Subjeft, where it is needlefs and impertinent to make ufe of it. And 
this makes me believe it was PrepofTeffion, and an inordinate Efteem for Euclid, that form'd in 
our Author's Imagination, the firft Defign of his Book. 

If this Gentleman had made as much ufe of his Reafon as his Memory, in a Matter where Reafon 
fhould have only been imploy'd : or if he had had as great a Refpedt. and Love for Truth,as Vene- 
ration for the Author he went to expound j there is great Probability that having mifpent fo much 
time upon fo frivolous a Subjeft, he would have acknowledge Euclidh Definitions of a Plane An- 
cle, and Parallel Lines, to be Vicious and Defective, and inexpreflive of the Nature of them ; and 
"that the Second Proportion is impertinent, fince the Proof of it depends npon the Third PoBulate, 
which is harder to be granted than that Second Proportion ; fince in granting that Third Postulate^ 
which is, That we may defcribe from any Point a Circle at "what interval we pleafe, we not only grant 
that a Line may be drawn from a Point equal to another Line ; which Euclid effedts in that Propofi- 
tion after a very round-about manner : But we allow, that from any Point may be drawn an infi* 
nite number of Lines, of what length we pleafe. 

But the Defign of moll Commentators is not to Illuminate their Authors, and to find out 
Truth •, 'tis to make Oftentation of their Learning, and implicitly to defend the Authors which 
they Comment on, even to their Vices. 'Tis not fo much to make themfelves or their Authors un- 
derftood, they talk, as to make him admir'd, and themfelves together with him. If the Gentleman 
before-mention'd, had not ftufPd his Book with Sentences of Greek, with a great many Names of 
unheard of Authors, and fuch other ufelefs Obfervations, for the underftanding Common Notions, 
Verbal Definitions, and Geometrical Populates, who would have read his Book? who would have 
admir'd him ? or who would have conferral on its Author the Honorary Title of Learned, or of; 
a Man of Senfe ? 

I prefume it can't be doubted after what I have laid, but the Indifcrete Reading of Books often 
prepoflefles the Mind. But as foon as PrepofTeffion enters in, that which we call Common Senfe, is 
banifii'd out of it. 'Tis incapable of Judging foberly of any thing any way relative to the Sub- 
ject of its PrepofTeffion : It ftains and tindtures with it every Thought ; nay, it cannot apply it 
felf to Subjedte quite remote from thofe it is prejudiced for." Thus a Man opinionated with Ari- 
ftotle, can relilh nothing but Ariflotle • He muft judge of every thing with relation to Arifiotle. 
What does not accord with that Philofopher, feems falfe ; he has conftantly fome Saying of Ari- 
flotle in his Mouth ; he is citing him upon all occafions, and all forts of Subjects, both to prove 
things fo obfcure, as no Man can comprehend ; and to prove things fo felf-evident, as Children 
cannot doubt of ; becaufe Ariflotle is to him what Reafon and Evidence are to others. 

So if a Man be poffefs'd with the conceit of Euclid and Geometry, he will be for reducing eve- 
ry thing you fhall fay to him, to the Lines and Proportions of his darling Author, and fhall talk 
nothing but with reference to his Science. The whole would not be bigger than its part ; but be- 
caufe Eulid has faid it : nor will he be afham'd to quote him for the Proof of it, as I have fome- 
times obferv'd. But this is ftill more cuftomary with thofe who are devoted to other Authors, 
than thofe of Geometry ; in whofe Books nothing is more frequent than Greek, Hebrew, Arabick 
Citations, to prove things as evident as the Sun at Mid-day. 

All this is occafion'd by Reafon that the Traces imprinted on the Fibres of the Brain by the Ob- 
jects of their PrepofTeffion are fo deep, as always to remain gaping and half open : And the Animal 
Spirits continually pafling through them,preferve them fo without permitting them to clofe again. 
So that the Soul having always of neceffity, the Thoughts that are connected with thefe Traces, 
becomes as it were enflav'd to them ; and fhe is ever troubled, and difquieted, even when know- 
ing fhe is wrong, fhe is willing to be Righted. Thus fhe is in conftant danger of falling into a 



great 



JBiap. VIII. - the Search after Truth. 

£reat number of Errors, unlefs fhe Hands always upon her guard, with an inviolable Refolution 
of obferving the Rule given in the beginning of this Work: that is, of Denying an entire Content- 
gxceft to things entirely evident. 

I pafs over the evil Choice that is generally made of the kind of Study Men apply themfelves to 
«S properly belonging to Moral Philofophy, to treat of} though it may likewife be reduc'd here to 
what has been faid of Prepolfeflion. For when a Man is fallen beyond retrival into the Reading 
of the Rabbins, and Books of all forts of moft unknown, and conlequently molt ufelefs Languages j 
and fpends his whole Life therein; he does it donbtlefs out of PrepofTeffion, and the Imaginary 
hopes of becoming Learned : though it is impoffible by that Method to acquire any true Sience. 
But becaufe this Application to unprofitable Studies does not fo much fubjeftus to Error, as 
wafte our Time, to polTefsus with a foolifh Vanity } I fhall notfpeak here of thofe who fondly 
think of becoming Learned in all thefe forts of fordid and unprofitable Sciences, the number 
whereof is very great, and the Study ufually too paffionate and earnelt. 



CHAP. VIII. 

I. Of the Inventors of new Syflems. II. The lafi Error of Men of 

Learning. 

E have been manifefting the ftate of the Imagination of Men, of Books, and Study, I. 
who refign up all to the Authority of fome certain particular Authors. There are others of the 
Y f fti'l very oppofite to thefe ; who have no refpecl: at all for Authors, let their Efteem / » w *' or * 
be what it will among the Learned. If they efteem'd them formerly, they are now of a contrary %fiem. 
Mind, and fet themfelves up for Authors. They love to be thought Inventors of fome new Opi- 
nions, thereby to procure Reputation in the World: and are well fatisfy'd, that by faying fbme- 
thing that was never faid before, they fhall not fail to have their Admirers. 

This fort of People are generally of a ftrong Imagination ; the Fibres of their Brain are in fuch 
a difpofition, as topreferve for a long time the Traces of what has been imprinted on them. Thus 
when once they have imagin'd a Syftem that has in it any thing of probability, 'tis impoffible to 
beat them out of it. Whatever any way makes for its confirmation, is moft heartily embrac'd 
and retain'd. And on the contrary, all the Objections that are made to it, are over-look'd j at leaft 
are eluded by fome frivolous Diftindtion. They are inwardly pleas'd with the fight of their own 
Workmanfhipi and of the Efteem, they hope, will redound to them from it. They only apply 
themfelves to confider the Image of Truth, deduc'd from their probable Opinions. They fix this 
Image ftedfaftly before their Eyes, but never behold with a fteddy View the other fides of their 
Sentiments, which would betray their Falfhood. 

There muft go great Qualifi cations, to capacitate a Man to be the Inventor of any true Syftem. 
For 'tis not enough to have a quicknefs of Parts ; there muft befides be a certain Capacioufnefs of 
Thoughts, and Reach of Mind, which can at one View take in a clear profpedt of a great many 
things. Little and narrow Minds with all their Vivacity and Delicacy, are too fhort-fighted 
to furvey all that is neceflary to be feen, for the eftablifhing a Syftem. They are check'd and 
even ftop'd with fome little Difficulties that difcourage them , or with fome glimmering Lights, 
which dazzle and carry them away : their Sight is too narrow to furvey at once the whole body of 
a capacious Subjedt. 

But however Capacious and Penetrating the Mind is, unlefs it be withal exempt from Paffion 
and Prejudice, there is no Good to be hoped from it. Prejudices take up one part of their 
Mind, and tinge and infect all the reft. The Paffions confound all the Idea's a thoufand ways ; and 
make us generally difcover in the Objedts, all that we have a mind to find in them. Even the 
Paffion, that we have for Truth, fometimes deceives us, when it is too vehement ; But the Am- 
bition to be thought Learned, is the great Impediment to our becoming really fo. 

Nothing then is more rare and extraordinary, than to find fuch Men as are capable of making 
new Syftems-, and yet nothing is more common than to find fuch, as have fram'd fome Syftem or 
other to their Humour. We fee few of thofe, who ftudy much, reafon upon common Notions-, 
there is ever fome Irregularity in their Idea's ; which is an evident fign they have fome particu- 
lar Syftem we are unaquainted with. 'Tis true, all the Books they compofe, do not favour of it. 
For when their Bufinefs is to write for the Publick, Men are more cautious of what they fay •, and 
a bare Attention is often enough to undeceive them. Yet we fee Books Publifh'd from time to 
time, which are a fufficient Proof of what I fay. And there are Perfons who are proud to let the 
World know at the beginning of their Book, that they are the Founders of fome new Syftem. 

The number of the Inventors of new Syftems is much increas'd by thofe, who have been pre- 
poflefs'd with any Author. For it often falls out, that having not met with Truth, nor any folid 
foundation in their Opinions of the Authors they have read ; they firft enter into a great DiC 
like, and an high Contempt of all forts of Books ; and thereupon fall to Imagining fome- proba- 
ble Opinion, which they hug and cherifh, and wherein they ftrengthen themfelves in the manner 
I have explain'd. 

But 



So' F. Malebranche Concerning Book II; 

But as foon as this Heat of Affeftion for any Opinion is boyl'd over and abated, or the 
Defign of Appearing in Publick has oblig'd them to examine it with a more exact and feriouS 
Attention- they difcover the Falfrfy of it, and throw it up-, but with this Condition, that 
they will never take up any other, but utterly condemn all thofe, who lhall pretend to the 
Difcovery of any Truth. . . . . : 

So that the laft and raoft dangerous Error, which Men of Study fall into, is their Imagining 
there can be nothing known. They have read many Books, both Ancient and Modern, and have 
milVd of Truth in them : They have had many fine Notions of their own, which they have 
II found to be falfe, after a more Uriel: and attentive Examination. From whence they conclude 
a Confider tnat all Men are like themfelves ; and that if thofe who fancy they have difcover'd fome Truths 
'ruble Er- foo^d ferioufly confider them j they would be undeceiv'd as well as themfelves. And this is 
' d or0)L M tU ' enough for them to condemn them, without making any more particular Enquiry ; becaufe if 
to en. ^^ ^.^ ^ con d emn them, it would be a kind of Confeffion, that they were wifer than them- 
felves ; a thing they cannot think very probable. 

They look therefore upon thofe as Bigotted to their own Thoughts, who give out any thing 
as certain and infallible : Nor will they fuffer a Man to talk of Sciences, as of Evident Truths, 
which cannot reafonably be doubted of j but only as of Opinions, of which it is good not to be 
ignorant. Yet thefe Gentlemen would do well to confider, that though they have read a great 
number of Books, yet they have not read all j or that they have not read them with all the Atten- 
tion, that was neceffary to a perfeft Underftanding of them. And that though they have had 
many fine Thoughts, which they have found falfe in the Conclufion, yet they have not had all 
that are poffible ; and fo 'tis no improbable thing, that others fhould have found better than 
themfelves. Nor is it necefTary, abfolately fpeaking, that others mould have greater Senfe than 
they, if that offends them \ for 'tis enough to have had greater Fortune. They need not be af- 
fronted to hear it faid, That others have Evident Knowledge of what they are Ignorant •, fince 
we fay at the fame time, that many Ages have been ignorant of the fame Truths : Not for want 
of excellent Wits ; but becaufe thefe excellent Wits have not luckily fall'n upon them. 
. Let them not be angry therefore, that a Man fees clearly,' and fpeaks as he fees ; but let them 
apply themfelves to what is faid to them, if their Minds be ftill capable of Application, after all 
their Excurfions ; and then let them judge if they pleafe. But if they will not examine it, let 
them hold their Tongue. But I would have them refled a little, whether that Anfwer fo readily 
made by them, to molt of the things demanded of them, No body Vnderftands it, No body knows 
how 'tis done, be not an injudicious Anfwer ? Since to anfwer fo, a Man mult of neceflity believe 
he knows all that all Men know, or all that is poffible to be known by them. For had they not this 
Notion of themfelves, their Anfwer would be Hill more impertinent. And why mould they be 
fo hard put to it, to fay they know nothing of them , fince in fome particular junctures, they ac- 
knowledge they know nothing at all? And why muft all Men be concluded Ignorant, becaufe they 
are inwardly convince! they are Ignorant themfelves ? 

There are then three forts of Perfons that apply themfelves to Study. The firft are fuch as are 
prepoiteroufly Bigotted to fome Author, or fome inlignificant or falfe Science : The fecond are 
fuch as are prepoffefs'd, and full with their own Fancies: The laft, which ufually proceed from 
the other two, are fuch as Imagine they know all that is poffible to be known ; and who fancying 
they know nothing with Certainty, conclude univerfally that nothing can be Evidently known, 
and regard all things that they hear, as bear Opinions. 

'Tis eafie to be feen that all the Faults, incident to thefe three forts of Men, depend on the 
Properties of the Imagination, explain'd in the X. and XI. Chapters, and efpecially of the Firft. 
That all this is owing to Prejudice, which choaks up their Minds, and makes them infenfible to all 
other Objects, but thofe they are prepoffefs'd with. It may be faid that their Prejudices do in 
their Minds, what theMinifters of Princes do in refpecl: of their Matters j for as thefe Gentlemen 
permit, as little as poffible, any others than thofe of their own Party and Intereft, or fuch as are 
unable to difplace them from their Matter's Favour, to come to the fpeech of them ; fo the 
Prejudices of the former fuffer not their Minds to take a full View of the pure and unmix'd Idea's 
of Objects. But they difguife them} they cloath them with their own Liveries ; and thus all 
mask'd and difcolour'd prefent them to the Mind : So that 'tis next to impoffible it fhould difcover, 
and throw off its Errors, 



CHAP, 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. 8 i 

C H A P. IX. 

I. Of Effeminate Minds. II. Of Superficial Minds. III. Of Men of 
Authority. IV. Of the Experimental Philofophers. 

I Have, if I miftake not, faid enough to difcover in general, what are the Faults of Imagina- 
tion j and the Errors whereunto Men of Books and Study are molt obnoxious. Now where- 
as there are few befides, who trouble their heads with Searching after Truth ; and the reft of 
the World take up with their Opinion :, it feems we might put an end here to this Second Part. 
However, 'tis not amifs to add fomething concerning the Errors of other Men -, as being no un- 
ufeful thing to take notice of them. 

Whatever flatters the Senfes, extreamly affect us \ and whatever affects us,makes us mind it in i. 
proportion to its affecting us. Thus thofe who refign themfelves up to all forts of molt Senli- of Effemi- 
ble and Pleafing Diverfions, are incapable of Penetrating into Truths ever fo little abltrufe and nm Mink 
difficult ; becaufe the Capacity of the Mind, which is not infinite, is fill'd up with their Pleasures ; 
or at leaft is very much divided by them. 

The generality of Great Men, of Courtiers, of Rich, and Young, and of thofe We call the fine 
Wits, giving themfelves to perpetual Diverfions, and ftudying only the Art of Pleafing, by all 
that gratifie the Concupifcence and the Senfes 5 by degrees obtain fuch a Nicenefs in thefe things, 
or fuch a Softnefs, that it may be often faid, they are rather the Effeminate, than the fine Wits, 
which they would fain be thought. There is a great deal of difference betwixt a true Finenefs, 
and Softnefs of Mind. Though thefe two things are ordinarily confounded. 

The Fine, or the Curious Wits are thofe whofe Reafon defcend to the leafl: Differences of 
things. Who fore-fee Effects which depend on hidden, un-ufual, and invifible Caufes. In brief, 
they are thofe who dive fartheft into the Subjects they confider. But the foft Minds have only a. 
counterfeit Delicacy and Nicenefs. They are neither Lively nor Piercing : They cannot fee the 
Effects of even the moll grofs and palpable Caufes. In fhort, they are unable to comprehend or 
penetrate any thing •, but are wonderfully nice as to Modes and Fafhions. An ungentile Word, 
a Ruftick Accent, or a little Grimace, fhall provoke them infinitely more than a confus'd mafs of 
lame and inconcluding Reafons. They cannot difcover the Defect of an Argument, but can cri* 
tieally difcern a falfe Step or an incompos'd Gefture. In a word, they have a perfect Underftan- 
ding of Senfible things, as having made continual ufe of their Senfes •, but have no true Know- 
ledge of things depending on Reafon, becaufe they have fcarce ever imploy'd their own. 

Yet thefe are the Men that flourifh moft in the Efteem of the World ^ and who moff. eafily ad- 
vance to the Reputation of the Fine Wits. For when a Man talks with a free and eafie Air •■, when 
his Expreffions are pure, and well chofen •, when he ferves himfelf with Figures that pleafe the 
Senfes, and excite the Paffions in an imperceptible manner j though what he fays be nothing but 
Impertinence and Folly, though there be nothing good or true in his Difcourfe, yet he fhall be 
voted by the common Opinion the Fine, the Curious, the Acute Wit. 'Tis not perceiv'd that 
this is only a Soft and Effeminate Mind, that glitters with falfe Lights, but never fhines out with 
a genuine Brightnefs \ that only perfwades becaufe we have Eyes,and not becaufe we have Reafon. 

For what remains, I do not deny but that all Men have a Tincture of this Infirmity we have 
now remark'd in fome part of them. There is no Man whofe Mind is not touch'd with the Im- 
preffions of his Senfes and Paffions - and confequently who has not fome Adherences to Senfible 
Manners. All Men differ in this but in degree of more or lefs. But the Reafon of charging this 
Fault upon fome particular Men, is, becaufe there are thofe who acknowledge it to be a Fault, 
and labour to correct it : Whereas the Men we have been fpeaking of, look upon it as a very ad- 
vantagious Quality : They are fo far from owning this falfe Delicacy as the Effect of an Effeminate 
Softnefs, and the Original of infinite Diftempers to the Mind, as to imagine it the Product and 
Sign of the Beauty and Excellency of their Genius. 

To thefe may be added a vaft number of Superficial Minds, who never go to the bottom of II. ' 
things •, and have but a confus'd Perception of the Differences between them ; but they are not in °f ^uperfi- 
the Fault, as are thofe before-mention'd •, for 'tis not their Divertifements that ftraiten their Souls cial ^i"^ s ' 
and make them little-minded \ but they are naturally fo. This Littlenefs of Mind proceeds not 
from the Nature of the Soul, as may perhaps be imagin'd. 'Tis effected Sometimes by the pau- 
city or dulnefs of the Animal Spirits, fometimes by an immoderate plenty of the Blood and Spi- 
rits, by the inflexibility of the Fibres of the Brain, or by fome other Caufe not neceffary to be 
known. 

There are then two forts of Minds. The one eafily obferves the differences of things ; and 
this is the folid Mind. The other imagines and fuppofes a refemblance between them, which is 
the fuperficial Character. The firfr. has a Brain fitly difpos'd for the Reception of the clear and 
diftinct Traces of the Objects it confidersj and becaufe 'tis very attentive to the Idea's of thefe 
Traces, it fees the Objects at hand, and furveys every part of them. But the Superficial Mind 
receives only the faint and confus'd Traces thereof} and that, by the by, very remotely and ob- 
fcurely •, infomuch that they appear alike, as the Faces of thofe we behold at too great a diftance \ 
becaufe the Mind ever fuppofes Similitude and Equality, where 'tis not oblig'd to acknowledge 
Difference and Inequality ; for the Reafons I fhall give in the Third Book, 

Y In 



g 3 Pi MAtEBiANCHE Concerning Book 1I 

In this Clafs may be reckon'd all your Publick Haranguers, and great Talkers -, arid many of 
thofe whoiiave a great Facility at delivering themfelves, though they fpeak but feldom. For 
'tis extreamly rare for Men of ferious Meditation, to be able to exprefs themfelves clearly upon, 
the things they have thought. They generally hefitate when they come to Difcourfe about them, 
as bein? fcrnpulous and fearful of ufing fuch Terms, as may excite a falfe Idea in the Hearers. 
Being aftiam'd to talk purely for Talking fake (asis the way with a great many who talk peremp- 
torily on all adventures.) They are at a lofs at finding words expreffive of their un-obvious and 
■ not common Thoughts. ' .'-.". 

III. Though I have the greateft Deference and Efteem imaginable for Pious Men, Divines, and 
of Men of Aged Perfons, and, in general, for all thofe who have defervedly a great Sway and Authority 
Anthony. over others \ yet I think my felf oblig'd to fay thus much of them, That it is ufual for them to 
think themfelves infallible, becaufe the World hears them with Refpeft \ that they exercife their 
Mind but little in difcovering Speculative Truths - y that they are too liberal in condemning what- 
ever their Pleafure and Humour fuggefts, before they have attentively confider'd it. Not that 
they are to be blam'd, for not applying themfelves to the Study of many Sciences, not veryne- 
ceflary for them to know ; we allow them to omit them, and likewife to defpife them ; but 
'tis not fair to judge of them out of a fanciful diflike, and ill-grounded fufpicions. For they ought 
to confider that the Serious Air and Gravity wherewith they fpeak, the Authority they have ob- 
tain'4 over the Minds of others, and that cuftomary way of confirming their Difcourfe with a 
Text" of Scripture, mult unavoidably engage in Error their refpedlful Auditors \ who being in- 
capable of Examining things to the bottom, are caught with Modes and external Appearances. 

When Error comes cloath'd in the Drefs of Truth, it frequently has more refpeft than Truth 
it felf: And this illegitimate Refpeft has very dangerous Confequences : Pefftma res eft Errorum 
Apotheofts, & pro pefte inteltetlus habenda eft ftvanis occedat veneratio. Thus when fbme Men out of 
a falfe Zeal, or a Fondnefs for their own Thoughts, bring the Holy Scripture to countenance or 
fupport falfe Principles of Phyficks, or other of like Nature, they are often attended to as Oracles, 
by the admiring Crowd, who credit them upon their word, becaufe of the Reverence they af- 
cribe to Divine Authority : Whtn at the fame time fome Men of a worfe Completion, have ta- 
ken occafion hereby to contemn Religion. So that by ftrangely perverting its Nature, Holy Scri- 
pture has been the Caufe of fome Men's Errors , and Truth has been the Motive and Original to 
other's Impiety. We fhould then be cautious, fays the fore-cited Author, of fearching after Dead 
things among the Living \ and of prefuming by our own Sagacity of Mind, to difcover in the 
Holy Scriptures, what the Holy Spirit has not thought fit to declare in it. Ex Bivinorum & Hu- 
manorum malefano admixtione, continues he, nonfolum educitur Philofophia phantaftica, fed etiam Reli- 
trio haretica. Itaq^falutare admodum eft ft mente fobria fidei tantum derttur qua fidei funt. All Men, who 
have any Authority over others, ought never to determine till they have fo much themSre feri- 
oufly confider'd, as their Determinations are more obftinately adher'd to \ and Divines fhould be 
more efpecially regardful, left they give fcandal and contempt to Religion, through a falfe Zeal, 
by an ambitious defire of their own Fame, and of giving Vogue to their Opinions. But it being 
not my Bufinefs to prefcribe to them their Duty, let them hearken to St. "Thomas Aquinas their 
opufi. 2. Mafter, who being confulted by his General for his Opinion touching fome Points, anfwers him in 
thefe words of St. Auftin. 

Multum autem nocet talia, qua ad pietatis doclrinam non fpeElant, vel offer ere vel negare, quaft perti- 
nent! a ad Sacram doclrinam. Dicit enim Auguftinus in 5. Confeff. Cum audio Chriftianum aliquemfra- 
trem ifta qua Philofophi de coelo aut ftellis Gr de Solis & Luna motibus dixerunt, nefcientem, & aliudpro 
aliofentientem, ,patienter intueor opinantem hominem 5 nee illi obeffe video cum de ff, Domine Creator om- 
nium noftrurn, non credat indiqna, ft forte fit us Gr habitus creature corporalis ignorct. Obeft autemft 
h&c ad ipfam doclrinam pietatis pertinere arbitretur, & pertinacius affirmare audeat quod ignorat. Quod 
aut em obftt manij "eft at Auguftinus in \. fuper Genef. Ad liter am. Turpe eft, inquit, nimis & pemiciofum 
ac maximc cavendum, ut Chriftianum de his rebus quafifecundum Chriftianas lit eras loquentem, it a deli- 
rare quilibet infidelis audiat, ut quemadmodum dicitur toto coelo err are confpiciens ; rifunt tenere vix poffit. 
Et non tamen mole ft um eft, quod errans homo vide at ur : fed quod Author es noftri ab eis qui for is funt, 
talia fenftffe creduntur & cum magno eorum exitio, de quorum falute fat ogimus, tanquam indotli repre- 
henduntur at que refpuuntur. Vnde mihi videtur tutius effe, ut hac qu& Philofophi communes fen ferunt, & 
noftra fidei non repugnant, nequc effe ftc offer enda, ut dogmata fidei, licet aliquando fub nomine Philofopho- 
rum introducantur, nequeftc effe neganda tanquam fidei contraria, ne fapientibus hujus mundi contemnendi 
doclrinam fidei, occafto pr&beatur: • 

'Tis a dangerous thing pofitively to determine concerning matters, that are not of Faith, as if 
they were: St. Auftin is our Author for it, in the fifth Book of his Confcffwm : " When I fee 
c (fays he) a Chriftian, who is un-inftrufted in the Opinions of Philofophers about the Heavens, 
" the Stars, and the Motion of the Sun and Moon, and who miftakes one thing for another ; I 
" I leave him to his Opinions and Uncertainties. Nor do I fee what injury it can do him (pro- 
** vided he has right Notions of Thee our LORD and CREATOR) to be ignorant, of the 
1 Site and Pofition of Bodies, and the different Regulations of Material Beings. But he does 
• himfelf wrong, in that he fancies thefe things concern Religion, and takes upon him obftinate- 
1 ly to affirm what he does not underftand. The fame Holy Man explains his Thoughts more clear- 
ly yet, in his firft Book of the literal Expofition of Genefts, in thefe Words. " A Ghriftian fhould 
" be extreamly cautious of fpeaking of thefe things, as if they were the Dodrinc of the Sacred 

Writings ; 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. 8| 

f e Writings j fince an Heathen vvho fhould hear him utter his Abfurdities, that had no appearance 
"of Truth, would Ridicule him for it. Thus the Chriftian would be put in confufion, and the 
" Heathen but ill-edify'd. Yet that, which on thefe occafions is matter of greatefi trouble, is, not 
" that a Man is found in an Error ; but that the Heathens, whom we labour to convert,falfely,and 
" to their unavoidable deftruction, imagining that our Authors abound with thefe" ridiculous 
" Notions, condemn them, and fpurn them as Ignorant and Unlearned •, which makes me think 
" it much the fafer way, not to affirm as the Maxims of Faith, the common receiv'd Opinions 
tc of Philosophers, though not inconfiftent with them, ('though the Authority of Philosophers may 
" fometimesbe us'd to make way lor their reception,) nor to reject their Opinions as contrary 
" to Faith, left occafion be given to the Wife Men of the World, to contemn the Sacred Truths 
tc of the Chriftian Religion. * 

The generality of Men are fo carelefs.or urireafonablc, as to make no diftin&ion between the 
Word of GOD and that of Men, when joyn'd together. So that they fall into Error, by ap- 
proving them both alike ; or into Irreligion by the contempt of both indifferently. 'Tis ealle 
to fee what is the Caufe of thefe laft Errors, and how p they depend upon the Connexion of Idea's, 
explain'd in the XI. Chapter , and I need not ftaud more largely to explain them. 

It feems feafonable to fay fomething here of the Chymifis, and of all thofe in general that im- f J V " 
ploy their time in making Experiments. Thefe are the Men that are in Search after Truth : Their ^1" Ex- 
Opinions are ufually embrae'd without Scruple and Examination. And thus their Errors are fa perimentsi 
much the more dangerous, as they are communicated to others with greater Facility. 

The Study of Nature is undoubtedly more Noble, than of Books ; Vifible and Senfible Experi- 
ments afford us much more certain Proofs of things, than the Reafonings of Men ; and no Obje- " 
ction can be made to thofe Men, whofe Circumftances of Life have engag'd them in the Study of 
Natural Philofophy, for endeavouring to excel in it, by making continual Experiments ; provided 
their greateft Application be made to the more neceflary Sciences. We find no fault with Ex- 
perimental Philofophy, nor the Improvers of it} but only with their Defects. 

The firft of which is, that ufually 'tis not the Light of Reafon which conducts them in the 
Method of their Experiments, but only Chance. Which is the reafon that they grow little more 
Learned or Skilful, after having wafted much of their Time and Fortune therein. 

The fecond is their infilling rather upon Curious and Extraordinary Experiments, than ori 
thofe that are more Common •, when 'tis plain that the Commoner being the more fimple, they 
ought firft to be dwelt upon, before a Man applies himfelf to the more Compounded, and to thofe 
which depend upon a multitude of Caufes. 

The third is their earneft and diligent Search after Profitable Experiments •, and their neglect 
of thofe, which only ferve to illuminate the Mind. 

The fourth, that they are too un-exad in their Obfervations of all the particular Circumftan- 
ces of Time, Place, the Quality of the Drugs made ufe of; though the leaft of thefe Circum- 
ftances is capable of fruftrating the defir'd Effect. For 'tis obfervable that the Terms the V~mnofi 
ufe, are Equivocal : The Word Wine, for inftance, fignifies fo many different things, as there 
are different Soils, various Seafons, and feveral ways of making and preferving it. So that it 
may be faid in general, there are no where two Veffels of it altogether alike. And when a 
Chymisl fays, To make fuch an Experiment, take wine, we have but a very confus'd Idea of his 
meaning. For which Reafon they fhould ufe a moft exact Circumfpection jn Experiments, and 
notdefcend to the Compound fort, till they are very well acquainted with the more Simple and 
Ordinary. 

The fifth is, That they make too many Deductions from a fingle Experiment ; when on the 
contrary, to the Eftablifhing any one good Conclufion, there fhould go generally many Experi- 
ments. Though a fingle Experiment may be affiftant to the inferring many Conclufions. 

Laftly, The moft part of Naturalists and Chymifts confider only the particular Effects of Na- 
ture. They never afcend up to the firft Notions of the Things Bodies are compos'd of. When 
yet it is moft certain we can have no clear and diftinct knowledge of any particular Phenomena, 
unlefs we are firft mafters of the moft general Principles, and run them up as high as Metaphy- 
fich. To conclude, they commonly want Courage and Conftancy, and are tir'd and difcourag'd 
with the Toil and Expence. There are many other Faults thefe Gentlemen are fubject to, but I 
defign not to reckon them all up. 

The Caufes of thefe Faults which I have remark'd, are the want of Application j the Proper-* 
ties of the Imagination explain'd in the Tenth and Eleventh Chapters ; and Men's judging of the 
Difference of Bodies, and the Changes they undergo, only from the Senfations they have of them 3, 
according to the Explication given in the Firft Book. 



The 



84. F. M a l e b r a n c h e Concerning Book II, 



The THIRD PART: 
Concerning 

The CONTAGIOUS COMMUNICATION 

Of Strong Imaginations. 



C H A P I. 

I. Of the Difpofition we have to imitate others in all things, which is the Ori- 
ginal of the Communication of thofe Error s^ that depend on the Power of 
Imagination. II. Two things that more efpecially increafe this Difpofition. 
III. What that flrong Imagination is. IV. That there are federal kinds 
of it. Of Fools, and of thofe that have a Srong Imagination, in the Senfe 
'tis here taken. V. Two considerable Imperfetfions of Men of a Strong 
Imagination. VI. Of the Power they have to ferfwade r and impofe on 
others. 



H 



A V I N G already explain'd the Nature of the Imagination, the Failings it is fubj'eft 
to, and Ihewn how our own Imagination engages us in Error ; all that remains in this 
Second Book, is to fpeak to the Contagious Communication of Strong Imaginations^ I mean 
that Sway and Power Ibme Minds have of drawing others into their Errors. 
L Strong Imaginations are wondrouily contagious : They domineqr over the weaker, fafhion 

of the Dif- them by degrees after their own Image, and imprint the fame Chara&ers upon them. And there- 
pofuion we fore fince Men of Conceit, and of a Vigorous and Strong Imagination, are the leaft reafonable 
bivetoimi- { anv . there are very few Caufes of the Errors of Men, more nniverfal than this dangerous 
foaSthiZs Communication of the Imagination. 

which utte In order to conceive what this Contagion is, and how it's tranfmitted from one to another, 
original of we muft know that Men are under a mutual neceffity of one another's Afliftance, and are fb 
theCnmmu- f ra m'd as out of many Bodies to compound one, whereof all the Parts have, a mutual Correfpon- 
"thofcEr- dence. F° r tne preferving and cherifliing of which Union, GOD commanded them to have Charity 
ron, that f° r eacn other. But whereas Self-love might by little and little extinguifh Charity, and break the- 
depend on Bond of Civil Society j GOV thought fit for the Prefervation of it, to unite Men more firmly 
the rower ft{\\ D y Natural Ties, which might fubfift in cafe Charity fhould fail, and alfo defend it againflf 

ttiolf' the attacks of Self-love. 

Thefe Natural Ties, which we have in common with Beafts, confift in a certain' Difpofition' 
of Brain, which makes all Men prone to imitate the Actions of thofe they converle with, to 
frame the fame Judgments with them, and to be a&ed with like Paflions they fee them poflefs'd 
with. Which Difpofition is a much ftraiter Obligation to bind them to each other, than Charity 
founded upon Reafon, this Charity being rarely to be met with. 

Now when a Man wants this Difpofition of Brain, whereby he may be affefted with our Sen- 
timents and Paflions, he is Naturally incapable of uniting and making up one Body with us. He 
may be compar'd to thofe Irregular Stones that cannot be plac'd in a Building, becaufe they can- 
not be joyn'd with the others. 

Oderitnt hilarem trifles^ trifiemque jocofi 7 
Sedatum .celereSj agilem gnaviimqne remtffi. 

'Tis a more confiderable Vertue than is imagin'd, to keep fair with thofe who are untouch'd 
with our Paflions, and whofe Notions are contrary to our own. And we fhall have Reafoa to 
think fo, if we conhder that 'tis a kind of Infulting, when we fee a Man that has juft caufe of 
Sorrow or Joy, not to take part with him in his Sentiments. When a Man is ia Sorrow, one 
fhould not come before him with a Gay and Airy look ; which befpeaks Joy, and violently im- 
prints the Motions thereof in his Imagination. This being to difturb him from theftate that 
is moft convenient and pleafaut to him ; for forrow is the pleafanteft of all the Paffions, to a Man 
under any Afflidion. 

There 



Chap. I. The Search after Truth. 85 

There is then a certain Difpoiition of Brain in all Men whatever, which naturally inclines them H» 
to conform and adapt themfelves to the Manners of thofe they live with. Which Difpofition ^things 
has two more principal means to cherifh and augment it; one whereof is in the Soul, and the" dLrfgfy' 
other in the Body. The former primarily confifts in the Inclination all Men have for Eminen- increafethe 
cy and Greatnefs : Which Inclination is a fecret Spur and Incitement to our Talking, Walking, Difpofition 
Drefling, and Deporting our felves like Men of Rank and Quality. This is the Origine of the V e have *° 
New Modes, of the Inconftancy and Flux of the prefent Languages, and of certain general \™™[ e °' 
Corruptions of Manners. In fhort, this is the principal Source of all thofe ftrange and extrava- 
gant Novelties, which have no Foundation in the Reafon, but only in the Humour of Men. 

The other means that augment this our Imitative Difpofition, and which is the Matter chiefly 
to be fpoke to in this place, confifts in a certain Impreffion, which Men of a ftrong Imagination 
make upon weak Minds, and delicate and tender Brains. 

By the ftrong and vigorous Imagination, I mean that Conftitution of Brain, which makes it JL II# , 
capable of very deep Impreflions ; which fo take up the Capacity of the Soul, as not to fuffer her strong* /- 
to attend to other things, befides thofe reprefented by thefe Images. maginatim 

Now there are two forts of Perfons who have a ftrong Imagination in this Senfe explain'd. The »• 
one receive thefe deep Traces by a diforderly and involuntary Impreffion of the Animal Spirits; IV - 
and the other, which I defign more particularly to treat of, receive them through the Difpofition J^, 
incident to the Subftance of their Brain. 

'Tis plain that the former are abfolutely Fools, fince they are oblig'd by the Natural Union 
between their Traces and Idea's, to think of things that others they converfe with, do not think 
of; which incapacitates them from fpeaking pertinently to the thing in hand, and making a futa- 
ble Anfwer to the Queftions that are ask'd them. 

Of thefe there are infinite forts, that differ 6nly in degree ; amongft which may be reckon'd 
all fuch as are acted without any violent Paffion, fince in the time of their Perturbation, the Ani- 
mal Spirits fo forcibly imprint the Traces and Images of their Paffion, that they are unable to 
think of any thing elfe. 

But 'tis to be obferv'd, that the Imagination of the weakeft Minds, and the moft foft and ten- 
der Brains that be, are not in danger of being corrupted by this fort of People, for two very 
good Reafons. The firft is, that being unable to conform their Anfwers to the Idea's of others, 
they are as unable to perfwadethem to any thing; and thefecond is, that their Difcourfe is al- 
ways heard with contempt, upon the account of fo vifible a Diforder in their Brain. 

'Tis true however, that Men in a Paffion infect the Spectators with the fame ; and ftrike their 
Imagination with Impreflions like to thofe they feci themfelves. But becaufe the outrage is fb 
vifible, the Impreflions it makes are refilled, and a little time will quite difcard them. They 
wear off of themfelves, when no longer fed and fupply'd, by the Caufe that produc'd them ; that 
is, when the tranfported Perfon is out of fight, and the fenfible View of the Features the Paffion 
drew upon the Face, produces no more alterations in the Fibres of our Brain, nor Agitations in 
our Animal Spirits. 

My Defign is only to examine that fort of ftrong and vigoious Imagination, which confifts in a 
Difpofition of Brain fit and proper to receive very deep Impreflions, from the weakeft and leaft- 
adtive Objefts. 

'Tis no Imperfection to have a Brain difpos'd for the Imagining things ftrongly, and receiving 
moft diftinct and lively Images of the moft inconfiderable Objects ; provided the Soul ftill fuper- 
intends the Imagination, and thefe Traces be imprinted by her Orders, and expung'd by her 
Commands: 'Tis, on the contrary, the Original of Subtilty and Strength of Wit. But when 
the Imagination lords it over the Soul, and thefe Traces, without ftaying for the Orders of the 
Will, are ftamp'd by the Difpofition of the Brain, by the A&ion of Objects and the Animal Spi- 
rits, 'tis manifeftly a bafe and mifchievous Quality, and a kind of Madnefs. Let us try to difco- 
ver their Character, whofe Imagination is wrought in this manner. 

And in order to this, it ought to be re-minded, that the Capacity of the Mind is very narrow, 
and that there is nothing fo cumberfom, as I may fay, or fo foon takes it up, as the Senfations of 
the Soul, and, in general, all the Perceptions of Obje&s that vehemently afFed us ; and that the 
deep Traces of the Brain are ever attended with Senfations or other Perceptions, which challenge 
a great Application of Mind. In remembring this, 'twill be eafie to lay open the Minds of Men 
of ftrong Imagination, and to difcover their real Characters. 

The firft whereof is their Incapacity to judge prudently of things any whit difficult and intri- V. 
cate ; becaufe the extent of their Minds, being fill'd with Idea's naturally annex'd to thefe deep J TO0 cov fi' 
Traces, they are not at liberty of thinking on many things at the fame time: When as in Com- J^i/^" 
pound Queftions, the Mind, by a quick and defultory Motion, muft run over the Idea's of a great of Men of 
many things, andfurvey, at one View, all the Relations and Dependencies, that necefTarily go a strong i- 
to the Refolution of the Queftions. maginatien 

Every one is confeious from his own Experience^ how impoffible it is to contemplate any ab- 
ftraft Truth, when he is under the Senfe of Pain, that is any thing violent ; the reafon whereof 
is, that the deep Traces then printed on the Brain, pofTefs the Capacity of the Mind. Thus 
thofe we are fpeaking of, having, as his fuppos'd, deeper Traces of the fame Objedts than others, 
muft have a Mind of narrower Bounds, and incapable of embracing fo many things. The firft 
Defect therefore of thefe Men, is their having a little Mind, and fo much the lefs, as their Brain 
receives deeper Traces from fuch Objects as are lefs confiderable. • 

Z The 



86 K Malebranche Concerning Book If; 

The fecond is their being Fifionifis, but in fo fubtile and delicate a way, as his hard to be 
difcover'd : and which makes the common fort of Men not think them fo : And 'tis only the ac- 
curate and clear-lighted Minds, that are apprehenfive of their Vifions, and theramblings of their 
Fancy. 

For the underftanding the Original of this Defect, we mult farther call to Mind what has beeii 
faid at the beginning of the Second Book -, that in regard of what happens in the Brain, the Sen- 
fes and Imagination differ only in degree of more or lefs ; and that 'tis the largenefs and depth of 
the Traces that makes the Soul fenfible of Objects •, makes her judge them as prefent, and in capa- 
city to affed her ^ and laftly, near enough to her, to make her feel Pleafure and Pain : For when 
the Traces are little, the Soul only imagines the Obje&s of them ; fhe judges it not as prefent, 
nor looks upon it as very great and confiderable : But in proportion as thefe Traces grow larger 
and deeper, the Soul judges the Object to be bigger and more confiderable, that it approaches 
nearer to us, and, in conclnfion, is capable of touching and hurting us. 

The Vifimists I fpeak of are not arriv'd to that high degree of Madnefs, as to believe they fee 
before their Eyes the Objects that areabfent: The Traces of their Brain are not fo deep as that 
comes to : They are not fo thorow-pac'd finilh'd Madmen •, for if they were, it would be in vain 
to talk of them here, fince their Dilufions would be fo vifible, that no Man could be impos'd oa 
by them, They are not Fifionifis of Senfe therefore, but of Imagination only. Madmen and 
Phrenticksare Fifionifis of the former fort, for that they fee not things as they are, and frequently 
fee thofe that are not. But owFifiomfis are of the latter fort, fince they Imagine things quite other- 
wife than they are, and Imagine likewife thofe that are not. And yet 'tis evident that the Fifionifis 
of Senfe, differ from the Fifionifis of the Imagination only Secundum plus & minus ; and the paf- 
fage is frequent from one Condition to the other. For which reafon we Ihould reprefent the di- 
ftemper'd Mind of the latter, by comparing it with that of the former ; as being of a more len- 
fible Nature, and making greater Impreffion on the Soul, fince in things that differ thus only in 
degree, thofe that are lefs Senfible ought to be exprefs'd by Analogy to thofe that are 
more fo. 

Thefecond Imperfection then, as has been feen, of Men of a Strong and Vigorous Imagina- 
tion, is their being Fifionifis of Imagination, or fimply Fifionifis : fince the Fifionifis of Senfe go by 
the Name of Madmen. I come now to fhew the ill Qualities of thefe Fifionary Wits. 

They exceed all Bounds, and keep no Mean upon any occafion, hightning what is low and 
mean, and magnifying what is little, and bringing clofe what's remote ; fince nothing appears to 
them as it is. They admire or exclaim at every thing indifferently, without Judgment and 
Difcretion. If their Natural Completion difpofes them to Fear ; I mean if their Animal Spirits 
be few in number, weak and unactive, they fhall be frighted at the leaft thing in Nature, and 
tremble at the fall of a ■ Leaf. Whereas if they abound with Blood and Spirits, the more com- 
mon thing of the two, they fhall feed upon empty hopes •, and giving themfelves up to their luxu- 
riant Imaginations, build (as we fay) Caftlesinthe Air,with a mighty Joy and Satisfaction. They 
are vehement in their Paffions, head-ftrong in Opinions, and ever well fatisfy'd with themfelves* 
But when once they are ambitious of being look'd upon as the Wits of the Age, and fet up for 
Authors, (for there are Authors of all forts, Fifionifis and others j) Good God ! what Extrava- 1 
gancies, Whimfies, and Irregular Motions do we fee ! wherein Nature has nothing to do, where 
all is Affected, forc'd, and Bombaftic. They never ftir but they are upon the Prance, every 
Step muff, be in Time and Meafure, and all proceeds in Figures and Hyperboles. If again the 
Humour takes them to be Religious, and their own Fancies be their Guide, they turn abfolutely 
Jews and Pharifees ; flicking ufually to the Surface and Shadow ; and being wholly taken up with 
the out-fide Ceremonies, and little Practices of fmall or no importance. Hence they become 
Scrupulous, Timorous, and Superftitious ; to whom every thing is Faith, every thing Eflential, 
except that which is truly Faith and Effential. For the molt material and weighty things of the 
Gofpel, Jufiice, Mercy and Faith, are frequently neglected ; whilft their Mind is entertain'd 
(with their Tithing Mint and Cummim) i. e. with the lefs important Duties of Religion : But here 
the Subject grows too plentiful, and there is no need of making farther Reflection than on what 
occurs in their ordinary Converfations, to be fatisfy'd of thefe Failings, and to obferve feveral 
others. 

But Men of a ftrong and vigorous Imagination have ftill other Qualities, very neceffary to be 

throughly explain'd, For hitherto we have treated only of their Defects, and we fhould do them 

Juftice now in fpeaking of their Advantages ; one whereof,among the reft,more efpecially belongs 

to our Subject ; becaufe it is upon the Strength of that they domineer over the Vulgar fort of 

Minds ; they enter them into their Thoughts, and communicate all the falfe Impreflions to them, 

which themfelves are affected withal. 

j This Advantage confifls in a Facility of Exprefling themfelves in a ftrong and lively, though 

That Men unnatural, manner. Such as Imagine things ftrongly, exprefs them with much vehemence, and 

efa Strong perfwade all thofe that are convinc'd, more by the fenfible Manner and Impreffion, than by the 

Jmagina- force of Argument : For the Brains of Men of Strong Imaginations receiving, as has been laid, 

tion ej/f/^deep Impreflions of the Subjects they imagine, thefe Impreflions are naturally purfued by a great 

l>erjwatte. c ommot i on of the Spirits, which difpofes their whole Body to fet off their Thoughts in a ready 

and lively manner of Expreflion. The Air of the Face, the Tone of the Voice, the Elegancy of 

their Words animating their Expreflions, prepare the Spectators and Hearers for Attention, and 

difpofc them to a Machinal Reception of the Image imprinted by the Speakers. For, in fine, 

when 



Chap. II. The Search after Truth. 87 

when a Man is affected with what he fays, he generally affe&s others with it too ; as a Man in a 
Paffion never fails to be moving : Though his Rhetoric be Inartificial and Irregular, yet he is 
fure of gaining his point, becaufe the Air and External Demeanour ftrike upon the Senfes - 7 and 
act in a livelier way on the Imagination, than the molt powerful Difcourfes coldly pronounc'd : 
Forafmuch as thefe Difcourfes don't gratifie the Senfes, nor affect, the Imagination. 

Thefe Men then have the Advantage of Pleafing, Moving, and Perfwading; becaufe of their 
Imaging their Thoughts in a moft lively and fenfible manner : Though there be other Caufes 
contributing to the Conqueft they obtain over the Minds of others. For they moll commonly 
Difcourfe upon obvious and eafie Subjects, and fuited to Vulgar Capacities. Then they only- 
make ufe of fuch Terms and Expreffions as raife the confus'd Notions of the Senfes, which are 
ever very Strong and Pathetical; and when they treat of Lofty and Difficult Subjedts, 'tis in a 
loofe and common-place way, without venturing a Difcuffion of Particulars, and fixing to Prin- 
ciples ; whether becaufe they underftand not thefe Points, or are fearful of being at a lofs for 
Terms, or of perplexing or tiring the Minds of fuch as are not capable of much Attention. 

And now we may readily judge from what has been faid, that the Diforders of the Imagination 
are extreamly contagious, and that they iniinuate and diffufe themfelves into molt Minds with a 
great deal of eafe : But whereas thofe who are of a Strong Imagination, are generally Enemies to 
Reafon, and irreconcilable to good Senfe :, becaufe of the littlenefs of their Minds, and the Vi- 
fions they are fubjeft to; 'tis manifeft to be feen there are few more general Caufes of our Er- 
rors, than this contagious Communication of the Diforders and Diftempers of the Imagination : 
But thefe Truths deferve to be farther Illuftrated by the Examples, and known Experience of 
the World. 



• CHA P. II. 

General Infiances of the Strength of Imagination. 

CHILDREN in refpedt of their Fathers, but efpecially Daughters in regard of their Mo- 
thers, afford us very frequent Inftances of this Communication of the Imagination : The 
fame things do Servants in relation to their Mafters, Maids in refpect of their Miflreffes, 
Scholars of their Teachers, Courtiers of their Kings, and generally all Inferiours in refpedt of 
their Superiours ; fuppofing only that Fathers, Mailers, and the reft of the Superiours have any 
Strength of Imagination themfelves. For otherwife 'tis poffible for Children and Servants to 
remain untouch'd, or very little infe&ed, with the languid Imagination of their Fathers and 
Mafters. 

The EfTe&s of this Communication may be likewife obferv'd in Equals ; but that more rarely, 
for want of that fubmiflive Refpedt among them, which qualifies and difpofes the Mind for the 
Reception of the Impreffions of ftrong Imaginations, without examining them : Laftofall, they 
are to be feen in Superiours alfo, with refpect to their Inferiours, who fometimes are impower'd 
with fo Lively and Authoritative an Imagination, as to turn the Minds of their Mafters and Supe- 
riours which way they pleafe. 

'Twill be eafie to conceive how Fathers and Mothers make fo very ftrong Impreffions on the 
Imagination of their Children, if it be confider'd, that the Natural Difpofitions of our Brain, 
whereby we are inclin'd to imitate thofe we live with, and to participate of their Sentiments 
and Paffions, are ftronger in Children with refpect to their Parents, than in any others; whereof 
feveral Reafons may be given. The firft is their being of the fame Blood : For as Parents com- 
monly tranfmit to their Children the Seeds and Difpofitions for certain Hereditary Diftempers; 
fuch as the Gout, Stone, Madnefs; and generally all thofe that were not of Accidental Acquire- 
ment, or whofe fole and only Caufe was not fome extraordinary Fermentation of the Humours, 
as Fevers and fome others ; f for of fuch 'tis plain there can be no Communication ) So they 
imprint the Difpofitions of their own Brain on the Brain of their Children, and give a cer- 
tain Turn to their Imagination, that makes them wholly fufceptible of the fame Senti- 
ments. 

The fecond Reafon is the little Acquaintance and Converfe Children generally have with other 
Men, who might fometimes ftamp different Impreffes on their Brain, and, in fome meafure, in- 
terrupt the bent and force of the Paternal Impreffion. For as a Man, that was never abroad, 
commonly Fancies that the Manners and Cuftoms of Strangers are quite contrary to Reafon, be- 
caufe contrary to the ufage of his Native Town, or Cuftom of his Country, whilft he yields to be 
carry'd by the current ; fo a Child, who was never from his Father's Home, imagines his Parents 
Sentiments and Ways of Living to be Univerfal Reafon, or rather thinks there are no other Prin- 
ciples of Reafon or Vertue to be had, befides the Imitation of them. Which makes him believe, 
whatever he hears them fay •, and do, whatever he fees them do. 

But this Parental Impreffion is fo ftrong, as not only to influence the Child's Imagination, but 
to have its Effect, on the other parts of the Body. So that a young Lad fhall Walk and Talk, 
and \have the fame Geftures as his Father: And a Girl fhall Mimick the Mother in her Gate, 
Difcourfe, and Drefs; If the Mother Lifps, the Daughter muft Lifp too ; if the Mother has any 

odd 



88 F. Malebranche Concerning Book II. 

odd fling with her Head, the Daughter takes the fame : In ihort, Children imitate their Parents 
in every thing, even in their Bodily Defeds, Grimace, and Faces, as well as their Errors, and 

Vices. 

There are ftill many other Caufes, which add to the EfFed of this Imprefllon. The chief 
of which are, the Authority of the Parents, the Dependence of Children, and the mutual Love 
- between them : But thefe Caufes are as common to Courtiers, Servants, and, in general, to all 
Inferiours, as to Children ; I therefore choofe to explain them by the Inftance of the Court- 
Gentlemen. 

There are thofe who judge by what's in fight, of that which is unapparent ; of the Greatnefs, 
Strength, and Reach of Wit, and Parts, which they fee not; by the Gallantry, Honours, and 
Riches which they know ; and meafure the one by the other : And that Dependency Men are in 
to the Great, the Defire of partaking of their Greatnefs, and that fenfible Luftre that furrounds 
them, makes themafcribe Honours Divine, if I may fo fpeak, to Mortal Men. For GOD be- 
llows on Princes Authority, but Men attribute to them Infallibility : Such an Infallibility as has no 
Boundaries prefcrib'd to it, on any fubjed, or any occafion, nor is confin'd to certain Ceremo- 
nies. For the Great know all things naturally ; they are ever in the Right, even in the Decifion 
of Queftions which they do not underftand: None attempt to examine their Pofitions, but thofe 
who want Experience and the Art of Living ; and 'tis Prefumption 2nd want of Refped to doubt 
of them. But 'tis no lefs than Rebellion, at leaft down-right Folly, Sottiflinefs, and Madnefs 
to condemn them. 

But when we are Honour'd with a Place in the Favour and Efteem of Great Men, 'tis no longer, 
plain Obftinacy, Conceitednefs, and Rebellion ; 'tis a Crime of a deeper dye ; Ingratitude, and 
Perfidioufnefs, not to furrender implicitly to their Opinions. 'Tis fuch an unpardonable Offence 
as utterly incapacitates us for any of their future Favours. Which is the Reafon that Courtiers, 
and by a neceflary confequenee, the generality of the World, indeliberate! y fubfcribe to the Sen- 
timents of their Sovereign, even fo far as to Model their Faith by, and make the Truths of Reli- 
gion fubfervient to his Fantaftic Humour and Folly. ' 

England and Germany furnifh us but with too many Inftances, of the blind and exorbitant Sub- 
miflion of the People to the Wilkof their Irreligious Princes, wherewith the Hiilories of the late 
Times abound : And fome Men of a confiderable Age, have been known to have chang'd their 
Religion four or five times, by reafon of the diverfe changes of their Princes. 
. Artie. 07. The Kings and even the Queens of England have the Government of all the States of their Kingdoms^ 
of the' Reli- whether Ectlefiaftical or Civil in all Caufes. 'Tis they that are the Approvers of the Liturgies, of 
gion of the the Feftival Services, of the way wherein the Sacraments ought to be Adminiitred and Received. 
church of They appoint, for inftance, that our LORD fhall not be adored in the Eucharisl, though they 
England. |jjjg e t0 tne Receiving it on the Knees, according to the Ancient Cuftom. In a word, they 
arbitrarily change the whole Subftance of their Liturgies, to fuit them to the New Articles of 
their Faith ; and together with their Parliament, have equal Right of judging of thefe Articles, 
as a Pope with a Councel ; as may be feen in the Statutes of England and Ireland, made at the begin- 
ning of the Reign of Queen Elizabeth. Laftly, we may add that the Kings of England have a 
greater Jnrifdidion over the Spirituals, than the Temporals of their Subjects; becaufe thofe 
wretched People, thofe Children of this World, are lefs concerned for the Prefervation of their 
Faith, than the Security of their Fortunes-, and readily embrace the Opinions of then; Princes, 
when their Temporal Interelt ftands not in the way. 

The Revolutions which have happen'd to Religion in Sweden and Denmark, may ferve as a 
.farther Evidence of the Power fome Minds have over others ; though indeed ail thofe Revolu- 
tions were contributed to, by many other very confiderable Caufes. Which furprizing Changes 
are fo many Proofs of the Contagious Communication of the Imagination, but Proofs too vaft 
and mighty ; and fuch as confound and dazle the Mind, rather than enlighten it ; becaufe 
there are too many Caufes concurring to the Production of thefe great Events. When Cour- 
tiers, and all Men elfe, fo commonly give up the Intereft of Infallible Truths, Elfential Truths; 
Truths that are neceflary to be aflerted, unlefs a Man refolve upon Everlafting Deftrudion: How 
can it be expected they fhould run any hazard in the Defence of Abftrad Truths of as little 
Certainty, as they are of life ? If the Religion of the Prince makes the Religion of his Subjeds ; 
the Reafon of the Prince will be the Reafon of his Subjeds too ; and fo the Sentiments of the 
Prince, his Pleafures, his Paflions, his Sports, his Habit, and generally all his Adions will be 
A-la-mode : For the Prince himfelf being as the Original and Eflential Mode, nothing that is 
derived from him will be out of Fafhion : And iince all the Irregularities of the Fafhion be- 
come Graces and Beauties, 'tis no wonder that Princes ad fo forcibly on the Imagination of 
other Men, 

It Alexander holds his Head awry, his Courtiers will have theirs in the fame Poflure ; If Dio- 

nyfiw the Tyrant apply himfelf to Geometry upon Plato's Arrival in Syracufe, Geometry grows the 

Study^ of the Court; and the King's Palace, fays Plutarch, is prefently fill'd with dull, by the 

Plutarch. va ^ numucr of thofe that are drawing Figures in it. But as foon as Plato is difguftcd with the 

Mor. /aw Tyrant, and the Tyrant dillikinghis Study betakes himfelf afrefti to his Pleafures: ThcCour- 

10 dijim- tiers turn Voluptuaries to accompany him. " One would think, continues that Author, they 

tiuijh the « were enchanted, and that fome Cine had Metamorphos'd them into other Men. Their Aflc&ioo 

frmtbe for ph;io f°P h y grows into an Afledionror Debauchery; and their Abhorrence of Debauchery, iato 

Friend. tne Abhorrence of Philoji/phy. And thus Princes can change Vices into Vermes, and Vertue* 

into 



Chap. II. The Search after Truth. 8<? 

into Vices \ and one word of their Mouth is able to reverfe all the Idea's of them, die Royal 
Word or Gefture, a Frown or a Lip, fhall debafe true Science and Learning, into Pedantry \ en- 
title Rafhnefs, Brutality, and Cruelty, to the repute of Valour and Greatnefs of Courage ; and 
make Libertinifm and Profanenefs, pafs for Force and Liberty of Thought. 

But this, as all that I have been faying, fuppofes that Princes have a Strong and Lively Imagi- 
nation ; fince if it were Weak and Languishing, they could not Animate their Difcouvfe, nor give 
it that lively Turn and Vehemence, requifite to Mailer and Inflave the weaker Minds. 

And now if the Imagination all alone, and unaffifted with the fupplies of Reafon, can produce 
fo furprizing EfFe&s ; there is nothing fo Fantaftical or Extravagant, but it will perfwade, when 
back'd and fupported with any apparent Reafons. Here are fome proofs of it. 

'Tis related by an Ancient Author, That 'in Ethiopia the Courtiers Crippl'd and Deform'd Diodor. 
themfelves, lop't off a Limb or two, and fometimes eyen died, to imitate their Princes. 'Twas Sicui.BibL 
as fcandalous to be feen with a Pair of Eyes, or to walk upright in the Retinue of a Crooked and L i b - 3- 
One-ey'd King ; as it would be ridiculous to appear at Court now a-days in Ruffs and Caps, Or 
in white Buskins and gilded Spurs. This Ethiopian Fafhion was as Extravagant and incommo- 
dious, as can be imagin'd •, but yet it was the Fafhion: It was cheerfully follow'd by the Court, 
and the Pain to be indur'd was lefs thought on, than the Honour a Man purchas'd by manifeft- 
ing fo generous an Affection for his King : In lhort, this Mode, when fupported by a pre- 
tended Reafon of Friendfhip, grew up into a Cuftom and a Law, that obtain'd a considerable 
Time. 

We learn from the Relations of thofe who have travelfd in the Levant, that this Cuftom is 
obferv'd in feveral Countries :, as alfo fome others, as inconfiftent with Reafon and good Senfe. 
But there is no neceffity of twice cutting the Line, to fee Unreafonable Laws and Cuftoms religi- 
oufly obferv'd , we may find the Patrons of Fantaftical and Inconvenient Fafhions nearer Home : 
Our own Country willfupply us with enow : Where-ever there are Men not infenfible to Paflions, 
and the Imagination- has the fupremacy over Reafon ; there will be fantaftical Humours, and 
Humours unaccountable. If there be not fo much Pain to be fuffer'd in going with bare Breafts, 
in the moft rigid Winter Seafon, andftovingup the Body in the exceffive Heats of Summer, as 
in the plucking out an Eye, or cutting off an Arm ; yet the Shame mould certainly be greater. 
I confefs the Pain is not fo great, but neither is the Reafon of undergoing it fo apparent ; and fo 
the Extravagance comes at leaft to an even poize. For an Ethiopian might, in juftifying himfelf, 
fay he pluck'd out an Eye, out of a point of Loyalty and Honour: But what mould a Christian 
Lady fay for Expoling what Nature and Religion oblige her to conceal ? Perhaps, that me did it, 
becaufe 'twas the Fafhion, and for no other Reafon. But fhe ought to know, That 'tis an Extrava- 
gant, Inconvenient, Unfeemly, and Shameful Fafhion on all Accounts, and proceeds from nothing 
but a manifeft Corruption of Reafon, and a fecret Depravation of Heart ; and cannot be favour'd 
or follow'd without Scandal, and openly fiding with the Corruption of the Imagination againft: 
Reafon ; with Impurity againft Purity ; with the Spirit of the World againft the Spirit of GOD. 
In a word, to follow this Mode is to violate both the Laws of Reafon, and of the Gofpel : But 
what matters that, you'll fay, it is the Mode, that is a Law more Sacred and Inviolable, than 
That written by the Finger of G O D upon the Tables of Mofes, and thofe graven by his Spirit on 
the Hearts of Christians. . 

And indeed I cannot fee that the English or French have much Reafon to laugh at the Ethiopians 
and Savages : At the firft time of feeing a Crippl'd or One-ey'd King, in the Front of a Train 
of Lame and Half-lighted Courtiers j I confefs a Man would fcarce forbear lauging: But time , 
would make it familiar, and inftead of ridiculing them for an Infirmity of Mind, he would more 
admire perhaps the Greatnefs of their Courage, and Perfection of their Friendship. But 'tis not 
fo with the Fafhions of our modern Ladies : Their Extravagancies have no pretended Reafon to 
uphold them, if they have the Advantage of being lefs troublefome, they ftand chargeable how- 
ever with being more irrational. In lhort, they bear the Character of an Age ftill more corrupt 
in which nothing is found fufficient to qualifie the Diforders of Imagination. 

What has been faid of Courtiers, ought likewife to be underftood of the moft part of Servants 
in refpeft of their Matters, Maids in refpedt of their Miftreffes , and not to make an impertinent 
Induction of particulars, of -all Inferiors in refped of their Superiors : and efpecially of Children 
in refpeft of their Parents : Forafmuch as they have a very peculiar Dependance on them^ 
are cherifh'd and brought up tenderly by them, which is not done in the reft ; and laftly, v 
becaufe Reafon inclines Children to fuch Submiffion and Refpecf, as Reafon it felf cannot always 
regulate. 

'Tis not abfolutely neceflary for the influencing the Imagination of others to have fome Autho- 
rity over them, and that they have fome kind of Dependance on us •, the fole ftrength of Imagi- 
nation is fometimes fufficient to do it : 'Tis common for ftrangers, for Men of no Reputation* 
for fuch as we are not prepoffefs'd with any Efteem of, to have fuch force of Imagination, and 
confequently fo lively and charming Expreflions, as to perfwade us without our knowing either 
for what end, or by what means we were perfwaded j I confefs it feems ftrange it ihould be fo, 
but yet there is nothing commoner. 

Now this. imaginative Perfwafion muft proceed from the force of a Vifionary Wit, who has a 

"lively way of Talking, without knowing what he fays ; and who thus brings over the Minds of 

Hearers to give a ftrong affent, without knowing what 'tis they affent to. For the generality of 

Men give way to the force of the fenfible Impreffion, and fo dazles and confounds them, and 

A a makes 



90 



B Malebranche Concerning Book II. 

makes them paffionately judge of what they confufedly conceiv'd. We defire fuch as fhall read 
this Work, to confider this thing, to obferve the Inftances of it in the Companies they light up- 
on ; and to make Reflection on what happens in their own Breaft on fuch occafions ; which will 
be a thing of greater nfe to them than they can imagine. 

But it mould be well confider'd, that there are two things, which wonderfully contribute to 
the Power of other's Imagination over us: The firft is, a grave and pious Deportment ^ the 
fecond, a Prefumptuous and Libertine Behaviour. For accordingly as we are difpos'd to Piety or 
Libertinifm, we fhall find an Air of Gravity and Piety in Difcourfe, or a Prefumpti;ous and Li* 
bertine ftrain fhall ad very differently upon us. 

'Tis true, the one is of more dangerous contagion than the other ; but yet we fhould equally 
refift the fenfible Manners of either fide ; and only fubmit to the force of the Reafons they are 
attended with ; for ridiculous Nonfence and Impertinence may be fpoke in a grave and fober way ; 
and Blafphemy and Profanenefs, with an Air of Devotion. Wherefore we fhould, following 
the Advice of St. John, examine Whether the Sprits be of GO D, and not trufl all forts of Spirits. 
We know the Devils fometimes transform themfelves into Angels of Light ; and there are Men 
who have, as it were, naturally the Mein of Piety, and Look of Religion, and confequently a 
well-eftablifh'd Reputation in the World :, who yet exempt Men from their ElTential Obligations, 
even from the loving GOD and their Neighbour ; to enflave them to fome foolifh Practices, or 
Pharifaick Ceremony. _ ■ 

But the Strong Imaginations, whofe Impreffion and Contagion fhould more induftrioufly be 
avoided, are of Men abroad in the World, who affect the being reputed the Bold Wits; which 
is a Reputation eafily acquir'd. For 'tis but denying, with a particular Grace, Original Sin, 
the Immortality of the Soul, or ridiculing fome receiv'd Opinion of the Church, to fet up for fuch 
an accomplifh'd Wit among the Vulgar. 

Thefe little Minds are generally full of Life and Fire, of a forward and haughty Carriage, 
which fways and difpofes Weak Imaginations, to yield to the vivid and plaufible Difcourfe, which 
to any thinking Man will appear to have nothing in it. For as happy as they are at Exprefling, 
they have but very ill luck at Reafoning. And yet whilffc Men, though never fo Rational, had 
rather be mov'd and affected with fenfible Pleafure, that attends the way of Delivery, and the 
fpecious Expreffions, than to enter into an irkfome Difquifition of the Reafons ; 'tis vifible thefe 
Minds muft have theafcendant over others, and fo propagate their Contagion and their Errors, 
by the Authority they have over the Imagination of other Men. 



CHAP. III. 

I. Of the Force of fome Authors Imagination. II. Of Tertullian. 



o 



NE of the greateft and mofl notorious Proofs of the Power fome Imaginations have 
over others, is the Prevalency fome Authors have of perfwading without Reafons. For 
inftance, The Turn, Tertullian, Seneca, Montagne, and fome others give their Difcourfe 
has thofe Charms and Luftre, which dazle the Minds of moft Men ; though it be only a faint 
Draught of Fancy, and, as it were, the Shadows of thofe Authors Imagination. ' Their Words, 
as dead and inanimate as they are, have greater Vigour than the Reafons of others : They enter, 
they penetrate, they domineer in the Soul at fo imperious a rate,as to challenge Obedience without 
being underftood, and make their Orders fubmitted to, before they are known. A Man has a 
Mind to believe, but he knows not what. When he would know what 'tis he would believe, and 
approaches, as I may fay, thofe fleeting Phantoms, to take a View of them, they diffipate'into 
fmoak with all their gaudy Drapery and Luftre. 

But though thefe Authors I have nam'd, are the moft proper Inftances that can be given, to 
fhew the Power of fome Men's Imaginations over others, and I propofe them for that purpofe ; 
yet I pretend not to condemn them in every thing. For I cannot forbear having an Efteem for 
thofe particular Beauties that are in them, and a Deference to that univerfal Approbation they 
have had for many Ages ; I muft declare I have a great Veneration for fome of Tcnulliarh 
Works, and efpecially for his Apology against the Gentiles, and his Book of PrefcHpiqns against He- 
See the n- ret J cks '■> and for fome P a i"ts of the Books of Seneca, though I have very little Efteem for any thing 
luftnuions. of Montagne. 

Tertullian was indeed a Man of profound Learning, but of a better Memory than Judgment ; 

and had a greater Penetration and Extent of Imagination, than of Intellect. There is no doubt 

but he was a Vifionis~l, in the Senfe I have before explain'd ; and was fraught with moft of the 

Qualities I have attributed to the Vifionary Wits : And the Veneration he had for Ahmanush PtL 

ons and his Prophetess, are an undoubted Demonftration of the Weaknefs of his Judgment : His 

fervent Zeal, and Tranfports, and Enthnfiafms upon trifling Subjefts, arc a fenfible Indication of 

a diftemper d Imagination. What irregular Motions are there in his Hyperboles and Figures t How 

many pompous and magnificent Arguments that owe all their force to their fenfible Luftre, and 

perfwade mecrly by giddying and dazling the Mind ? 

To 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. af 

To what purpofe," for inftance, does that Author, in juilifying his wearing the Philofophers 
Gown inflead of the ufual one, alledge this Habit was formerly the Fafhion in the City Carthage ? 
Should we at prefent wear Ruffs and Caps, becanfe they were in ufein the days of our Fore-fathers ? 
Or would it look well for Women to put on old-fafhion'd Heads and Fardwgales, except it be in 
the Carnival, when they would difguife themfelves to go a Mafyueradivg ? 

What could be concluded from thofe pompous and magnificent Descriptions of the Changes 
the World undergoes, and what could they contribute to his Apology ? The Moon has different 
Pbafes, the Year changes its Seafons, and the Fields have another Countenance in Summer than 
in Winter. Inundations lay -whole Provinces under Water ; and Earthquakes fwallow them up -. 
New Cities are built, and new Colonies planted ; and People in fwarms have over-run and depo- 
pulated entire Countries : And therefore the common Toga Ihould be chang'd for the Philofophic 
Pallium. What Affinity is there between the thing to be prov'd, and all thefe Changes, and fe- 
veral others he's at great Pains to find out, and which he defcribes in unnatural, obfeure, and 
bombaftic Expreflions ? The Peacock varies every Hep he makes ; and the Serpent gliding into a 
narrow hole, (lips out of its Skin, and grows young again ; why then Ihould not we change our c . 
Habit? Could any Man in his Wits, and in cold Blood, make fuch Inferences as thefe ? Could any & , ap ' D 2 g 
that mould hrear him, hold from laughing ? Did not this Author make giddy the Head, and con- Paiiio. 
found the Intellect of his Reader ? 

Almoff. all the remainder of that little Book De Pallio, is fill'd with Multos etiam vidi poftquam bene 
Reafons as foreign to his Subied as thefe ; which certainly prove nothing, *J?aflent, nt eum affequerentur, 
butoalyamafe fachasare liable to be amasM : But 'tis needlefs to infift ^gSSSSSSSSA 
longer on this 7 opid : It may fuffice to fay, That it Accuracy of Thought, aione difcefliffe. Sic qui sminm ha- 
and Clearnefs and Diftindnefs of Difcourfe, Ihould always appear in what- beri videriqjdignus, qui hoc cogno- 
e-er a Man writes ffince the end of Writing is to manifeft the Truth) mentum habere voluit, adeo quod 

'tis impoflible to excufe this Author, who, by the Teftimony of Salmafms, v .f™* ^fu IT.T 5* e ? cere 

» i K r 7>a j r> ■ ■ l u i -a aXt. ii u- r j * i id quod obtabat valuitait hquido iu- 

the belt of our Modern Cnticks, has laid out all his Endeavours to become rar e au f im ne minem ad hoctempus 

cbicure ; and has fo well fucceeded in that Defign, that this Commentator extitiffe, qui pofiit jurarehunc libel- 

fcarce forbore Swearing that no Man ever perfectly underftood him. But fup- * um a capite ad calcem ufq; totum,a. 

polma the Genius of the Nation, the Humour of the Mode that then pre- [ e 5 on mi ™ s b . ene intelleftum quam 

vail'd" and laftly, the Nature of Satyre or Raillery, might in fome meafure J®g£ Mm ' in E P'fi- ^■Comment, 

juftifie this notable Defign of being Myfterious and Incomprehenfible : yet 

all this could never atone for the pitiful Reafons and the Ramblings of an Author, who in many 

of his Works, as well as this, fpeaks whatever comes in's Head ; provided it be in fbme unordi- 

nary Thought, which he can fet off in fome bold Expreflion, with hopes of making Oltentatioa 

of the force, or I might fay, the corruption of his Imagination. 



CHAf. IV. 
Of the Imagination of Seneca. 

THE Imagination of Seneca is fometimes as irregular as Tertullian's: His impetuous Mo* 
tions carrying him into unknown Regions ; where yet he walks with as great confidence 
and fecurity, as if he knew where he was, and whither he was tending. Whenever he 
makes large fteps, fleps in Figures, and exactly meafur'd ; he fancies he is far advane'd ; whereas 
he imitates the Dancers, that always end where they begin. 

We ought to diftinguifh the Force and Beauty of Words, from the Force and Evidence of 
Reafons. There is doubtlefs much Force, and fome Beauty in the Words of Seneca t, but very 
little Strength and Evidence in his Reafons : By the Force of imagination, he gives fuch a Turn 
to his Words, as moves, agitates, and perfwades by the Impreffion they .make on us ; but he fails 
to give that Diilindnefs and pure Light, which illuminates and perfwades by Evidence. His 
Conviftion depends on the Commotion he raifes, and the Pleafure he fuggefts ; but fuch as can 
read him fedately and undifturb'd, that can take heed of Surprize, and are us'd to no other Con- 
vidion than that of Clearnefs and Evidence of Reafon, will not, I dare fay, be convine'd by his 
Difcourfe. For, in fhort, fo he talks handfomly, he is but little folicitous about what he fays j 
as if it were poffible a Man mould fpeak well, without knowing what he fpeaks. And thus he 
commonly perfwades, without knowing how or why we are perfwaded •, as if it were reafona- 
ble to be convine'd of any thing without a diilinft Knowledge of it, and Examination of the 
Proofs that demonftrate it. 

What can be more ftately than the Idea he give us of his Wife-man • and yet what at the bottom 
is more vain and fantaftical ? The Portraiture he draws of Plato is too fine to be Natural ; but 
'tis fuch Paint and Varnifh, he puts upon none but the unthinking fort of Men, and thofe that are 
unacquainted with Nature. Cato was a Man, and fubjed to the Mifery of Men: 'Twas only a 
Fancy that he was invulnerable, or that when he was flruck, he was not hurt : He had neither the 
hardnefs of Adamant to be impenetrable to Iron, nor the liability of Rocks to be unfhaken by the 
Floods, as Seneca pretends* In a word* he was not infenfible \ as Ssneca himfelf is oblig'd to ae- 

knowledge* 




Q3 F. M a t e b r a n c h b Concerning Book 1 

j 

lapidum inexpugnabi... 

tro retiindit : quemadmodum projetJi in altum fcopuh marefrangunt, nee ipji *Ila Jtvttta veftigt* tot ver- 
berati faults oftentant : Itafapientis animus folidits est; & id roboris collegia ut tarn t ut us fit ab injuria, 
miam ilia qua extuli. Sen. c. 5. Trad. Quod in fapientem non cadit injuria. 

But what? will he not grant that his Wife-man may become miferable, when he acknowledges 
he is not infenfible to Pain ? No by no means ; Pain can never affetf him, nor the fear of it dif- 
quiethim : For his Wife, man is Paramount to Fortune, and above the Malice of Men: and they 
are incapable of giving him any Disturbance. 

Adfum hoc vobis probations, fub ifto tot civitatum everfore muniment a incur fu arietis labefieri, & 
turrium altitudinem cuniculis ac latentibus foffis repente refidere, & aquaturum editiffimas arces agger em 
crefcere. At nulla machinamenta poffe reperiri, qua bene fundatum animum agitent. And lower : Non 
Babylonis muros illi contuleris, quos Alexander intravit ; non Carthaginis, aut Numantia mcenia una mdnu 
capta : non Capitolium arcemve, habent ifta hofiile vefiigium. Cap. 6. 

Quid tu put as cum fiolidm ille Rex multitudine telorum diem obfeurajfet, ullam fagittam inSoleminci- 
dijfe : ut cceleftia humanas manus effugiunt, & ab his qui templa diruunt, autfimulachra confiant, nihil 
divinitati nocetur ; ita quicquid fit in fapientem, proterve, petulanter, fuperbe frujlrd tentatur. Gap. 4. 
Inter fragor em templorum fuper Deosfuos cadentium uni homini paxfuit. Cap. 5. 

Non efi ut die as ita utfoles, hunc fapientem noftrum nufquam inveniri. Nonfing'unta ifiudhumani in- 
genii vanum dec us, nee ingentem imaginem rei falfa concipimus : fed qualem confirmamus, & exhibuimus 
& exhibebimus. Ceterum hicipfe M. Cato vereor nefupra nojirum exemplar ft. Cap. 7. 

Videor mihi intueri animum tuum incenfum, & effervefcentem : paras acclamare. Hac funt qua an- 
ftoritatem pr&ceptvs vejlris detrahant. Magna promittitis, & qua ne optari quidem nedum credi pof- 
funt. And lower : Ita fublato alte fuper 'cilio in eadem, qua c&teri, defcenditis mutatis rerumnominibus; 
tale itaque aliquid, & in hoc effe fufpicor, quod prima fpecie pulchrum atque magnificum efi, nee injuri- 
am, nee contumeliam accepturum effe fapientem. And lower : Ego vero fapientem non imaginario honore 
verborum exornare conftitui, fed eo loco ponere, quo nulla perveniat injuria. 

Battering Rams, and other Engines of Wars, will fhake the Walls and Towers of the ftrongeffc 
Garrifons, and in time level them with the Earth : But what Machines are found fufficient to 
fhake the impregnable Mind of his Wife-man? Compare not with him the Wall of Babylon fore'd 
by Alexander ; nor thofe of Carthage and Numantia, that one General overturn'd : Nor laftly,the 
Capitol, and the Citadel, which carry the marks of the prevailing Enemy. Arrows fhot againft 
the Sun are fpent in vain ; Sacriledges committed in the overthrow of Temples, and the Shrines 
of the Gods melted down, touch not the Divinity ; yet the Gods may be overwhelm'd in the 
ruines of their own Temples : But his Wife-man fhall never be opprefs'd ; or rather, he may be 
opprefs'd, but 'tis impoffible he mould be hurt. 

But think not (fays Seneca) that the Wife-man I am picturing, is no where to be found. 'Tis 
no vain Fi&ion of ours, ridiculoufly to exalt the Mind of Man : 'Tis not a Stalking Idea, with- 
out Realty and Truth ; no, the Original Cato tranfeends perhaps the Pidlure that I make of 
him. 

But methinks, continues he, I perceive your Mind begins to kindle, and grow hot •, and you 
are ready to cry out, That 'tis the way to make our felves contemptible, to promife things above 
the reach of Faith or Hope ; and that the Stoich only change the Names of things, to fpeak the 
fame Truths in a more lofty and fupercilious ftrain. But fee how you are miftaken : For 'tis not 
our Defign to dignifie the Wife-man with the imaginary Honour of great and pompous Words ; 
but to fet him in a place inacceffible to Injuries and Affronts. 

See here now Seneca's weak Reafon is hurried away with an impetuous Imagination. ' But is it 
poffible for Men, under a continual fenfe of their Miferies and Infirmities, to fall into fuch pre- 
fumptuous and arrogant Notions ? Can a reafonable Man be perfwaded that Pain cannot touch or 
hurt him ? Or could this All-wife, this Self-fufficient Cato fuffer without Difquiet, at leaft fome 
Moleftation, I don't fay the heinous Infults and Abufes of an enraged Rabble, Dragging, Strip- 
ping, Beating him j but the Stinging of a filly Fly? What can be imagin'd more weak againff fo 
ftrong and convincing Proofs of our own Experience, as this pretty Arguing of Seneca, which 
yet is one of his heft Arguments? • 

Validius debet effe quod Udit, eo quod Uditur : non eft aut em fortior nequitia virtute : non potest ergo 
ladi Sapiens. Injuria in bonos non tentatur nifi a mails, bonis inter fe pax est. Quodfi Udi nifi infirmior 
non pot efi, malus autem bono infirmior efi, nee injuria bonis nifi a difpari verenda efi, injuria in Sapientem 
virum non cadit. Cap. 7. 

That which hurts, fays he, muft be flronger than that which is hurt : But Vice is not ftronger 

than Vertue j therefore the Wife-man cannot be hurt. To this we need only anfwer, Either 

that all Men are Sinners, and confequently worthy of the Mifery they fuffer, as Religion aflures 

us ; or that if Vice be not ftronger than Vertue, yet the Vicious may fometimes be more preva- 

Epicurus lent than tne Ve .rtuous, as Experience manifefts. 

ait, Injuri- Epicurus was in the right, in faying that Injuries were fuppor table by a Wife-man ; but Seneca cer- 

as toicra- tainly in the wrong, to affirm, The Wife-man could not be injured. The Vertue of the Stoicks 

biles effe C ou Id never render them impregnable ; fince 'tis not inconfiftent with true Vertue for a Man to 

noKuri- bc Miferablc 5 and pitiable at the time of his fuffering fome Evil : St. /Wand the Primitive Chri- 

as nun effe ^** w j nacl doubtlefs more Vertue than Cato and all the Stoicks ; and yet they confefs'd they were 

Miferable 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. cj \ 

Miferable through the Pains they endur'd ^ though they were Happy through the Profped of an 
Eternal Retribution. Sitanturn in bac vita fperantes [umus, mifcrabiliores fumus omnibus bominibus 
fays St. Paul. 

As 'tis GO D alone, who through his Grace can give us a real, and a folid Vertue , fo'tis from 
Bim only we can receive the Fruition of a folid and real Happinefs ; which yet he neither pro- 
mifes, nor gives us in this Life ; but in the other it mufl be expeded from his Juftice, as the 
Recompenfe of the Miferies we have undergone for the Love of him in this: We are not as yet 
in poffeflion of that Peace and Repofe, which nothing can difturb ; even the Grace of our 
LORD makes us not fo Invincible, but it commonly leaves us to the Senfe and Feeling of our 
own Imbecility, both to certifie us there is nothing in the World but is capable of hurting us ; 
and to teach us to "firfTer, with a modeft Patience and an humble Refignation, all the Injuries 
we receive ; and not with a faftuous and haughty Patience, like the Conftancy of Proud Prefurri- 
ptuous Cato. 

When Cato was ftruck on the Face, he was not troubl'd at it ; nor would he revenge or par- 
don the Affront, but Dogmatically deny'd that he had receiv'd any. He would be thought infi- 
nitely above thofe that ftruck him : So that his Patience was Pride and Arrogance, and affronting 
and abufing thofe thatinjur'd him: This Patience of his being a manifeft fign, that he look'd up- 
on his Enemies as Beafts, with whom 'twas below him to be angry. And this Contempt of his 
Enemies, and great Efteem of himfelf, is what Seneca calls the greatnefs of Courage ; Majori ani- 
mo, fays he, (fpeaking of an Abufe Cato had receiv'd,) non agnovit, quant ignovijfet. How extra- 
vagant it is to confound Magnanimity with Pride, and feparating Patience from Humility, to joyn 
it with an unfufferable Arrogance. And yet how feelingly does fuch Extravagance flatter the Va- 
nity of Man, who is never willing to ftoop and abafe himfelf ? And how dangerous is it, for Chri- 
ftians efpecially, to be inftruded out of the Morality of an Author of fo little Judgment as Seneca, 
and yet of fo ftrong, fo lively, and fo impetuous an Imagination, as dazles, and giddies, and 
drags along the Readers, that have but little Strength of Mind, but great Propenfion to whatever 
indulges Concupifcence, and their Senfes ? 

Let Chriftians rather learn from their Mafter, that they are liable to the Infults and Injuries of 
evil Men ; and that the Good are fometimes fubjeded to the Wicked, by the order of Providence. 
When one of the Officers of the High-Prieft gave our LORD a box on the Ear ; that Wife-man 
of the Christians, he who was infinitely Wife, and whofe Power was as great as his Wifdom, 
confeffes that Servant was capable of hurting him : He is not vex'd at the Affront, nor does he 
take CWs way of Revenge ; but pardons, as one that was truly offended. He was able to revenge 
Himfelf, and deftroy His Enemies ; but he rather fufrers with a modeft and an humble Patience, 
offenfiveto none, not even to that Servant that had injur'd Him. Whereas Cato either could not, 
or durft not take a real Revenge of the Affront he had receiv'd, and thei-efore attempts an ima- 
ginary one, which ftruck in with his Vanity and his Pride. For he fwells and exalts his Mind as 
high as the Clouds ; from whence he looks down upon Men below as little Flies ; and defpifes 
them as infignificant Infeds, incapable of offending him, and unworthy of his Indignation. This 
Vifton, is a Notion worthy of the Wife Cato .• 'Tis this which gives him a greatnefs of Soul, and a 
eonftancy of Courage, that equals him with the Gods. 'Tis this which makes him Invulnerabkj 
as fetting him above the Power and Malice of other Men. Alas, poor Cato ! Thou fancieft thy Sapientia 
Vertue raifes thee above all things ; whereas thy Wifdom is Folly, and thy Magnanimity abomi- ]n W 
nable before GOD; whatever the Wife-men of the World may think of it. JhHtitia 

There are Viftonifts of feveral kinds. Some fancy themfelves transform'd into Coch and Hens ; e ft a p Uc i 
others think they become Kings and Emperors ; and fome again perfwade themfelves they are in- Deum. 
dependent, and like the Gods. And yet whilft Men look upon thofe as Madmen, who are confi- Q^ od ho * 
dent of being chang'd into Cocks and Kings, they do not always think thofe fo., who fay their Ver- "j 1 "^ 113 
tue renders them independent, and equal to the Gods. The Reafon whereof is, That to be rec- abomina V 
kon'd a Madman, 'tis not enough to have Mad Thoughts } but 'tis moreover requifite that thefe tioeft an- 
Thoughts be taken for Vifions and Madneffes by other Men. For Madmen never go for what te Deum* 
they are, among Madmen that are like them, but only among Rational Men ; as Wife-men never Luc ' l6 ' 
pafs for what they are, in the Company of Madmen. Wherefore fuch are acknowledg'd for 
Madmen, who take themfelves for Cocks or Kings ; becaufe no Man fees any reafon to believe ano- 
ther can be fo eafily chang'd into a Cock or a King : But 'tis not now-a-days that Men firft begin to 
think they can become as Gods: It has been the belief of all Ages, and perhaps more of former 
than the latter \ fo probable has their Vanity always made that Opinion. They derive it from 
their firft Parents, for I make no doubt bat Adam and Eve were of the fame Sentiment, whea 
they fubmitted to the Temptations of the Devil, upon the promife he made them that they fhould 
become like GO D: Eritis ficut DU. Even the Pureft and moft Illuminate Intelligencies were fo 
blinded by their Native Pride, as to believe they might grow Independent; and thereupon form'd 
a Defign of ufurping the Throne of the ALM1G H TT. Thus we need not wonder that Men, 
who have neither the Purity nor the Illumination of Angels, fhould give themfelves up to be blin- 
ded and fedue'd, by the motives of their Vanity. 

If the Temptation of Greatnefs and Independency be the ftrongeft of all others, 'tis fo upon 
its appearing to us, as it did to our firft Parents, conformable to Reafon, as well as to our Incli- 
nation ; becaufe we are not at all times fenfible of our whole Dependence. Had the Serf em 
threatned our firft Parents, faying, Unlefs you eat of the Fruit, which GOD has forbidden yc, 
ye mail be transform'd, one into a Cock, and the other into an Hen, vye make no doubt to affirm, 

B b the/ . 



oi K Malebranche. Concerning Book II. 

they had laugh'd at the groflhefs of the Temptation •, for even we fliould have laugh'd at it our 
felves. But the Devil, judging of others by himfelf, knew well that the defire of Independency, 
was the Weak-fide where they were the molt eafily taken. 

The fecond Reafon why we look upon thofe as Diliemper'd in their Brain, who affirm they are 
either Coch or Kings, but have no fuch Thoughts of thofe who allure us that nothing can hurt 
them, becaufe they are above Pain, is that the Hypocondriach are palpably deceiv'd ; and 'tis but 
opening the Eyes to have fenfible Proofs of their Delufion. But when Cato affirms that he is not 
hurt by^him that Itrikes him, and that he is above all the Injuries that can be done to him ; he 
affirms it, or may affirm it with that Haughtinefs and Gravity, as makes it impoffible to be difco- 
vered, whether he is not actually within what he appears to be without. And we are inclin'd 
to believe his Soul is unffiaken, becaufe his Body remains unmovable : For that the outward De- 
portment of our Body is a Natural Indication of what happens inwardly to the Soul. Thus a bold 
Lyar, when he lyes with a Itrong affurance, makes the molt incredible things believ'd ; the Con- 
fidence wherewith he delivers them, is a Proof that affects the Senfes, and confequently is a ve- 
ry powerful Motive to Perfwafion with the greatelt part of Men. There are then but few that 
look upon the Stoich as VifwniUs, or as hardy Lyers ; becaufe they can have no fenfible Proof of 
what paries at the bottom of their Soul ; and the Air of their Face is a very fenfible Argument, 
which eafily abufes them ; befides that, their Vanity inclines them to believe that Man's Mind is 
capable of that Greatnefs and Independence, which he boalts of. 

All which makes it evident, that there are few more dangerous Errors, or more eafie commu- 
nicated, than thofe the Books of Seneca abound with ; becaufe they are Errors of a fubtil and de- 
licate Nature, proportion'd to the Vanity of Man, and like that wherein the Devil engag'd our 
firft Parents. They are attir'd in thefe Books with molt fumptuous and fpleudid Habiliments, 
which make way for their Reception in molt Minds. Wherein entring, they feize, ftuh, and 
and blind them; but blind them with a Fafluous Blindnefs, a Darling Blindnefs ^ a Blindnefs at- 
tended with glimmerings of Light ; and not an Humbling and Caliginous Blindnefs, that makes a 
Man fenfible he is blind, and acknowledge it to others. The being Itruck with this Blindnefs of 
Pride makes us reckon our felves the Fine and the Bold Wits ; and others alfo think us fo, and ad- 
Beaux mire us. So nothing is more contagious than this Blindnefs ; whillt the Vanity and Senfibility of 

Writs Men, tne Corropti 011 of the Senfes and the Paffions difpofe them to the defire of being Itruck with 

Tom! it, and provokes them to Itrike others with it alfo. 

I am then of Opinion that there is no Author more fit than Seneca, to exemplifie that contagi- 
ous Communication of a great many Men, who go by the Name of the Fine and Bold Wits -, and 
to Ihew how thefe Itrong and vigorous Imaginations domineer over the Weak and Unenlightened 
Minds -, not by the force and evidence of their Reafons, whicji are the Produ&ions of the Mind ; 
but by the Turn, and lively way of Exprelfion, which depend on the Strength of Imagi- 
nation. 

I know well enough that this Author's Reputation is confiderabde in_ihe World, and 'will be 
look'd upon as a rafh attempt to have treated him as a very Imaginative, and Injudicious Au- 
thor : But 'twas chiefly upon the Account of his Elteem I have faid fo much of him here ; not 
out of any Envy or ill Humour, but becaufe the Eltimation he is in, will more fenfibly touch the 
Mind of the Reader, and more clofely apply it to the Confideration of the Errors I have at- 
tack'd. For we Ihould, as far as poflible, bring the molt Eminent Inltances, when the things- 
we fay are important, it being fometimes an Honouring a Book, to Critizice upon it. But yet I 
am not the only Man that finds fault with the Writings of Seneca, for not to mention fome Fa- 
mous Men of our own Age, 'tis near fix hundred Years ago, that a molt Judicious Author ob- 

i. In Phi- ferv'd, there was little Exa&nefs in his Pbilofiphy, little Judgment and Juftice in his Elocution - r 

lofophia an( i yg R e p U tatioh was rather the refult of the Heat, and indilcreet Inclination of Youth, than 

Hgens! ' tne Confent of Learned and Judicious Men. 

2. Velles Publickly to engage the groflelt and molt palpable Errors, is labour loft, there being no conta- 
eum fuo gion in them. 'Twould be ridiculous to advertife Men, that Hypocondriack People are deceiv'd ; 
^Sfnio > t j S v ifibleto all the World. But if thofe very Men, they have the greatelt Opinion of, Ihould 
eno judi- cnance to be miltaken, 'tis a piece of fervice to admonifli them, left they ihould imitate them in 
do. their Errors. Now 'tis plain that the Spirit of Seneca is a Spirit of Pride and Vanity : And where- 

3. Si ali- as Pride, according to the Scripture, is the Origine of Sin ; Initium Peccati Superb': a: The Spirit 
qua con- f Seneca cannot be the Spirit of the Gofpel ; nor his Morals be allied to the Morals of our S A fl- 
fet" s£ OVR y th ? only true and folid Morals. 

Co'nfenfu True 'tis, that all the Notions of Seneca are not falfe nor dangerous. And he may be read 
Erudito- with profit by fuch as have an exadrnefs of Thought, and are acquainted with the Foundation of 
rum quam Chrifiian Morality. Good ufe has been made of him by Great Men, and I have no intent of blam- 
anwre™" 1 ing th ° fe ' W - ho to accomm °date themfelves to the Weaknefs of others, that had an exceffive 
compro- £ ft eem f° r mm » have drawn Arguments from his Works whereby to defend the Morality of our 
baretur. LORD, and oppugn the Enemies of the Gofpel with their own Weapons. 
QuimiUib The Alcoran has many good things in it, and fome true Prophecies are to be found in the Cen- 
to, cap. 2. furies of Noftradamus. The Alcoran is made ufe of, to oppofe the Religion of Mahomet ; and No- 
ftradamnis Prophecies may be of ufe to convince fome Fantaftick and Vifionary People. But what 
is good in the Alcoran can't make it a good Book, nor can fome true Explications in Noftradamw's 
Centuries make him ever pafs for a Prophet •, neither can it be faid, that all who make ufe of thefe 
Authors, approve them, or have for them any real Elteem. 

A Man 



Chap. V. The Search after Truth, yd 

A Man ought not to go about to overthrow what I have faid about Seneca^ by alledging abun- 
dance of Quotations out of him, which contain in them nothing but folid Truths, and confonant 
to the Gofpel : For I grant many fuch are met with in that Author 5 and fo thereare in the Alco- 
ran, and other mifchievous Books. Nor would he be lefs to blame, who Ihould overwhelm me 
with the Authority of thofe great Numbers, who have made ufeof Seneca, finceufemay be made 
of what we think an impertinent Book, provided thofe we' fpeak to, judge otherwife of it than 
our felves. 

But to rume intirely the Wifdom of the Stolch, we need only know one thing, which is luffici- 
ently prov'd by Experience, and by what we have already faid ; which is, that we are link'd and 
faften'd to our Body, our Relations, our Friends, our Prince, and our Country, by fuch ties as 
we neither can break, nor could for fhame endeavour it. Our Soul is united to our Body, and by 
our Body to all things Vifihle, by £b potent an Hand, that 'tis impoffible by our own force, to 
loofen the Connexion : 'Tis impoffible our Body mould be prick'd, but we mult be prick'd and 
hurt our felves ; becaufe the ftate of Life we are in, molt necelTarily requires this Correspondence 
between us, and the Body which we have. In like manner 'tis impoffible to hear our felves re- 
proach'd and defpis'd, but we mult feel fome difcontent thereupon; becaufe GOD, having 
made us for fociable con verfe. with other.Men, has given us an Inclination for every thing, capa- 
ble to bind and cement us together ; which Inclination, we have not ftrength enough of our 
felves to overcome. 'Tis Extravagance to fay that Pain does not hurt us \ and that words of Con- 
tumely and Contempt are not at all offenfive to us, as being above fuch things as thefe : There is 
no getting above Nature, without being affifted by Grace ; nor was there ever any Stoick who de- 
fpis'd Glory and the Elteem of Men, through the meer Strength of his Mind. 

Men may indeed get the maltery of their Paffions, by contrary Pafllons : They may vanquifh 
their Fear or their Pain by Vain Glory •, I mean only that they may abftain from Flying or Com- 
plaining, when feeing themfelves in themidit of a multitude, the defire of Glory fnpports them 
and Itops thofe motions in their Bodies which put them upon Flight : In this manner they may 
conquer them ; but this is no Conqueft or Deliverance from their flavery ; 'tis poffibly to change 
their Mailer for fome time, or rather, to put on a longer and an heavier chain : 'Tis to grow wife, 
happy, and free only in appearance, but in reality to fuffer an hard and cruel bondage. The na- 
tural union a Man has ftiii with his Body, may be refifted by that union he has with Men-, be- 
caufe Nature may be refifted by the ftrength of Nature. GOD may be refilled by the forces He 
himfelf fupplies us with ; but GOD cannot be refifted by the ftrength of a Man's own mind; 
Nature can't be perfectly vanquifh'd but by Grace : becaufe GOD cannot, if 1 may be allow'd fo 
to fpeak, be overcome but by the fpecial auxiliaries of GOD himfelf. 

And thus that fo much celebrated and vaunted Divifian of all things, in fuch as depend not on 
us, and fuch as we ought not to depend on, is a Divifion that feems agreeable to Reafbn, but is 
not confiftent with this diforder'd ftate Sin has redue'd us to. We are united to all the Creatures 
by the Order of GOD; but we abfolutely depend on them by the'Diforders of Sin : So that be- 
ing incapable of Happinefs, when in Pain or Difturbance, we ought not to hope for Happinefs in 
this Life, by imagining we have no Dependence upon thofe things-to which we are naturally (laves. 
There is no poffibility of being happy, except by a lively Faith, and a folid Hope f which gives 
us a fore-taft of the Enjoyment of future Goods J nor of living up to the Rules of Vertue, and 
overcoming Nature ; unlefs fupported by the Grace merited for us by Our LORD and S AV I- 
OVR JESVS CHRIST. 

— ... 1 — — 1 . 1 . 1 ■ 1 . 11 ' 1 1 1 ■ i 1 ■ ■ 1 . 






CHAP. V. " 

Of MontagneV Book. 



i . 



■ 




{ONTAGNE's Eflays may ferve as another inftance, to prove the Influence fome 
Imaginations have over others. For that Author has fuch a fort of a Fine and Debo- 
naire way, and gives fuch a Lively and Natural Turn to his Thought, as 'tis almoft 
impoffible to read him, without being prejudie'd in his- behalf; that his affefted Negligence ad- 
mirably becomes him, andindearshimtomoft Men, without making him contemptible ; and his 
Arrogancy is that of a Gentleman, if we may fay fo, that makes him refpefted, and not difliked* 
That Air of Gentility and Gallantry, fuftain'd by fome ftOek of Learning, works fo prodigioufly 
on the Mind, that a Man often admires him, and ftill yields to his Decifions, without daring to 
enquire into them, and fometimes without underftanding them. 'Tis not by the ftrength of his 
Reafons he perfwades ; for Reafons are feldom alledg'd for what he advances, at leaft fuch as have 
any force and folidity in them. And indeed he neither has any Principles whereon to bottom 
his Reafonings, nor any Method to make Deductions from his Principles. A Touch of Hiftory 
is no Argument ; nor a little Story a Demonftration : A couple of Vcrfes of Horace, or an 
Apophthegm of Cleomenes or C&far, are not fit to perfwade Reafonable Men : And yet thefe L(]'<-y? 
are nothing but a Contexture of fc raps of Hiftory, little Relations, good Words, Diftiris and 
Apophthegms. 

Montagne 



, F. Malebranche Concerning Book II. 

Montagne mould not be look'd upon in his Effays as a Man that argues, but as one that writes 
for his Diverfion; whofe drift is the Pleafure, and not the Inftru&ion of his Reader: And if 
thofe that read him were only diverted by him, it muft be own'd that Montane could not do them 
fo much harm. But 'tis next to impoffible to forbear loving that which pleafes, and not to defire 
thofe Dimes that are agreeable to the Palate. Nor can the Mind long be pleas'd with the read- 
ing of an Author, but it will take in its Sentiments, or at leaft receive fome Tinaure from them, 
which mingling with its Idea's, makes them confus'd and obfcure. -,_,,- „ 

But 'tis not only dangerous to read Montagne for Diverfion ; by reafon that the Pleafure a Man 
takes in him, infenfibly engages him in his Opinions-, but alfo, becaufebis Pleafure is more cri- 
minal than is imagin'd. For 'tis certain that this Pleafure arifes chiefly from Concupifcence, 
and that it only feeds and ftrengthens the Paffions ; this Author's way of Writing being only 
fo taking, becaufe'tis fenfible and moving, and that it roufes our Paffions in an imperceptible 
manner. 

It would not be time mifpent to prove this in particular ; and, m general, that we are pleas d 
with all the divers Styles of Men, meerly on the account of the fecret Corruption of our Morals j 
but this is not the proper place for it ; and befides it would carry us too far froni our purpofe. 
However, if we but refled on the Gonneftion of our Idea's and Paffions I formerly fpoke of ; as 
alfo upon what pafles within our felves at the time of our Reading fome well wrote piece, we may 
in fome meafure difcover, that if we love the Sublime Style, the noble and free Air of fome Au- 
thors, 'tis becaufe of our Vanity, and our Paffion for Greatnefs and Independency. And that 
the relifh we find in that delicacy of Effeminate Difcourfes, is deriv'd from no other Fountain, than 
a fecret Inclination for Softnefs and Pleafure. In a word, 'tis Senfibility and not Reafon, a cer- 
tain Skill and Faculty for what affects the Senfes, and not for Truth, that makes fome Authors 
charm and ravifh us, even whether we will or no. But to return to Montagne. 

The Reafons why his greateft Admirers fo much cry him up, to me feems to be, that they 
thought him a Judicious Author, and far from the imputation of Pedantry -, as alfo one who was 
throughly acquainted with the nature and weakneffes of the Mind. If I mould lhew then that 
Montagne with all his Gallantry, was as much a Pedant as many others ; and that he had a very 
imperfect Knowledge of the Mind: I fliall make it appear, that thofe who moft admire him, 
were not perfwaded by the Evidence of his Reafons, but were only brought over by the Force of 
his Imagination. 

The word Pedant is very Equivocal ; butUfe, if I miftakenot, and even Reafon, will have it 
fignifie thofe, who to make oftentation of their falfe Science, quote all forts of Authors, right or 
wrong ; talk meerly for talking fake, and to beadmir'd by the Ignorant ; and without any Judg- 
ment or Difcretion,amafs together apophthegms and Paflages of Hiftory, to prove,or at leaft pre- 
tend to prove things, that cannot be made out by any thing but Reafon. 

Pedant is oppos'd to Rational', and that which makes Pedants fo odious to Men of Senfe, is their 
being Irrational j for fenfible Men, naturally loving to Reafon, can't endure the Converfation of 
thofe who reafon not at all. Pedants are unable to reafon, becaufe their Mind is little, or elfe is 
taken up with Falfe Learning ; and they are unwilling to reafon, as knowing they are efteem'd and 
admir'd by fome fort of People, more for their citing fome paflage of an Unknown or Ancient 
Author, than pretending to Argument and Reafoning. And thus their Vanity acquiefcing in the 
profpedi of the refped that's paid to them, fixes them to the ftudy of uncommon, and out of the 
Way Sciences, that attract the Admiration of the Vulgar. 

Pedants therefore are vain, and arrogant, of great Memory, and little Judgments : fuccefs- 
ful and powerful in Citations, misfortunate and weak in Reafons : Of a vigorous and capa- 
cious Imagination ; but defultory and difbrderly, and unable to keep to any Accuracy and 
Exa&nefs. 

Having thus cleard the Notion of the word Pedant, it will be no hard matter to prove Mon- 
tagne as much a Pedant as moft others, in this fignification of it ; which feems moft agreeable to 
Reafon and Cuftom. For I fpeak not here of the Pedant of the Long Robe, it being not a Peda- 
gogue's Gown that only makes a Pedant. Montagne, who had fuch an averfion to Pedantry ^ 
poffibly never wore a Gown ; but neverthelefs could not diveft himfelf of all his Imperfe- 
ctions. He has laboured much for a Gentleman-like way, but has taken no great pains for ex- 
a&nefs of Thoughts ; or if he has, 'twas to very little purpofe. And fo he became a Genteel 
Pedant, or a Pedant of a /pedes entirely new ; rather than a Rational, Judicious, and a Worthy 
Man. 

Montagne\ Book contains fo evident Proofs of the Vanity and Arrogance of its Author, as may 
make it feem anufelefs Undertaking to ftand to remark them. For a Man muft needs be very 
conceited, that, like him, could imagine the World would be at the pains of reading fo large a 
Book, meerly to gain fome acquaintance with its Author's Humours. He muft neceflarily diftin- 
guilh himfelf from the reft of the World, and look upon his own Perfon as the Miracle and Phoe- 
nix of Nature. 

All created Beings are under an indifpenfable obligation of turning off the Minds of fuch as 
would adore them, towards the only One, that deferves their Adoration: And Religion teaches 

confervu' us never t0 fufi * r the Mind and Heart of Man > wnom G0D crcated for himfelf, to be bulled 
tuus fum S about us > aad to be ti * cn U P with loving and admiring us. When St. John proftrated himfelf 
ttc.DoM before the Angel of the Z.O.R.D, the Angel forbad him, faying ; lam thy fellow Servant, and of 
adgra. thy Brethren; tVorfiip GOD. None but the Devils, and fuch as partake of their Pride, are 

pleas'd 



Chap. V. The Search after Truth. jj 

pleas'd with being worfhipp'd : To require therefore that others fhould be afFe&ed and taken up 
with our particulars, what is it but to defirenot only to be worfhipp'd with an outward and appa- 
rent, but alfo with a real and inward worfhip? 'Tis tt> defire to be worfhipp'd even as GOD him- 
felf defires it, that is, in Spirit and in Truth. 

Moma^e wrote his Book purely to pidture himfelf, and reprefent his own Humours and Incli- 
nations ; as he acknowledges himfelf in the Advertifement to the Reader, inferted in ajl the Edi- 
tions. I give the Pittiire of my felf, fays he : J am my felf the SubjetJ of my Booh. Which is found 
true enough by thofe that read him •, for there are few Chapters wherein he makes not fome Di- 
greffion to talk of himfelf: and there are even fome whole Chapters wherein he talks of nothing 
elfe. But if he wrote his Book meerly to defcribe Himfelf, he certainly Printed it, that his own 
Chardier might be reed in it. He therefore defir'd to be the Subject of the Thoughts and Attention 
of Men :, though he fays there is no reafon a Man (hould employ his time upon fo frivolous and 
idle a Subject. Which words make only for his Commendation : For if he thought it unreafona- 
ble for Men to fpend their time in reading his BooR, he himfelf afted againft Common Senfe in 
publilhingit. And fo we are oblig'd to believe either that he Thought not what he [aid, ox did not 
what became him. 

But 'tis a pleafant Excufe of his Vanity, to fay he wrote only for his Friends and Relations : 
For, if fo, how chance there were publifh'd three Editions ? Was not one enough for all his 
Friends and Relations ? Why did he make Additions to his Bock in the laffc Impreflions, but no 
Retra&ions^ but that Fortune favour'd his Intentions ? I add, fays he, but make no Corrections, be- 
caufe when once a Man has made his Book of publick right, he has, in my Opinion, no more pretence or 
title to it. Let him fay what he can better in another, but let him not corrupt the Works already fold. 
Of fuch as thefe "'tis folly to purchafc any thing before they are dead : Let them think long before they 
publijh. Why are they in fuch hafie ? My Book is always one and the fame. He then was willing to 
publifh his Book for, and depofite it with the reft of the World, as well as to his Friends and Re* 
lations. But yet his Vanity had never been pardonable, if he had only turn'd and fix'd the Mind 
and Heart of his Friends and Relations on his Picture, fo long time as is neceffary to the reading 
of his Book. 

If 'tis a Fault for a Man to fpeak often of himfelf, 'tis Impudence, or rather a^ kind of Sottifh- 
nefs to praife himfelf at every turn as Montagne does : This being not only to fin againft Chrifiian 
Humility, but alfo Right Reafon. 

Men are made for a fociable Life, and to be form'd into Bodies, and Communities. But itmuft 
be obferv'd, that every particular that makes a part of a Society, would not be thought the mea- 
neft part of it. And fo thofe who are their own Encomiasts, exalting themfelves above the reft, 
and looking upon others as the bottom-mofl: parts of their Society, and themfelves as the Top- 
moft and moft Honourable, aflume an Opinion of themfelves, that renders them odious, inftead 
of indearing them to the Affe&ions and Efteem of the World. 

'Tis then a Vanity, and an indifcreetand ridiculous Vanity in Montagne, to talk fo much to his 
own Advantage, on all occafions : But 'tis a Vanity ftill more Extravagant in this Author to 
tranferibe his own Imperfe&ions : For if we well obferve him, we fhall find that moft of the 
Faults he difcovers of himfelf, are fuch as are glory'd in by the World, by reafon of the Cor^ 
ruption of the Age : That he freely attributes fuch to himfelf, as can make him pafs for a Bold 
Wit, or give him the Air of a Gentleman ; and that with intent to be better credited when he 
fpeaks in his own Commendation, he counterfeits a frank Confefllon of his Irregularities. He has 
reafon to fay, that The fetting too high an Opinion of one's felf, proceeds often from an equally Arro- , „, - 
gantTemper. 'Tis always an infallible fign that a Man has an Opinion of himfelf ; and indeed J ' ■" 3 
Montagne feems to me more arrogant and vain, in difcommending than praifing himfelf ; it being 
an infufferable Pride, to make his Vices the Motives to his Vanity, rather than to his Humiliation. 
I had rather fee a Man conceal his Crimes with Shame, than publifh them with Impudence ; and, 
in my Mind, we ought to have that Vnchriftian way of Gallantry in abhorrence, wherein Mon- 
tagne publifhes his Defects. But let us examine the other Qualities of his Mind. 

If we would believe Montagne on his word, he would perfwade us that he was a Man of No 
Retention; that his Memory was treacherous, and faiPd him in every thing-: But that in his Judg- L.'i.ch.io 
ment, there was no defect. And yet fhould we credit the Portraiture he has drawn of his own L.\.ch.2^ 
Mind, I mean his Book, we fhould be of a different Opinion. I could not, fays he, receive an Or- »' 2 ' ? 
der without my Table-book; and if I had an Oration to fpeak, that was confid.er ably long-winded, I was 
fore'd to that vile and miferable neceffity of learning it word for word by Heart ; otherwife J had neither 
Vrefencenor Affurance, for fear my Memory jliould fliew me a fippery trick. Does a Man that could 
learn Memoriter, word for word long-winded Difcourfes, to give him fome Prefence and AfTu- 
rance, fail more in his Memory than his Judgment ? And can we believe Montagne when he fays, 
/ am fore'd to call my Domeftick Servants by the Names of their Offices, or their Countries ; it being the 
moft difficult thing to remember Names ; and if I fhould live long, I am perfwaded I jlwuld forget my 
vwn .? That a plain Gentleman, who could retain by Heart, and word for word, and with AfFu- 
rance, long-winded Difcourfes, fhould have fuch a multitude of Servants, that he could not re- 
member their Names ! That a Man, who was Born and Bred in the midst of Fields and Tillage, who L - 12. CI '4 
kept Bufmefs and Farms in his Hands ; and who fays, To be regardlefs of what lies at our Feet, of what l 1' 
we have in our Hands, and of what most nearly concerns the neceffnies and ufe of Life, is a thing utterly 
inconfiftentwith his Maxim, fhould forget the French Names of his Domefticks ! Could he be igno- 
rant, as he fays, of the most part of our Coins in ufe, the difference of one Grain from another, either 

Cc in 



98 K Malebranche Concerning Book II. 

in the Earth or Granary, unlefs it were the moft manifeft •, of the groffefl Principles of Agri- 
culture, which there's hardly a Child but knows-, what ufe Leaven is of in making Bread ; and 
why Wine mall: ftand fometime in the Fat, before it ferments , and yet has his Mind ftor'd with 
the Names of the Ancient Philofophers and their Principles ; with the Idea's of Plato, Epi c m \ us Atoms , 
LlCh 2 tne Plenum and Vacuum of Leucippits and Democritus ; the Water of Thales, "Anaximander's Infinity 
of Nature, Diogenes\ Air, the Numbers and Symmetry of Pythagoras, the Infinite of Parmenides j 
the Vnity of Mufms ; the Water and Fire of Apollodorus ; the Similar Parts of Anaxagoras ; the 
Difcord and Friendjlnp of Empedocks ; the F/W of Heraclitus, &c. A Man that in three or four Pa- 
ges of his Book, quotes more than /j/ry different Authors, with their Opinions: Who has fill'd his 
Book with various Hiftorical Pajfages,and many confus'd Apophthegms; who in point of Books, fays, 
Hiftory and iVj^ were his Excellency : Who contradi&s himfelf every moment, and in the fame 
Chapter, and even in the fpeaking of things he pretends to be belt acquainted with ; I mean the 
Qualities of his Mind, lhould this Man boalt that His Judgment is better than his Memory t 

We will confefs that MomtigW was Excellent at Forgetfulnefs, fince Montagne allure u§ of it, and 
would have us think fo ; nor is this altogether contrary to Truth. But let us not believe him on 
his word,or for the Praifes that hegives himfelf} that he was a Man of great Senfe, and of extra- 
ordinary Sagacity of Mind : For this might engage us in Error, and give too much Countenance to 
thofe falfe and dangerous Opinions, he puts off with a prefumptuous and dogmatical Arrogance, 
which only confounds and blinds the feebler forts of Minds. 

The other Encomium they bellow on Montagne, is, that he was perfectly acquainted with the 
Mind of Man ; that he furvey'd it to the bottom,its Nature, and its Properties ; that he knew the 
ffrong and weak fides of it-, and, in a word, all that could be. known of it. Let us fee if he de- 
fer ve thefe Praifes, and whence it comes to pafs Men are fo liberal on his behalf. 

Thofe who have read Montagne, know well enough that he would fain pafs for a Pyrrhoniil, 
L.uCh.22 and that he takes Pride in doubting of all things. The perfwafion of Certainty in any thing, fays he, 
is a certain teftimony of Folly , and extream incertainty ; and there is not a foolijher and lefs Philofophkal 
fort of Men, than the Philodox of Plato: On the contrary, he extolls the Pyrrhomfts at that exceffive 
rate in the fame Chapter, that 'tis not to be doubted but he was of the fame Sea. 'Twas necef- 
fary in the time he liv'd, to doubt of every thing, to pafs for a Man of Parts and a Gentleman ; 
and the Quality of a Bold Wit, which he pretended to, engag'd him farther in thefe Opinions. 
Now 'tis but fuppofing him an Academkl, to be able at one ftroke to manifeft him the molt ig- 
norant of all Men ; not only in what relates to the Nature of the Mind, but in every thing elfe. 
For fince there is an Effential difference between Knowing and Doubting, if the Academkh fay 
what they think ; when they affure us, They know nothing, we may conclude they are the molt Ig- 
norant Perfons in the World. 

But they are not only the molt Ignorant of all others ; but alfo the molt Vnreafonable Defenders 
of their Opinions : For ihey not only rejeft what is molt certain, and univerfally receiv'd, to be 
thought the Bold Wits; but by the fame Itrength of Imagination, love to talk in a Decifive Magi- 
iterial ftrain, about the molt uncertain and improbable things in Nature. Montagne affords us a 
manifeit Inltance of this Diltemper of Mind : And we mult neceffarily fay he was not only ig- 
norant of the Nature of an Humane Mind, but was in the grofleft Errors upon that Subject, fup- 
pofing he had faid what he thought of it, as he ought to have done. 

For what can we fay of a Man that confounds the Mind with Matter, that reports the molt ex- 
travagant Opinions of the Philofopbers, about the Nature of the Soul, without defpifing them ; 
and in a way that gives us to underltand he lik'd thofe belt, that were molt, oppofite to Reafon : 
Who faw no necefiity of the Immortality of our Souls ; who thinks it indifcoverable by Humane 
Reafon ; and who looks upon the Arguments that are given for it, as Dreams, which the delire 
of it breeds in us : Somnia non docentis, fed optantis : Who finds fault with Men for feparating from 
the Crowd of other Creatures, and diltinguilhing themfelves from Bealts, which he calls our Fel- 
low Brethren and Companions ; who believes they converfe with, and under fl and each other, and ridicule 
us; as we difcourfe and under ftand one another, and laugh at them; "who makes a greater difference be- 
twixt Man and Man, than betwixt a Man and a Beaft: Who attributes even to Spiders, Deliberation^ 
Thought, and Conclufwn. And who after having maintain'd, that the Difpofition of the Humane Body^ 
had no advantage over that of Bcafts, readily embraces this Opinion. That 'tis not by our Reafon y 
■ our Difcourfe, our Soul, we have the Afcendant over Beafts ; but on the account of our Beauty, the fine- 
nefs of our ComplcBion, and the excellent Difpofition of our Members, in comparifon of which we ought 
to give up our Intelligence, Prudence, and the relt, as trivial Accomplifhments, &c. Can any 
one fay that a Man who concludes with fuch the molt extravagant Opinions, as that 'Tit not by 
the Deductions of Reafon, but our Arrogance and Obftinacy, that we give our felves the Preeminence above 
other Animals, had a very exact Knowledge of the Mind of Man ? Or can he think to convince 
others herein ? 

But we ihould do all Men Jultice, and impartially declare what was the Character of Mont ange'% 
Mind. He had indeed but little Memory, and Itill lefs Judgment .-■ But thefe two Qualities put to- 
gether, make not that accomplilh'd thing which generally goes by the Name of Finenefs and Beau- 
ty of Wit or Parts. 'Tis the Beauty, the Vivacitys and the Extent of Imagination which are 
the Ingredients of the Fine Wtt. 'Tis the glittering and not the folid Mind, that pleafes the ge- 
nerality^ becaufe they love what touches the Senfes above that which inftru&s their Reafon. And 
thus taking the Finenefs of Imagination for the Finenefs of the Mind, we may fay, that. Mon- 
tagne had a Mind Fine, and indeed extraordinary : His Idea's are falfe, but handfom. His Ex- 

preffions 



Chap. VI. The Search after Truth. 

preffions irregular and bold, but taking : His difcourfes ill-feafon'd, but well imaging. There 
appears throughout his Book the Character of an Original, that is infinitely pleating. As great a 
Copyer as he is, the Copyer is not difcern'd ; his ftrong and bold Imagination giving always the 
turn of an Original, even to what was the molt ftol'n. To conclude, he has every thing necef- 
fary either for pleating us> or impofing on us : And, I think, I have fufficiently Ihewn, that 'tis 
not by convincing their Reafon he gets into the Favour and Admiration of Men, but by turning 
th.eir Mind by an ever- victorious Vivacity of his imperious Imagination. 



99 



CHAP. VI. 

I. Of Witches in Imagination, and of Wolf-men. II. The Con- 
clusion of the two firft Books, 

THE ftrangeft effect of the force of Imagination, is the immoderate Fear of the Appari- 
tion of Spirits, Witchcraft, Spells, and Charms, Lycamhropes or Wolf-men, and gene- 
rally of whatever is fuppos'd to depend on the Power of the Devil. 

There is nothing more terrible, or that frightens the Mind more, and makes deeper impref- I. 
lions in the Brain, than the Idea of an invifible Power,intent upon doing us mifchief, and to which of Imtgi- 
we can make no refiftance : Whatever Difcourfes raife that Idea, are attended to with dread, "^ 
and curiofity : Now Men affecting all that's extraordinary, take a whimfical delight in relating Wl£ches ° 
furprizing and prodigious Stories, of the Power and Malice of Witches, both to the fearing others 
and themfelves. And fo we need not wonder that Sorcerers and Witches are fo common in fome 
Countries, where the belief of the Witches-Sabbath is deeply rooted in the Mind : Where all the 
molt extravagant Relations of Witchcrafts art liften'd to as Authentic Hiftories} and where Mad- 
men and Fifwnislrs, whofe Imagination has been diftemper'd through the recital of thefe Stories 
and the corruption of their Hearts, are burnt for real Sorcerers and Witches. 

I know well enough I lhall incur the blame of a great many, for attributing the molt part of 
Witchcrafts to the power of Imagination, as knowing Men love to be fcar'd and frightned ; that 
they are angry with fuch as would difabufe them, and are like thofe imaginary fick People, who 
refpectfully harken to, and punctually execute the orders of Phyficians who prognofticate direful 
accidents to them : For Superltitions are not eafily either deftroy'd or oppos'd without finding a 
great number of Patrons and Defenders. And that Inclination to a blind-fold Belief of all 
the Dreams and Illufions of Demonogr others is produe'd, and upheld by the fame Caufe ; which 
makes the Superfluous ftiffand untra&able, as it were ealie to demonftrate. However, this 
ought not to difcourage me from fhewing in a few words, how I believe fuch Opinions as thefe 
take footing. 

A Shepherd in his Cottage after Supper, gives his Wife and Children a Narrative of the adven- 
tures of the Witches-Sabbath. And having his Imagination moderately warm'd by the Vapours of 
ftrong Liquors, and fancying he has been often an Affiftant at that imaginary Rendezvous, fails 
not to deliver himfelf in a manner ftrong and lively. His- natural Eloquence, together with the 
Difpofition his whole Family is in, to hearken to a Subject fo new and terrible, muft doubtlefs 
produce prodigious Impreffions in weak Imaginations °, nor is it naturally poffible but his Wife and 
Children muft be difinay'd, muft be affected and convine'd with what they hear him fay. 'Tis an 
Husband, 'tis a Father that fpeaks of what himfelf has been an Eye-witnefs and Agent: He is 
belov'd and refpected, and why fhould he not be believ'd ? The Shepherd repeats the fame thing 
one day after another ; his Wire's and Children's Imagination receive deeper and deeper Impref- 
fions of it by degrees, till at laft it grows familiar ; their Fears vanifh, but Conviction ftays be- 
hind ; and at length Curiofity invites them to go to it themfelves. They anoint themfelves, and 
lay them down to fleep : This Difpofition of Heart, gives an additional heat to their Imagina- 
tion, and the Traces the Shepherd had imprinted on their Brain open, fo as to make them fancy 
in their lleep all the Motions of the Ceremony he had defcrib'd to them, prefent and real. They 
wake, and ask each other, and give a mutual Relation of what they fay. And thus they ftreng- 
then the Traces of their Vifion ; and he who has the ftrongeft Imagination, having the beft 
knack at perfwading the reft, fails not in a few Nights time, to Methodize the Imaginary Hifto- 
ry of the Sabbath. Here now are your finifh'd Witches of the Shepherd's making ; and thefe in 
their turn will make many others, if having a ftrong and lively Imagination, they be not deterr'd 
by Fear from telling the like Stories. 

There have been known fuch hearty down-right Witches, as made no fcruple to confefs to eve= 
ry body their going to the Sabbath ; aud who were fo throughly cortvine'd of it, that though feve- 
ral Perfons watch'd them, and aflur'd them they never ftirr'd out of their Bed, yet have with- 
ftood their Teftimony, and perlifted in their own perfwafion* 

We all know that when Children hear Tales of Spirits, what frights they are put into, and 
that they have not courage to ftay without Light arid Company : Becaufe at that time their Brain 
receiving not the Impreffions of any prefent Object, opens in thofe Traces that are form'd in it by 
the Story, and that with fo much force, as frequently to fet before their Eyes, the Objects repre- 

fented 



loo F. Malebranche Concerning ... Book 117 

fented to them •, And yet thefe Stories are not told them as if they were true, nor fpoken in a man- 
ner denoting the Belief of them in the Speaker } and fometimes coldly and without the leaft con- 
cern. Which may make it lefs to be admir'd, that a Man who believes he has been prefent at the 
Witches-Sabbath, and confequently affirms it in a ferious tone, and with a look of affurance, 
mould eafily convince his refpedful Auditory of all the circumftances he defcribes to them} and 
thereby tranfmit into' their Imagination, Impreffions, like thofe he was himfelf abus'd with. 

Men in fpeaking engrave in our Brain fuch Impreffions as they have themfelves. When they 

are deep they fpeak in a way that makes a deep Impreffion upon others : For they never fpeak, but 

they make them like themfelves in fome thing or other. Children in their Mother's Womb, have 

only the Perceptions of their Mothers } and when brought into the World, imagine little more 

than what their Parents are the caufe of} even the wifeft Men take their Meafures, rather from 

the Imagination of others, that is, from Opinion and Cuftom, than from the Rules ofReafon. 

Thus in the places where Witches are burnt, we find great numbers of them, it being taken for 

granted, they are really what they were executed for •, and this Belief is ftrengthened by the Dif- 

courfes that are made of them. Should they ceafe to punifh them, and treat them as Mad-folks, 

we fhould fee in a little time no more Witches ; becaufe thofe that are only imaginarily fo, which 

certainly make the greateft number, would return to fober Senfe again. 

Tis certain that True Witches deferve Death, and that the Imaginary are not to be reputed al- 
together innocent : For generally they never fancy themfelves to be Witches, without having their 
Heart difpos'd to go to the Sabbath, and anointing their Bodies with fome Drug, to bring about 
their wicked Defign : But by punifhing all thefe Criminals without diftindion, the common Per- 
fwafion gathers flrength, the Imaginary Witches daily multiply, and a great many People deftroy - 
their Lives and Souls together. Wherefore 'tis not without Reafon, feveral of our Courts have 
left off punilhing them ; lince which, there are found but few that are within their Jurifdidion-} 
and the Envy, Hatred, and Malice of the Wicked, cannot ufe that pretence to the Deftrudion of 
the Innocent. 
of Wolf- ^he Apprehenfion of Wolf-men, or of Men, who imagine themfelves transform'd into Wolves, 
men. is a Fancy no lefs ridiculous. A Man by an extraordinary Sally of Imagination, falls into a fort of 
Madnefs, that makes him fancy he grows a Wolf every Night. This Diforder of his Mind, dif- 
pofes him to the doing all the Ad ions that Wolves either do, or he has heard of tbem. He leaps 
then out of his Houfe at Midnight, roams along the Streets, falls upon fome Child he meets with, 
bites, tears, and miferably mifufes it. The Stupid and Superftitious People imagine this Fana- 
tick is really turn'd Wolf; becaufe the wretch believes it himfelf, and has whifper'd it to fbmePer- 
fbns, who cannot conceal the Secret. 

Were it an eafie thing to form in the Brain fuch Impreffions, as perfwade Men they are tranf- 
form'd into Wolves ; and could they run along the Streets and make all the havock thofe wretched 
Wolf-men do, without an entire fubveriion of their Brain (as 'tis an eafie matter for a Man to go 
to the Witches-Sabbath, in his Bed, and without waking ) thefe notable Stories of Men Metamor- 
phos'd into Wolves, would have no lefs effed than thofe that are told of the Rendezvous of Witches ; 
and we fhould have as many Wolf men as we have Wizards. But the perfwafion of being chang'd 
into a Wolf, fuppofes a fubverfion of Brain much harder to be efieded, than that Diforder of one, 
who only thought he went to the Midnight-Sabbath -, that is, of one, who fancy'd he faw in the 
Night what was not^ and who, when he waked, could not diftinguifh his Dreams from the Thoughts 
he had in the Day-time. 

'Tis a very common thing for fome Men to have fuch lively Dreams, as to remember every 
particular of them when they wake, though the fubjed of their Dream, has nothing in it very 
terrible ; and fo 'tis no hard matter for Men to perfwade themfelves they have been at the Witches- 
Sabbath ; fince to this no more is requir'd, than that their Brain preferve the footfteps in it, which 
were made by the Animal Spirits in their Sleep. 

The main Reafon way we cannot take our Dreams for Realities, is, the Incoherence we find in 
our Dreams, with the things we have done, when awake: For hereby we difcover they are only 
Dreams. Now this is no Rule for the Sorcerer to judge by, that hls-Sabbath is a Dream •, for he 
never goes to the Sabbath but in the Night-time, and the Occurrences therein are incapable of 
having any Connedion with the other Adions of the Day ; fo that 'tis Morally impoffible he fliould 
be made fenfible of his Error by this Means. Nor is there any neceffity, that the things fancy'd 
to be feen by thefe pretended Witches at the Sabbath, fliould have any Natural Order to one ano- 
ther ; fince they feem fo much the more real, as they are the more extravagant and confus'd in 
Coherence. Wherefore it makes enough for their Deception, that the Idea's of thefe Sabbatic 
Ceremonies be lively and frightful ; as 'tis impoflible they fhould be otherwife, if it be confuler'd, 
that they reprefent things wholly new and extraordinary. 

But the Imagination mult be highly diftemper'd, before a Man can fancy himfelf a Cock, a 
Coat, a Wolf, or an Ox ; which is the reafon the thing is no commoner ; though thefe Diforders 
of Mind fometimes happen either through GOD's punitive Juftice, as in the cafe of Nebuchodo- 
nofor, related in Scripture, or by a natural overflowing of Melancholy in the Brain, whereof ma- 
ny Inftances are to be met with in the Books of Phyficians. 

Though I am fatisfy'd, that real Witches axe extreamly rare, and that their Sab bath is nothing 
but a Dream ; and that the Courts, which throw out the Indidments of Witchcraft, are themoit 
. equitable^ yet I doubt not but there may be Sorcerers, Charms, and Witchcraft, and that COD 
fometimes permits the Devil to exercife his Malice upon Men. But we are taught by holy Scri- 
pture, 



Chap. VI. The Search after Truth. ioi 

pture, that The Kingdom of Satan is deftroy'd; and that an Angel of Heaven has chained up the De- 
vil, and fhut him in the Abyf; from whence he fhall never efcape till the end of the World : 
That this is the Strong Man, CHRIST has difarm'd andfpoil'd; and that the time is come, 
when the Prince of the World is baniih'd out of his Kingdom. 

He reigu'd till the Coming' of our SAFJO VR , and he reigns ftill, if any one will have it fo, 
in thofe places, where the Knowledge of our S AF 10V R is not come. But he has no Right or 
Power over thofe, who are Regenerated in JESVS CHR 1ST. He cannot fo much as tempt 
them, unlefsby GOD's Permiflion^ and if he permits it, 'tis that they may overcome him: 'Tis 
therefore doing the Devil too much honour, tomakje-'fuch Hiftories, as illuftrate his Power, as is 
done by our new Demonographers ; fince thefe Hiftories render him formidable to weaker Minds. 

We ought to defpife the Devils, as we defpife Executioners, and tremble before GOD alpne : 
'Tis his Power we fhonld only fear, his Judgments and his Wrath, we mould only dread, and 
never provoke him by the contempt of his Laws and his Gofpel. He deferves to be attended to, 
when he fpeaks himfelf ; and fo do Men when they fpeak of him. But 'tis ridiculous to be fright- 
ned and troubled when they fpeak of the Power of the Devil; our trouble is too great an honour 
to our Enemy, who loves to be refpe&ed and fear'd ; and we facrifice to his Pride, when we prb- 
ftrate and abafe our Mind before him. 

'Tis now time to put an end to this Second Book, and to remind you, by what has beenfaid II. 
in this and the Fore-going Book, That all the Thoughts the Soul has through the means of, or ™f Co f 
wkh dependance on the Body, are wholly for the Body ; and are either all falfe, or obfeure : ^"^J 
That they are only inftrumental in uniting us to fenfible Goods, and to whatever can procure firft Bocks. 
them, which Union engages us in infinite Errors and exceffive Miferies ; though we are not al- 
ways fenfible of thefe Miferies, no more than we are of the Errors that occafion them. I give 
here a remarkable Inftance. 

The Union that we had with our Mothers in their Womb, which is the ftri&eft poffibleto be 
had with Mankind, was the Caufe of two of the greateft Evils , namely, Sin and Concupifcence ; 
which are the Original of all our Miferies. And yet for the forming of our Body, it was necef- 
fary that Union mould be fo clofe and ftrid as it is. 

This Union which was broken at our Birth, was fucceeded by. another, whereby Children are 
con-fociated to their Parents and their Nurfes. This fecond Union was not fo ftriQr as the former, 
and therefore did us not fo much mifchief ; having only inclin'd us to believe and imitate all that 
our Parents and Nurfes do and fay. 'Tis plain this fecond Union was farther neceflary, not as 
the firft, for the forming, but the preferving of our Body} that we might know all the things 
ufeful or advantagious to it, and might accommodate it to fuch Motions as are neceflary to ob- 
tain them. | 

Laft'of all, the Union which we have at prefent with all Men, is unavoidably the caufe of a 
great deal of Evil to us 5 though it be not fo ftrait, as being lefs neceflary to the Prefervation 
of our Body. 

For 'tis upon the fcore of this Union, we live by Opinion, that we efteem and love, what is 
efteem'd and lov'd in the World, in fpight of the Remorfe of our Confciences and the true Idea's 
that we have of things. I fpeak not here of the Union we have with the Mind of other Men 5 
in behalf of which it may be laid, we receive inftru&ion from it : I fpeak only of the fenfible 
Union that is between our Imagination, and the Air, and Manner of thofe that fpeak to us. We 
fee then how all the Thoughts we have by the Dependance on the Body, are falfe, and fo much 
the more dangerous to the Soul, as they are the more ufeful to the Body. 

Which being fo, let us try to rid our felves by degrees of the Delufions of our Senfe, of the 
Vifion and Chimeras of our Imagination, and of the Impreffion made by other Men's Imaginations 
on our Mind. Let us carefully rejeft all the confus'd Idea's we have contra&ed through the De- 
pendance we are in to our Body ; and let us only admit the clear and evident Idea's which the Mind 
receives through its neceflary Union with the Divine Logos, or with Eternal Wifdom and Truth 5 
as we fhall explain in the following Book, which treats Of the Vnderfianding or Pure Mind. 



D d R MALE- 



[ ioi .] 



F. MALEBRANCHE'S 

TREATISE 

CONCERNING 

The Search after TRUTH. 

BOOK the THIRD, 

Concerning 

The Understanding, 

O R 



The Pure Intelled. 



CHAP. I. 

I. Thought is only ejfential to the Mind. Senfation and Imagination are 
only the Modifications of it. II. We know not all the Modifications 
our Soul is capable of. III. They are different from our Knowledge 
and our Love^ nor are they always Confequences of them. 

THE Subjed of this Third Book isfomewhat dry and barren: In which we enquire 
into the Mind confider'd alone, and without any reference to the Body, in order to 
difcover the Infirmities peculiar to it, and the Errors deriving only from it. The 
Senfes and Imagination are exuberant and inexhauftible Sources of Error and Decep- 
tion : But the Mind a&ing by it felf, is not fo fubjeft to flraying and mifcondud. It was a diffi- 
cult thing to put an end to the two laft Treatifes ; and 'tis no lefs difficult to begin this ^ not that 
there is not enough to befaid on the Nature and Properties of the Mind •>, but becaufe we enquire 
not here fo much into its Properties, as its WeaknefTes. 'Tis not therefore to be wonder'd, if 
this Trad is not fo large, nor difcovers fo many Errors as the two fore-going ; nor ought it to be 
complain'd of for being fomewhat Dry, Abftrad, and Applicative. For 'tis impoffible in all 
Difcourfes to move the Senfes and Imaginations of others •, nor ought it always to be done : A 
Subjed of an abftrad Nature, in becoming fenfible, commonly grows obfcure, and 'tis enough to 
be made intelligible: So that nothing is moreunjuft, than the ufual Complaints of thofe, who 
would know every thing, and yet take pains for nothing; who take pet, if you deiire them to 
be attentive : who would ever be touch'd and mov'd, and have their Senfes and their Paffions 
eternally gratify'd : But, we confefs our felves unable to give them Satisfaction.- Writers of 
Comedies ; and Romance s^xz oblig'd to pleafe, and to procure Attention ; but for us, it's fufficient if 
we can inftrud, even thofe that labour to make themfelves attentive. 

The Errors of the Senfes and Imagination, proceed from the Nature and Conftitution of the 
Body ; and are expos'd to view, by confidering wh3t Dependency the Soul's in to it : But the 
Errors of the Pure Underftanding cannot bedifcover'd, but by confidering the Nature of the Mind 
it. felf, and of the Idea's that are neceflary to its knowing Objeds. And therefore to penetrate 
into the Caufes of the Errors of the Pure Underftanding, 'twill.be neceffary to infift in this.Book, 
on the confideration of the Nature of the Mind, and of Intellectual Idea's. 

In 



fchap. I. The Search after Truth. , xod 

In the firft.pkce, I fhall treat of the Mind, confider'd in its own Nature, without any Rela- 
tion to the Body, to which it is united. So that what I ihall fay on this point, will extend to 
pure Intelligences, and by ftronger Reafon to what we call Pure Underftanding. For by the 
Word PureVnderfanding, I mean only to defign that Faculty, the Mind has of knowing External 
Object, without -forming Corporeal Images of them in the Brain, to reprefent them by. After 
which I (hall difcourfe of Intellectual Idea's, by means of which the PurtVnderftanding perceives 
Exteriour Objects. 

I am perfwaded no Man can doubt, after he has ferioufly thought on it, but the * Ejfence of *• , 
the Mind conlifts only in Thought, as the ElTence of Matter eonfifts only in Extenfion ; and that^ ??^ 
according to the different Modifications of Thought, the Mind one while Wills, and another/eat/^ to 
while Imagines, or has many other particular Forms, as according to the different Modifications^ soul. 
of Extenfion, Matter is fometimes Water, fometimes Wood, and fometimes Fire ; orhas,abun-' ye ^ tZ( ' w . 
dance of other particular Forms. , ZtknTe 

I only advertife thus much, That by the word Thought, I underftand not here the parti- only the 
cular Modifications of the Soul, that is, this or that particular Thought, but Thought capable Modifier 
of all forts of Modifications, or of all forts of Thoughts ; as by Extenfionis not meant this or that tior! J°f it ' 
Extenfion round of fquaU, forinftance, but Extenfion capable of all forts of Modifications, or of E n- e „f e ' ^ 
Fi CT ures : And this Comparifon would have no difficulty in it, but that we have not fo clear an a t j,i„g t j 
Idea of Thought as we have of Extenfion ; for we only know Thought by Internal Sentiment or mean that 
Confcicnce, f as I make out hereafter. wAfc* is 

I am farther perfwaded, it is impoffible to conceive a Mind, without Thought ; though 'tis eafie 2,»<Sfr 
enough to conceive one without A&aalSenfation, Imagination, and even without Volition ; in like m which' 
manner as 'tis impoffible to conceive any Matter without Extenfion, though it be eafie to conceive depend all 
one that's neither Earth nor Mettle, neither (quart nor round, and which likewife is not in Motion. tbeModifi- 
Hence we ought to conclude, that as there may be a Portion of Matter; that is neither Earth nor rf™™^' 
Mettal neither fquare nor round, nor yet in Motion ; fo there may be a Mind, that neither feels 7 ™ second 
Heat nor Cold, neither Joy nor Sorrow •, that Imagines nothing, and even Wills nothing •, fo that pan of the 
all thefe Modifications are not effential to it. Thought therefore is only the Effence of the Mind, Pure Mind 
as Extenfion only is the Effence of Matter. <*«$> 7* 

But as Matter or Extenfion, were it without Motion, would be altogether ufelefs, and incapa- 
ble of that variety of Forms, for which it is created ; and 'tis not conceivable that an Intelligent 
Being defi CT n'd to produce it in that manner ; fo were a Mind or Thought without Volition, it is 
plairTit would be wholly ufelefs, fince that Mind would have no tendency towards the Objects of 
its Perceptions ; nor would it love Good, for which it was created ; So that, 'tis impoffible to be 
conceiv'd that 'an Intelligent Being fhould have prod ue'd it in fuch a condition. Notwithflan- 
din°- as Motion is not the Effence of Matter, fince it fuppofes Extenfion ; fo Volition is not the 
Effence of the Mind, fince Volition fuppofes Perception. 

Thomht therefore all alone, is what conftitutes the Effence of the Mind , and the different 
manners of Thinking, as Stnfation and Imagination, are only the Modifications it is capable of, 
but wherewith it is not always modify'd: But Volition is a Property that always accompanies it, 
whether in Conjunction with, or Separation from the Body ; which yet is not Elfential to it, 
fince it fuppofes Thought, and 'tis poffible to conceive a Mind without Will, as a Body without 

However the Power of Willing is infeparable from the Mind, though it be not elfential to it ; as 
the Capacity of being mov'd is infeparable from Matter, though it be not included in its Effence. 
For as it is impoffibie to conceive any Matter that cannot be mov'd, fo 'tis impoffible to conceive 
any Mind, that has not the Power of Willing, or is incapable of any Natural Inclination. But 
again, as Matter may be conceiv'd to exift without any Motion, fo the Mind may be conceiv'd 
to exift without any Impreffion of the Author of Nature towards Good, and confequently withr 
out Will. For the Will is nothing but the Imfreffion of the Author of Nature, which carries us to- 
wards Good in general; as we have explain'd more at large, in the firft. Chapter of the Firft 

°What has been faid in that Treatife of the Senfes, and what we have now laid, of the Nature TL 
of the Mind,does not fuppofe we know all the Modifications it is capableof : We are far from mak- ™ °»™ 
ing fuch like Suppofitions ; believing on the contrary, that the Mind has a Capacity of receiving Modifica . 
an infinite fucceffion of diverfe Modifications, which the fame Mind knows nothing of. tions our 

The leaft portion of Matter is capable of receiving a Figure of three, fix, ten, or of ten thou- ^«f " "- 
faod Sides, alfo a Circular, or Elliptic Figure, which may be confider d as Figures of infinite ^ »/• 
Sides and Angles The different Species of each of thefe Figures are innumerable ; Infinite are 
Triansl-s of a different Species, and more ftill are the Figures of four, fix, ten, or ten thoufand 
Sides, and of infinite Polyenes. ' For a Circle, an Ellipfis, and in general every regular or irre- 
gular Curvilhid Figure, may be confider'd as an infinite Polygene: AnElhpfis, for inftance, as an 
infinite Polyene, but whofe Sides or Angles are unequal, being greater towards the little Diame- 
ter than the great ; and fo of other infinite Polygenes, more compound and irregular. 

A plain piece of Wax therefore is capable of infinite, or rather infinitely infinite different 
Modifications, which no Mind can comprehend. What reafon is there then to imagine that the 
Soul, which is far more noble than the Body, fhould be capable only of thofe Modifications ihe 
has already receiv'd ? 

Had 



10 a JF. Malebranche Concerning Book III. 

Had we never Felt Pleafure or Pain, had we never Seen Light nor Colour ; or had we been 
with refped to all things, as the Blind and Deaf are, in regard to Sounds and Colours •, fhould 
we have had Reafon to conclude we were incapable of all the Senfations we have of Objects? For 
thefe Senfations are only the Modifications of our Soul, as has been prov'd in the Book concer- 
ning the Senfes. 

It mufl be granted then, that the Capacity the Soul has of Receiving different Modifications, 
is probably greater than the Capacity it has of Conceiving. I would fay, that as the Mind can- 
not exhauft, or comprehend all the Figures Matter can be fafhion'd in, fb it can't comprehend 
all the different Modifications poflible for the Almighty Hand of C O D to Mint the Soul into, 
though it knew as diftindtly the Capacity of the Soul, as it knows that of Mattery which yet 
it cannot do, for the Reafons I fhall bring in the Seventh Chapter of the Second Part of this 
Book. 

If the Soul, whillt we are on Earth, receives but few Modifications, 'tis becaufe it is united 
to the Body, and depends upon it. All her Senfations have reference to her Body, and as fhe has 
not the Fruition of GOD, fo fhe has none of thofe Modifications this Fruition mould produce. 
The Matter whereof our Body is compos'd, is capable but of very few Modifications in our Life- 
time ^ it cannot be refolv'd into Earth and Vapour, till after our Death : It cannot at prefent be- 
come Air, Fire, Diamond, or Mettal ; it cannot grow round, fquare, or triangular ; it mufl: 
neceflarily be Flefh, and have the Figure of a Man, to the end the Soul may be united to it. 
'Tis the fame cafe with our Soul : She mufl neceflarily have the Senfations of Heat, Cold, Co- 
lour, Light, Sounds, Odors, Tails, and many other Modifications, to the end fhe may continue 
united to her Body. All her Senfations are fubfervient to the Prefervation of her Machine. 
They trouble her, and difmay her, if but the leafl inward Spring chance to break or flaken ; 
which neceflarily fubje&s the Soul to her Body, as long as her Body is fubjeft to Corruption. 
But when the Body fhall becloath'd with Immortality, and we fhall no longer fear the Diflblu- 
tion of it parts ; 'tis reafonable to believe the Soul fhall be no longer touch'd With thofe incommo- 
dious Senfations, which we feel againfl our Will ; but with infinite others of a different kind, 
whereof we have at prefent no Idea ; which will exceed all that we can think, and will be worthy 
the Greatnefs and Goodnefs of the GO D we fhall enjoy. 

'Tis therefore unreafonable for any one to think he fo throughly comprehends the Nature of 
the Soul, as to be able to pronounce it incapable of any thing more than Knowledge, and Love. 
This indeed might be maintain'd by thofe who attribute their Senfations to external Obje&s, or 
to their Body ; and who would have their Paflions to be in their Hearts. For indeed if we rob 
the Soul of all her Paflions and Senfations, all that we leave difcoverable in her' is, no more than 
a confequence of Knowledge, or of Love. But I cannot conceive how thofe who are retriev'd 
from thofe Delufions of the Senfes, can perfwade themfelves, that all our Senfations and our 
Paflions, are nothing but knowledge and Love •, I would fay, Specie s of confus'd Judgments the 
Soul pafles upon Objects, with reference to the Body which fhe Animates. I cannot conceive, 
how a Man can affirm Light, Colours, Odors, and the like, to be Judgments of the Soul ; for it 
feems to me on the contrary, that I diftin&ly perceive Light, Colours, Smells, and the other Sen- 
. fations, to be Modifications quite different from Judgments. 

But let us make choice of more lively Senfations, and fuch as the Mind is mofl taken up with ; 

and fee what thefe Perfons fay of Pain and Pleafure. They will have thefe Senfations, with feve- 

* S. Aug. ra i mofl confiderable * Authors, to be only the confequences or dependences of the Faculties we 

1^' J 5 ' de we have of Knowing and Willing ; and that Pain, for inflance, is only the Regret, the Oppofition, 

jPesclnes and Averfion the Will has, to what fhe knows hurtful to the Body which fhe loves. Now to me 

inhisMan, this feems evidently to confound Pain with Sorrow ; but fo far is Pain from being a Confequence 

&c. of the Knowledge of the Mind, and the Action of the Will, that on the contrary it precedes them 

both. 

If you put, for example, a burning Coal in the Hand of a Man afleep, or that was warming 
his Hands behind him ; I know not how it can be with any probability affirm'd, that this Man 
firftknew there happen'd in his Hand fome Motions contrary to the good Conllitution of 
his Body; that hereupon his Will oppos'd them ; and that his Pain was the Confequence of that 
Knowledge of his Mind, and Oppolition of his Will. On the contrary, it is in my Opinion un- 
doubtedly certain, that the firfl thing this Man perceiv'd as foon as the Coal touch'd his Hand, 
was Pain; and that the Knowledge of the Mind, and Oppofition of the Will, were only the 
Confequences of it, though they were truly the Caufe of the Sorrow which fucceeded the 
Pain. 

But there's a vafl difference between this Pain and the Sorrow it produces. Pain is the fu-fl 
thing the Soul is fenfible of; it is not preceded by any Knowledge, nor can ever be agreeable 
and welcome of itfelf. Whereas Sorrow is thelaft thing the Soul feels; it is ever preceded 
with Knowledge, and is always pleafant of it felf. This is evidently manifeft from the Pleafure 
that attends the Sorrow a Man's affected with, at the direful Reprefentations of the Theatre; 
for this Pleafure increafes with the Sorrow ; but Pleafure never increafes with- Pain. The Come- 
dians, who ftudy the Art of Pleafing, know well that they mufl never lay the Stage in Blood j 
becaufe the fight, though of a fictitious Murder, would be too Terrible to be Pleafant : But they 
are not afraid of touching the Spectators with a deep Sorrow; becaufe Sorrow is ever agreea- 
ble, when there's occafion to be mov'd with it. There is then an EfTential difference between 

Sorrow 



Chap. II. The Search after Truth. to 5 

Sorrow and Pain ; and it can no wife be faid, that Pain is nothing but the Knowledge of the 
Mind, together with an Oppofition of the Will. 

As to all the other Senfations, fuch as are Smells, Tails, Sounds, Colours, the generality 
of Men do not think they are the Modifications of their Soul. Bat on the contrary, judge they 
are diffus'd upon the Objefts ; or at leaft that they are only in the Soul, as an Idea of a Square or 
a Circle ; that is, are united to the Soul, but are not the Modifications of it \ and the Reafon of 
their judging thus is, that this kind of Senfations do not much affect them •, as I have Ih&wn hi 
the Explication of the Errors of the Senfes. 

It ought then, I think, to be concluded, That we know not all the Modifications incident to 
our Soul ; and that, befides thofe which Ihe has by the Organs of Senfes, it is impoffible for her to 
have infinite others, which Ihe has never experimented, nor ever Ihall, till deliver'd from the cap- 
tivity of her Body. 

And yet it mult be confefs'd,that as Matter is not capable of infinite different Configurations,but 
becaufe of its Extenfion ; fo the Soul is not capable of different Modifications but on the account 
of Thought :, it being manifeft that the Soul would be incapable of the Modifications of Pleafure, 
Pain, and even of thofe that are indifferent to her, were it not for her being capable of Perception 
or Thought. 

It is fufficient then to know, that Thought is the Principle of all thefe Modifications : If any 
one will have fomething in the Soul previous to Thought, I fhall not difpute it with him : But 
as I am affur'd that no One has any Knowledge of his Soul, but by Thought, or by being inward- 
ly confcious of what paffes in his Mind j fo I am certain that if any One would reafon about the 
Nature of the Soul, he ought only to confult that Internal Senfation, which conftantly repre- 
fents her to himfelf fuch as ihe is, and not to imagine againft the conviction of his own Confcience, 
that Ihe is an invifihle Fire, a fubtile Air, Harmony, or the like. 



CHAP. II. 

I. The Mind being limited^ cannot comprehend any thing of an infinite 
Nature. II. Its Limitation is the Origine of a great many Errors: 
III. And efpecially of Herejies. IV. The Mind muft be fubmitted 
unto Faith. 

SO then, that which we immediately difcover in the Thought of Man, is its being li- I. 
mited to a very narrow compafs \ from which confideration may be drawn two very im- the Mind 
portant Conclufions : As firft, that the Soul cannot perfectly know Infinity. Secondly, M H Umi ' 
that (he can have no diftindt Knowledge of many things at once. For as a piece of Wax is inca- H^l"^ 
pable of admitting at the fame time a great number of different Figures •, fo the Soul is incapable anything of 
of knowing at the fame time a multitude of things. And as again a piece of Wax cannot be fquare an infinite 
and round at the fame time, but only femi-fquare and femi-circular \ and the more different Kaure. 
Figures it has, the lefs perfect and diftinct they will be •, fo the Soul cannot perceive many things 
at once •■, and her Thoughts will be fo much more confus'd, as they are more numerous. 

Laft of all, as a piece of Wax, which had a thoufand Faces, and on each Face a different Fi- 
gure, would be neither fquare, nor round, nor oval, nor could a Man lay what Figure it was of: 
So it fometimes happens that a Man has fuch a multitude of different Thoughts, that he fancies 
he thinks of nothing at all \ which is exemplify'd in thofe that fall into a Trance. The Animal 
Spirits irregularly turning in- their Brain,excite fuch a multitude of Traces, as not to open any one 
ftrongly enough, to produce any particular Senfation, or diftinct Idea in the Mind } fo that thefe 
Perfons perceive fo many things at once, that they have no diftinct Perception of any, and this 
makes them conclude they have perceiv'd nothing. 

Not but that fometimes Men fwoon away for want of Animal Spirits : But at that time the Soul 
having only Thoughts of Pure Intellection, which leave no Traces in the Brain, we never remem- 
ber them when we come to our felves -, and that makes us believe we have thought of Nothing. 
This I have faid by the way, to fhew it is a miftake to believe the Soul does not always think, be- 
caufe Men fancy fometimes they think not of any thing. 

Every one that reflects but a little upon his own Thoughts, is experimentally convinced that the ti. 
Mind cannot apply it felf to the confideration of many things at once, and a. fortiori is unable to The Umm< 
comprehend what's infinite. And yet out of an unaccountable Capricio y fuch as are not ignorant */«* W tie 
of this, apply themfelves rather to the Contemplation of infinite Objeds, and of Queftions that |J" » r % 
demand an infinite capacity of Mind, than to fuch as are fuited to the Reach and Abilities of Agreax1Mr 
their mind. And a great many others, who would fain know all things, ftudy fo many Sciences vy Errors. 
at once, as only confound the Underftanding and incapacitate it for any true Science at all. 

How many do we fee defirousof comprehending the Divifibility of Matter ad infinitum, and of 

knowing how 'tis poffible for a grain of Sand to contain fo many parts in it, as this Earth, tho' 

proportionably leffer. What a multitude of Queftions are form'd, never to be refolv'd upon 

thatfubject; and many others which include any thing of Infinity in them ; the Refolution of 

. E e which, 



F Malm*ancke Concerning Book III. 

106 .. , , c' , in their own Mind ? When yet, though they ftudy them till they 

t^Xt^^ i^^to b^ opinionated with feme Error, or Extravagance or . 

<% certainly a very Pleafant **j^^ 

meevly becaufe they cannot S #|^ S^^' "Lfef kimpoffible for the Mind of Man 

ons that prove it ■ and this at toe fame jme tntt tn y ^ ^ ^.^ ^ fi 

to comprehend Infinity. For the fl A r g°™f ^^ "Jkaowledge it when they confider them with 
demon?fcrative,if there ^vvere ever any '^^V^J Q^^^o^d, which they cannot An- 
Attention. Notwithftandmg which, if they y^^TO t P hey fegfo to boggle at them, 
fwer, their Mind recbi s Irora th J Evi^ce^ ^ffmfet cannot Anfwer ^ they invent fome 
They are earncftly taken up ^Mfflfflfei and conclude at laft they were 
frivolous Dillinaion to the Dem°iiftrations o ^ init S^ they embrace the contrary Opinion, 
deceiv'd : and that all the World is in an Error Hoiccttej em ^ ^ I inaticm 

and defend it by Turgid Points C^^-^ t ^ Delufions, is theW* being inwardly 
is fure to furnilh them withal. Now the leaion 1 or iwai . v n0 ' neceffity of comprehending the 
convinced, that the Mind of Man is |gy ^ ***** * g °£J[ all the objeaions that 
!H^^ f* ^ * * t-pdOblctold be re- 

f ° 1V W d ouldMen only flick to fnch Qpdto. |^j^^ 

cern'd at it : For though there may become tha t are gepa i e ^" P fll ethcr loft their tim e, 
are Errors of little confequence. And as for the reir, tney conv £ c > d of the Weaknefs 

in thinkmg o^things they cannot co-prehend ? Fm -t^they « ^ Mind 

* ^ o/ of their Mind "Tis good (Jays a very umciou , .. ^ rf ever tQ oppofe 

Ito*/* kind of Subtilties, « or ^ h ?^^ r to7t b 7 the Gofpel, under pretence it cannot com- 
« its feeble Lights to the Truths propos d to it oy 1 , 1 ^^ thg w ht 

« pretend them. For fince all the ftrength of the Mind or Men is op ig wkh _ 

tof the leaft Atom of Matter and \^^^ C ^ m ^^ gainft Reafon, to refufe 

^S Keafon that our *^~lg^ or rather Inadvertency to the 

££ f bending what any ways belongs ,to ^^ ^^ ^ra^culiar TW-to themfelves-, 
fife«ji«. in thefe days above any other, a great many men, Natural Weaknefs of their Rea- 

ces not only to their dif-believing it but alfo to the r |^§|t^ ^ conceive ho w 
Arrogant and a Libertine ^ay, that Aey^re torn t^SlavCTy £ ^ 

'tispoffible for the Body of JESVS CHRIS 1 to ^^'^j as fufficient Rea f on to conclude 
^ir, at the fame time he is in Heaven-, and hence ™ g^^f ^ r, cou ld go. 
itimpoffible, asifhe perfeftly wmprehended ^ ^faHs to work and heats his Head in endea- 
So a Man that's convinced of his own Li ^» " e a Xhfe Dwr«s with Liberty, will poflibly 
vouring to reconcile the Fore-knowledge of G OD a ^ ™ s H^ ^ t . For being unable on 
fall into the Error of thofe who do .not beheve that Man a ee A ent t ^^ ^ 
one hand to conceive how the p "^ wc M ^S7dSo forbidding him to deny a Pro- 
the Liberty of Man -and ^^i^^t^th^i^om \ oiMiot making fufficient 

has of reconciling his Decrees with our Liberty. to confider the Weaknefs of their 

But Hereticks arc not the only Men who .^Attention to C o^ct canQOt attaili 

Mind, and that give it too much Scope and Liberty or Judging or tningb 

The Working and Agitation of the Mind, and the Subtil ties *ft%^^ r S^^S 
to make Men fenfible of their own Weaknefs, and to mfpire them with W^W 
requifite to make them humbly refign to the Decihons of the Church. On SS'SgW'jW 
Subtil and Humane Reafonings, may kindle a fecret Pride in their %^#g ^ 
ploy their Mind to evil purpofe, by framing a Religion fuitable to its Capuaty Andfe t-i a.c 
we from feeing Heretic h convine'd by Philofophic Arguments, and the Reading ol Book, piuc- 
li ScholafticalT fo as to acknowledge and condemn their Errors ; that on the contrary, we find 
them daUy taking conftantoccafion from the Weaknefs or fome School-men's Argiungs , to tur* 
the moft Sacred wyfteries of our Religion into Jeft and Raillery S which indeed are not eitab. 



Chap. III. The Search after Truth, I0 * 

on any Reafon, and Explications of Humane Derivation, but only on Authority of the Word of 
G O D, written or unwritten, that is tranfmitted down to us by way of Tradition. 

And indeed 'tis impoflible for Humane Reafon to make us comprehend, how one GOD is 'm 
Three Perfons : How the Body of our L O R D can be really prefent in the EnchtriSt i and how 
tis confiftent for Man to be free, whilft GOD knows from all Eternity all that Man fhall do 
The Reafons that are brought to prove and explain thefe things are fuch for the Generality as 
convince none but thofe who are willing to admit them without Examination i but look ridicu- 
lous and extravagant to Men minded to oppugn them, and that are not fettled in the Belief of 
the Foundation of thefe myftenes. Nay, it may be faid, that the Objections that are form'd 
againft the Principal Articles of our Faith, and efpecially againft themyfteries of the TRINITY 
are fo ftrong, as cannot poffiby admit of any clear, evident, and fatisfaaory Solution 5 fuch I 
mean, as one way or other does not fhock our weak and daggering Reafon : Thefe myfteries be- 
ing, in truth, incomprehenfible. 

The belt way of converting Heretich, is not then to accuftom therri to the Exercife of Reafon" 
by urging to them only uncertain Arguments, dedue'd from Philofiphy ; becaufe the Truths we 
would inftruft them in, come not under the Scrutinity of Reafon. Nor is it always convenient 
to ufe Argument in Truths, that can be made out by Reafon, as well as Tradition, as the Immorta- 
lity of the Soul, Original Sin, the neceffity of Grace, the corruption of Nature, and fome others ; 
for fear leaft the Mind having once tailed the Evidence of Argument, upon thefe Queftions, will 
not acquiefce in thofe which are only prov'd by Tradition. Oh the other hand, they mould be 
taught to quit their own Reafon, by making them fenfible of its Weaknefs, its Limitation, and 
its Difproportion to our myfteries; and when the Pride of their mind fhall be humbled and 
brought down, it will be eafie to introduce them into the Sentiments of the Church ; by repre- 
fenting to them her Authority, or explaining to them the Tradition of all Ages, if they are ca- 
pable of underftanding it. 

But whilft men are continually calling of their Sight, from the Weaknefs and Limitation of 
their Mind, their Courage will be puffed up with an indifcreet Preemption; they will bedazled 
by an abufive Light, and blinded with the love of Glory, andfo Heretkh will be continually 
Heretich : Phihfopherf obftinate and opinionated : And Men will never leave difputing on all 
things they can difpute on, as long as Difputation pleafes them. 







CHAP. III. 

I. The Philofophers dijfipate or dijfohe the force of their Mind, by applying 
it to Subje&s, including too many Relations, and depending on too many 
things ; and by obferving no Method in their Studies. II. An Inftance 
taken from Ariftotle. III. That Geometricians on the contrary take a good 
Method in the Search of Truth : Efpecially thofe who make ufe 0/ Algebra., 
and Analyticks. IV. That their Method increafes the flrength of the 
Mind, and that AriftotleV Logick lejfens it. V. Another Fault of Lear- 
ned Men. 

MEN not only involve themfelves in a multitude of Errors, by being bulled with Que- t. 
ftions, partaking of Infinity, whilft their Mind is Finite ; but by over-matching their Tl ^t the 
Mind which is but of a narrow Reach, with thofe of a vaft Comprehenfion. Thiofa- 

It has been already faid, That as a piece of Wax was incapable of receiving many perfeft and^rT^ 
very diftinct Figures, fo the Mind was incapable of receiving many diltincl Idea's-, that is, of*/;«v sm* 
perceiving many things diftindtly at the fame time. Whence 'tis eafie to conclude, that we dies. 
fhould not apply our felves at firft to the finding out occult Truths, the Knowledge whereof de- 
pends on too many things, fbme of which are unknown to us, or not fo familiar as they mould 
be: For we ought to ftudy with order, and make what we know diftin&ly, ferviceable to the 
Learning we know not, or what we know but confufedly. And yet the moft part of thofe, who 
take to any Study, trouble not themfelves fb much : They never make trial of their forces, nor 
enter into themfelves to try how far the reach of their Mind will go : 'Tis a fecret Vanity, and 
a diforderly Defireof Knowledge, and not Reafon, which regulates their Studies: For without 
confulting their Reafon, they undertake the fathoming the molt hidden and infcrntable Truths, 
and the refolving Queftions, which depend on fuch a multitude Relations, that the moft quick 
and piercing Mind would, to the difcovering their Truth with an abfblute Certainty, require 
leveral Ages, and infinite Experiments to build upon. 

In Medicine and Morality, there are a vaft many Queftions of this nature; all the Sciences of 
Bodies and their Qualities; as of Animals, Plants, Mettals, and their Properties, are fuch Scien- 
ces as can never be made fufficiently evident, or certain ; efpecially unlefs they are cultivated in 
in another manner, than has been done ; and the moft fimple and leaft compos'd, are began with, 

on 



i o 8 K Malebranche Concerning Book III. 

on which thofe other depend. But Men of ftudy care not to be at the pains of a methodical 
Philofophy : They are not agreed about the certainty of the Principles of Phyfics : They frank- 
ly confefs they know not the Nature of ■ Bodies in general, nor their Quaikies. And yet they 
fancy themfelves able, for inftance, to account for Old Men's Hairs growing White, and their 
Teeth becoming Black, and fuch like Queftions, which depend on fo many Caufes, as 'tis impofli- 
ble to give any infallible Reafon of them. For to this, 'tis neceflary to know, wherein truly 
confifts the Whitenefs of Hairs in particular; the Humours they are fed with; the Strainers 
which are in the Body, to let thefe Humours through; the Conformation of the Root of the 
Hairs, or of .the Skin they pafs through •, and the difference of all thefe things, in a Young Man, 
and an Old ; which is abfolutely impoflible, or at leaft extreamly difficult to be known. 
!X. Jttriftotle, for inftance, has pretended not to be ignorant of that adventitious Whitenefs in the 

Aninjlance'&a.iYs of Old Mgn ; and has given feveral Reafons for it *in feveral places of his Books. But be- 
of the want [ a g the Genius ofWature, he has not ftopt there ; but penetrated much farther. He has moreover 
of order m difcover'd, that the Caufe which turn' d Old Men's Hairs white, was the felf-fame with that which 
. ri ° • ' made fome Men, and fome Horfes, have one Eye Blue, and the other of another Colour. Thefe 
Lib. <. de are his Words : 'Ejt&KXcujKai $ tJjihisa. yv«0-, «5 ei d.v%?a>mt,itj ol i-b-sidi J>* # {wrlw atria* JVwiip o «* £v^fwir@- 
generati- mMx?) (mvo V . This is very furprizing, but there is nothing un-intelligible to this Great Man j- 
oneAnim. w h g{ ves Reafons for fuch a vaft number of things, in almoft all parts of his Phyfics, as the molt 
enlightned Men of this Age believe impenetrable ; which mult needs give good grounds for an 
Author's faying, He was given us by GOD, that we might be ignorant of nothing poffible to be 
known: Ariftotelis eft SV MM A VE RITAS,, quoniam ejus Intellelttu fait finis, humani intelletlm. 
Quare bene dicitur de illo, .quod ipfe fait creatus, & datus nobis divina Providentia, ut non ignoremus 
foffibiliafciri. Averroes ought too to have laid, That Ariftotle was given us by Divine Providence, 
for the underflanding what was impoflible to be understood. For certainly, that Philofbpher 
teaches us, not only the things that may be known, but (fince we mult believe him on his word, 
his Doctrine being the Soveraign Truth, SV MM AVE RITAS) he teaches us likewife thofe 
things, which 'tis impoflible to know. 

Undoubtedly a Man muft have a ftrong Faith, thus to believe Ariftotle, when he only gives us 
Logical Reafons; and explains the Effects of Nature, by the confus'd Notions of theSenfes; 
efpecially when he pofitively determines upon Queftions, which we cannot fee poffible for Men 
ever to refolve. Yet Ariftotle takes particular care of admonifhing us to believe him on his word : 
it being an uncontroverted Axiom, with this Author, That a Difciple k to believe : /« mdltw £ 

fMUtSdvovia,. 

True ; fometimes Difciples are oblig'd to believe their Matters : But their Faith fhould reach 
no farther than to Experiments, and matters of Fact. For, would they become true Philofophers, 
they ought to examine their Matter's Reafons, and never receive them till they had difcover'd 
their Evidence by their own. But to become a Peripatetic Philofopher, there is no more requi* 
fite, than to believe, and to remember : The fame Difpofition of Mind going to the reading 
that Philofophy, as to the reading of an Hiftory. For fhould a Man take the freedom of ufing his 
Mind and his Reafbn, he muft not expect to grow any conllderable Philofbpher. /« $ *»$-<(&«* # 

But the Reafon why Ariftotle, and a great many other Philofophers have pretended to know, 
What can never be known, is their not well diftinguifhing the difference betwixt knowing, and 
knowing ; betwixt having a Certain and Evident Knowledge, and only a Probable and Obfcure : 
And the Reafon of their not having obferv'd that Diftin&ion, is their being taken up always with 
fubjects of a greater Reach and Comprehenfion, than their own Mind ; fo that they have ufually 
feen only fome parts thereof, without being able to take them all in together ; which fuffices to 
the Difcovery of many Probabilities, but not for the evident Difcovery of Truth. Befides which, 
Vanity, being the Motive to their feeking Science, and Probabilities making more for their Efteem 
among Men, than Truth it felf, as being more proportion'd to the ordinary feature and ability of 
the Mind ; they neglected to fearch for the neceflary means of augmenting its Capacity, and gi- 
ving it a greater Growth and Comprehenfion; for which reafon they have not been able to go 
to the bottom of Truths that lay any thing deep and conceaPd. 
III. The Geometricians only have well difcover'd the narrow Capacity of the Mind; at leaft have 
that Geo- taken fuch a Method in their Studies, as fhewsthey have a perfect Knowledge f it; efpecially 
^"'2 thofe who ufe Algebra and Analytics ; which Viet a and Des-Cartes have re-eftabliftfd and perfe- 
Method in & e d in this Age. Which is herein apparent, that thefe Men never attempted the Refolution of 
feanb of Difficulties very Compound, till after having moft clearly known the more Simple, which they 
Tmh. depend on; they never fix'd to the confideration of Crooked Lines, as of Conick Sections, 'till 
they we perfect Mafters of common Geometry. But what is peculiar to the Analyfts, is that, fee- 
ding their Mind incapable of Attention to many Figures at once, and unable to imagine Solids of 
Method in- more t ^ ian tloree ^imenfions, though there were frequent neceflity of conceiving fuch as had more ; 
treafes ^ they made ufe of common Letters, that are very familiar to us, to exprefs and abridge their 
ftrength of Idea's. And thus the Mind being not confounded, or taken up with the Reprefentation, it would 
the Mind, be oblig'd to make, of a great many Figures, and an infinite number of Lines, can furvey at a lin- 
AriftotievS le view » whatotherwife was impoflible to be feen: Forafmuch as the Mind can launch out far- 
Logkk di- tiier -> and penetrate into a great many more things, when its Capacity is raanag'd to the belt ad- 
ninijhesit, vantage. 

So 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth* 109 

So that all the Skill and Artifice there is in making the Mind deeper-fighted, and more com- 
prehenfive, confifts, as fhall be explain'd in andther place, in a dexterous management of its Book 6, in. 
Strength and Capacity ; and in not laying it out impertinently on things not nccefTary to the dif- the ifl Pan 
covery of the Truth it is in fearch of : Which is a thing well worthy to be obferv'd. For this concerning 
one thing makes it evident, that the ordinary Logicks are more proper, to ftraiten the Capacity mtM * 
of the Mind, than enlarge it ; it being vifible, that by imploying the Rules they give in the 
finding out any Truth, the Capacity of the Mind muff be taken up with them ; and fo it muft 
have the lefs Liberty for attending to, and comprehending the whole extent of the fubjed it exa- 
mines. 

'Tis manifeft enough then, from what hath been faid, that moft Men have made but little Re- 
flection on the Nature of the Mind, when they would imploy it in The Search of Truth •, that they 
have not been throughly convinc'd of its little Extent, and the neceffity there is of Husbanding it 
well, and increafing it , and that this is one of the molt confiderable Caufes of their Errors, and 
of their fo ill fuccefs in their Studies. 

This is not faid with Prefumption, that there were ever any who knew not their Mind was li- 
mited, and ftraitned in its Capacity and Comprehenflon. This doubtlefs has been known, and 
is ftill confefVd by all the World. But the generality know it only confufedly, and confefs it no 
farther than Teeth-outwards : For the condud they take in their Studies, gives the Lye to their 
Confeffion > fince they ad as if they truly believ'd their Mind was Infinite ; and are defirous of 
diving into things which depend on a great many Caufes, whereof they commonly know not 
any one. 

There is ftill another Failing, very cuftomary with Studious Men ; and that is their applying v# 
to too many Sciences at once ; fo that if they ftudy fix hours a day, they fometimes ftudy fix dif- Another 
ferent things, 'Tis vifible, that this fault proceeds from the fame Caufe as the others I have been Fault of 
fpeaking of. For there is great probability, that if thofe, who ftudied in this manner, knew ^ arne<l 
evidently how difproportion'd it was to the Capacity of their Mind \ and that it was more apt 
to fill it with Error and Confufion, than with true Science ; they would not let themfelves be 
transported with the diforderly motives of their Paffion and Vanity : For indeed this is not the 
way to be fatisfy'd in our purfuits, but the moft ready means to know nothing at all. 



CHAP. IV. 

I. The Mind cannot dwell long upon Obje&s that have no Relation to it, 
or that include not fimething of Infinity in them. II. The Inconflancy of the 
Witt, is the Caufe of that want of Application, and confequently of Error, 

III. Our Senfations take us up more, than the Pure Idea's of the Mind: 

IV. Which is the Source of the Corruption of our Morals : V. And of the 
Ignorance of the Vulgar fort of Men. 

TH E Mind of Man is not only fubject. to Error, for want of being Infinite, or for being p 
of lefs Extent than the Obje&s of its Confideration •, as has been explain'd in the two rf,e Nl!flli 
lafl Chapters : But becaufe it is Inconftant, and nothing Refolute in its Aclion , and ™™y x lm 
unable to keep the View fixt and fteady on the Object, long enough to examine all the parts u?on b- 

f i t< jetts that 

The better to conceive the Caufe of this Inconftancy and Levity of the Mind, we mult know klveno1 ^.' 
that the Will is the Dire&refs of its Action ; that the Will applies it to the Obje&s which it |£^_ or 
loves ; and that the fame Will is itielf in perpetual fluctuation and difquietude, whereof I affign C M° not 
this to be the Caufe. fomphing 

'Tis not to be doubted but GOD is the Author of all things, and has made them only for*/ fg/jfr"-* 
Himfelf, and that he draws the Heart of Man towards him, by a Natural and Invincible lm- " 
preffion, which he perpetually influences him withal. 

'Tis impoffible for GOD to have wiWd that there fhould be any Will that did not love Him j 
or*that lov'd Him lefs than any other Good, if there could be any other befides Himfelf ; it being 
impoffible for Him to ordain, that a Will fhould not love that which was fupreamly Amiable, or 
fhould love that rmore which was lefs lovely. And thus Natural Love muft needs carry us to 
GOD, as proceeding from GOD, and nothing being able to flop the motions thereof, unleft 
GOD Himfelf that impreffes them. There is then no Will whatever, but necefTarily follows 
the motions of this Love. The Righteous and the Wicked, the BlefTed and the Damned, love 
GOD with this Love} and 'tis this Love, in one fenfe, that is the Caufe of the Mifery of the 
latter. For this Natural Love we have for GOD, being the fame thing with the Natural -Impreflion* 
which carries us towards Good in general, towards Infinite Soveraign Good ; 'tis manifeit that 
all Minds love GOD with this Love, fince there is no other that is the Univerfal, the Infinite, 
the Soveraign Good. For, laftly, All Spirits, and even the DivcU, paffionately defire to be Hap- 

F f py, 



in them. 



no F. M a l.e b r a n c h e "Concerning Book III. 

py, and to poflefs the Soveraign Good \ and they defire.it without Choice, Deliberation, and 
Liberty, by the bent and necefllty of their Nature. Being therefore made for G O D, for an In- 
finite Good 5 for a Good that comprehends in Himfelf all Goods, the Natural -Motion of our 
Heart can never Hop, till we arrive to thepofTeffion of this Good. 
■ft The Will then labouring thus with a perpetual thirft, being tofs'dand agitated with Defires, 

Tk;^w;-Eagernefs, and .Reftlefs longings for that Good it is not in PofTeffion of, cannot but with much 
ftaniy 4 Uneafinefsfuffer the Mind to dwell any time upon Abftradt Truths, which don't affect it, and 
the wm ».^hjch it judges incapable of -making it Happy. It therefore pufhes the Mind forward continu- 
!ted»t a % t0 tne Refearch of other Objedts ; and when in this hurry and agitation, communicated to it 
cfjpjlica- by the Will, it. meets with any "Object that carries the Mark of Good, I mean that by approach- 
tion, and jng.the Soul,makes it fenfible of fome internal Delight or Satisfadtion,then this Thirft of the Heart 
confequem- j-jfes anew j thefe Delires, Eagcrneffes, and Fervencies are re-Jdndled; and the Mind oblig'd to 
^/i' w - wa itoii them, fixes it felt only on, the Qbjedt that either is or feems to t>e the caufeof them, to 
approximate it to the Soul, that regales and feeds upon it for fome time. But the Emptinefs of 
the Creatures, being unable to fill the Infinite Capacity of the Heart of Man ; thefe little Plea- 
fures, inflead of extinguishing its Thirft, only provoke and inflame it, and give the Soul a foo- 
lifh and vain Hope of being fatisfy'din the multiplicity of Earthly Pleafures} which produces a far 
greater Inconftancy, and an inconceivable Levity in the Mind, which ought to make the Difco- 
very to the Soul of all thefe Goads. 

It's true, when the Mind falls by chance upon an -Object of an Infinite Nature, or which in- 
cludes fomething great and mighty in it, its unfettlednefs and calling about ceafes for fome time: 
For finding that this Objedt bears the badge and character of that which the Soul defires, it dwells 
upon it, and clofes in with it for a confiderable time : But this clofing and adhefaon, or rather ob- 
ftinacy of the Mindj to examine Subjedts infinite, ortoovaft and unweildy, is as ufelefs to it, as 
that Levity, wherewith it coniiders thofe that are proportion'd to its Capacity j fince'tis too 
weak to accomplish fo difficult an Enterprife, and in vain it endeavours to effedt it : That which 
rn uft render the Soul happy, is not, as J may fpeak, the Comprehenfion of an Infinite Objeft 
(this fhe is not capable of) but the Love and Fruition of an Infinite Good, whereof the Will is 
capable, through the Motion of Love, continually imprefs'd on it by G O D Himfelf. 

Which being thus, we need not wonder at the Ignorance and Blindnefs of Mankind; becaule 
their Mind being fubjedted to the Inconftancy and Levity of their Heart, which incapacitate it 
from confidering any thing with a ferious Application, is unable to penetrate into a fubjedr. any 
whit perplex'd, and difficult. For, in fhort, the Attention of the Mind is to intelligible Objedts, 
what a fteady View of the Eyes is to thofe of Sight : And as a Man that can't fix his Eyes on the 
Bodies that are about him, can never fee them well enough to diftingnifh the differences of their 
leaft parts, and to difcover all the Relations thofe little parts have to one another: So a Man 
who cannot fix the Eye of his Mind upon the things defir'd to be known, can never have a fuffici- 
ent Knowledge to diftingnifh all the parts ; and to obferve all the Relations that may poffibly be 
between themfelves, or themfelves and other fubjedts. 

Yet it is certain that all our Knowledge conlifts in a clear View of the Relations things ftand in 

to one another. So that when it happens, as in difficult Queftions, that the Mind muft furvey 

at one fighta multiplicity of Relations, that are between two things or more, it is plain, that if 

it has not conlider'd thefe things very attentively, or if it has but a confus'd Knowledge of them, 

it can never have a diftindt Perception of their Relation, and confequently cannot make any folid 

Judgment of them. 

HI. One of the main Caufes of our Mind's wanting Application for Abftradt Truths, is our feeing 

Our Senfa- t ] iem as at a oiftance, whilft other things are continually offering themfelves to the Mind, that 

us'up f more are nea i' e r at hand : The great Attention of the Mind, brings home, as I may fay, the remote 

than \k Idea's of the Objedts we confider. But it often falls out, that when a Man is very intent on Mc- 

PureiAea's taphyficd Speculation, he is eafily thrown off from them, by fome accidental Senfations breaking 

°J.: tl f in upon the Soul, which fit clofer to it than thofe Idea's: For there needs no more than a little 

Pleafure or Pain to do it. The. Reafon whereof is, that Pleafure and Pain, and all Senfations in 

See the jih general, are within the very Soul : They modifie her, and touch her more to the quick, than 

se?ond ^ ie fi m Pl e Idea's or " Objedts of Pure Intelledtion, which though prefent to the Mind, neither touch 

Partofthif nor niodifie it at all. And thus the Mind on one hand, being of a ftraitned and narrow reach,. 

Book. and on the other, unable to prevent feeling Pain, and all its other Senfations, has its Capacity 

fill'd up with them ; and fo cannot at one and the fame time, be fenfible of any thing, and think 

freely of other Objedts that are not fenfible: The Humming of a Fly, or of any other little 

Animal, fuppofing it communicated to the principal part of the Brain, and perceiv'd by the Soul, 

is capable (do what we can) of interrupting our Confideration of very Abftradt and Sublime 

Truths ; becaufe no Abftradt Idea's modifie the Soul ; whereas all Senfations do. 

Which it From hence arifes ^at Stupidity and Droufinefs of the Mind, in regard of the molt Funda- 

the source mental Truths of Chriftian Morality; which Men know only in a Speculative and Fruitlefs man- 

ofthecor- ner, without the Grace of JESVS CHRIST. All the World knows there is a GO D, and 

rufttm of that this G O D is to be ferv'd and worfhipp'd. But who is it, that ferves and woi fhips him with- 

M'MoMs. ontlhc Divine Grace, which alone gives us a rclifh of Delight and Pleafure, in thefe Duties? 

There are but very few that do not perceive the Emptinefs, and Inconftancy of Earthly Goods, 

and that are not convinc'd with an Abftradt, though moft certain and evident Conviction, that 

they are indeferving of our Cares and Application. But where are thofe, who defhifc thefe 

Goods 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. f\\ 

Goods in their Pradice, and deny their Pains and Application to acquire them ? 'Tis only theV 
that perceive fome Bitternefs and Diftafte in the Injoyment of them, or that Grace has made fen- 
fibleto Spiritual Goods, by an inward Delegation, affix'd to them by GOD., 'tis thefe only 
who vanquifh the Imprefiions of Senfeand the Strugglings of Concupifcence : A View of the 
Mind alone can never make us rciift them as we fhould do ; but befides that View, there muft be 
a certain Senfation of the Heart : That Intellectual Light all alone is, if you pleafe, the Sikei- 
tnt Grace, which makes only for our Condemnation, which acquaints us with our own Weaknefs 
and of our Duty of flying by Prayer to Him, who is our Strength : But the Senfation of the 
Heart, is a Lively and Operative Grace. 'Tis this which touches us inward, which fills us, and 
perfwades the Heart, ahd without it there is no body that confiders with the Heart : Nemo cB qui 
recogitct corde. All the moft certain Truths of Morality lye conceal'd in the folds and doubles 
and fecret corners of the Mind, and as long as they continue there, are barren and inactive ' 
fince the Soul has no relifh of them : But the Pleafures .of the Senfes dwell nearer to the Soul \ 
and fince fhe cannot be infenfible to, or out of love with * her Pleafure, 'tis impofiible to difen- * Namely 
gage her felf from the Earth, and to \ get rid of the Charms and Delufions of her Senfes, by her a Natural 
Own Strength and Abilities. Lov ^ ; /<"• 

1 deny not however but the Righteous, whofe Heart has been already vigoroufly turn'd to- tate^pul 
wards GOD, by a preventing Delegation, may without that particular Grace perform fome /ire by an 
Meritorious Actions, and refill: the Motions of Concupifcence. There are thofe who are coura- EleSive 
gious and conftant in the Law of GO D, by the ftrength of their Faith, by the care they have to H * trei - 
deprive themfelves of Senfible Goods • and by the contempt and diflike of every thing that can^jj^* 
give them any temptation: There are fuch as aft for the moft part without the tafte of Indeliberate Love c<m- 
or Preventing Pleafure: That fole Joy, they find in acting according to the Will of GOD, is not be long 
the only Pleafure they tafte ; and that Pleafure fuffices to make them perfevere in their fbate, and wit ^ out 
to confirm the Difpofition of their Heart : Thofe who are Novice Converts, have generally need ■ Z^l 
of an Indeliberate, or Preventing Pleafure, to difintangle them from Senfible Goods, to which mal Love. 
they are fattened by other Preventing, and Indeliberate Pleafures. Sorrow and Remorfe of 
their Confidences, arc not fuificient for this purpofe ; and as yet they tafte no Joy : But the Jult 
can live by Faith, and that in Indigence ; and 'tis likewife in this Eftate they merit molt : Foraf- 
rnuch as Men being Reafonable Creatures, GOD will be lov'd by them with a Love of Choice, 
and not with a Love of Inftind, or an Indeliberate Love, like that wherewith we love Senfible 
things,without knowing they be Good, otherwife than from the Pleafure we receive in them. Not- 
withftanding, moft Men having but little Faith, and yet conftant opportunities of tailing Plea- 
fures, cannot long preferve their Elective Love for GOD, againft their Natural Love for fenfi- 
ble Goods, unlefs the Delegation of Grace fupport them againft the Efforts of Pleafure. For 
the Delectation of Grace produces, preferves, and augments Charity, as Senfible Pleafures 
Cupidity. 

It is apparent enough from what has been faid, that Men being never free from fome Paflion, 
or fome pleafanr or troublefome Senfations, have their Capacity and Extent of Mind much taken 
up •, and when they would imploy the remainder of its Capacity in examining any Truth, they 
are frequently diverted by fome new Senfations ; through the diflike they take to that Exercife, 
and the Inconftancy of the Will, which tofles and bandies the Mind from Object to Objed, with- 
out letting it ftand ftill. So that unlefs we have habituated our felves from our Youth to the con- 
quering all thefe Oppofitions, as I have explain'd in the Second Part, we find our felves at 
laft incapable of piercing into any thing that's fomewhat difficult, and demands fomething of 
Application. 

Hence we are to conclude, That all Sciences, and efpecially fuch as include Queftions very hard 
to be clear'd up, and explain'd, abound with an infinite number of Errors : And that we ought 
to have in fufpicion thofe bulky Volumes we fee daily compos'd on Medicine, Phyfics, and Mora- 
lity ; and efpecially on the particular Queftions of thofe Sciences, which are much more complex 
than the general. We Ihould judge too thefe Books to have fo much lefs worth in them, as they 
ai-e better entertain'd by the common fort of Men ; I mean thofe, who are little capable of Ap- 
plication, and know not how to fet their Mind to work ; becaufe when an Opinion is cry'd np, 
and applauded by the People, in a matter difficult to be made out, 'tis an infallible fign of its be- 
ing falfe, and founded only on the delufive Notions of Senfe, or fome falfe Lights of the Ima- 
gination. 

Neverthelefs 'tis not impofiible for one Man to difcover a great number of Truths, that were 
conceal'd from Ages paft ; fuppofing this Perfon to have no lack of Parts, and who being in Re- 
tirement} as remote as poffible from every thing that might diftrad his Thoughts, applies him- 
felf ferioufly to the feeking Truth : Which makes thofe appear none of the moft reafonable Men, 
who defpife Mr. Des-Cartes's Philofophy, without knowing it ; for this only Reafon, that it feems 
next to impofiible for a fingle Man} to have found out Truth, in things fo deep and conceal'd as 
thofe of Nature. But did they know the way of Life, that Philofopher chofe ; the means he 
' imploy'd in his Studies to prevent the Capacity his Mind's being fhar'd by other Objeds, than 
thofe he meant to difcover the Truth of: The diftindnefs of his Idea's on which he eftablilh'd 
his Philofophy .- And generally all the advantages he had above the Ancients, by the New Difco- 
veries ; they would certainly receive a more ftrong and reafonable Prejudice on his behalf, thaa 
that of Antiquity, which gives Tlato y Ariftotle, and diverfe others their Authority, 

And 



U3 F. Malebranche Concerning Book III. 

And yet I would not advlfe them to ground only on this Prejudice, .and to believe Mr. Des- 
Cartes a Great Man, and his Philofopby good, becaure of thofe advantagious things that may be 
faid for it. Monfuur Des-Cartes was a Man like us, fubje& to Error and Illufion, no kfs than 
others. Not anyone of his Works, without even excepting his Geometry, but bears the Chara- 
cter and Earneft of the weaknefs of an Humane Mind. Wherefore we ought not to take his word 
for what he teaches ; but read him according to his own Advice, with Precaution, by examining 
whether he is not deceiv'd, and believing nothing that he fays, without being oblig'd to it by its 
own Evidence, and the fecret Reproofs of our Reafon. For, in a word, the Mind knows nothing 
truly, but what it evidently perceives. 

We have fhewn in the preceding Chapters that our Mind is not infinite, that it is, on the con- 
trary, of but a very indifferent Capacity ; and has that Capacity ufually fill'd with the Senfa- 
tions of the Soul : AndJaft ly, that the Mind receiving its direction from the Will,cannot fteadily 
fix its view upon any Objecl, without being fuddenly thrown off by the Will's Fluctuation and 
Inconftancy. 'Tis moft certain that thefe things are the molt general Caufes of our Errors ; and 
I might ftay here to make them more evident in particular: But what has been already faid, will 
be enough, with fuch as are capable of Attention, to give them to underftand the weaknefs of 
the Humane Mind ; I fhall treat more at large in the Fourth and Fifth Book, of the Errors that 
are owing to our Natural Inclinations, and our Paffions •, of which we have now faid fomething 
in this Chapter. 



The SECOND PART: 

Concerning 

The Pure UNDERSTANDING. 



Of the Nature of Idea' 



s. 



CHAP. I. 

What is meant by Idea's. That they really exitt^ and are neceffary to our 
Perceiving all material Objeffs. II. A T * articular ization of all the ways 
pojfible for ua> to perceive External Obje&s. 



i. 



I 



Suppofe that every one will grant, that we perceive not the ObjecTts that are without us fm- 
witt U I mediately, and of themfelves. We fee the Sun, the Stars, and infinite other Obje&s without 

meant by JL us} and it is not probable that the Soul goes out of the Body, and fetches a walk, as I may 

jdeas.That £y, about the Heavens to contemplate all the Obje&s therein. 

they really j t ^ es them not therefore by themfelves ; and the immediate Object of the Mind, when it be- 

ar'e neceffa- holds the Sun, for example, is not the Sua, but fomething intimately united to the Soul ; and the 

ry to our fame thing which I call an Idea. So that by the Term Idea, I mean nothing but that Objed which 

Perceiving is immediate, or next to the Soul in its Perception of any thing. 

ob%a er ' ai It: ou &ht to be well obferv'd, That in order to the Mind's perceiving any Object, it is abfolute- 
ie s ' ly neceffary the Idea of that Objecl: be actually prefent to it ; which is fo certain as not poffibie to 
be doubted of. But it is not necefTary there fhould be any thing without like to that Idea : For it 
often happens that we perceive things which don't exift, and which never were in Nature. And 
fo a Man has frequently in his Mind real Idea's of things that never were. When a Man, for In- 
ftance, imagines a golden Mountain, it is indifpenfibly necefTary the Idea of that Mountain fhould 
be really prefent to his Mind. When a Frantick, or a Man in a Fever, or Afleep, fees fome ter- 
rible Animal before his Eyes ; it is certain that the Idea of that Animal really exifts. And yet 
that Mountain of Gold and this Animal, never were in Being. 

Notwith Handing, Men being as it were naturally inclin'd to believe that none but Corporeal 
Obje&s exift, judge of the Reallity and Exiftence of things quite otherwife than they ought. For 
when they perceive an Object by way of Senfe, they would have it moft infallibly to exift, tho' 
it often happens, that there is nothing of it without ; they will have moreover this Object to be 
juft the fame as they perceive it} which yet never happens. But as lor the Idea which necefTa- 
nly exifts, and cannot be otherwife than we fee it, they commonly judge without Refledion, 
that it is nothing at all ; as if Idea's had not a vaft number of Properties (as that the Idea of a 
fquare, for inftance, were not very different from that of any Number) and did not reprefent 
quite different things. Which is not confiftent with Nothing, fmcc Nothing has no Property. 

'Tis 






Chap. I. The Search after Truth. n* 

5 Tis therefore undoubtedly certain, that Idea's have a moft real Exiltence. But let us enquire 
into their Nature, and their Effence ; and fee what there is in our Soul capable of making te> her 
the Reprefentations of all things. 

Whatever things the Soul perceives, are only of two forts; and are either within or without 
the Soul. Thofe that are within the Soul, are her own proper Thoughts -, that is, all her diffe- 
rent Modifications : For by the words, Thought, Manner of Thinking or Modification of the Sout, 
I mean all thofe tilings in general, which cannot be in the Soul, without her perceiving them ; 
fuch are her own Senfations, her Imaginations, her Pure Intellections^ or fimply her Conceptions, as 
alfo her Paffwns, and Natural Inclinations. Now our Soul has no need of Idea's to perceive all 
thefe things, becaufe they are within the Soul, or rather becaufe they are the very Soul it felf^ 
in fuch or fuch a manner •, juft as the real Rotundity of any Body artdits Motion^ are nothing but 
the Body figured and tranflated, after fuch or fuch a fort. 

But as to the things without the Soul, we can have no perception of them, but by the means 
of Idea's, upon fuppofition that thefe things cannot be intimately united to it •, and they are of 
two forts, Spiritual and Material : As to the Spiritual* there is fome probability they may be 
difcover'd to the Soul without Idea's, immediately by themfelves. For though Experience certi- 
fies us, that we cannot by an immediate Communication declare our Thoughts to one another, 
but only by words, and other fenlible Signs, whereunto we have annex'd our Idea's ; yet we 
may fay that G O D has ordain'd this kind of Oeconomy, only for the time of this Life, to pre- 
vent the Diforders that might at prefent happen, if Mert fhould Underftand one another as they 
pleas'd. But when Juftice arid Order fhall reign, and we fhall be delivered from the Captivity 
of our Body, we fhall poffibly communicate our Thoughts by the intimate union of our felves, 
as 'tis probable the Angels may do in Heaven. So that there feems to be no abfolute neceffity of 
Idea's, for the reprefenting things of a Spiritual Nature, fince 'tis poffiblefor them tobefeen 
by themfelves, though in a very dark, and imperfed\ manner* 

/ enquire not here hoxo two Spirits can be united to one another ^ or whether by that means they can This Para- 
open inwards, and make a mutual Difcovery of their Thoughts. I believe however, there is no Sub fiance S r ^»'» 
purely Intell'wble, except tha: of G O D X and that nothing can be evidently difcovered but in his Light* Ital ' c | c '* e " 
and that the Zmon of Spirits cannot make them vijwle. For though we be moft intimately united with beiaffeio- 
our felves, we both are, and Jhall be unintelligible to our felves^ until we fee our felves in GOD, and ver as be- 
lie fliall prefent to us, in our felves, the perfectly intelligible Idea, which he has of our Beings included in^g^S^^ 
bis own. And thus though I feem to grant that Angels may manifest to each other, both what they are, ?? Z "7" 
tind what they think; I must advertife, that I do it only becaufe 1 have no mind to difpute it; provided m iefs 'a 
it fhall be granted me, what can't be controverted, namely, That we cannot difcern material things by Man Inoro 
themfelves, and without Idea's. rvhatlthink 

I will explain in the Seventh Chapter, what my Notion is of the way whereby We know Spi- O f t ^ ou ^ 
rits •, and I will make it appear, that we cannot at prefent entirely know them by themfelves, % at ul e * of 
though they may poffibly be united to us. But I difcourfe in this place chiefly of material Things, idea's. 
which certainly are incapable of fuch a manner of Union with our Soul, as is neceflary to make 
them perceiv'd ; for that, they being extended, and the Soul not, there is no proportion be*- 
twixt them. And befides, our Souls never depart from our Bodies, to meafure the Greatnels 
of the Heavens, and confequently cannot fee the Bodies that are without, otherwife than by the 
Idea's that reprefent them. And this is what all the World mult agree to. 

We affirm then, that it is abfolutely neceffary that the Idea's we have of Bodies, and of all n, 
other Objedfc we perceive not immediately by themfelves, proceed from thefe fame Bodies, or A Panicu- 
thefe Objeds, or elfe that our Soul has the power of producing thefe Idea's ; or that GOD pro- Ration 
due'd them together with her in the Creation ; or that he produces them as often as we think of "^^ * h * 
any Object ; or that the Soul has in her felf all the Perfections which fhe difcovers in thefe Bodies ; biTforu* 
or laftly, is united with an All-perfed Being, who comprehends univerfally in himfelf all the to perceive 
Perfections of Created Beings. External 

There is no perceiving of Objects, but by one of thefe ways : Let us examine without Pre- ^'- 
poffeffion which feems the probable'ft of all, and not be difheartned at the difficulty of the Que- 
ftion: It may be we fhall give a Refolution clear enough, though we pretend not to give incon- 
tefted Demonftrations for all forts of Perfons ; but only moll convincing Proofs to fuch as with 
thoughtful Attention fhall confider them : For it probably would look like Rafhnefs and Prefump- 
tion, to talk in a more pofitive manner. 



Gg 



CHAP- 



1 14. E Malebranche Concerning Book III.' 

C H A P. II. 

That Material Ohje&s emit not Species which refemble them. 

TH E mofl common Opinion is that of the Peripatetics, who pretend, That External Ob~ 
j efts fend forth Specie s,vohich are like them jand that thefe Species are convey'd by the Exter- 
nal Senfes as far as the Commune Senforium. They call thefe the Species Imprejfe, becaufe 
imprinted by Objects on the outward Senfes. Thefe Imprefs'd Species being Material and Senfible 
are made Intelligible by the Intellects Agens, and are fit to be receiv'd in the Intellettus Patiens .• 
Thefe Species thus Spiritualiz'd, are term'd Exprejfe, as being expr eft d from the imprefs'd : And 
by thefe it is that the Patient Intellect knows all Material things. 

I fhall not ftand to finifh the Explication of thefe Notable things, and of the diverfe ways Phi- 
lofophers have of conceiving them. For though they be not agreed about the number of the Fa- 
culties which they attribute to the Internal Senfe and Underftanding, and there are alio many 
that are very dubious, whether they have any need of the Agent Intellect for the knowing Senfible 
Objects \ yet they almoft univerfally agree in the Emijfwn of the Species, or Images refembling 
the Objects they proceed from: And 'tis only on this Foundation they multiply their Faculties, 
and defend their Active Intellect. So that this Foundation, liaving no folidity, as will be feen 
by and by, there is no neceflity of Handing to overthrow all the Superstructures they have built 
upon it. 

I maintain then, it is not probable that Objects fhould fend out Species or Images in their own 
likenefs ; and thefe are my Reafons for it. The firffc is taken from the Impenetrability of Bodies. 
All Objecls, as the Sun, the Stars, as well as thofe that are near our Eyes, cannot emit Species of 
a different Nature from themfelves : and for this Reafon 'tis ufually faid by the Philofophers, that 
thefe Species are grofs and material, to diflinguifh them from the exprefs'd Species, which are fpiri- 
tualiz'd : Thefe Imprefs'd Species of Objects are therefore little Bodies. They cannot then pene- 
trate each other, nor all the fpaces betwixt heaven and Earth, which mull needs be fill'd with 
them. From whence 'tis eafie to conclude, that they rauft needs bruife, and batter one another, 
fome coming one way, and thwarting others coming another ; and fo 'tis impoffible they fhould 
render Objects vifible. 

Again, it is poffible for one ftanding on one Point, to fee a great number of Objects which 
are in the Heaven, and on the Earth. There is then a neceffity that the Species of all thefe 
Bodies be redue'd into a Point. But they are Impenetrable, fince they are extended, Ex- 
go, &c. 

But we not only can fee from one end of the fame Point, abundance of mofl large, and even 
immenfe Objects : There is moreover not any Point in all thefe great Spaces of the World, from 
whence we cannot difcover an almofl inexhauftible number of Objects, and even Objedb as big 
as the Sun, the Moon, and Heavens. There is not then any Point in the great Circumference of 
the World, wherein the Species of all thefe things ought not to center, which is contradictory to 
all appearance of Truth. 
if a Mm The fecond Reafon is taken from the Change thefe Species undergo. It is certain the nearer an 
has a mind object is, the greater the Species ought to be, fince we fee the Objecl greater. Now we cannot 

'how'aUtbe *" ee w ^ at '^ s t ' lat can ^ en ^ en tn * s s ? ecies -> a nd what become of the Parts that compos'd it, when it 
impreftons was greater. But that which is ftill more difficult to conceive, according to their Notion, is, 
of Vifible^ how in beholding an Object with Magnifying-glafTes, or a Microfcope, the Species grows on a fud- 
objefts,tbd' d a i nj five or fix hundred times bigger than it was before -, for 'tis ftill harder to be feen from 
ITcommu- what advent i tious Pai "ts it can increafe fo mightily in an inflant. 

nicated The third Reafon is, that in looking on a perfect Cube, all the Species of its faces are unequal, 
without and yet we fail not to fee all its faces-equally fquare : And fo in beholding in a Picture Ovals and 
voeaMng, Parallelograms, which can only fend forth S/ww of afimilar Figure; we fee notwithflanding Cir- 
Mr/loes- cles an< ^ Se i mres - For this makes it manifeflly clear, that there is no neceffity the Object we be- 
Cartes'* hold fhould produce Species like it felf, in order to our feeing it. 

Dioptrics. Laflly, it is not conceivable, how it is poffible for a Body, that is not fenfibly exhaufted, to 
fend conflantly Species from out of it felf on every fide ; how it can continually fill with them, 
fo very capacious Spaces all round about ; and that with an incomprehenfible fwiftnefs. For an 
Objed that lay hid, in the very inflant of its Difcovery, may be feen many millions of Leagues 
on all fides. And what feems much flranger yet, is, that the Bodies which have a great deal of 
Action, as the Air, and fome others, have not force enough to extrude from them their repre- 
fentative Images -, which the groffefl and leailaftive Bodies can do, as Earth, Stones, and almoft 
all hard Bodies. 

But I fhall not fpend more time in producing all the Reafons that oppugn this Opinion, becaufe 
that would be an end lefs work ; the lead Eflay of Thought fumifhing out an inexhauftible num- 
ber of them. Thefe we have already urg'd, are enough, and even more than were necellary, 
after what has been faid relating to this Subjedt, in the firft Book, when we explain'd the Errors 
of the Senfes. But there being fuch a multitude of Philofophers devoted to this Opinion, I thought 
it neceffary to fay fomething of it, to put them upon reflecting on their own Thoughts. 

CHAP, 



Chap. III. The Search after Truth, \f* 

CHAP. III. 

That the Soul has no Power to produce Ideas. The Caufe of the Error 

Men are guilty of, upon this Subjecl. 

TH E fecond Opinion is theirs, who believe that our Souls have the Power of producing the 
Ideas of the things they would contemplate -, and that they are mov'd to the producing 
them, by the impreffions Objeds make upon the Body ; though thefe impreffions, are 
not Images reprefentative of the Objeds they are caufed by : They pretend it is in this that 
Man is made after the Image of GOD, and participates of his Power : That as G O D has'crea- 
ted all things out of nothing, and can annihilate them again ; and thence create others wholly 
new ^ fo Man has the Power of Creating and Annihilating the Idea's of all things as he pleafes. 
But there's very good reafon to fufped all thefe Opinions, that elevate Man fo high ; as being 
Notions which commonly derive from his vain and haughty Heart, and which the Father of 
Lights never vouchfafed to give him. 

This Participation of the Power of G D, which Men boaft of having, whereby to repre- 
fent Objeds, and to do many other particular Adions, is a Participation which feems to draw 
in fomething of Independency, as 'tis, ordinarily explain'd. But 'tis likewife a Chimerical Par- 
ticipation, which Men's Ignorance and Vanity have caus'd them to imagine : For they are under 
a greater Dependance on the Goodnefs and Mercy of G O Z>, than they fuppofe. But this is not 
the place to give an Explication of thefe things: Let us only try to make it vifible, that Men 
have not the Power of forming the Idea's of the things they perceive. 

No Man can doubt but that Idea's are real Beings, feeing they have real Properties •, that they 
differ one from another - r and that they reprefent quite different things. Nor can it reafonably 
be doubted, but they are of a Spiritual Nature, and very different from the Bodies reprefented 
by them. All which feems ftrong enough to raife a doubt, whether the Idea's by means where- 
of we perceive Bodies, are not of a nobler extrad, than the Bodies themfelves. And in earneffr,' 
the Intelligible World ought to be perfeder than the Material and Terreftrial, as we fhall fee in the 
procefs of our Difcourfe , and then, in affirming that Men are impower'd to frame all Idea's as 
they pleafe, we incur the danger of maintaining that Men nave power of making Beings more 
noble and more perfed, than the World which GOD has created. But this refledion never 
enters our Heads, by reafon of our imagining an Idea to be nothing, becaufe not obvious to the 
Senfes ; or if we look upon it as a Being, 'tis a Being fo {lender and contemptible, that we fancy 
it annihilated, as foon as abfent from the Mind. 

But though it fhould be true, that Idea's were only little, pitiful, defpicable Beings } they are 
however Beings, and Beings Spiritual : And Men having not the Power of Creating, have not 
confequently the Power of Producing them. For the Produdion of Idea's in the manner they 
explain it, is a true Creation , and though they endeavour to palliate, and foften the Prefump- 
tion and Harfhnefs of this Opinion, in faying, that the Produdion of Idea's fuppofes fomething 
antecedent, and Creation fuppofes nothing •, yet they bring no Reafon to folve the Knot of the 
difficulty. 

For it ought well to be heeded, That there is no greater difficulty in producing Something 
out of Nothing than in producing it, by prefuppofing another thing, out of which it could not 
be made, and which could contribute nothing to its Produdion. There is no greater difficulty, 
for inftance, in the Creation of an Angel, than in the Produdion of an Angel from a Stone : Be- 
caufe a Stone being a Being of a quite oppofite kind, cannot be any ways ferviceable to the Pro- 
dudion of an Angel. But it may contribute to the Produdion of Bread, of Gold, &c be- 
caufe Stone, Gold, and Bread, are only the fame Extenfion, of a diverfe Configuration, and all 
thefe are Material things. 

Nay, it is even harder to produce an Angel out of a Stone, than to produce it out of Nothing ; 
becaufe to the producing an Angel out of a Stone, fo far as that is poffible to be done, the Stone 
muft be firfl Annihilated, and afterwards the Angel Created ; but firnply to Create an Angel, 
there needs no Annihilation at all. If then the Mind produces its Idea's from the Material Im- 
preffions the Brain receives from Objeds, it does ftill the fame thing, or a thing as difficult, or 
even difficulter, than if it Created them : Since Idea's being Spiritual, cannot be produc'd out of 
Material Images that are in the Brain, to which they have no Proportion or Analogy. 

But fome will fay, That an Idea is not a Subftance : Be it fo ; but ftill it is a Being, and a Be- 
ing of a Spiritual kind : And as it is impoffible to make a Square of a Spirit, though a Square 
be not a Subftance -, fo 'tis impoffible to frame a Spiritual Idea, out of a Material Subftance, tho' 
an Idea were not a Subftance. . 

But fuppofe we fhould allow the Mind of Man to have an abfolute Power of Creating, and An- 
nihilating the Idea's of things ; yet after all} he would never imploy it to the producing them. 
For as a Painter, though never fo excellent at his Art, could not reprefent an Animal he had 
never feen, or had no Idea of ; fo that the Pidure he was oblig'd to make of it, would not be 
like that unknown Animal ; fo a Man could not form the Idea of an Objed, nnlefs he knew it 
before ; that is, unlefs he had already the Idea of it, which has no dependance on his Will: 



1 1 6 F. Malebranche Concerning Book UK 

But if he has the Idea of it already, he knows the Objed ; and 'tis needlefs to form a new 
one of it. 'Tis therefore needlefs to attribute to the Mind of Man the power of producing its 
Idea's. 

It may perhaps be faid, that the Mind has general and confus'd Idea's, which it does not pro- 
duce-, and that thofe which it produceth are particular, more clever and diftind ; but it all comes 
to the fame thing. For as a Painter could not draw the Pidure of a particular Man, fb as to be 
certify'd he had hit it right, unlefs he had a diftind Idea of him, and even unlefs the Perfon him- 
felf fhould fit ; fo the Mind that had only the Idea, for inftance, of Being, or of an Animal in 
general, could not reprefent to it felf an Horfe, nor form any very diftind Idea thereof, nor bfe 
aflur'd this Idea perfedly refembled an Horfe, unlefs it had a former Idea thereof, wherewith to 
collate this fecond. Now if it had a former, it is in vain to form a fecond : And the Qpeftion 
proceeds upon that .former. Therefore, &c, 

It is true, that whilft we conceive a Square by pure Intelledion, we may befides imagine it, 
that is, perceive it by drawing the Image of it in the Brain. But 'tis to be obferv'd in the firffe 
place, that we are not the real and principal Caufe of that Image \ but it would take up too much 
time to explain it: And again, that the fecond Idea, which accompanies that Image, isfofar 
from being more diftind and accurate than the others, that, on the contrary, it owes all its Ex- 
adnefs to its Refemblance with the firft, which ferves to regulate the fecond. For, in brief, it 
is not to be believ'd, that the Imagination, or even the Senfes, make us a more diftind Represen- 
tation of Objeds, than the Pure Intellect ; but only that they make the Mind more concern'd, 
and applicative : For the Idea's of Senfe and Imagination, are not diftind any farther, than 
they are conformable with thofe of Pure Intelledion. The Image of a Square, for inftance, 
that the Imagination delineates in the Brain, is no otherwife juft and regular, than as it con- 
forms with the Idea of a Square, which we have by Pure Intelledion. 'Tis^that Idea which 
regulates the Image. 'Tis the Mind that conduds the Imagination, and obliges it, as I may 
fay, to look time after time, whether the Image painted by it, be a Figure of four right and 
equal Lines, whofe Angles are exadly right : In a word, if that which is imagined, be like that 
£ n a to e J? e e - which is conceiv'd. 

judicoquae After what has been faid, I fuppofe no body can doubt, but it is an Error, in thofe that affirm 
oculis cer- the Mind can form the Idea's of Objeds ; fince they attribute to the Mind a Power of Creating, 
no,quanto an( i eve n of Creating with Wifdom and Order, though it has no Knowledge of what it does 5 
P rofui . n .^" a thing utterly inconceivable. But the Caufe of this their Error, is that cuftomary Judgment 
nk>rafunt Men ma ^ e °f one thing's being the Caufe of another, when they are found conjoin'd together ; 
iis quae a-fuppofing that the true Caufe of this Effed be unknown to them. 'Tis for this Reafon, that every 
nimo in- one concludes, that a Bowl in motion, meeting with another, is the true and principal Caufe of 
telligo. tne motion it communicates to it ; that the Will of the Soul, is the true and principal Caufe of 
liem'a*' the motion of the Arm, and fuch like Prejudices as thefe*, becaufe it always happens that a Bowl 
Xeiigione. is mov'd, when it lies in the way of another that knocks againft it, and we move our Arms al- 
moft as often as we mil it s and we do not fenfibly perceive what elfe could be the Caufe of thefe 
Motions. 

But when an Effed is not fo conftant an attendant on any thing that's not the Caufe of it, there 
are ever very many who believe this thing to be the Caufe of the Effed that happens, though all 
Men fall not into this Error. A Comet, for inftance, appears, and prefently after a Prince goes of£ 
&c Stones are expos'd to the Moon, and are eaten with Worms : The Sun is in Conjunction with 
Mars, at the Nativity of a Child ; and that Child has fome Fortune extraordinary : This is Argu- 
ment fufficient to perfwade a great many, that the Comet, the Moon, the Conjunction of the Sua 
with Mars, are the Caufes of the Effeds I haVe mention'd, and of others that are like them: And 
the Reafon why all the World is not of the fame Opinion, is their Obfervation that the like Ef- 
fects do not at all times attend thefe Caufes. 

But all Men having commonly Idea's of Objeds prefent to their Mind, when they defire it; and 
this happening many times a day, very few of them but conclude, that the Will, which ac- 
companies the Produdion, or rather Pretence of Idea's, is the true Caufe of them ; becaufe they 
fee nothing at the fame time to which they can attribute them : And they imagine that Idea's ceafe 
to exift, when out of the view of the Mind ; and that they begin to exift again, when re-prefen- 
ted to it. 

'Tis upon the fame account too, that fome judge that External Objeds fend forth Images that 
refemble them ; fb as has been faid in the preceding Chapter. For it being impofiible to fee Ob- 
jeds by themfelves, or any otherwife than by their Idea's, they judge that the Objed produces the 
Idea; becaufe when 'tis prefent, they fee it, whenabfent, it disappears ; and the prefence of the 
Objed, almoft always is found in company with the Idea that reprefents it to us. 

However, if Men were not rafh and inconfiderate in their judgments, they ought only to con- 
clude from the Idea's of things being prefent to their Mind, whenever they will have them, 
that according to the order of Nature, their Will is for the moft part neceffary to their having 
thefe Idea's, but not that the Will is the True and Principal Caufe that exhibits them to the 
Mind, much lefs that the Will produces them out of nothing, or in the manner they explain it. 
Nor is there any more Reafon for concluding, that Objeds emit Specie s that refemble them ; be- 
caufe the Soul has feldom any Perception of them, but when they are prefent ; but only that the 
Objed is for the moft part necefTary to the Idea's being prefent to the Mind. Laftly, They 
ought not to conclude, that the Bowl in motion, is the principal and true Caufe of the motion 

of 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. nj 

of another, which it meets in its way ; (nice the fifft has no power of moving it felf. They can 
only judge, that the Collilion of the two Bowls, is an occafion to the Author of the motion Seetbe ld. 
of Matter, to execute the decree of his Will • which is the univerfal Caufe of all things, by com- ch d ° f tbe 
municating to the other Bowl a part Of the motion of the firft i that is, to fpeak more clearly, *mcmL* 
by willing that the latter mould acquire as much motion as the former loft ; for the impellent force Method. 
of Bodies can be nothing but the Will of him that preferves them, as will be made appear in ano- 
ther place. 



CHAP. IV. 

That we perceive not Obje&s by means of Idea's Created with w. That 
GOD does not produce them in us^ every moment we have need of 
them. 

T~ "1 HE third Opinion is of thofe who pretend, That all Idea 's are Created with m. For 
our better difcovering how little likelihood there is in this Opinion, we muft confider 
_JL. that there are in the World many quite different things, whereof we have Idea's. But 
to mention only fimple Figures, it is certain that the number of them is infinite ', and even if we 
fix only on an EMpfis, 'tis not to be doubted but the Mind can conceive an infinite number of 
Ellipfes of a different Species; inafrauch as it can conceive, that one of its Diameters maybe 
lengthened to Infinity, the other remaining conftantly the fame. 

So fince the Height of a Triangle may be augmented or diminilh'd to infinity, the fide which 
ferves for the Bafe, being ftill the fame, we conceive there may be infinite Triangles upon the 
fame Bafe, of a different Species. And moreover, which I defire may be well confider'd here, 
the Mind in fome manner perceives that infinite number,though it can imagine but a very few, and a 
Man cannot, at one and the fame time, have particular and diftinc~t Idea's of many Triangles of a 
different Species. But that which mould be moft efpecially attended to, is, that this general Idea 
the Mind has of an infinite number of Triangles of a different Species^ is a fufficient proof, that 
if we cannot conceive by particular Idea's all thefe different Triangles ^ in a word, if we cannot 
comprehend Infinity, 'tis not for want of Idea's, or becaufe Infinity is not prefent to our Mind ; 
but meerly for want of the Mind's Capacity and Comprehenfion. If a Man fhould apply himfelf 
to the coafidering the Properties of all the diverfe Species of Triangles, and even fhould eternally 
purfue this fort of Study, he would find new and particular Idea's, in an endlefs fucceffion : But 
his Mind would tire under the unprofitable Difquifitiori. 

What I have now faid of Triangles^ may be apply'd to Figures of five, fix, an hundred, a 
thoufand, or ten thoufand fides, and fo up to infinity. And if the fides of a Triangle, being ca- 
pable of infinite Relations with each other, can make Triangles of infinite Species ; it iseafie to be 
feen that the Figures of Four, Five, or of a Million of fides, are capable of much greater Diffe- 
rences, as being fubjed to a far greater number of Relations and Combinations of their fides than 
fimple Triangles. 

The Mind then difeerns all thefe things, and has Idea's of them all. And 'tis certain thefe Idea's 
will never be exhaufted, though it fhould imploy »infinite Ages in the confideration of one Figure 
only \ and if it perceives not thefe infinite Figures all at once, or if it comprehend not infinity, 
'tis only becaufe its Capacity is too fhort and limited. It has then an infinite number of Idea's : 
What faid I, an infinite number ? It has fo many infinite numbers of Idea's, as there are different 
Figures : Inforauch that there being an infinite number of different Figures, the Mind muft have 
an infinity of infinite numbers of Idea's, for the Knowledge of Figures only. 

Now I demand of them, Whether 'tis probable that G O D has created fo many things with the 
Mind of Man ? For my own part it can never enter into my Head,efpecially fince it might be done 
in another moft fimple and eafie manner, as we fhall fee by and by. For whereas GOD acts al- 
ways by the moft fimple means, it feems unreafonable to explain our manner of knowing Obje&s, 
by admitting the Creation of an infinity of Beings, when the difficulty may be refolv'd in a way 
more eafie and natural. 

But what if the Mind had a Magazine of all the Idea's neceffary to its Perception of things? 
It would be ftill extreamly difficult to explain, how the Soul could make choice of them, to re- 
prefent Obje&s to her felf \ how, for inftance, fhe could bring it about to perceive the 5«», when 
it were prefent to the Eyes of the Body. For fince the Image, the Sun imprints in the Brain, is 
nothing like the Idea we have of. it, as has been formerly prov'd \ and fince likewife the Soul per- 
ceives not the Motion the Sun produces in the Fund of the Eye, and in the Brain ♦, it is not con- 
ceivable, how among fuch an infinite number of Idea's which fhe had, fhe could exadtly divine 
which it was neceffary to reprefent, for the imagining or feeing of the Sun. It cannot then be 
faid, that the Idea's of things were created with us, and that this is fufficient for our perceiving 
the Objects that are round about us, - „ . ■. ** 

Nor can it be faid, that GOD produces every moment fo many new Idea's, as we perceive dif- 
ferent things. This is fufficiently refuted, by what has been faid m this Chapter, Befides it fe 

H h necefferyf 



ng F* Malebranche Concerning Book III* 

neceflary, we mould attually have in our felves the Idea's of all things at all times, fince at all 
times we can W*7/ the conceiving all things. Which we could never do, unlefs we 1 had already 
a eonfus'd Perception of them ; that is, unlefs we had an infinite number of Idea's prefent to 
our Mind. For, to conclude, we cannot Will the Thinking on Objects, whereof we have no 



Idea. 



CHAP. V. 

That the Mind perceives neither the Ejfence nor the Exigence of Obje&s^ 
by confidering its own PerfeSions, That none but GOD fees them 
in that manner. 



T 



H E fourth Opinion is, That the Afindfiands in need of nothing, but it [elf, to perceive Ob- 
jeEls \ and that it may by refietting on it felf and its own PerfeElions^ difcover all things that are 
External to it. 

It is certain that the Soul perceives in her felf, and without Idea's, all the Senfations and Pafli- 
onsfhe is capable of : Pleafure, Pain, Cold, Heat, Colours, Sounds, Odours, Tails, her Love, 
her Hatred, her Joy, her Sorrow, and the reft : Becaufe all the Senfations, and Pafllons of the 
Soul, reprefent nothing out of her felf, which refembles them, and they are only the Modifica- 
tions the Mind is capable of. But the difficulty lies in knowing, whether the Idea's that re-» 
prefent things exteriour to the Soul, and referable them in one manner, as the Idea's of the 
Sim, of an Houfe, of an Horfe, of a River, are nothing but the Modifications of the Soul : So 
that the Mind has no need of any thing but it felf, to reprefent all thefe things that are with- 
out it. 

There are thofe who make no fcruple to affirm, That the Soul being made for Thinking, 
has in it felf, I mean by confidering its own Perfections, all that is neceflary to its Perception of 
Obje&s : For being in Effect more noble than all the things it diftinctly conceives, it may be faid 
to contain them in fome Eminent fort, as the Schools love to fpeak ; that is, in a more noble and 
fublimated manner than they are in themfelves. They pretend that fiiperiour Beings compre- 
hend after this manner the Perfections of the inferiour. And hereupon, being the nobleft Crea- 
tures* that they know, they flatter themfelves with poffefling in a Spiritual manner all that is in the 
Vifible World, and with being able by diverfly modifying themfelves, to perceive all that the 
Humane Mind can attain to know. In a word, they would have the Soul to be a fort of an In- 
telligible World ; that comprehends in it felf the Material and Senfible World, and infinitely 
more. 

But methinks'tis a bold Stroke, to offer a Defence of this Opinion : 'Tis, if I miftake not, a 

Natural Vanity, the love of Independency, and the defire of refembling Him, who comprehends 

in Himfelf all Beings •, that confounds the Mind, and makes us imagine our felves the Pofleflbrs 

Die quia of what we have not. Say not, fays St. Auguftin, that ye are a Light to your felves. For 'tis only 

tu tibi la- GOD that is alight to Himfelf, and who may by confidering Himfelf, fee all that he has pro- 

me s n ° n s duc ' d ' and a11 tllat he is able to produce. 

2'Sj 'Tis moll certain, That there was none but GOD before the Creation of the World, and 

Domini, that He was not able to produce it without Knowledge, or without Idea : That confequently the 

Idea's which GOD had, are not different from Himfelf ; and fo all the Creatures, even the molt 

Terreftrial and Material are in GOD, though in a manner altogether Spiritual, and to as in- 

comprehenfible. 

GOD fees therefore in Himfelf all Beings, by Reflection made on His own Perfections that 
reprefent them to Him. He has befides the perfect Knowledge of their Exiftence: For fince they 
depend upon His Will for their Exiftence, and He cannot be ignorant of His own Wills ; it fol- 
lows that He cannot be ignorant of their Exiftence ; and confequently G O D beholds within Him- 
felf not only the Eflence of things, but their Exiftence alfo. 

But 'tis not the fame with Created Spirits, as not being able to fee in themfelves either the EC- 
fence or the Exiftence of Things. They cannot fee the Eflence of them in themfelves, fince be- 
ing of a fhort and limited Capacity, they contain not all Beings, as GOD does; who may be 
ftil'd an Univerfal Being ; or fimply He that u, as He calls Himfelf. Seeing then the Humane 
Mind is capable of knowing all Beings, and Infinite Beings, and yet contains them not in it felf y 
■tis an infallible Argument, that it fees not their Eflence in it felf. For the Mind has not only a 
iucceflive fight of firft one thing, then another, it alfo actually perceives INFINITE; Though 
1 A d0 ff "° g C ? m P re hend it, as has been faid in the foregoing Chapter. Wherefore being neither 
actually infinite, nor capable of infinite Modifications at the fame time, it is abfolutely impoflible 
it fhould fee in it felf what it does not contain ; it fees riot then the Eflence of things by confide- 
ring its own Perfeaions, or by the diverfe modifying of it felf. 

Nor does it fee their Exiftence in it felf, becaufe they depend not on its Will for their Exi- 
ftence ; and the Idea's of things may be prefent to the Mind, though they do not exift at all. 
For every one may have the Idea of a golden Mountain, though there be no fuch thing as a golden 
Mouataw in Nature : And though we rely on the Teftimonies of the Senfes in our judging of the 

Exiftence 



Chap. VI. 'The Search after Truth. He) 

Exiftence of Obje&s, yet Reafon does not afTure us that we ought always to believe them, fince 
we manifeftly difcover that they abufe us- When a Man's Blood, for inftance, is well warm'd, or 
only when he fleeps, he fees fometimes before his Eyes, Fields, Battles, and the like, which yet 
are not prefent, and which poflibly never were. 'Tis then indubitable, that the Mind neither 
in it felf, nor by it felf, fees the Exiftence of things, but in that particular depends on fonie- 



thing elfe 



.... .... 



CHAP. VI. 

That we fee all things In GOD. 

WE have examin'd in the preceding Chapters Four different ways for the Mind's per- 
ceiving External Objects ; none of which feems likely to be true. There only remains 
the Fifth, which alone feems agreeable to Reafon, and the propereft to manifeft the 
Dependance our Minds have on GOD in all our Thoughts. 

'Tisrequifite to our perfed Underftanding it, to call to Mind what has been deliver'd in the 
foregoing Chapter, viz.. That 'tis absolutely necelTary for GOD to have in Himfelf the Idea's of 
all the Beings He has created, fince otherwife he could not have produc'd them : And that here- 
by he fees all thefe Beings by confidering the Perfections he includes, whereunto they are related. 
We ought to know farther, that GO D is molt ftrictly united to our Souls by His Prefonce^ fo 
that He may be faid to be the place of Spirits, as Space is the place of Bodies. Thefe two things- 
being fuppos'd, it is certain that the Mind can fee what there is in G O D, which reprefents Crea- 
ted Beings ; that being molt Spiritual, molt Intelligible, and moft clofely Prefent to the Mind. 
And fo the Mind may fee in G O D all the Works of G O D, fiippofing GOD willing to difcover 
to it what He has in Himfelf, that reprefents them. Here then are the Reafons which feem to 
prove He would rather do this, than create an infinite number of Idea's in every Mind. 

In the firft place, though it be not deny'd abfolutely that GOD might have made infinite up- 
on infinite Numbers of Beings, Reprefentative of Objects with every Mind he has created \ yet 
it is not to be believ'd that He lias done it. For it is not only moft agreeable to Reafon, but more- 
over apparent from the Oeconomy of all Nature, that GOD never effe&s by moft Round-about 
and difficult ways, what can be done in ways moft fimplc and eafie : GOD makes nothing needlefsj 
and without Reafon. That which ihews His Wifdom and His Power, is not the working little 
things by great means-, thisisagainft Reafon, and the fign of a limited Underftanding : But on 
the contrary, the effecting great things by moft fimple and eafie ways. Thus it is that purely 
with Extenfion He produces all we fee admirable in Nature ; even that which gives Life and Mo- 
tion to Animals. For thofe who would have abfolute Subftantial Forms and Faculties, and Souls 
in Animals, diftinguifh'd from the Blood and Organs of their Body, for the performance of their 
functions, will at the fame time have GOD to want Underftanding, or fuppofe him unable to 
effect thofe admirable things with Extenfion all alone. They rrieafure the Power of G O D and 
His fupream Wifdom, by the Littlenefs of their own Mind. Since then it is poffible for GOD to 
to make all things vifible to our Minds, by fimply Willing they fhould fee what is in the midft 
of themfelves ^ that is, what He has in Himfelf, Relative and Reprefentative of thefe things ; 
it is not likely He fhould have done otherwife ; and that He fhould produce for that purpofe infi- 
nite upon infinite Idea's, with every Mind that He has created. 

But 'tis to be well obferv'd, that we cannot conclude that our Minds fee the EfTence of G O Z>, 
from their feeing all things in G O Dm this Nature : becaufe what they fee is moft imperfeft, 
whereas GO D is moft perfeft. They fee matter Divifible, Figur'd, &c. and in GOD there is 
nothing Divifible or Figur'd. For G D is all Being, as being infinite, and comprehending all - 7 
But He is not any Being in particular •, mean while what we fee, is only one or more Beings in 
particular, and we comprehend not that perfect Simplicity ot GOD, who concludes all Be- 
ings within Himfelf. Befides which it may be faid, that we fee not the Idea's of Things, fo 
much as the Things reprefented by the Idea's-, for in feeing a Square, for inftance, weufenot 
to fay, we fee the Idea of that Square which is united to the Mind, but only the Square that is 

without. 

The fecond Reafon which obliges me to think that we fee all Beings, becaufe GOD wills the 
difcovery of what is in Himfelf, reprefenting them; and not becaufe we have fo many Idea's 
created with us, as there are things to be feen, is, that this inflates created Minds in an abfolute 
Dependance upon GOD, and in the greateft that poflibly can be. For it being fo, we not only 
can fee nothing but what GOD will have us fee, but alfo can fee nothing, except what He makes 
US fee. We are not Sufficient of our [elves, but our. Efficiency is of GOD : Non fumusfuffickmes iCox^.^ 
coiritare aliquid a. nobis tanquam ex nobis, fed fufficientia nofira ex Deo eft. 'Tis GOD Himfelf that 
enlightens the Philofophers, in that Science which ungrateful Men call Natural , though it is 
deriv'd to them from Heaven. GOD hath fhewed it unto them : Dens enim illis manifefiavit. Romaa? 
He is properly the Light of the Mind, and the Father of Lights : Pater Luminnm. 'Tis He Who gc. 1. 17* 
teaches Men Knowledge : Qui docet hominem Sciendum. In a word. He is the true Light, that 1 '• 94«to. 
lighteth every Man that cometh into the World. Lux vera <^u& illuminat omnem hominem venientem J oh - u 9* 

in hunc mundum. 

For 



5^0 F. Male br an che Concerning Book III, 

For 'tis no eafie thing to comprehend diflindly the Dependence our Minds have on GOD, in 
all their particular Adions ; fuppofing they have every thing, we diflindly know to be neceflary 
to their Ading, or all the Idea's of things prefent to their Mind, And that general and confus'd 
term Concourfe, whereby they offer to explain the Dependance Creatures have on GOD, raifes 
no diflind Idea in a confiderate Mind ; and yet it is convenient Men fhould moft diflindly know, 
how altogether impotent they are without GOD. 

But the ftrongefl Reafon of all,is the manner of condud the Mind take's in the perceiving every 
thing: It is manifefl, and known to every one's own experience, that when we would think on 
any thing in particular, we firft call about our View upon all Beings in general, and afterwards 
apply our felves to the confideration of the Objed we defire to think on: Now it is undoubtedly 
certain, that we could not defire the fight of arty particular Objed, but we mull have already 
feenit, though it were confufedly and in general: So that it being poflible to defire the feeing 
all Beings, fometimes one, and fometimes another, it is certain that all Beings are prefent to our 
Mind ; and it feems that all Beings can be no otherwife prefent to our Mind, than as G O D is 
prefent to it •, that is, He that contains all things in the fimplicity of his Effence; 
.. It feems too that the Mind would not be capable of reprefenting to it felf the univerfal Idea's 
of Gems, Species, and the like, unlefs it faw all Beings included in one. For every Creature be- 
ing a particular Being, it can't be faid, we fee any thing created when we fee, for example, a 
Triangle in general. In fine, I do not believe there is any way of accounting for the manner of 
the Mind's knowing feveral abftrad and general Truths, but by the prefenceof Him who can 
enlighten the Mind ten thoufand different ways. 

' In Ihort, the fineft, the moft fublime, the moll folid and primary proof (or that which fup- 
pofes leafl thingsj of the Exiftence of a GOD, is the Idea we have of what is infinite : For it 
is certain that the Mind perceives infinite, though it does not comprehend it ; and that it has a 
moft diftind Idea of G O D, which can only arrive, through the Union it has with Him. Since** 
'tis inconceivable, that the Idea of a Being infinitely perfed, as is that we have of G O'D, fhould 
be any thing of a # created Nature. 

But the Mind has not only the Idea of infinite, but this Idea is precedaneous to that of finite : 
For we conceive infinite Being, from our conceiving Being only, not confidering whether it be 
iinite or infinite. But in order to conceive Finite Being, it is neceflary to prefcind fomewhat from 
that general Notion of Being, which confequently muft precede it. So then the Mind perceives 
not any thing, except in the Idea it has of Infinite ; and fo far is that Idea from being form'd of 
a confus'd colledion of all the Idea's of particular Beings, as the Ph'ilofophers imagine ; that on 
the contrary, all thefe particular Idea's are only participations of that general Idea of infinite- 
as GOD derives not his Being from the Creatures, but all the Creatures have their fubfiftence 
from Him. 

The lafl Proof, which poffibly may go for a Demonflration with thofe who are us'd to abftrad 
Reafonings, is this. 'Tis impoffible for GOD to have any other Principal End of his Adions 
than Himfelf. This is a common Notion with all Men capable of any Reflection ; and Holy Scri- 
pture will not fuffer us to doubt, that GOD has created all things for Himfelf. It is neceflary 
then not only that our Natural Love, I mean the Motion he produces in our Mind, fhould tend 
towards him ; but alfo that the Knowledge and the Light he gives it, fhould difcover fomething to 
us which is in Him: For all that comes from GOD, can have no other End but GOD. If 
GOD has made a Mind, and given it the Sun for its Idea, or for the immediate Objed of its 
Knowledge, GOD, we fhould think, had made that Mind and the Idea of that Mind for the Sun, 
and not for Himfelf. 

GOD cannot therefore make a Mind for the Knowledge of his Works, were it not that this 
Mind fhould in fome fort fee GOD in contemplating his Works. So that it may be faid, that 
unlefs we faw G O D in fome manner, we fhould fee nothing at all •, juft as we fhould love nothing 
at all, except we lov'd GOD; that is, except GOD continually imprefs'd on us the love of 
Good in general. For that Love being our Will, we are unable to love any thing, or will any 
thing without Him ; fince we cannot love particular Goods, but by determining towards thefe 
Goods the motion of Love that GOD gives us for Himfelf. Thus as we love not any thing, but 
by means of that neceflary Love we have for GOD; fo we know nothing, but through that ne- 
celfary Knowledge we have of Him, all the particular Idea's which we have of the Creatures, 
being only the Reflridions of the Idea of the Creator, as all the Motions of the Will towards 
the Creatures, are only Determinations of the Motion towards the Creator. 

I fuppofe there is no Theologift but will agree with me in this, that the Impious love G O D,with 

this Natural Love I fpeak of: And St. Augu/Hn, and fome other of the Fathers maintained it as a 

thing undoubted, that the Wicked fee in G O D the Rules of Morals, and eternal Truths. So 

Lib. 14.de that the Opinion I am explaining ought not to trouble any body. Ab ilia incommutabili luce Ve- 

'iiin.cap.ritatis, etiam impius, dum ab ea avertitur, quodammodo tangitur. Hinc eft quod etiam impii cogitant 

•3« aternttatem, Cjr mult a reel e reprehendunt rctleque laudant in hominum moribus. Ouibus ea tandem re- 

gulis judicant,nifi in quibus vident, quemadmodum quifq; vivere debeat, etiamfi nee ipfi eodem modo vim ant ? 

Vbi ant em eas vident? Ncque enim infuanatura.Nam cum proculdubio mente ifta vide ant ur,eorumque mentes 

confiet ejfe mutabiles, has verb regulas immutabiles, videat qmfquis in eis & hoc viderc potuerit Vbi- 

nam ergo funt ifia reguU fcripta, nifi in libro lucu illius, qua Veritas dicitur, unde lex omnisjufla. de- 
fenbitur ..... .in qua videt quid operandum fit etiam qui operatur injnfiitiam, & ipfe est qui ab ea lace 

avertitftr a qua tamen tangitur. 

There 



Chap VI. The Search after Truth* III 

There are in St. Augvftin infinite paffages of the like Nature, whereby he' proves that we fee 
GOD^ even in this Life, through the Knowledge we have of eternal Truths. Truth is uncreated, 
immutable, immenfe, eternal, and above all things. It is true independently, . and by it felf, 
and is beholden to-nothing elfe for its Perfection. It renders the Creatures more perfedt, and 
all Spirits are naturally folicitous to know it ; nothing can have all thefe Perfections, except 
GOD; therefore Truth is GOD. We fee immutable and eternal Truths, therefore we fee 
G O D. Thefe are the Reafons of St. Anguftin. My own are fomewhat difFerent ; and I would 
not unjuftly ufurp the Authority of fo Great a Man to countenance my Opinion. 

'Tis my thoughts then that Truths, even thofe which are eternal, as That twice two are fottr^ 
are not fo much as abfolute Beings ; fo far am I from believing them to be GOD. For 'tis 
manifeft that this Truth confifts only in the Relation of Equality, which is between twice two 
and four. We do not fay then with St. Anguftin, That we fee G O D in feeing eternal Truths, 
but in feeing the Idea's of thefe Truths ; for Idea's are real, but the Equality between Idea's, 
which is the Truth, has nothing real in it. When, for inftance, we fay, the Cloth we meafure 
is three Ells long. The Cloth and the Ells are real, but the Equality between the three Ells and 
the Cloth is no real Being, but only a Relation intervening between them. In faying, Twice 
two arc four, the Idea's of the Numbers are real, but the Equality between them is only a Rela- 
tion. And thus according to our own Opinion, we fee GOD in feeing eternal Truths-, not 
that thefe Truths are GOD, but becaufe the Idea's on which thefe Truths depend, exiftinGOD* 
and perhaps too St. Anguftin understood it fo. We are perfwaded alio that we know changeable 
and corruptible Truths in G O D, though St. Anguftin fpeaks only of the immutable and incor- 
ruptible ; fince there is no need of subjecting GOD to any imperfection on this account, no- 
thing being more requir'd, than that GOD gives us a Manifestation of what He has in Himfelf, 
which relates to thefe things. 

But when I fay, that we fee in G O D material and feniible Things, fpecial Notice mould be 
taken that I don't fay, We have the Senfations of them in GOD, but only that they proceed 
from GOD, who acts upon us. For GOD perfectly knows Tenfible things; but not by any 
Senfation. In perceiving any thing of a fenfible Nature, two things occur in our Perception j 
Senfation, and Pure Idea. The Senfation is a Modification of our Soul, and 'tis GOD whocau- 
fesitin us; which he is able to caufe, though He has it not Himfelf; becaufe he fees in the 
Idea he has. of our Soul, that it is capable of it : As to the Idea, which is found joyn'd to the 
Senfation; that is in G O D, and we fee it, becaufe he is pleas'd to difcover it to us. And GOD 
joyns the Senfation to the. Idea when the Objects are prefent, to the intent we may believe them 
fo, and may enter into the Sentiments and Paffions, that we ought to have with relation to 

them. .-.•. 

We believe laftly, that all Spirits fee the eternal Laws, no lefs than other things in G OD ; 
but with fome difference. They know the Divine Order, and the Eternal Truths, and even the 
Beings GOD has made, according to this Order, and thefe Truths, through the Union they ne- 
ceffarily have with the WORD, or the WISDOM of GOD, who enlightens them, as we 
have before explain'd. But 'tis through the impreffion they without intermiffion receive from the 
Will of GOD, which carries them towards Him, and flrives, as I may fo fay, to conform their 
Will entirely like His own; that they know this Order to be a Law; I mean that they knoiv 
the Eternal Laws ; as that Good ought to be lov'd, and Evil avoided ; that Righteoufnefs ought 
to be lov'd more than Riches ; that 'tis better to obey GOD than to command Men, and infinite 
other Natural Laws. For the knowledge of all thefe Laws is not different from the knowledge of 
that impreffion which they constantly feel within themfelves, though they do not always follow it 
by the free choice of their Will ; and which they know to be common to all Minds, though it 
be not equally ftrong and powerful in them all. 

'Tis by this Dependance of our Mind, and its Relation, and Union to the W O R D of GOD: 
and of our Will to his Love, that we are made after the Image and Similitude of GOD. * And 
though this Image be very much blurr'd and defac'd by Sin, yet it is necelfary for it to fublilt as 
long as we our felves. But if we bear the Image of the WORD humbled upon Earth, and 
obey the Motions of the Holy Sprit-, that Primitive Image of our first Creation, that Union of 
our Mind to the W O R D of the F A T H E R, and to the Love of the F A T H E R, and of the 
SON, will be repair'd, and be made indelible. We fhall become like GOD, if we be like 
the Man-God. Laftly, GOD will be wholly in us, and we fhall be wholly in GOD, in a far 
perfe&er manner, than that whereby it is necelfary to our Subfiftence, that we (hould be in Him, 
and He in us. 

Thefe then are fome of the Reafons that induce us to believe, that our Minds perceive all See theillu- 
things through the intimate prefence of Him, who comprehends all things in the Simplicity P mms - 
of his Effence. Let every one judge of them, according to the internal conviction he fhall 
receive, after he has ferioufly confider'd them. But for my own part, I can fee no probability, in • 
any other way of explaining it, and I prefume this last will appear more than probable. 

Thus our Souls depend on G O D all manner of ways. For as it is He who makes them feel 
Pleafure and Pain, and all the other Senfations, by theNaturalUnionHe has inftituted between them 
and their Bodies, which is no other than His Decree and general Will : So it is He, who by means 
of the Natural Union He has plac'd between the Will of Man, and the Reprefentation of Idea's, 
included in the immenfity of the Divine EfTence, gives them to know all that they know : Nor is 
this Natural Union any thing but his general Will. So that 'tis He only who can enlighten us, 

Ii by 



a. -» 



02 F. Malebranche Concerning Book III. 

by reprefenting all things to us, as 'tis He alone that can make us happy, by giving us to tafte all 
forts of Pleafures. 

Let us per fill; then in our perfwafion, that GOD is the intelligible World, or the place of 
Spirits, as the material World is the place of Bodies. That 'tis from His Power they receive all. 
their Modifications"*, that 'tis in His Wifdom they difcover all their Idea's ; and 'tis by His Love 
they are influenc'd with all their regulated Motions: And becaufe His Power and His Love arc 
nothing but Himfelf; let us believe with St. Pad y that He is not far from every one of us, and 

A&.Apoft that in Him we live, and move, and have our Being. Non longe esl ab urwquoque noftrum^ in iffo 

c. 17. 2%.enimvivlmns 1 movemur^ & [limns. 



CHAP. VII. 

I. Four different manners of Perception. II. How it is that we know 
GOD. III. How we know Bodies. IV. How we know our own 
Souls. V. How we know the Souls of other Men^ and Pure Spirits. 



I 



N order to give an extract and illuftration of the Notion I have juft eflablifh'd, concerning 
the manner of our Minds perceiving all the different Obje&s of its knowledge, it is neceffary 
1 fhould diftinguifh in it Four manners or ways of Knowing things. 



I. The Firft is that whereby we know things by themfelves. 

Tout diffe- The Second is that of knowing them by their Idea's ; that is, as I underftand it in this place, 
rent man- y fomething that is different from themfelves. 

Teption' Tiie Trarcl ls that °f Con f cience -> or by internal Senfation. 
C _ ' The Fourth is their knowing them by Conjecture. 

We know things by themfelves immediately and without Idea's, when being of a njoft intelligi- 
ble Nature they can penetrate the Mind, or difcover themfelves to it. We know things by their 
Idea's when they are not intelligible by themfelves, whether becaufe they are Corporeal, or that 
they cannot penetrate the Mind, or difcover themfelves to it. We know by Confcience whatever 
is not diftinguifh'd from our felves. Laftly, we know by Conjecture the things which are diffe- 
rent from our felves, and from thofe we know in themfelves, and by Idea's, when we think that 
fome things are like fome others that we already know. 

Of all the things that come under our Knowledge we know none but GOD by Himfelf. For 
though there be other Spiritual Beings befides Him *, and fuch as feem intelligible by their own 
XX. Nature ; yet in our prefent State there is none but He that penetrates the Mind, and difcovers 
Hew we Himfelf to it. 'Tis GOD alone that we fee with an immediate and direct View *, and poffibly 
know He alone is able to enlighten the Mind by his own Subftance. Finally, in this Life, it is from no- 
's ° D> thing but the Union that we have with Him, that we are capable of knowing what we know, 
as has been explain'd in the foregoing Chapter. For he only is our Matter, whi> prefides 
over our Mind, according to St. Auftin, without the Deputation or Interpofition of any 
Humanis Creature. 
mentibus 

terpofita It cannot be conceiv'd, that any thing Created can reprefent infinite, that Being without re- 
natura ftri&ion, the immenfe Being, the univerfal Being, can be perceiv'd by an Idea, that is, by a par- 
praefidet. ticular Being, and a Being different from the. univerfal and infinite Being. But as to particular 
AugM.de Beings, there is no difficulty to conceive how they can be repiefented by the infinite Being that 
ver&ReHg. includes them, and includes them in a raoft Spiritual, and confeqnently moft intelligible manner. 
Thus it is neceffary to fay that GOD is intelligible by Himfelf, though the knowledge we have. 
of Him in this Life be very imperfect and confus'd ; and that Corporeal things are intelli- 
gible by their Idea's ; that is to fay, inGOD; fince GOD alone contains the intelligible World, 
wherein are found the Idea's of all things. 

But though things are poflible to be feeh in GOD, it does not follow that we do fee all things 
in Him : We fee only thofe things in Him whereof we have Idea's, and there are things We fee 
without Idea's. 



III. All things in the World, whereof we have any knowledge, are either Bodies or Spirits; pro- 
How we perties of Bodies, and properties of Spirits. As to Bodies, 'tis not to be doubted bnt we fee 
iow Bo- t h cm together with their Properties by their Idea's, forafmuch as being unintelligible of them- 
felves, there is no po'ffibility of feeing them, except in that Being which contains them in an in- 
telligible manner. Bodies then and their Properties are feen in GOD, and by their Idea's •, and 
for this reafon the knowledge we have of them is moft perfedt. I mean, that the Idea that we 
have of Extenfion, isfufficientforthedifplaying to us all the Properties Extenfion is capable of; 



hnow 
dies. 



Chap VII. The Search after Truth. 15 2 

and wc cannot defire a more diftincl: and fertil Idea of Extenfion of Figures, and Motions than 
that which GOD furniflies us withal. 

As the Idea's of things which are in GOD, include all their Properties ; in feeing their Idea's 
we can fee fuccefiively all the Properties of them : for in feeing things as they are in GOD, 
we conftantly fee them in the moft perfect manner, and the knowledge of them would be infi- 
nitely Perfect, if the Mind that perceives them in him were infinite. What is wanting to our 
knowledge of Extenfion, its Figures, and Motions, is not the defedtivenefs of the Idea that 
reprefents it, but of our Mind that confiders it. 

But 'tis not fo in point of the Soul ; we know her not by her Idea ; we fee her not in GOD j we iv. 
know her only by Conference .- and for that reafon the knowledge we have of her is imperfect. Homwe 
We know nothing of our Soul, but what we feel pafs within Us. If we never had had the knom ** e 
fenfation of Pain, Pleafure, Light, &c, it were impoffible for us to know whether the Soul SouU 
was capable of them, becaufe we know her not by her Idea. ' But if we faw in GOD the Idea See the 1U 
that anfwers to our Soul, we fhould at the fame time know, or at leaft, might know all juftrations. 
the Properties file is capable of; as we know all the Properties Extenfion is capable of, becaufe 
we know Extenfion by its Idea. 

It is true we know well enough by our Gonfcience, or by the internal fentiment we have 
of our felves, that our Soul is fomething great and excellent : But 'tis poflible that what 
we know of her, is the leaft part of what fhe is in her felf. If all we knew of Matter, 
were only Twenty or Thirty Figures, wherewith it had been modify'd, certainly our know- 
ledge of it had been very inconliderable, in comparifon of what we know by the Idea that 
reprefents it. To underftand then the Soul perfectly, it is not fufficient to know that only, 
which we receive by internal Sentiment, fince our Self-Confcioufnefs difcovers to us, it 
may be but the leaft part of our Being. 

It may be concluded from what has beenfaid, that though we know the exiftence of our 
Soul better than the exiftence of our Body, or than of the things about us, yet we have not 
fo perfect knowledge of the Nature of our Soul, as of the Nature of our Body ; which may 
ferve to reconcile the different Sentiments of thofe who fay there is nothing better known 
than the Soul, and of others that affirm we underftand nothing lefs. 

This too may be of life to prove that the Idea's, which reprefent fomething to us that's 
External, are not Modifications of our Soul. For if the Soul faw all things by confidering 
her own Modifications, fiie ought to have a more clear and perfpicuous knowledge of her 
own Eflence or Nature, than of that of Bodies ; and of the Senfations or Modifications fiie 
is capable of, than of all the Figures or Modifications incident to Bodies. Mean while, 
fhe knows not that fhe is capable of this or that Senfation, by any View fiie takes of her felf, 
but by Experience ; whereas fiie knows Extenfion to be capable of an infinite -number of Figures 
by the Idea which reprefents Extenfion. There are morover certain Senfations as Colours 
and founds, which the generality of Men cannot difcover to be Modifications of the Soul ; 
but there are no Figures which every one does not know by the Idea he has of Extenfion, 
to be the Modifications of Bodies. 

What I have been faying, fhews likewife the reafon why we cannot give a Definition ex- 
planatory of the Modifications of the Soul. For fince we know neither the Soul, nor its Mo- 
difications by Idea's, but only by Senfations ; and fuch Senfations of Pleafure, for inftance, 
Pain, Heat, or the like, have no Connexion with Words ; It is plain that had a Man never 
feen Colour, nor felt Heat, he could not be made to underftand thefe Senfations by all the 
Definitions in the World. Now Men having their Senfations occafionally from the Body, 
and all Men's Bodies being not difpos'd alike, it often happens, that thefe words are Equivocal : 
and that thofe which are employ'd to exprefs the Modifications of our Soul, fignify quite 
contrary to what they defign : fo that thay often, for inftance, make a Man think of Bitter, 
when 'tis fuppos'd they make him think of Sweet. 

But though we have not an entire knowledge of our Soul, we are fufficiently inftru&ed by 
Confcience, for demonftrating her Immortality, Spirituality, Liberty, and fome other Attributes 
which it is necefiary for us to know ; and for that reafon GOD manifefts her not to us 
by her Idea, in the way that he gives us to know Bodies. True, the knowledge we have 
of our Soul by Confcience is imperfect, but it is not falfe: the knowledge on the contrary we 
have of Bodies, by Senfation or Confcience, if we may term Confcience that Senfation we 
have of what occurrs in our Bodies, is not only imperfect, but alfo falfe. Wherefore the 
Idea of Bodies was necefiary to correct the Senfations we had of them. But we have no need 
of the Idea of the Soul, fince the Confcioufnefs we have of her, engages us not in Error ; and 
there is no fear of miftaking in the Knowledge of her, if we be carcfull not to confound her with 
the Body ; which may be done-by Reafon. Laftly, if we had had a clear Idea of the Soul, as 
we have of the Body, that Idea had made us confider her as too feparate from it, and fo it 
had weakned the union of our Soul with our Body, by hindring us from regarding our Soul, 
as expanded through all our Members : which I explain not more at large. 

There remains now no other Obje&s of our Knowledge to be fpoke to, than the Souls of v 
other Men, and pure Intelligences, and 'tis manifeft we know them only by Conjecture. We Ho ^ we 
know them not at prefent, either in themselves, or by their Idea's : and whereas they are different know the 
from us, it is not poflible to know them by Confcience. We conjecture that the Souls of souls of 
other men are of the fame Species with our own. What we feel in our felves, we prefume otha Mea ' 

that 



t o 4- F. Malebranche Concerning Book III. 

that they feel too : and when thefe Sentiments have no Relation to our Body, we are fure 
we are not deceiv'd ; becaufe we fee certain Idea's and immutable Laws in GOD, according 
to which we are certainly affur'd that GOD ads equally on all Spirits. 

I know, that twice two are four ; that it is better to be Righteous than Rich : and I am not 
deceiv'd in believing others know thefe Truths, as well as I. I love Good and Pleafure, I 
hate Evil and Pain : I am willing to be happy, and I am not deceiv'd in thinking all' Men, 
and A«geh, and even Devils, have the fame Inclinations. I know likewife that GOD will 
never make Spirits uildelirous of Happinefs, or that can be defirous of being Miferable. But 
I know it with evidence and certainty, fince'tis GOD that teaches me: for who could in- 
form me of the Deflgns and Wills of GOD, but GOD Himfelf. But when the Body is 
a partner in that which occurrs within me, I am almolt ever deceiv'd, if I meafure others by 
my felf. I feel Heat, I fee a thing of fuch a Size, or fuch a Colour ; I have fuch or fuch a 
Taft, upon the application of certain Bodies to my Palate : and I am deceiv'd, if I judge of 
others by my felf: I ana fubjed to particular Paffions, I have a kindnefs or averfion to this 
or that thing, and I judge that others have the like : but my Conjedure is often falfe. Thus 
the Knowledge we have of other Men is very obnoxious to Error, if we judge of them only 
from the Senfations we have of our felves. 

Whether there are any Beings different from G O D,' our felves, Bodies, and Pure Spirits, 

is unknown to. us. We can hardly perfwade our felves there are ; and after we have examin'd 

the Reafons of fome Philofophers, who pretend the contrary, we have found them falfe : Which 

. has con fir m'd us in the Notion we had taken up, that all Men being of the fame Nature, we 

have all the fame Idea's, as having all need of the Knowledge of the fame things. 



CHAP. VIII. 

I. The intimate Prefence of the indefinite Idea of Being in general^ is the 
caufe of all the diforderly Abftraclions of the Mind: and the moft part of 
the Chimera's of the Vulgar Philofephy, which hinder many Philofofhers 
from acknowledging the folidity of true Principles of Phyficks. II. An In- 
flame concerning the Ejfence of Matter. 

I. Y ■ 1HAT clear, intimate, and neceffary Prefence of GOD : I mean that prefence of Being 

the 'mi- without any particular Limitation •, of Being infinite, and in general, to the Mind, 

7" e P fth a< ^ s ^ ron S^ er u P on ftj tuan the prefence of all finite Objects. It is impoflible 

indefinite* *° diveft it felf abfolutely of this general Idea of Being ; fince 'tis impoflible to fubfift out of 

idea of Be- GOD. Perhaps it may be faid, that the Mind can feparate it felf from him, becaufe it can 

big in ge- think on particular Beings. But this is a miftake. For the Mind in confidering any Being 

wdivtke [ n particular, does not fo much feparate and recede from GOD, as approach nearer fome of 

ttedifor* Hi s Perfections, if I may be permitted fo to fpeak, by removing farther off from others. 

deny Ab- However, it doth not diflance it felf in that manner, as quite to lofe fight of them} but is 

ftraBions ever in a Capacity of feeking them out, and approaching near them. They are ever prefent 

°f. % te .to the Mind, yet the Mind perceives them not but in an unexplicable confufion, by reafon of its 

themon 1 Littleneis, and the Greatnefs of the Idea of Being : A Man may indeed be fome time without 

pan of the thinking on himfelf ; but he cannot, as I think, fubfift a moment without thinking on Being; 

Chimera's a nd even at the time a Man believes he thinks of nothing, he is neceffarily full of the indetermi- 

cf **«7«/" nate and general Idea of Being. But becauie the things which are cuftomary to us, and which 

phy which don't affed us, alarum not the Mind with any vehemence, nor oblige it to make refkdion on 

hinder ma- them : this Idea of being fo great, fo vaft, fo real, and politive as it is, is fo familiar to us, and 

ny Phiiofo- makes fb little impreffion, that we fancy that we hardly fee it ; that we make no refiedion on it •, 

phers ffom anc i confequently judge there is little reality in it : and that 'tis only form'd from a confus'd col- 

kdeingtbe kdion of all particular Idea's ; though on the contrary it is in this, and fy this only, we perceive 

folidity of all Beings in particular. , - 

true Tr'm- Though that Idea which we receive through our immediate union with the W O R D of 
cities of COD, never deceives us of it felf, as do thofe we derive from the union we have with our 
Phyfick. g 0( jy^ w hich reprefents things to us otherwife than they are ; yet I fcruple not to fay, That we 
make fo bad ufe of the belt things, that the indelible prefence of this Idea, is one of the prin- 
cipal Caufes of all the diforderly Abftradions of the Mind ; and confequently of all that Ablhad 
and Chimerical Philofophy, which explains all Natural Eileds, by the general terms of Ad, 
Power, Caufe, Effed, Subftantial Forms, Faculties, Occult Qualities, Sympathy, Antipathy, &c. 
For 'tis certain thefe Terms, and a great many others, excite no other Idea's in the Mind, than 
indeterminate and general Idea's ; that is, Idea's which readily offer themfelves to the Mind, with- 
out any trouble, and application on our own part. 

Let a Man read with all Attention poffible, all the Definitions and Explications given of Sub- 
ftantial Forms ; let him do his belt to fearch wherein cpnfifts the Effence of all thefe Entities, 

which 



Chap. VIII. The Search after Truth. 1 3 tt 

which the fraitful Imagination of Philofophers produces in fuch multitudes at pleafure, that 
they are forc'd to divide tTiem, and fubdivide them over and over again ; and I dare engage, 
that he fhall never excite in his Mind, any other Idea of all thefe things, than that of Being' 
and of Caufe in general. 

For let us take a view of the cuftomary proceedings of Philofophers. They obferve fome * 
new Effect, and prefently imagine fome new Entity mull produce it. The Fire heats ; there 
is then in the Fire fome Entity to produce this Effect, which differs from the Matter the Fire 
is compos'd of : And becaufe Fire is capable of many different Effects, as of feparating Bo- 
dies, Pulverizing Vitrifying, Drying, Hardning, Softning, Dilating, Purifying, and En- 
lightning them, &c therefore they liberally bellow on Fire fo many Faculties, or real Quali- 
ties, as it is capable of producing different Effects. 

But if we reflect on all the Definitions they give of thefe Faculties, we (hall find they are 
nothing elfe but Logical Definitions, [which raife no other Idea's, than that of Being and Caufe 
in general, which the Mind refers to the Effect that is produe'd. So that a Man is nothing the 
wifer when he has lludied them never fo long : For all that is got by this fort of Study, is the 
imagining we know better than others, what indeed we know much worfe ; not only becaufe 
we admit many Entities that never were j but alfo in being prepoffefs'd, we make our felves 
incapable of conceiving how 'tis poflible for Matter all alone, as that of Fire, in being mov'd 
againft Bodies differently difpos'd, to produce all the different Effects we fee Fire produce. 

It is manifefl to all thofe who have read any thing, That almoil all the Books of Science, and 
especially thofe which treat of Phyficks, Medicine, and Chymifiry, and of all particular things 
of Nature, are full of nothing but Argumentations, founded on the Elementary and Secondary 
Qualities, as Attractive, Retentive, Comoilive, Expulfive, and fuch like; upon others Mthich 
they term Occult ; upon fpecifick Vef tues ; and many other Entities, which Men frame and make 
np out of the general Idea of Being, and out of the Caufe of the Effect which they fee ; which 
methinks could not happen, were it not for the facility they have at confidering the Idea of 
Being in general, which is always prefent to their Mind, through the intimate prefence of Hini 
who includes all Beings. 

If the vulgar Philofophers would be content to let their Phyficks go for firople Logich ; which 
furnifh'd out Terms for the Difcourfing of Natural things, and if they would give thofe Men 
leave to be quiet, who affix to thefe Terms diftinct and particular Idea^to make themfelves in- 
telligible, we fhould have nothing to reprehend in their Conduct : But they fet up themfelves 
for the explaining Nature, by general and abftract Idea's, as if Nature were her felf abftract 5, 
and will abfolutely have the Phyficks of their Mailer Arifiotle, to be real Phyficks, which fearches 
to the bottom of things, and not a fimple Logick only •, though it has nothing fufferable in it, 
except it be fome Definitions, fb loofe and indefinite, and fome fo general Terms, as may be 
employ'd in all forts of Philofophy. In fine,their Heads are fo full of thefe imaginary Entities,and 
thefe loofe and indeterminate Idea's, which fpring up naturally in their Minds, that they are 
too incapable of fixing their Thoughts for any time upon the real Idea's of things, to difcover 
their folidity and evidence. And this is the Caufe of that their extream ignorance of the true 
Principles of Natural Philofophy. 'Tis neceffary to give a proof of it. 

The Philofophers are fufficiently agreed, That that ought to be look'd upon as the Eflence of jjj. 
a thing} which is acknowledg'd the Firft in that thing, which is infeparable from it, arid on of the Ef~ 
which all the Properties which belong to it, depend : So that to difcover wherein confifts the \ fence of 
Effence of Matter, we mull confider all the Properties that comport with it, or are included Matter ' 
in the Idea we have of it : as Hardnefs, Softnefs, Fluidnefs, Motion, Reft, Figure, Divifibi- jf ^.w-^r 
lity, Impenetrability, and Extenfion} and enquire immediately which of thefe Attributes is ^"^^ 
infeparable from it. Thus Fluidity, Hardnefs, Softnefs, Motion, and Reft, being to be fe- Effence be 
parated from Matter, fince there are many Bodies without Hardnefs, Fluidity, or Softnefs, admitted, 
which are not in Motion, or laflly which are not at reft, it clearly follows that none of thefe iU the reft 
Attributes are eflential to it. f Wj™r 

And now there remain only four, which we conceive infeparable from Matter ; namely ft r J^°. n ';f 
Figure, Divifibility, Impenetrability, and Extenfion ; wherefore in order to underftand which u he not 
Attribute is to be taken for its Effence, we mull no longer think of feparating them, but only admitted, 
examine which is the Primary, and that fuppofes none before it. Now we eafily difcover that [ m onl J * 
Figure, Divifibility, and Impenetrability, fuppofe Extenfion ; and that Extenfion prefuppofes ^^ 
nothing : But this being given, Divifibility, Impenetrability, and Figure, necelfarily follow, wherein 
Extenfion then ought to be concluded the Effence of Matter, on Suppofition it has no other confifts the 
Attributes than thofe beforemention'd, and fuch as are like them : and I am perfwaded no Man Effence of 
in the World can doubt of it, when he has ferioufly confider'd it. ' Jjjg' \° r 

But all the difficulty is to know, Whether Matter has not fome other Attributes, different cmno l be 
from Extenfion, and its Dependants ; fo that Extenfion it felf may not be elfential to it, but may the fubjett 
fuppofe fome other thing, both as its Subject, and its Principle. of «■ 0"'' 

Many Men, after having moll attentively confider'd the Idea, which they have of Matter, by-'" ' 2 " 
all the Attributes that are known of it } after having meditated likewife on the Effects of Na- 
ture, as much as their Strength and Capacity of Mind would permit them, have been ftrongly 
convine'd, that Extenfion fuppofes not any thing in Matter, whether becaufe they have had no 

Kk aifttact 



is6 F. Male branch e Concerning Book III. 

diftinft and particular Idea of that thing pretended, precedaneous to Extenfion, or becaufe 
they have found no vifible Effe& to prove it. 

For even as to our being perfwaded that a Watch hath no Entity, different from the Matter, 
it is compos'd of :, it fuffices to know, how the different Difpofition of the Wheels is able to 
effeft all the Movements of a Watch, without having any other diftindfc Idea of what might 
poilibly be the Caufe of thefe Motions, though there be many Logical to had. So becaufe 
thefe Perfons have no diftinct Idea of what could be in Matter, were Extenfion taken away, 
and fee no Attribute that can explicate its Nature, and becaufe Extenfion being granted, all 
the Attributes conceiv'd to belong toMatter,areatthefame time granted : and becaufe Matter is 
the Caufe of no Effe&iWhich may not be conceiv'd producible by Extenfion, diverfly configur'd, 
and diverfly mov'd \ therefore they are perfwaded, that Extenfion is the Eflence of Matter. 

But as no Man can infallibly demonftrate there is not fome Intelligence, or New-created En- 
tity in the Wheels of a Watch •, fo no Man can, without a particular Revelation, beaffur'das 
of a Geometrical Demonstration, that there is nothing but Extenfion diverfly configur'd in 
a Stone. For 'tis abfolutely poffible for Extention to be joyn'd with fomething which we 
don't conceive, becaufe we have no Idea of it: though it feems very unreafonable to believe 
and aflert it , it being contrary to Reafon, to aflert what we neither know, nor have any con- 
ception of. 

Yet though we fhould fuppofe, That there were fomething befides Extenfion in Matter, yet 
that would be no Impediment, if we well obferve it, why Extenfion fhould not be its Eflence, 
according to the Definition we have given of theWord. For, in fhort, 'tis abfolutely necef- 
fary that every thing in the World,fhould be either a Being,or a Mode of being ; and no Think- 
ing and Attentive Man can deny it. But Extenfion is no} the Mode of a Being •, therefore it is 
a Being. But becaufe Matter is not constituted of feveral Beings , as Man, who is compos'd 
of a Body and Mind j Matter being one fimple Being, it is manifest that Matter is nothing but 
Extenfion. 

Now to prove that Extenfion is not a Mode of Being, but a real Being ; it rauft be obferv'd, 
That a Mode of Being cannot be conceiv'd, but the Being muft at the fame time be conceiv'd 
whereof it is the Mode : We cannot conceive Rotundity, for Instance, but we muft: conceive 
Extenfion, becaufe the Mode of Being or Exiftence, being only the Being it felf in fuch a 
fort of ftate, (the Roundnefs of tbe Wax, for Inftance, being^ but the Wax it felf, in fuch a fort 
or fafhion ) ; it is plain that we cannot conceive the Mode without the Being. If then Ex- 
tenfion were a Mode of Being, we could not conceive Extenfion without the Being, whereof 
Extenfion was the Mode : whereas we eafily conceive Extenfion all alone. Wherefore it is 
not a Mode of Being : but confequently a Being of it felf. And fo it is the Eflence of Matter, 
iince Matter is but a fimple Being, and not compos'd of many Beings : as I have already 
faid. 

But many Philofophers have fo accuftom'd themfelves to general Idea's, and Logical Entities 
as to have their Mind more poflefs'd with them, than thofe that are distinct, particular, and 
Thyfical. Which is evident enough from hence, that their Argumentations upon Natural 
things, are founded merely on Logical Notions j fuch as Ad, Power, and an infinite number 
of Imaginary Entities, which they take no care to diftinguifh, from fuch as are Real. Thefe 
Gentlemen therefore finding it wonderful eafie, to fee after their manner what they have 
a Mind to fee, imagine they have better Eyes than other Men, and that they perceive diftinftly 
Extenfion fuppofes fomething elfe j and that 'tis only a Property of Matter, which Matter 
may be diverted of, as of the reft. 

Yet if you make a Demand of them, that they would pleafe to explain that thing which 
they pretend to perceive in Matter, befides Extenfion - they offer to do it feveral ways, 
every of which makes it apparent, that they have no other Idea of it than that of Being, or of 
Subftance in general. This is extreamly evident, if we take notice, That this their Idea in- 
cludes no particular Attributes, which agree to Matter. For whilst we take Extenfion from 
Matter, we rob it of all the Attributes and Properties, which we diftin&ly conceive do belong 
to it} and though we leave that imaginary thing, which they fuppofe the Eflence of it; it being 
manifest, that neither Earth nor Heaven, nor any thing we fee in Nature, could be made of 
it. Whereas on the contrary, if we take away what they fancy, the Effence of Matter, pro- 
vided we leave Extenfion, and we leave all the Attributes and Properties we dilliudly con- 
ceive, included in the Idea of Matter : For it is certain, that out of Extenfion all alone might 
be fram'd an Heaven, an Earth, and all the Vifible World, and infinite others. So this Some- 
thing which they fuppofe over and above Extenfion, having no Attributes difiinftly to be 
conceiv'd belonging to it, and clearly included in the Idea we have of it, can have nothing 
real in it, if we will credit our Reafon ; nor can be of. any ufe in explaining Natural Effe&s. 
And that which is faid of its being the Subjeft and Principle of Extenfion, is faid gratis^ and 
without any distinct Conception in them that fay it ; that is, they have no other than a Ge- 
neral and Logical Idea of it, as of Subjetl and Principle : In fo much that we may further ima- 
gine anew Subject, and a new Principle of this Subject of Extenfion; and fo in infinitum, the 
Mind having the Power of reprefenting the General Idea's of Subject and Principle, as long 
as it pleafes. 

'Tfs 



Chap. VIII. The Search after Truth. ta7 

'Tis true there is a great probability, that Men had not fo puzzl'd and obfeur'd the Idea that ' 
they have of Matter, had they not fome Reafons for it ; and that there are many who main- 
tain contrary Conclufions to thefe of ours, upon Theological Principles. Doubtlefs Extenfion 
is not the EfTence of Matter, if that be contrary to our Faith : And we willingly acknowledge 
it. We are, thank GOD, very well perfwaded of the Feeblenefs, and Limitednefs of an Hu- 
mane Mind. We know it is of too little Extent to meafure an Infinite Power j that GOti 
can do in finitely more than we can conceive ; that he communicates only thofe Idea's, which 
reprefentto us the things that arrive by the order of Nature, and hides the reft from us. 
Wherefore we are always ready to fubmit our Reafon unto Faith ; but there is need of better 
proofs than are generally urg'd, to ruin the Reafons we have eftablilh'd : Becaufe the man- 
ner of explaining the Myfteries of Faith, are not of Faith, and we believe thefe Myfteries, 
without conceiving how the manner of them can bediftindtly explaind. 

We believe, for inftarice, theMyftery of the T R INITY, though £the Humane Mind is 
unable to conceive it ; and yet we ceafe not to believe, that the things that differ not in any 
third, differ not in themfelves : though this Propofition feems to overthrow it. For we are 
convine'd, that Reafon is not to be madeufeof, except in Subjects proportion^ to its Capa- 
city ; and that we ought not to look fteadfaftly on our Myfteries, for fear of being dazel'd by 
them, according that Admonition of the Holy Spirit, Qui femtator eft Majeftatisopprimettir a 
rrloria. 

However, if we thought it convenient for the fatisfadtion of fome Men's Minds to explain 
how our Notion upon this matter may be reconcifd, with what we are taught by Faith con- 
cerning Tranfubfiantiation ; we probably could do it in a way very diftinft, and perfpicuous 
and could no ways offend again ft the Decifions of the Church : But we think this Explication 
may be difpens'd with, efpecially in this Work. 

For it ought to beobferv'd, That the Holy Fathers have almoft always look'd upon it as an 
incomprehenfible Myftery:, and that they never play'd the Philofophers to explain it : but con- 
tented themfelves for the moft part with unexaft Comparifons, fitter to make known the Do- 
ctrine than to give a Satisfaftory Explication to the Mind: Therefore Tradition is forfuch 
as Philofophize not on this Myftery, and who fumit their Reafon to the Rule of Faith, with- 
out diftra&ing their Brain to no purpofe, about moft abftrufe and difficult Queftions. 

We lhould be to blame, Ihould we require the Philofophers, to give us clear and eafie 
Explications of the manner of our LO R JD's Body being in the Eucharifi ; for this would be 
to demand of them novelties in Divinity. And in cafe the Philofophers mould make an im- 
pudent Anfwer to the Demand, they muft be necelfarily obnoxious either to the having 
their Philofophy or Divinity condemn'd. For if their Explications were obfeure, they would 
give reafon to defpife the Principles of their Philofophy ; if their Anfwer were eafie and appa- 
rent we fhould have reafon to be apprehenfive of Novelty in their Divinity. 

Since then Novelty in point of Divinity, bears thelmprefs and Chara&er of Error, and the 
World has a right and priviledge of defpifing Opinions merely on the Account of their being 
Novel, and having no foundation in Tradition ; we ought not to undertake to give eafie and 
intelligible Explications of thofe things, which the Fathers andCouncels, have not perfectly 
explain'd : and 'tis fufheient to hold the Doftrine of Tranfibftamiation, without offering to 
make out the manner of it. For otherwife we might low the feeds for frefh Difputes, and 
Quarrels, whereof there are too many already ; and the Enemies of the Truth would not fail 
to ufe them to malicious purpofe, and for theoppreffmg of their Ad verfaries. 

Difputes in point of Theological Explications, feem to be the moft ufelefs and moft dange- 
rous of any ; and they are with greater reafon to be fear'd •, for that even Religious Perions 
often fancy they have aright of breaking theirCharity withfuch as break with their Opinions. 
We have but too common Experience of this Practice ; and the caufe of it lies not very deep. 
Wherefore 'tis always the belt and fureft way , not to be eager to fpeak of things whereof we 
have no Evidence, and which others are not difpos'd to conceive. 

Nor ought obfeure and uncertain Explications of Myfteries of Faith, which we are under 
no obligation to believe, to ferve for a Rule and Principle for the guiding our Reafonings 
in Philofophy, where nothing but Evidence ought to perfwade us. We are not to change the 
clear and diftinft Idea's of Extenfion, figure, and Local Motion, for the general and con- 
fus'd Idea's of Principle, or of fubjedt of Extenfion, of Form of Quiddities, and Real Qua- 
lities, and of all thofe Motions of Generation , Corruption, and Alteration, and others 
which differ from Local Motion. Real Idea's will produce real Science : but from general 
and Logical Idea's, can proceed nothing, but a random fuperficial and a barren Science. 
Wherefore we ought with ferious Refieftion to attend to the diftinft and particular Idea's of 
things, for the difcovering the Properties they contain •, and thereby ftudy Nature inftead of 
lofmg our felves in theie Chimera's, which are only the litter or off-fpring of fome Philofo- 
pher's Brains. 

C H A P, 



• v» 



i a 8 F, Malebranche Concerning Book j| j. 



C HA P. IX. 

I. Tta lafl general Caufe of our Errors. II. TW ffc* Tfa'j of things 
are not always prefent to the Mind^ when we would have them. III. 
77wf <?wry finite Mind is fubjeSi to Error ^ and why. IV. That we 
ought not to judge that there Is nothing but Body and Spirit : Nor that 
GOT) is a Spirit , according to our conception of Spirits. 

j. "17C7Ehave hitherto treated of fuch Errors, as may have fome occafional Caufe affigned 

Tbehn VV in the Nature of the pure Intellect, or of the Mind, confider'das acting by itfelf: 

general and in the nature of Idea's j that is to fay, in the manner of the Mind's perceiving exter- 

Caufe of na j objects. There remains only one Caufe now to be explain'd, which may be term'd the 

w Errors. un j ver f a j an ^ general Caufe of our Errors •, becaufe we can conceive no Error, that has not 

fome fort of dependance on it. The Caufe is this: That Nothing having no Idea to re- 

prefent it, the Mind is carried to believe that the things whereof it has no Idea, have no 

Exiftence. 

'Tis certain that the general Source of our Errors, as we have often faid, is our Judg- 
ment's having greater extent and latitude, than our Perceptions. For when we confider any 
Object, we commonly take the profpect but on one fide of it \ but we are not content to judge 
only of that fide we have confider'd, but we pronounce of it all entire : And fo it often for- 
tunes that we are-deceiv'd ; for though the thing be true on the part we have Examin'd, it is 
commonly falfe on the other we have not ; and what we believe true, is no more than pro- 
bable. Now 'tis manifeft that we fhould not judge thus abfolutely on things as we do, did we 
not think we had confider'd all the parts of them, or fuppofe them all like that which we have 
examin'd. So the general Caufe of our Errors lies in this, that having no Idea of the other 
Faces of the Object, or of their difference with that which is prefent to our Thoughts, we 
believe thofe other Faces don't exift j or at leaffc we fuppofe they have no particular dif- 
ference. 

This manner of adding we think reafonable enough : For fince Nothing cannot form any 
Idea in the Mind, we have fome pretence to believe that the things, that form no Idea in the 
Mind, at the time of our Examining them, refemble Nothing : And that which confirms us in 
this Opinion, is our being perfwaded by a fort of Inftind, that the Idea's of things are due 
to our Nature, and are in fuch wife fubje&ed to the Mind, that they are oblig'd to pay their 
attendance, when the Mind commands them. 
II. However, if we would make a little Reflection upon the prefent ftate of our Nature, we 

that the fhould hardly be fo ftrongly bent upon believing all the Idea's of things, fo much at our 
idea's of |, ec k an( j command. Man, as I may fay, is only Flefh and Blood, fince Adam's Tranfgref- 
liotfiways *i° n *• Tne * ea ft impreffion of his Senfes and his Paffions interrupts the ftrongeft Appli- 
frefem to cation of his Mind : and the current of the Spirits and Blood, hurry it along with them, and 
the Mind, drive it continually upon fenfible Objects. In vain it ftrives to withftand the Torrent it is car- 
v,hen we ried by, and rarely it is, that it thinks of refilling it 5 fo pleafant it finds it to follow, and fo 
7km troublefome to ftruggle againft the flream. The Mind therefore is difcourag'd and dejected 
as foon as it has made an attempt to hold, and fix it felf upon a Truth } and 'tis abfolutely 
falfe in the ftate we are in, that the Idea's of things are prefent to the Mind, as often as we 
would confider them : And therefore we ought not to judge that things are not in being, up- 
on the only fcore of our having no Idea's of them. 

But though we fhould fuppofe Man abfolute Mafter of his Mind, and its Idea's, yet he would 
JP?" , ftill be fubjed to Error, by the neceflity of his Nature. For the Mind of Man is limited , and 
riiuMwd ever y limited Mind is by Nature liable to Error. The reafon.w hereof is this, that the leaft 
it fuh)e£t things have Infinite Relations betwixt them, and require an Infinite Mind to comprehend 
to Error, them. And therefore a limited Mind being unable to embrace, and comprehend all thefe Re- 
lations, after all that ever it can do, a Man's inclin'd to believe, that thofe which he does 
not perceive, don't exift :, efpecially when he does not confider the Weaknefsand Limitation 
of his Mind, as 'tis cuftomary for him not to do. And thus the Finitenefs of the Mind alone* 
brings along with it the Capacity of falling into Error. 

Notwithftanding, if Men even in this their ftate of Infirmity and Corruption, made always 
good ufe of their Liberty, they would never bedeceiv'd. And for this reafon, every one, that 
falls into Error, is juftly blameable, and defervedly obnoxious to punifhment : For no more 
is requifite for the avoiding Error, than to judge only of what a Man fees, and not to form 
compleat judgments on things, before he is afTur'd he has examin'd them in all their parts : 
and this is poffible for Men to do. But they had rather fubjugate themfelves to Error, than 
conform to the Rule of Truth •, and love to arbitrate without the trouble of Enquiry .- And 
fo we need not wonder if they are guilty of infinite Errors, and frequently Hand chargeable 
• with uncertain and unwarrantable Judgments. 

All 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. 139 

All the Idea's, for inftance, that Men have of Subftance, are thofe of Spirit and of Body , Iv - 
that is of a thinking, and extended Su bftance : and thereupon they take upon them to deter- ^ ™j ht g 
mine, that whatever exifts, is either of Body or Spirit. This is not faid, as if Iprefum'd to t [,J$ er f 
affirm there were any Subftance, neither Body nor Spirit : it being too hazardous to main- ^ no crea . 
tain thofe things exift whereof we have no Idea \ fince 'tis fuppos'd that GOD, who conceals ted Being 
not his Works from us, would have given us fome Idea of them. Yet I think we ought to de- b f ldes , Bo ° 
terminc nothing concerning the number of the kinds of Beings which GOD has created, fit: nor 
from the Idea's we have of them : Since abfolutely fpeaking, there may be Reafons why GOD that GOD 
mould conceal them from us, if it were only that thefe Beings having no Relation to us, the U a. spirit. 
Knowledge of them would be of little ufe to us : as he has not given us Eyes acute enough to according 
reckon the Teeth of an Hand- worm, fince 'twould be ufelefs to the Prefervation of our Body, l° e I^ on c g f' 
to have fo penetrating an Eye-fight. L • spirits/ 

But though we do not think it fit to judge haftilyand raflily, that all Being is divided into 
Spirit and Body j yet we think it iuconfiftent with Reafbn for Philofbphers, in explaining 
Natural Efrefts, to ufe other Idea's than thofe that depend on Thought and Ext enfwn : thefe in 
Effect, being the only diftinct or particular that we have. 

There is nothing more Unphilofophical and Irrational, than to imagine vaft numbers of 
Beings from fimple Logical Idea's ; to bellow on them infinite properties •, and fo to go about 
explaining things, which no body underftands, by things which not only no body conceives, 
but which indeed are impoffible to be conceived. This is to take the fame courfe that Blind 
Men would do, when intending to difcourfe of Colours, and maintain the Thefes that concern 
them, they fhould make ufe of the Definitions they receive from the Philofophers, and thence 
make their Inferences and Gonclufions. For as thefe blind Men's Arguings and Difputes 
about Colours, muft needs be pleafant and ridiculous enough, fince they could have no di- 
ftinct Idea's of the Subjects in Queftion, and would only argue from general and Logical 
Idea's. So the Philofophers can never reafon juflly andfolidly upon the Effeds of Nature, 
when they only employ general and Logical Idea's, as of Aft, Power, Being, Caufe, Prin- 
ciple, Form, Quality, and others of like Nature, It is abfolutely neceffary for them to 
ground their Difputes and Reafonings only upon thediftinft and particular Idea's of Thought 
and Extenfion, and thofe which arecontain'd in them, as Figure, Motion, &c. For we can 
never expect to arrive to the Knowledge of Nature, but by the Confideration of the diftindt 
Idea's we have of it : and 'tis better not to meditate at all, than to throw our Meditation away 
upon Whim Hes and Chimera's. 

We ought not however to affert that there is nothing but Spirit and Body, Thinking and 
Extended Beings in Nature, fince 'tis impoffible for us to be miftaken. For though thefe are 
fufficient tor the Explication of Nature, and confequently we may conclude without danger 
of erring, That all Natural things, as far as our Knowledge goes, depend upon Extenfion 
and Thought j yet abfolutely fpeaking, its not impoffible but there may be others, whereof we 
have no Idea, nor fee any Effect. 

Men are therefore too rafh and precipitate in judging, as an indifputable Principle, that all 
Subftance is diftinguiftVd into Body and Spirit. But they thence infer a rafh and unadvis'd 
conclufion, when they determine by thefole light of Reafon, that GQD is a Spirit, 'tis true, 
that fince we are created after His Image and Similitude, and we are taught from feveral pla- 
ces of the Holy Scripture,, that GOD is a Spirit^ we ought to believe and call Him fo : But 
Reafon all alone can never teach us fo much. It only tells us that GOD is a Being infinitely 
perfect ; and that he ought rather to be a Spirit than a Body, fince our Soul is more per- 
fect than our Body 5, but it cannot allure us, there are not ftill other Beings more perfect than 
thofe Spirits within us, and rang'd in an higher order above them, than our Minds are above 
our Bodies. 

But fuppofing there were fuch Beings as thefe, (as Reafon makes it unqueftionable that 
GOD was able to create them) 'tis evident they would have a nearer refemblance to their 
Maker than our felves : And fo the fame Reafon informs us, that GOD would rather have 
their Perfections than ours - which would be reckon'd but imperfections in comparifon with 
them. We ought not therefore precipitately to imagine that the word S^wVzV, which we indiffe- 
rently ufe to fignifie what GOD is, and what we are our felves, is an univocal Term, ex- 
preffing the fame things, or very like. G O D is farther exalted above Created Spirits, 
than thefe Spirits are elevated above Bodies ; and we ought not to term GOD a Spirit fo 
much for a pofitive Declaration of what He is, as to fignifie He is not material. He is an 
infinitely perfect Being, no Man can doubt of it : But as we are not to imagine with the An- 
thropomorphitss, that he ought to have an Humane fhape ; becaufe that Figure feems the moft 
perfect, though we fhould fuppofe Him Corporeal , fo we ought not to think that the Spirit 
of G O D has Humane Thoughts, and that his mind is like our own, becaufe we know no- 
thing perfe&er than our own Mind. 'Tis rather to be believ'd, that as he includes in Him- 
felf the Perfections of Matter, without being material : (for 'tis certain that Matter has a 
Relation to fome Perfection that is in God) fo He comprehends the Perfections of created Spi- 
rits, without being a Spirit, after our manner of conceiving Spirits - that his true Name is 
HE THAT IS; that is, being without reftriction, all Being, being Infinite and Univer- 
fal LI CHAP, 



i go F. M a ^e bran Che Concerning Book III. 



CHAP. I 

a 

So/fle Inftahces of Errors in Phyficks, wherein Men are engagd by fup- 
pofing that the things which differ in their Nature^ their Qualities^ Ex- 
tenfion, Vuration^and Proportion^ are alike in thtfe things. 

IT has been fhewn in the Fore-going Chapter, That Men make a rafh Judgment in con- 
cluding all Beings tinder two Heads, either of Body or Spirit ; we will make it appear in 
the fucceeding Chapters, that they not only make rafli Judgments, but falfe too ; and 
which are the fruitful Principles of innumerable Errors, when they judge that Beings are not 
different in their Relations and Modes, becaufe they have no Idea of thefe Differences. 

'Tis certain that the Mind of Man fearches only after the Relations of things : Firfl thofe 
which the Objeds, it confiders, have to it felf, and then thofe which they have with one an- 
other. For Man's Mind is inquifitive only after its Good and Truth. For the finding out 
its Good, it confiders carefully by Reafon, and by Tafte or Senfation, whether the Objects 
have any Relation of Agreement with it felf. For the difcovering Truth, it confiders whe- 
ther the Objeds have any Relation of Equality or Similitude, to each other, or what precifely 
is the Quantity that is equal to their Inequality. For as Good is not the Good of the Mind any 
farther than it is agreeable to it : fo Truth is not Truth, but by the Relation of Equality or 
Refemblance, which is found betwixt two things, or more : whether this Relation be between 
two or more Objeds \ as between an Ell, and a Piece of Cloth : For 'tis true that this is an Etl 
of Cloth, becaufe of the Equality between the Ell and the Cloth : whether it be between two 
or more Idea's, as between the two Idea's of Three and Three, and that of Six : for 'tis true 
that Three and Three are Six, becaufe of the Equality between the two Idea's of Three and 
Three, and the Idea of Six : Or whether laftly, it be between Idea's and Things, when the 
Idea's reprefent what the Things are. For when I fay, There is a Sun, my Propofition is true, 
becaufe the Idea's I have of Exiftence, and of the San, reprefent that the Sun exifts, and that* 1 
it truly exifts. Every Adion of the Mind about, and every Attention to Objeds, is only 
then to try to difcover their Relations, fince we apply our felves to the confideration fllttngs, 
only for the finding out the Truth or Goodnefs of them. 

But as we have faid before in the preceding Chapter, Attention tires and difpirits the MinU ; , 
fo that it fpeedily defifts to oppugn and bear againft the 'Impreffion of the Senfes, that throws 
it off* its Objed, and hurries it towards others, which the love it has to its Body, render 
grateful and agreeable. It has but a ftraitned Capacity, and fo the differences which are be- 
tween the Subjects it examines being infinite, or almoft fo, it is incapable of diftinguifhing 
them. Wherefore the Mind fuppofes imaginary Refemblances, where it obferves no Posi- 
tive and Real Differences ; the Idea's of Refemblance being more prefent to it, more fami- 
liar and more fimple than the other. For 'tis manifeft that Similitude includes only one 
Relation, and there is need only of one Idea, to judge that a thoufand things are like; 
whereas to judge without fear of being miftaken, that a thoufand Objeds differ with one an- 
other, there is an abfolute Neceffity of having a thoufand different Idea's prefent to the 

Mind. 

Men therefore imagine things of a different Nature, to be of the fame, and that all things 

of the fame Species, hardly differ from one another. They judge that unequal things, are 
equal ; that thofe which are inconftant, are conftant ; that fuch as are without Order or Pro- 
portion, are beft order'd, and molt proportionate. In a word, they believe often that things 
different in Nature, in Quality, Extenfion, Duration, and Proportion, are alike in all thefe 
particulars : But this deferves to be explain'd more at large by fome Examples, as being the 
the Caufe of an infinite number of Errors. 

Spirit and Body, a Subftance that Thinks, and a Subftance that's Extended, are two kinds 
of Being altogether different, and intirely oppofite : what belongs to one, can't appertain to 
the other : Yet Men for the raoft part but little heeding the Idea they have of Thought, and 
being continually mov'd and affeded with Bodies, have look'd upon the Soul and Body, as 
only one and the fame thing ; have imagin'd a Similitude between things, fo unlike in every 
refped. They would have the Soul to be material •, that is to fay, extended over all the Body, 
and figur'd as the Body. And thus have attributed to the Mind, what can belong to nothing 
but the Body. 

Again, Men having the Senfation of Pleafure, Pain, Smells, Tafts, &c. and their Body be- 
ing more prefent to them, than their Soul ; (that is, they ealily imagine their Body, but are 
«ot able to imagine the Soul,) they attribute to it the Faculties of Senfation, Imagination, 

and 



Chap. X. The Search after Truth. , j 3 

and fometimes give it that of Conception too :, which can belong to nothing but the Soul., 
But the following Examples will be more fenfible and manifeft. 

Tis certain that all Natural Bodies, even thofe that are rank'd under the fame Species, difrct 
from one another : that one piece of Gold is not altogether like another piece, that one drop 
of Water is different from another drop. 'Tis with all Bodies of the fame Species, as 'tis 
with Faces : All Faces have two Eyes, a Nfofe, a Mouth, &c. they are all Faces, and Hu- 
mane Faces ; yet it may be affirm'd there never were two perfectly fimilar. So one piece of 
Gold has parts extreamly like another piece ^ and one drop of Water has undoubtedly a near 
refemblance to another, yet we may be certify'd that two drops of Water cannot be given 
though taken from the fame River, in an exaa refemblance. Neverthelefs, the Philofophers. 
inconliderately fuppofe Eflential Likeneffes between Bodies of the fame Species, or Likeneffes 
that confift in IndivifibUi : For the Elfences of things center in an indivillble Point, "according 
to their falfe Opinion. 

The Reafon of their lapfing into fo grofs and palpable an Error, is becaufe they will not with 
any care confider thofe very things, on wich thy compofe huge and mighty Volumes. ~ For 
as we don't fancy a perfect Similitude in Faces, becaufe we fcrupuloufly behold them, and 
furvey them clofely ; and the cuftom we have taken of diftinguifhing them, makes us obferve 
the leaft differences .• So if the Philofophers confider'd Nature with attention, they would 
acknowledge fufficient caufes of diverfities, even in thofe things which produce the fame Sen- 
fetions, and which for that Reafon we afcribe to the fame Species ; and would not fo credu- 
loufly fuppofe Eflential Refemblances. Blind Men would be to blame to fuppofe Eflential 
Similitudes confiding in IndivifibUi between Faces, becaufe they did not fenflbly perceive 
the differences : And Philofophers have no more reafon to fuppofe fuch Similitudes in Bo- 
dies of the fame Species, becaufe they difcover no differences in them by the Senfations they 
have of them. 

The Inclination we have for fuppofing a Likenefs in things inclines us farther to believe 
there is a fet and determinate number of Differences, and Forms ; and that thefe Forms are 
fix'd to a Point, and incapable of Latitude, more or left. We think that all Bodies differ from 
each other as in Degrees and that thefe Degrees, alfo retain certain Proportions together. In 
a word, we judge of Material things as of Numbers. 

Tis' clearly manifeft, that this proceeds from the Mind's lofing it felfin the Relations of 
things incommenfurable, as are the infinite Differences to be met with in Natural Bodies, and 
its folacing it felf with the Imagination of any Refemblance or Proportion it can find be- 
tween them ; becaufe then it can reprefent many things at once with much readinefs, and 
eafe. For, as I have already faid, there needs no more than one Idea to judge that many 
things are like, but there muft be many to judge they are unlike each other. If a Man knew, 
for inftance, the number of Angels ; and that for each Angel there were ten Arch- Angels ; 
and for every Arch- Angel ten Thrones -, andfo on, obferving the fame Proportion in the pro- 
greflionupto the higheft Order of Intelligences : the Mind might know when it pleas'd the 
number of all thefe Bleffed Spirits, and even by a good ftrong reflection, determine of them 
almoft at a fingle view^ which is infinitely delightful to it. And this is what may have in- 
duc'd fome Perfons to judge thus of Celeftial Spirits ; as fome Philofophers have done in an- 
other cafe, of the Gravitation and Levitation of the Elements, making a Decuple Propor- 
tion between them, fuppofing Fire ten times lighter than Air ; and fo of the reft. 

When the Mind finds a neceflity of admitting Differences between Bodies, by the diffe- 
rent Senfations it has of them, and for fome other particular Reafons ; itisfureto allow as 
little as poflibly it can. 'Tis upon this account it is eafily perfwaded, that the Eflences of 
things are in IndivifibUi, and that they are like Numbers, as we have faid before ; for that 
then it requires only one Idea to reprefent all the Bodies that go under- the name of the fame 
Species. 

If you put, for example, a Glafs of Water into an Hoglhead of Wine, the Philofophers will 
tell you, the Ellence of Wine ftill remains the fame, and the Water is converted into Wine. 
That as no number can intervene between three and four, fince a true Unity is indivifible, 
fo 'tis neceffary the Water fhould be converted into the Effence or Nature of the Wine, or 
that the Wine fhould lofe its own : That as all Numbers of Four are perfectly alike, fo the 
Effence of Water is exadly the fame in all Waters. That as the Number Three Eflentially 
differs from the Number Two, and cannot have the fame Properties ; fo two Bodies differ- 
ing in Specie, differ Eflentially, and in fuch wife, as they can never have the fame Properties 
which flow from the Effence ; and fuch like things as thefe : Whereas if Men confider'd 
the true Idea's of things any thing attentively, they would not be long a difcovering, that 
all Bodies being extended ; their Nature or EfTence has nothing in't like Numbers, and that 
'tis impoflible for it to confift in IndivifibUi. 

But Men not only fuppofe Identity, Similitude, or Proportion in the Nature, the Number, 
and eflential Differences of Subftances, but in every thing that comes under their Perception. 
Moft Men conclude that all the fix'd Stars, are faftned as fo many Nails in the mighty Vault 
of Heaven, in an equal diftance and convexity from the Earth. The Afironomers have for 
a long time given out, that the Plants rowl in exact Circles 3 whereof they haye invented 

a plenti- 



1 3 i F. M a l e b R a n c h e Concerning Book III. 

a plentiful number, as Concentric, Excmtric, Epicycles, Deferent; and Equant, to explain the 
Phenomena that contradict their Prejudice. 

'Tis true, in the laft Ages, the more Ingenious have corrected the Errors of the Ancients, 
and believe that the Planets defcribe Ellipfes, by their Motion. But if they would have us be- 
lieve that thefe Ellipfes are regular, as we are eafily inclin'd to do ; (becaufe the Mind fuppofes 
Regularity, where it perceives no Irregularity) they fall into an Error fo much harder to be 
corrected, as the Obfervations that can be made upon the Courfe of the Planets, want ExadV 
nefs and Juftnefs, to fhew the Irregularity of their Motions : which Error nothing but Phyfi&h 
can remedy •, as being infinitely lefs obfervable, than that which occurs in the Syfteme of exact 
Circles. 

But theje is one thing of more particular occurrence, relating to the Diftance and Motion 

of the Planets ; which is, that the Afircnomers not being able to difcover an Arithmetical or 

Geometrical Proportion, that being manifeftly repugnant to their Obfervations, fome of them 

have imagin'd they obferv'd a kind of Proportion, which they term Harmcnical, in their Di- 

ftances and Motions. Hence it was that an Aftronomer of this Age, in his New Almagiftus, 

Iticcioli begins a Section intitul'd, De_Syftemate Mundi Barmonico, with thefe words-, There is no Man 

2. Vol. that's never fo little -versed in Aftronomy, but must acknowledge a kind of Hai mony in the motion 

Nemo eft m ^ intervals of the Planets, if he attentively confiders the Order of the Heavens. Not that 

paulo eru- ^ was Q f ^^ Qpj n i on . f or fh e Obfervations that have been made, gave him fu/ficiently to 

jiftrono- underftand the extravagance of that imaginary Harmony, which has yet been the Admira- 

micinqai tion of many Authors Ancient and Modern ; whofe Opinions are related and refuted by Fa- 

Ccelorum ther Riccioli. It is attributed likewife to Pythagoras and his Followers, to have believ'd, That 

ordmem ^q Heavens by their Regular Motions, made a wonderful Melody, which Men could not 

platuTnon near -» ^Y rea *° n of their being us'd to it : As thofe, fays he, that dwell near the Catara&s of 

agnofc'at the Waters of Nile, hear not the noife of them. But I only bring this particular Opi- 

Harmoni- nion of the Harmonical Proportion between the Diftances and Motions of the Planets, to 

am quan- f new that the Mind is fond of Proportions, and that it often imagines them where they are 

dam in . 

Planeta- **^* 

mm inter- The Mind alfo fuppofes Uniformity in the Duration of things, and imagines they are not 

vallis & liable to Change, and Inftability ; when it is not as.it were forc'd by the Teftimonies and re- 
motibus. p or t of Sence, to judge otherwise. 

All Material things being extended, are capable of Divifion, and confequently of Corru- 
ption. And every one that makes never fo little reflection on the Natui'e of Bodies, muft fen- 
fibly perceive their Corruptibility. And yet there have been a multitude of Philofophers who 
believ'd the Heavens, though Material, were Incorruptible. 

The Heavens are too remote from our Eyes, to difcover the Changes which happen in 
them ; and there feldom any great enough fall out, to be feen upon Earth ; which has been 
fufficient warrant to a great many Perfons to believe they were really incorruptible. What 
has been a farther confirmation of their Opinion, is their attributing to the Contrariety of 
Qualities, the Corruption incident to Sublunary Bodies. For having never been in the Hea- 
vens, to fee how things were carried on there, they have had no Experience of that contra- . 
riety of Qualities -being to be found therein, which has induc'd them to believe there were 
actually nojfuch thing. And hence have concluded the Heavens were exempt from Corruption, 
upon this Reafon, That what according to their Notion, corrupts Sublunary Bodies, is not to 
be found in the higher Regions of the World. 

'Tis plain that this Arguing has nothing of folidity : for we fee no Reafon why there may 
not be found fome other Caufe of Corruption, befides that contrariety of Qualities which they 
imagine: nor upon what grounds they can affirm, There is neither Heat nor Cold, neither 
Drought nor Moifture in the Heavens, that the Sun is not hot, nor Saturn cold. 

There is fome probability of Reafon to fay, That very hard Stones, and Glafs, arid other 
Bodies of like Nature, are not corrupted, fince we fee they fubfift a long time, in the fame 
Capacity •, and we are near enough to obferve the Changes that fhould happen to them. But 
while we are at fuch a Diftance from the Heavens, as we are, it's abfolutely againft all Reafon 
to conclude they don't corrupt, becaufe we perceive no contrary Qualities in them, nor can 
fee them corrupting ; and yet they don't only fay, they don't corrupt, but that they are un- 
changeable and incorruptible : And, a little more, the Peripatetich would maintain, That Ce- 
leftial Bodies were fo many Divinities, as their Mafter Arifhtle did believe them. 

The Beauty of the Univerfe confifts not in the Incorruptibility of its parts, but in the Va- 
riety that is found in them ; and this great Work of the World, would have fomething 
wanting to its Admirable Perfection, without that Vieifiitude of things that is obferv'd in k. 
A Matter infinitely extended, without Motion, and confequently rude and without Form, and 
without Corruption, might perhaps manifeft the infinite Power of its Author, but could give 
no Idea of his Wifdom. And for this reafon all Corporeal things are corruptible ; "and there is 
no Body whatever, whereunto there happens not fome Change, which alters and corrupts it 
$0Wiudofi n p roce f s f Time. GOD forms even in the Bowels of Stones and Glafs, Creatures more 
'/ Au g™~ perfect and admirable, than all the Works of Men. Thefe Bodies though cxtreamly hard and 
1666. * ' dry, fail not however to corrupt in Time : The Air and the Sun, which they are exjws'd to, 

change 



Chap. Xt The Search after Truth. j*j 

change fome of their parts « and there are found Worms to feed on them, as gxperient* 
nrJm lefts. . *- A i'wicutc 

There is no other difference between very hard and' very dry Bodies, and others than 
that the former are compos d of very Grofiand Solid parts, and confequently Ids capable of 
being agitated, and fcparated from each other, by the motion of thofe that beat againft them • • 
which makes us look upon them as incorruptible. Notwithstanding they are not fo in their 
Nature, as Time, Experience, and Real'on fufficiently evince. 

Botas to the Heavens they are conflicted of a more fluid and fubtile matter: and efoe- 
cially fhe&w, which is fo far from wanting Keat, and being incorruptible, as €av Ari&otU's 
Dilciples, that on the contrary, it is the hotteft of all Bodies, and molt fubieft to change 
'Tis he that warms, that agitates, and changes all things. For 'tis he that produces by his 
Aftion, which is no other than his Heat or the motion of his Parts, all that appears new in 
the changes of the SeafonS : Reafon demonftrates thefe things : But though Reafon maybe 
withftood, yet Experience cannot. For, fince we havedifcover'd in the Saw, by the help of a 
Telefcope, or large Glaffes, ftains or leurf as big as all the Earth, which - have been form'd 
upon him, anddiffipated in amort time : It can no longer be doubted, but he is more fubjedl: 
to change,, than the Earth which we inhabit. 

All Bodies then are under a perpetual flux, and continual change ; and efpecially thofe that 
are moft fluid, as Fire, Air, and -Water ; next the parts of living Bodies, asFlefh and alfo 
Bones, and laftly the moft hard: and the Mind is not to fuppofe a kind of Immutability in 
things, becanfe it fees not Corruption or Change in them : For 'tis no Argument that a thing 
continues always like it felf, becaufe we can difcover no difference in it : nor that things do not 
exift, becaufe we have no Knowledge or Idea of them. 




CHAP. XL 

Inflames of feme Errors of Morality, which depend on the fame Vrin- 
ciple. 

""! H I S Eafinefs and Propenfity of the Mind, to imagine and fuppofe Likenefs, where- 
ever it does riot vifibly perceive Difference, engages the generality of Men in moft 
dangerous Errors in point ot Morality. Some inftances whereof are thefe. 

A French Man falls in Company of an Englijh Man, or an Italian : This Stranger has par- 
ticular Humours of his own } he has a Finenefs and Delicacy of Wit ; or if you had rather, is 
arrogant and troublefom. This fhall forthwith incline the French Man to judge that all Englijh 
Men or Italians have the fame Character of Mind, as the Man that he has met with; and 
make him praife them, ordifcommend them all in general: And if he meets with another, 
he is immediately prepoffefTed with a Notion of his being like the former, and he gives 
way to fome Affection, or fecret Averfion on his Account. In a word, he will judge 
of all the particulars of thefe Nations, from the notable proof he has taken from one or 
two, that had fuch certain Qualities of Mind •, becaufe having no Information elfewhere 
of their Difference he fuppofes them all alike. 

A Regular of fome Order, falls into fome enormity, and this is fufficient with the genera- 
lity of thofe that know him, to condemn indifferently all the Members of the fame Society. 
They all wear the fame Habit, and bear the fame Name : they are alike in this, and there 
needs no more grounds for Vulgar-rate-men, to imagine they are fo in every thing, The 
Reafon why they fuppofe them alike, is becaufe they cannot pierce into the bottom of their 
Hearts, and fee wherein they pofitively differ. 

Slanderers who ftudy for means of Waiting the Reputation of their Enemies, commonly 
make ufe of this ; and Experience verifies that it generally fucceeds. And indeeed it is moft 
fuited and proportioned to the Vulgar Itandard and capacity. For 'tis not fufficient to find 
in numerous Communities, as holy as they are, fomePerfons diforderly in Manners, or un- 
orthodox in Opinion : fince in the Company of the Apoftles, whereof J ESVS CHR IS T 
Himfelf was the Head, there was found a Robber, a Traitor, an Hypocrite •, and in a word, 
a Judas. 

The Jews doubtlefs had been much to blame, had they pafs'd hard and difadvantagious 
Cenfures upon the moft Holy Society that ever was, becaufe of the Avarice and Corruption 
of Judas; and had they condemn'd them all in their Heart, becaufe they fuffer'd fo wicked 
a wretch in their Company : , and ourlO^D let him go unpunifhed, though he knew his 
Crimes. • 

'Tis then a manifeft repugnance to Reafon, and breach of Chanty, to fuppofe a whole 
Community in an Error, from fome private Perfon's being engag'd in it •, even though the 
Heads conniv'd at it, or perhaps were Partifans and Abbetters. 'Tis true, when all the Par- 

Mm ticulars 



134. F.Malebranche Concerning Book til. 

ticulars will uphold an Error, orjuftifie the Fault of their Brother, the whole Fraternity 
is to be concluded culpable : but it may be faid, that this but rarely happens. Foritfeems 
Morally impofiibie for all the Particulars of an Order to have Thoughts and Sentiments 
alike. 

Men fhould never in this manner conclude a General, from a Particular : but they cannot 
judge finiply of what they fee, but run to an.extreamon one fide or other. A Regular of 
futh an Order, is a Great Man, or a good Man ^ from hence they infer that the whole Or- 
der is full of Great or Good Men. So a Regular of an Order is unfound, and Heterodox, 
therefore the whole Order is Corrupt and Heterodox. But thefelaft Judgments are much 
more dangerous than the former :, becaufe we fhould always judge charitably of our Neigh- 
bour, and the malice and ill-nature of Men, make hard Cenfures and Difcourfes, meant for 
the Dif-repute of others, more pleafant and welcome, and imprint them deeper on the 
Mind, than fuch Judgments and Difcourfes, as are made to their Advantage. 

When a Man of the World, who is addicted to his Pafllons, flicks refolutely to his Opi- 
nion, and pretends whilft his Paflion is high, that he has Reafon to follow it, heisdefer- 
vedly concluded Stubborn, and Opinionated ; and he will acknowledge it himfelf, when 
his Paflion is over. So when a Man of Piety, who is penetrated with what he fays, who is 
convinced of the Truth of Religion, and of the Vanity of Worldly things, goes 
upon the ftrength of his Lights and Knowledge, to withftand the Corruptions and Difor- 
ders of others, and reprimands them with fome Fervency and Zeal: Worldly Men judge 
him alfo to be an Qfitoiaftre ; and fo conclude all Devoutnefs, Wilfulnefs and Bigottry. Nay 
they think the Vertuous and Good, more Opinionated, than the Vicious and Wicked : 
Becaufe thefe latter urging their Corrupt Opinions, as they are buoy'd up by the different 
commotions of their Blood and Paffions ; ftaynotlongin the fame Sentiments, but defert 
them : Whereas the Religious remain conftant, and immovable in theirs, as being built 
upon fixed and unfhaken Foundations, which depend not on any thing fo wavering, as the 
Circulation of the Blood. 

See now the reafon why the common fort of People judge the Pious and Vertuous, as Opi- 
nionated as the Vicious ; Which is, That Good Men are as Paflionate for Truth and Vertue, 
as Wicked Men for Vice and Falfhood. Both one and the other talk much after the fame 
Manner, in defending their Opinions : In this they are alike, though they differ in the 
Main. 

But this is enough for the World, that is unable to diftinguifh their Reafons, and acknow- 
ledge the Difference, to judge them Alike in every thing j becaufe they are Alike in that 
external way, whereof every body is a competent Judge. 

The Godly then are not Obftinate and Opinionated, they are only Conftant as they ought 
to be. But the Vicious and Licentious, are ever Opinionated, though they continue but 
an Hour in their Opinion, For thofe are the Opinionated only, who defend a Falfe Opi- 
nion, though they defend it but a little time. 

The cafe is much the fame with fome Philofophers, who maintain Chimerical Opinions \ 
which they afterwards rejedf. They would have others who defend certain Truths, the 
certainty whereof they plainly 'fee, to quit them as Naked Opinions, as themfelves have 
done thofe they were impertinently conceited with. And becaufe 'tis not eafie to pay De- 
ference to them to the prejudice of Truth \ and the Love a Man naturally has for her, 
makes him heartily efpoufe her, they judge this Man an Opi niafire. 

Thofe Perfons would be to blame, obftinately to defend their Chimera's ; but the others 
are to be commended for maintaining Truth with Strength and Refolution of Mind : 
The Manner of them both is the fame, but the Sentiments are different: And 'tis this 
Difference of Sentiments, which makes the one Conftant, and the other Obftinate, and Opi- 
niated. 



The Conclufion of the Three Firfi Books. 

FROM the Beginning of this Treatife, I have diftinguifh'd, as it were, two Parts in 
the Simple and Indivifible Effence of the Soul, one whereof was purely Pajfive ; the 
other both ABive and Pafjive together. The Firft is the Mind or Vtiderftanding ; the 
Second is the Will : I have attributed to the Mind three Faculties ; becaufe it receives its 
Modifications and its Idea's from the Author of Nature three feveral ways. I have called. 
ItSenfe, when it receives from GOD Idea's confounded with Senfations , that is, Sen- 
fible Idea's, upon occafion of fome Motions happening in the Organs of the Senfes, by the 
Prefence of Objefts. Inam'd it Imagination and Memory, when it received from. G D 
Idea's confounded with Images ; which make a fort of languid and feeble Senfations, which 

the 



Chap. XL The Search after Truth. , 135 

the Mind receives only from forae Traces, produe'd or excited in the Brain, by the Courfe 
of the Animal Spirits. Laftly, I call'd it Pure Mind, or Pure Intelletl, when it receives from 
GOD the All-pure Idea's of Truth, without any mixture of Senfations and Imager-, not by 
the Union it hath with the Body, but with that it has with the WORD, or WIS D M of 
GOD: not becaufe it exifts in the Material and Senfible World, but becaufe it fubfifts in the 
Immaterial aad Intelligible World : not for the knowing Mutable things, that are fit for the 
Prefervation of Corporeal Life ; but for piercing into Immutable Truths, which conferve in us 
the Life of the Spirit. _ 

I have (hewn in the Firft and Second Book, That our Senfes and Imagination are very ufeful 
to the knowing the Relations External Bodies have to our own ; that all the Idea's the Mind 
receives by means of the Body, are for the Intereft of the Body : that 'tis impoffible to difco- 
ver any Truth whatever, with Evidence, by the Idea's of the Senfes and Imagination ; that 
thefe confus'd Idea's are of ufe only in uniting us to our Body, and by our Body^ to all fenfible 
things : and that laftly, if we defir'd to avoid Error, we fhould not credit their Reports : I 
concluded likewife, That it was Morally impoffible to know by the pure Idea's of the Mind, 
the Relations which Bodies have with our own : that we ought not to reafon upon thefe Idea's, 
to know whether an Apple, or a Stone, are good to eat; but the way to know, is to try by 
Tafting : And that though we may employ our Intellect, for obtaining a confus'd Knowledge 
of the Relations foreign Bodies have with ours ; 'tis always the fureft way to make ufe of our 
Senfes. I give one Inftance more, fince fo neceflary and eflential things cannot be too deeply 
imprinted on the Mind. 

I have a Mind to examine, for Example, Whether 'tis more advantagious to be Juft or Rich. 
If I open the Eyes of my Body, Juftice looks like a Cbimara, I fee no Allurements that it has. 
The Juft I fee mifcrable, deferted, perfecuted, naked of Defence, and deftitute of Comfort: 
For He that is their Comforter and Supporter, is not apparent to my Eyes : In a word, I fee 
not what ufe Juftice and Vertue can be put to. But if I contemplate Riches with my Eyes 
open, I prefently fee the Luftre and Splendor of them, and am dazl'd. Power, Greatnefs, 
Pleafure, and all fenfible Goods, are the Retinue and Attendants of Wealth ; and I have 
no room to doubt but a Man muft be Rich, if he will be happy. Again, If I employ my Ears; 
I hear how all Men have Riches in Efteem ; and that their Talk is only about ways of ac- 
quiring them ; and that they are conftantly giving Praifes, Incenfe, and Honour to thofe that 
pofTefs them. This Senfe then, and all the reft inform me, that I muft be Rich, before I can 
be Happy. But let me fhut my Eyes, and ftop my Ears, and only interrogate my Imagina- 
tion, and it will conftantly represent what my Eyes had feen, what they had read, and what 
my Ears had heard, to the Advantage and Commendation of Riches ; but it will reprefent 
them in a quite other iranner,than my Senfes : For the Imagination always augments the Idea's 
of thofe things which are related to the Body, and are the Objefts of our Love. If I refign 
my felf to its Condnft, it will prefently lead me into an Inchanted Palace, much what the fame 
with thofe celebrated by Poets and Romancers, in magnificent Defcriptions ; and here I fhall 
be ravifh'd in gazing oft thofe Beauties, that need not be defcrib'd, which will convince me, 
that the God of Riches that inhabits it, is the only capable of making me Happy. .Lo here, 
what my Body is able to perfwade me, for it fpeaks only on its own behalf; and 'tis neceflary 
to its welfare, that the Imagination bow beneath the Grandem-, and proftrate it felf before 
the Luftre of Riches. 

But if I coniider, that the Body is infinitely inferiour to the Mind ; that it is not its Mafter, 
nor can inftruft it in Truth, nor any ways illuminate it ; and if upon this Scene and Profpecf 
I re-enter into, or enquire of my felf, or rather (fince I am neither my own Mafter, nor my 
own Light) if I approach unto GOD, and in the calm and filence of my Senfes and Paffions, 
make this Demand, Whether Riches ox Vertue is preferable ? I fhall hear a clear and difrinft An- 
fwer, concerning what is to be done; an Eternal Anfwer, that has been always given, and 
which is, and always will be : an Anfwer that's not neceflary to be explain'd, fince every body 
know it; fuch as read this, andfuch as do not read it ; which is neither Greek, nor Latin, nor 
French, nor German, but which all Nations under Heaven underftand : An Anfwer laftly, that 
confolates the Juft in their Poverty, and defolates Sinners in the abundance of their Riches. I 
fhall hear this Anfwer, and remain convine'd ; and then fhall laugh at the Vifions of my Ima- 
gination, and the Delufons of my Senfes. The Internal Man that is in me, fhall ridicule the Ani-. 
mal and Terreftrial Man, that I carry about me. In fine, the New Man fhall thrive, and the 
Old Man fhall be deftroy'd ; provided in the mean time I continually obey the Voice of Him, 
who delivers Himfelf fo clearly, in the moft fecret recefs of my Reafon; and who becoming 
fenfible to accommodate Himfelf to my Weaknefs and Difeafe, and to give me Life by that 
which gave me Death, fpeaks to me anew, in a moft ftrong and lively, and familiar way by 
my Senfes ; I mean by the preaching of His Gofpd: But if I interrogate Him in all Metaphy- 
fcal, Natural, and purely Philofophical Queftions, as well as thofe which refpeft the Rule of 
Manners, I fhall always have a faithful Mafter, who will never deceive me. I fhall not only 
be a Chnfiian, but a Philofopher ; I fhall be*a found Thinker, and a Lover of what is Good : In 
a word, I fhall follow the Road that leads me to all Perfection I am capable of, either by Na- 
ture or by Grace. 

1 We 



156 F. Malebranchb Concerning Book III. 

We ought then to conclude from all that has been faid, that to make the belt ufe poffible 
of the Faculties of our Soul, of our Senfes, Imagination, and Vnderftanding ; we muft ap- 
ply them only to thofe things, for which they were given us. We ought carefully to di- 
ftinguifh our Senfations and Imaginations ,from our Pure Idea's; and judge by the former of the 
Relations our Body has with thole about us ; but never make ufe of them in difcovering 
Truths, which they always confound. Whereas Pure Idea's muft be us'd in the finding 
out of Truths, but omitted, when we judge of the Correfpondencies between Exteri- 
our Bodies, and our own : becaufe their Idea's have never reach and extent enough, to give 
a thorough Reprefentation of them. 

'Tis impoffible for Men to have fuificient Knowledge of all the Figures and Motions of 
the little parts of their Body and Blood:, and of thole of a particular Fruit ; at a certain 
See the Seafon of their Sicknefs,. to know whether there is a Relation of Agreement between that 
Illuftrati- Fruit and their Body •, and that if they eat of it they lhall recover : Thus our Senfes alone 
ons. are more ufeful for the Converfation of our Body, than the Rules of Experimental Medi- 
cine } and Experimental Medicine, than Theoretical. But Theoretical Medicine, that deferrs 
much to Experience, and more to the Senfes, is the bell of all. Becaufe all thefe mould 
be caball'd together. 

Reafon then is of univerfal ufe ; and this is the Privilege it obtains over the Senfes and 
Imagination, which are limited and confin'd to Senfible things : yet this is to be regularly em- 
ploy'dj for though it be the principal part of Our felves, it often happens to deceive us, 
by our letting it aft too much \ becaufe it cannot adf enough without tiring \ I mean it 
cannot know enough to make a right Judgment, and yet it will ftill be judging. ~ 



F. MALE- 



«3? 



F. MALEBRANCHEs 

TREATISE 

Concerning the 

SEARCH after TRUTH 



BOOK IV. 

Concerning the Inclinations, or Natural Motions of 

the Mind. 



CHAP. I. 

I. Inclinations are as neceffary to Spirits, as Motions to Bodies. II. GOD 
gives no Motion to Spirits , but what tends towards Himfelf. III. The 
Tendency Spirits have to particular Goods^ proceeds but from their Mo- 
tion towards Good in general. IV. The Original of our chiefeji Natural 
Inclinations : Which will makg up the Divifwn of this Fourth Book. 

THERE had been no occafion of Treating on the Natural Inclinations, which are to be 
the SubjeQ: of this Fourth Book, nor on the Paffions, which I am to ipeak to in the 
Fifth, to difcover the Caufes of our Errours, did not the Underftanding depend on the 
Will, in the Perception of Objects. But becaufe the Underftanding receives its Di- 
rection from the Will, and is determin'd and fix'd by it, rather to lome Objects than others : in 
order to penetrate into the Caufes of the Errours whereunto we are fubjecf, it will be abfolutely 
neceflary to be well acquainted with the Nature of our Inclinations. 

Had God in the Creation of the World, produc'd a Matter infinitely Extended, without im- r. , 
printing on it any Motion, there had been no diverfity in Bodies. The whole Vifible, World at Inclinations 
this day, would have been nothing but an unweildy Mafs of Matter, or Extenfion, which might art L as m ' 
perhaps have ferv'd to (new the Greatnefs and Power of its Author ; but wanting that Succeflion 'M^f* & 
of Forms, and Variety of Bodies, wherein the^Beauty of the Univerfe confifts, would have little Motions to 
to invite Spiritual Beings to admire, and adore the Infinite Wifdom of its Governour. Bodies. 

Now the Inclinations of Spirits feem to be in the Spiritual World, what the Motions of Bo- 
dies are in the Material : and that if Spirits had no Inclinations or Volitions, that Variety would 
be wanting to the Order of Spiritual things, which not only excites to the Admiration of the 
profound Wifdom of God, (as does the diverfity obferv'd in Material things,) but alfo of his 
Mercy, Juftice, and Goodnefs, and all his other Attributes in general. The difference then of In- 
clinations, has an EfFett in Spirits much like that which the diverfity of Motions produces iri 
Bodies : and the Inclinations of Spirits, together with the Motions of Bodies, make up all the 
Beauty of Created Beings. So that 'tis requifite for the former to have leverai Inclinations, as 
for the latter to have different Motions. But' let us try to difcovet what Inclinations thefe 
ought to be. 

Were not our Nature corrupted, we mould not need to feek by Reafon, as we are now to do, 
what fhould be the Natural Inclinations of Created Spirits. We need but have defcended into 
our own Breaft, to have difcovefd, by an inward Feeling, or Self-confcioufnefs of what pafTes with- 
in us, all the Inclinations we ©ught Naturally to have. But fince we are taught by Faith, that 
Sin has inverted the Order of Nature, and even by Reafon, that our Inclinations are diforder'd, 
as we mall fee better in the fequel, we are oblig'd to another courfe. For our Senfations being 

N n not 



1 28 KMalebranche Concerning 

not to be credited, we are forc'd to explain things in an higher and more traiifcendent man- 
ner ; but fueh as will doubtlefs feem Chimerical to thofe who take the Eftimate of all things 
from the Senfes. 1 

ir. 'Tis an undeniable Truth, That God can have no other Principal End of his Atfions, than Him- 

God ha- y e /j~ : an d tnat ne ma y fore man y s inordinate Ends, tending all to the Prefervation of the Beings 
th?rPrinci- he h3iS cre ated. He can have no Principal End befides Himfelf ^ becaufe, being not liable to 
pal End of Errour, he cannot place his ultimate End in Beings that include not all forts of Perfe&ion. 
bnAtlions, But he may have a lefs Principal, namely, the Prefervation of Created Beings ; becaufe all par- 
thanhim- taking of His Goodnefs, are necelTarily Good, or t in the Style of Scripture Valde Bona. And 
noMtionto therefore God loves them ; and 'tis His Love that preferves them : for their Subfift ence is wholly 
Spirits, but owing to the Love of God. Diligis omnia quazfunt, fays the Wife Man, & nihil odifti e or urn qu<e 
what tends fecifti : nee enim odiens aliquid conftituijii & fecifti. ^iio?nodo autem poffet aliquid permanere, nifi 
towards j^ vo /uiffes, au t quod a te vocatmn non ejfet confervaretur ? And indeed 'tis unconceivable, that 
himfelf. things mould fubfift, which are not pleafing to an infinitely Perfett and Omnipotent Being -, fince 
all things, have their Subfiftence only from His Will. God therefore Wills His Glory, as the Prin- 
cipal End ; and the Prefervation of His Creatures, only for His Glory. 

Natural Inclinations of Spirits, being undoubtedly the conftant Impreffions of the Will of Him, 
' who has Created and Preferves them, muft, we may conclude, be entirely like thofe of their 
Creatour and Preferver. Wherefore they naturally can have no other Principal End, than His 
Glory ; nor any other Second End, than their own, and others Prefervation : but this ftill with 
reference to him who gives them their Being. For in brief, it feeming undeniable that God 
cannot Will that the Wills He has Created fhould love a Lefs Good, more than a Greater 5 
that is, fhould love what is lefs amiable, more than what is more fo ; it is impoffible for Him 
to Create any Creature, without Direcling it towards Himfelf, and commanding it to love Him 
more than all things elfe -, though He may create it Free, and with a Power of difengaging it fclf, 
and diverting from Him. 
HL As there is but One Love properly in God, that is, the Love of Himfelf; and as He can love 
the ten- nothing but by that Love, fince He can love nothing but with reference to Himfelf. So He im- 
^tuhct't P r i nts ^ ut one L° ve ln us , which is the Love of Good in general : and we can love nothing but 
Partkutar through that Love, fince we can love nothing but what's a Real or Apparent Good. This Love 
Goods, pro- of Good in general is the Principle of all our particular Affe&ions, fince this Love is really no- 
ceedsfrom thing but our Will : The Will of Man, as I have faid before, being only the Continual Im- 
their Mo- p re jfi on f fa Author of Nature, which carries the Mind towards Good in general. Surely we 
wards Good ouglit not to imagine that this Power of Loving either proceeds from, or depends on our felves ; 
in general, on whom only depends the Power of Loving wrong, or rather of Rightly Loving Evil things : 
becaufe being Free, we can determine, and do actually determine to particular, and confequently 
falfe Goods, the Good Love wherewith God continually influences our Souls, as long as He pre- 
ferves them. 

But not only our Will, or our Love for Good in general, comes from God-, our Inclinations 

likewife for particular Goods, which are common to, though unequally ftrong in all Men, ( fuch 

as the Inclination for the Prefervation of our Being, and that of others, to whom Nature has 

united us ) are the Impreffions of the Will of God upon us : For I term indifferently natural 

Inclination all the Impreffions of the Author of Nature, that are common to all Created Spirits. 

Iv I have been faying, that God loves his Creatures, and that 'tis this His Love that both gives 

the ori- and. preferves their Being : and whereas he continually imprints on us a Love like His own, ( fince 

g'mai of the His Will both makes, and governs ours, ) He gives us all thofe Natural Inclinations, which de- 

chiefeii va- p enc i n ot on our Choice, and which neceffarily difpofe us to the preferving our own, and our 

SI':"" Neighbour's Being. 

which will make up the Divifton of thit Fourth Book. 

For though Sin has corrupted all things, it has not utterly deftroy'd them. Though our Na- 
tural Inclinations have not always God for their End, by the free Choice of our Will ; yet they 
always have by the Inftitution of Nature : fince God who both produces and preferves thefe In- 
clinations in us, does it only for Himfelf. For all Sinners tend to God, by the Impreffion they 
receive of Him ; though they recede from Him by the Errour and deviation of tlieii Mind. They 
love well, it being impoffible to love ill, whilft God is the Author of Love : but they love Evil 
things ; Evil, only becaufe God, who gives Sinners the Power of Loving, forbids their loving 
them, by reafon of their withdrawing Men, ever fince the Fall, from the Love of Himfelf. For 
whillt they imagine that the Creatures are the Caufe of the Pleafure and Pain they feel, or re- 
ceive Occafwnally from them, they run fiirioufly to the embracing thefe Bodies, and fo fall into 
an utter Oblivion of God, who is not Vifible to their Fyes. 

We have ftill then the fame Natural Inclinations, or Impreffions of the Author of Nature, as 
Adam had before his fall. We have even the fame Inclinations as the Ble/fed have in Heaven : 
tor God neither makes, nor preferves any Creatures, but He poffeffes therri with a Love like His 
own. He loves Himfelf, and us, and all His Creatures : and therefore Creates no Spirits, but 
withall inclines them to love God, Themfelves, and all the Creatures. 

But as all our Inclinations are only the Impreffions of Nature's Author, which carry us to love 
Him, and all things for His fake, they can never be regular, but when we love God with ail our 
Strength, and all things for the lake of God, by a Free and Premeditate Choice of our Will : 

For 



The Search after Truth. %zA 

For 'tis Imufice and Abufmg the Love of God, which he gives us for tiimfelf, to lay it out on 
any thing oefides, or without Relation to him. .. ., . . ; .. . . . 

And thus we now know not only what are our Natural Inclinations, but alio what they ought 
to be, to become regular, and as they were inftituted by their Author. For all the Diforders of 
our Inclinations, have no other Root than this, that we fix our Ultimate End in Our felves, and 
inftead of referring all to God, center all things upon Self, 

Firft then, we have an Inclination for Good in general, which is the Principle of all our Na- 
tural Inclinations, all our Paflions, and all the Free Affections of our Will. 

Secondly, we have an Inclination for the Prefervation of our own Being, or Welfare. 

Thirdly, we have an Inclination for other Creatures -, which are either ufeful to our felves, or 
thofe we love. We have yet many other particular Inclinations which depend on thefe, which 
probably we may treat of elfewhere. In this Fourth Book my only Defign is to reduce' the Er- 
rours of our Inclinations to three Heads, to. the Inclination we have for Good in general, to Love of 
of Our felves, and of our Neighbour. 



CHAP. II. 

I. The Inclination for Good in general^ is the Principle of the Rejilefnefs of 
of the Will. II. And confequently of our Inadvertency and Ignorance. 
III. The firfl Inflame^ (fhewing that) Morals are but little known by 
the generality of Men. IV. The fecond Injlance, (fhewing that) the Im- 
mortality of the Soul is controverted by fome People. V. That we are in 
extreme Ignorance^ in point of JbJlraSl things , and which have but little 
reference to us. 

THAT vaft Capacity which the Will has for all Goods in general, by reafon of its being made £ 
for a Good that comprehends in it all Goods, can't be fill'd by all the things the Mind re- f he . InJ 
prefents to it •, and yet the continual Motion which God impreffes it withall, is never ftopt -, which C qZ1T^ T 
neceffarily gives a perpetual Disturbance and agitation to the Mind. The Will which feeks after matjlfthe 
what it delires, obliges the Underftanding to reprefent all forts of Objects : which when repre- Principle of 
fented by the Underftanding, the Soul cannot tafte-, or if fhe tafles, fhe remains unfatisfied. theR f le h 
She cannot tafte them, becaufe the View of the Mind is leldom accompanied with Pleafure, which ffli * the - 
is the Seafoning, whereby the Soul relijhes her Good ; and (he is not fatisfied, becaufe nothing can ~ * 
flop the Motion of the Soul, except the Author of the Impreflion : Whatever the Mind reprefents, 
as the Good of the Soul, is finite ; and whatever is finite, may detain her Love for a moment, 
but cannot fix it. When new and extraordinary Objects come under the confideration of the Mind, 
or fuch as have a Character of Infinite, the Will gladly bears with an attentive Difcufiion for fome 
time, as hoping to find what fhe is in Search of-, becaufe that which appears Infinite, bears the 
Signature of its real Good ? but after a while, is difgufted with this, as with the reft, and leaves 
it. Hence it is ever reftlels and fluctuating, becaufe it is fated to feek what it never can find, 
though always in hopes of: And it loves whatever is Great, Extraordinary, and Infinite -, becaufe 
having mifs'd of its true Good, in common and familiar things, it fancies it may be found in fach 
as are unknown. We fhall fhew in this Chapter, that the Reftlefsnefs of our Will is one of the 
Principal Caufes of our Ignorance, and the Errours we are guilty of, upon infinite fubje£ts, and in 
the two following, mall explain what it is that breeds that our Inclination for all that's Great, and 
Extraordinary. 

Firft, It is plain enough from what has been faid, That the Will is only folicitous to apply the n; 
Understanding to thole Objects which are related to us, and is very negligent as to the reft : For And con* 
that being by a Natural Impreffion, ever longing and Impatient after Happinefs, it turns the ~Un-f e i ueMl y°f 
derftandmg only upon thofe things, which afford us Pleafure and Advantage. wrtenct 

Secondly, That the Will permits not the Underftanding to bufie it feiflong, even about things andigna^ 
that afford fome Pleafure ; becaufe, as has been faid, all Created things may pleafe us for a feafon, ranee, 
but they quickly grow diftaftful, and then our Mind declines them, and takes new ways to other 
Delights, and Satisfactions. 

Thirdly, That the Willis prompted to put the Underftanding on thefe defultory advances from Ob- 
ject: to Object:, from that confus'd, and as it were, diftant Reprefentationthe Underftanding gives 
of Him ; who includes in Himfelf all Beings ? as has been faid in the Third Book. For the Will 
defiring, as I may fofpeak, to bring its real goodclofer, foas to be affected by it, andto receive its 
quickning Motion ; excites the Underftanding, to reprefent it by peice-meal : But then this is no lon- 
ger the General, the Univerfal, and infinitely Perfect Being, Which the Mind perceives ; but fome- 
thing of a limited and imperfect: Nature, which the Will fpeedily abandons, as finding it unable to 
flops Its Motion, and pleafe It any considerable time, and fo purfues after another Object. 

Mean while, the Advertency and Application of the Mind, being abfblutely neceflary to the difco- 
very of Truths ever fo little abftrufe, it is manifeft that the Vulgar of Men, muft be molt grofly Ig 



norant^ 



140 F. Malebranghe Concerning 

wmnt, even in point of iuch things, as have fome reference to them ; but inconceivably Blind, as. 

to all Abftra£t Truths, and to which they have no fenlible Relation. But we muft try to make thefe 

things manifeft by fome examples • 

III. There is no Science that ftands in fo near a Relation to us, as Moral Philofophy : which teaches us 

Thefirft our Duties to God and our King, our Kindred and Friends, and in general to all about us. Befides 

inflame, | t points out the way we mult follow to become eternally Happy : fo that all Men are under an 

thatTm- Euential Obligation, or rather an difpenfible Neceflity of refigning themfelves to the Study of it. 

rah are but Notwithftanding Generations of Men have fuccefhvely continued fix thoufand Years, and yet this 

little known Science is ftill very imperfect. 

iythe gene- ^hat' p art f Morals which refpe&s our Duty to God, and which queftionlefs is the Principal 
9 Men. °f a ^-> as rating t0 Eternity, has been little known by Men of the greateft Learning -, and there 
are ftill to be found Men of Senfe, who have no Knowledge of it, though the eafieft part of all Mo- 
ral Philofopy. For firft of all, What difficulty is there to find out the Exiflence of a God? Every 
of his works is a proof of it : All the Actions of Men and Beafts prove it : Whatever we think, 
whatever we fee, whatever we feel, demonftrates it : In a word, there is nothing in the World 
but proves that there is a God; or at leaft may prove it, to Men of attentive Minds, who feriouf- 
ly betake themfelves to Search after the Author of all tilings. 

Again, it is evident that we muft purfue the Orders of God, if we will be happy : For fince 
He is Juft and powerful, we cannot Difobey him, without being punifh'd ; nor obey Him, with- 
out a recompence. But what is it he requires of us ? That we love Him, that our Thoughts be poP 
fefs'd with Him, and our Heart fet upon Him. For, what end had God in Creating Minds, and all 
things elfe ? Certainly no other than Himfelf : So that being made for Him we are indifpenfibly 
oblig'd from diverting elfewhere the Impreflion of Love, which He perpetually maintains in us, in 
order to Our perpetual loving Him. 

Thefe Truths are not very difficult to be difcover'd by any attentive and considering Man ; and 
yet this fole Moral Principle, That to become Vertuous and Happy, "'tis abfolutely neceffary to Love 
God above all things, and in all things, is the Foundation of all Chriftian Morality. Nor is there 
need of very great Application to deduce from thence all neceffary Confequences, to fettle the 
General Rules of our Behaviour ? though few there are that do it ; whilft daily Difputes arile 
about Queftions of Morality, which are the immediate and neceffary Refults of fo lelr-evident a 
Principle as this before us. 

The Geometricians are continually making new Difcoveries in their Science-, and if they do not 
much advance it, 'tis becaufe they have already drawn from their Principles, the moft ulef ul and 
neceffary confequences : But the greateft part of Mankind, feem incapable of concluding any thing 
from the Firft Principle of Morals. All their Ideas vanim and diffipate, when their Will inclines them 
barely to confider it. Becaufe they will not as they ought ; and they will not as they ought, be- 
caufe they cannot tafte it ^ or that having tailed it, are prefently diftafted. For 'tis an AbftraG:, 
Metaphyseal, and purely Intellectual Principle, and not attainable by Senfe or Imagination. And 
therefore feems to Carnal Eyes, or Minds that fee no farther than their Eyes, to have no folidity. 
Nothing appears in this Principle likely to fettle and compofe the reftlefs agitation of their Will, 
and thereupon to flop the View of their Mind, and fix it attentively on confidering it. What 
hope then is there they mould fee it well, comprehend it right, and draw thofe direct Inferences 
from it which they ought? 

. Thofe who mould have but an imperfect apprehenfion of this G<w#/#77Vtf/ Proposition, That the 
fides of Similar Triangles are proportional, could certainly be no great Geometricians : But if, be- 
fides that confus'd and imperfect Perception of that Fundamental Propofition of Geometry, they 
had fome Intereft, why the fides of Similar Triangles mould not be proportional ; and if Falfe Ge- 
ometry were as fuitable to their perverfe Inclinations as Falfe Morals, we mould fee as abfurd Pa- 
ralogisms in Geometry as Morality ; becaufe their Errours would be pleafant to them, and Truth 
would only trouble, perplex, and confound them. 

Hence we need not wonder at the Blindnefs of Men in former Ages, who liv'd whilft Idola- 
try fiourifh'd in the World, or of fuch as live at prefent unenlightned with the Sun-mine of the 
Gofpel: It was needful for Eternal Wifdom to cloath it felf with Senfibi/ity, to infttuct Men that 
enquire only of their Senfes. Four thoufand Years together Truth was. manifefted by fpeaking to 
their Mind; but not entring into themfelves, they did not hear it; 'twas requifite therefore it 
mould fpeak unto their Ears : The Light which enlightens all Men, fhin'd upon their Darknefs, 
without difperfing it-, and they could not behold it. Intelligible Light mult veil it felf and be- 
come Vifible : The Word muft be made F/eff) ; and hidden and inacceflible. Wifdom muft inftruct 
Men in a Carnal manner ; Carnaliter, fays St. Bernard. The Generality of Men, and efpecially 
jer. 39. de t j ie Yoox, (who are the worthieft Object of their Creator's Mercy and Providence,) thole who are 
*r.inL' °* ^'g ^ t0 ^ a ^ or ^ or Xneir Living, are extremely ignorant and ftupid. They hear only becaufe 
they have Ears, and fee only becaufe they have Eyes : But are incapable of retiring into themfelves, 
by any Effort of Reafon, there to examine Truth, in the filence of their Senfes and their Pafftons. 
Truth they cannot apply to, becaufe they cannot reliQi it; and commonly that application enters 
not their Heads, becaufe they cannot think of applying themfelves to unaffe&ing Objects. Their 
del ultory and reftlefs Will continually cafts the View of their Mind upon all fenfible Objects, the 
Variety of which is pleafant and diverting. For the Multiplicity and Diverfity ot Senfible Goods, 
ferve to conceal their Vanity, and to keep up our Hopes of finding among them the True Good, 
which we defire. 

Thus 



Chap. It. The Search after Truth. izj-t 

Thus though the Counfels which JESUS CHRIST, in quality o? Man, of the Way, and 
of Author of our Faith, gives us in the Gofpel, are much more proportion'd to. the weaknefs of 
our Mind, than thole which the fame CHRIST, as He is Eternal wifdom, Internal Truth, In- 
telleUual Light, infpires into our molt inward Realbn ; and though He renders thefe His Counfels 
delegable by His Grace, 'Jenfible by His Example, and convincing by His Miracles ; yet Men are 
lb ftupid and inconliderate, even as to things of greateft importance to be known, that they fcarce 
ever think of them as behooves them. Not many perceive the Excellency of the Gofpel, nor the 
Soundnefs and Neceffity of the Precepts of our LORD; few there are that meditate on them, fo 
as to nourifii and itrengthen the Soul by them: The continual toffing and agitation of the Will, 
which looks for the Enjoyment of Good, permitting not thofe Truths to be infilled on, which feem 
to deprive the Soul of it. Here follows another proof of what I am aiTerting. 

Doubtlefs it much concerns, and lies upon the Wicked, to know whether their Soul is Mor- JV. 
tal, as they fuppofe it; or Immortal, as Faith and Realbn allure : as being a thing of geateft mo- Thefcconi 
ment and importance to them; fince the Queition lays their Eternity at ftake, and the quiet of $*"*?' 
their Mind depends on the refolve. Whence comes it that they are ignorant, or doubtful in the tLTj'fbc 
matter, but from their want of ferious Attention, and the Reftlefnefs and Corruptnefs of their MmortalU 
Will, not fuffering the Mind to take a Iteady View of the Reafons which contradict the Opi- *y of the 
nion they "wiih to be true ? For in brief, is it fo difficult to difcover the difference between the Sml H c f: 
Body and Soul, betwixt a Thinking and an Extended thing ? Muff, a Man bring fo great an At- 2^/pL//. 
tention to perceive that a Thought is neither Round nor Square ; that Extention is capable only 
of different Figures and Motions ; but not oi'' Thought and Reafoning : and fo, that what Thinks 
and what's Extended, are two Beings altogether oppofite. And yet this is all that's requifite to 
demonftrate the Immortality of the Soul, and thatlhe is not perijhable, though the Body fhould 
be annihilated.- 

True it is, when a Subftance perifbes, that the Modes or Manners of its Exigence perifri 
with it : as were a piece of Wax annihilated, it is certain the Figures of that Wax would be 
annihilated alfo : becaufe the Roundnefs, for inftance, of the Wax is really nothing, but the 
Wax it felf, exifting in fuch a ?nanner, and fo cannot fubfift without the Wax, whole Mode it 
is. But though God fhould deftroy all the Wax in the World, it would not follow from thence 
that any other Subftance, or Modes of Subftance fhould be annihilated. All Stones, for example, 
might fubfift, together with their Modes : Becaufe Stones are Subjlances or Beings, and not 
Modes of Being of the Wax. 

So though God fhould annihilate the half of a Body, it would not follow that the other half 
was annihilated. The latter half is united to the other, but is not one with it. And therefore 
one half being annihilated, it might be reafonably inferr'd, that the other half was no longer 
related to it ; but not that it did it felf exift no longer : for being a different Being, it could not 
be reduced to nothing by the annihilation of the other; Thence 'tis manifeft, that Thought be- 
ing not the Modification of Extenfion, our Soul is not annihilated, on luppofition that our Body 
were annihilated by Death. 

But we have no reafon to imagine that even the Body is annihilated, when it is deftroy M. 
The parts that make it up, are dilTolv'd into Vapours, and redue'd into Duft : we neither fee 
nor know them any more, I confefs ; but we cannot hence conclude they exift not ; For the Mind 
perceives them ftill. If we feparate a Muftard-feed'into two, or four, or twenty parts, we an- 
nihilate it to our Eyes, becaufe we fee it no longer ; But 'tis not annihilated in it felf, or to the 
Mind ; for the Mind difcerns it, though divided into a thoufand, or an hundred thoufand parts. 

'Tis a common Notion, and receiv'd by all that ufe their Reafon rather than their Senfes, That 
nothing can be annihilated by the ordinary force of Nature. For as 'tis naturally impoflible for 
fomething to be produced from nothing, fo 'tis impoftible for a Subftance or Being to be reduced, to 
nothing. Bodies indeed may corrupt, if you call Corruption the Changes that befall them, but 
cannot be annihilated. What is round, may become fquare ; what is Flefh, may become Earth, 
Vapour, and whatever you pleafe : for all Extention is capable of all forts of Configuration : 
But the Subftance of what is round, or Flefh, can never perifli: There are certain fettled Laws 
in Nature, by which Bodies change fucceffrvely their Forms ^ becaufe the fucceffive Variety of 
thefe Forms, makes the Beauty of the Univerie, and caufes us to admire its Author. But there 
is no Law in Nature for the annihilation of any Being, becaufe Kothingnefs, wants all Beauty, 
as well as Goodnefs ; and the Author of Nature is the Lover of his works. Bodies then may- 
change, but can never perifh. 

But if any one flicking to the Verditt of his Senfes, fhall obftinately maintain, that the dif- 
fblution of Bodies is a true Annihilation •, becaufe the parts they refolve into, are invifible : Let 
him do fo much as remember that Bodies cannot be divided into thefe invifible parts, but by 
reafon of their Extenfion. For if the Mind be not extended, it muft be indivifible, and if indi- 
vifible, muft be acknowledg'd incorruptible in rhat fenfe. But how can the Mind be imagined 
extended and divifible ? A right Line will divide a Square into two Triangles, Parallelograms or 
Trapezia : But by what .Line may a Pleafure, a Pain, or a Deftre be conceiv'd to be divided ? and 
what Figure would refult from that Divifion ? Certainly I cannot believe the Imagination fo 
fruitful in falfe Ideas as to fatisfie it felf in this particular. 

The Mind therefore is neither extended, nor divifible, nor fufceptible of the fame chan- 
ges as the Body^ and yet it muft be own'd, that it is not immutable by its Nature. If 
the Body is capable of an infinite number of different Figures, and different Configurations; 

o the 



1*2 F. Malebranghe Concerning Book IV. 

the Mind is likewife capable of a world of different Ideas, and different Modifications. And as after 
our Death, the Subllance of our Flem will refolve into Earth, Vapours, and infinite other Bodies, 
without annihilation ; fo our Soul without falling back into Nothing, will have Thoughts and 
Senfations very different from thofe Hie has during this Life. At prefent 'tis neceiTary that we 
live, and that our Body be compos'd of Flem and Bone ; and in order to live, 'tis neceiTary the 
Soul mould have Ideas and Senfations, relating to the Body me is joyn'd to. But when me 
(hall be diverted of her Body, fhe mall enter upon a perfect Liberty of receiving all forts of 
Ideas and Modifications, very different from thofe me has at prefent; as the Body on its part 
mall be free to receive all forts of Figures and Canfigurations, nothing like thofe it is oblig'd 
to make the Body of a living Man. 

It is, if I miltake not, manifeft from what I have faid, That the Immortality of the Soul is 
no liich hard thing to comprehend. Whence comes it then, that fo many doubt of it, but from 
their Inadvertency, and want of Attention to the Reafons that are requifite to convince them? 
or whence proceeds this negligence, but from the Unfetlednefs and Inconltancy of the Will, in- 
ceiTantly dilturbing the Underftanding > So as not to give it leafure for a diltincl Preception, even 
of Ideas that are the raoft prefent to it, fuch as are thofe of Thought and Ext en/ion : as a Man 
in the heat of a PatTion, cafting his Eyes round about him, feldom diftinguifhes the Objects 
that are nearer!, and molt expos'd to View. For indeed the Queftion of the Immortality of the 
Soul, is one of the eafieft to be refolv'd, when without liltning to the Imagination, we bring the 
Mind attentively to confider, the clear and diftin£t Idea of Extenfion, and the Relation it can. 
have with Thought. 

If the Inconft ancy and Levity of the Will, hinders the Underftanding from piercing to the 
bottom of things that are moft prefent to it, and of mightieft Importance to be known; 'tis eafie 
to judge what greater Remoras it will afford the Mind, to prevent its Meditating on fuch as are 
Re/vote and Unconceming. So that if. we are under the GroJJeft Ignorance and Blindnejs, as to 
moft things of greateft confequence to be known •, I can't tell how we mould be very Intelligent 
and Enlightened, as to thofe that feem altogether Impertinent and Fruitlefs. 

This I need not Hand to prove by tedious Inftances, and which contain no confiderale Truths; 
for if we muff be ignorant of any thing, that beft can be deipens'd with, which is of no ufe : 
and I had rather not be credited, than make the Reader lofe time by unprofitable things. 

Though there are but very few, that are ferioufly taken up with things altogether Vain and 
Ufeiefs ; yet thofe few are too many : But the number can't be too great of fitch as negle£l them 
and defpifethem ; provided only they forbear to judge of them. A limited Underftanding is not 
blameable for not knowing feveral things, but only forjudging of them. For Ignorance is an un- 
avoidable Evil : But Errour both may, and ought to be avoided: Ignorance of many things is ex- 
cujable, but headlong inconfiderate Judgments never, 
v. When things are nearly related to us, are Senjible and ealily Imaginable -, we may fay that the 

Thatree Mind intends them, and that fome Knowledge of them is attainable: for knowing that they re- 
treme te't - ^ ate t0 us ' we tn ^ n ^ °f them w ith fttfne. inclination -, and feeling rhem to affeft us, our Applica- 
'rance 'm°~ tion grows pleafant and delightful : So that we mould, as to many things, be wifer than we 
point of are, but for the Reftlefnefs and Agitation of our Will, that perpetually troubles and fatigues 
Abjiratf ur Attention. ■ 

which'lave ^ ut w ^ en things are abftratl and infenfible, 'tis difficult to acquire any certain Knowledge of 
tut little them : not that abftracl things are in their own Nature intricate and puzling ; but becaufe the 
reference to Attention and View of the Mind commonly begins and ends with the Senjible View of Objects : 
m ' for as much as we moftly think of only what we fee and feel, and as long as we fee and feel it. 

'Tis certain, that if the Mind could ealily keep up to clear and diftinft Ideas, without be- 
ing as it were fupported by fome Senfation ;• and without having its Attention perpetually di- 
fturb'd by the Reftlefhefs of the Will ; we mould find no great difficulties in infinite Natural 
Queftions, but in a fhort time mould get rid of our Ignorance, and Efrours about them, which 
we now look upon as inexplicable. 

For inftance, 'tis an indilputable Truth to every Man that makes ufe of his Reafon, that Cre- 
ation and Annihilation exceed the ordinary force of Nature. Should we now ftick to the confe- 
deration of that pure Notion of the Mind and Reafon, we mould not fo readily admit the Cre- 
ation and Annihilation of fuch innumerable multitudes of New Beings, as of Subftantial Forms, 
Real Qualities, and faculties, and the like. We fliould look for the reafon of Natural Effe£ls, 
in the diftincl: Ideas of Extenfion, Figure and Motion ; and this is not fo difficult as is imagin'd : 
For all Nature hangs in a continued chain, and the parts of it mutually prove each other. 

The Effects of Fire, as thofe of Cannons and Mines, are very wonderful ; and their Caufe as 
fecret and conceal'd. . Neverthelefs, if Men inilead of adhering to the Impreffions of their Sen- 
fes, and laffe and delufive Experiments, fhould infill on that fole Notion of Pure hue! left : That 
'tis impoffible for a Body gently mov'd to produce a Violent Motion in another; fince it cannot com- 
municate more moving Force, than it has it felf -, it would be eaiie from that fingle Notion to 
conclude, there is fome fubtile and invifible Matter ; that it is violently agitated, and univerfally 
diftus'd among all Bodies, and feveral things of like kind, which might ferve to explain the 
Nature of Fire, and to difcover other yet more intricate and hidden Truths. 

For feeing fo great Motions produced in a Cannon or a Mine, and all the vifible furrounding 
Bodies, in too little Commotion to effeft: them, we are infallibly affur'd there are other in- 
vifible and infenfible Bodies, which have at leaft fo much Motion as' the Cannon Bullet; but 

being 



; T 



Cliap. III. The Search after Truth. t 

being extremely fine and fubtile may, when alone, pafs freely and without burfting any thing 
through the Pores of the Cannon, before it is fir'd ; that is, as may be feen explain'd at large 
in Mr. des Cartes, before they have furrounded the hard and grofs parts of the Saltpeter, which 
the Powder is compos'd of. But when the Fire is kindled, that is, when thefe molt fubtile and 
agitated particles, have encompaiTed the grofs and folid parts Of the Saltpeter, and fo have com- 
municated their moil forcible and violent Motion to thein^ all muft neceflarily burft: becaufe the 
the Pores of the Cannon, which gave a free paffage on all fides to the fubtile parts we fpeak of, 
when alone •, are not large enough to receive the grofs parts of the Saltpeter, and others that 
make the Powder, when agitated by the fubtile particles that environ them. 

For as the Water of a River (hakes not the Bridge it runs under, becaufe of the minuteness 
of its parts. So this moft fine and fubtile Matter continually paffes through the pores of all Bo- 
dies, without caufing any fenfible alteration. But, as again that River is able to overturn a Bridge, 
when bearing down its Stream huge maffy pieces of Ice, or other more folid Bodies, it daffies 
them againft it with the fame force that it felf is mov'd by : fo the fubtile Matter is capable of 
thofe aitonifhing Effects, obfervable in Cannons and Mines ; when having communicated to the 
parts of the Powder, fwimming in the midft of it, an infinitely more violent and rapid Motion, 
than that of Rivers and Torrents ; thefe fame parts of the Gunpowder cannot freely pafs through 
the Pores of the including Bodies, becaufe of their too great bulk : and therefore open them- 
felves a way, by violently breaking what withstands them. 

But 'tis not very eafie to imagine thefe To fubtile and refine! Bodies, and they are look'd upon 
as Chimeras, becaufe they cannot be feen. Com emplatio fere definit cum afpetlu; fays My Lord 
Bacon. And indeed the greatelt part of Philofophers had rather invent fome New Entity, than 
be filent about things they do not underftand. If it be objected to their falfe, and inconceivable 
Suppositions, that Fire muft neceffarily be compos'd of parts rapidly mov'd, becaufe of thofe 
violent Motions it produces ; whilft nothing can communicate what it has, not : (which furely is 
a moft clear and folid Obje&ion ) they will be fare to confound all by fome childifh and imaginary 
Distinction^ filch as Caufes umvocal and equivocal, that they may feem to fay fomething, when 
indeed they fay nothing at all. For in fine, 'tis a receiv'd Maxim with all confidering Men, That 
there can be no equivocal Caufe in Nature, and Ignorance has only invented them. 

Thofe then who are defirous of knowing Nature, fhould take care to fix more to clear and di- 
ftinct Notions. They fhould a little check and refill that Levity and Inconflancy of their Will, 
if they would penetrate to the bottom of things : for their Minds will ever be feeble, fuperfi- 
cial and defultory, whilft their Wills remain roving, fickle and inconftant. 

It muft be confefs'd that 'tis a painful and tirefome thing, and full of conftraint, to become at- 
tentive, and go to the bottom of the things we have a mind to know. But nothing can be had 
without pains. Mean time, 'tis a reproach to Men of Senfe, and Philofophers, who are oblig'd 
by all manner of reafons to the Search and Defence of Truth, to talk they know not what, and 
to be fatisfied with what they do not underftand. 



CHAP. III. 

I. Curiofity is natural, and neceffary. II. Three Rules to moderate it. 
HI. An Explication of the frji of thefe Rules. 

AS long as Men fhall have an Inclination for a Good that exceeds their Strength, and they i. 
fhall not enjoy it -, they will ever have a fecret Inclination for whatever carries the Cha- . Cwtftp 
rafter of New and Extraordinary. They will conftantly be perfuing after things, which rhey ts ** tum J; 
have not yet confider'd, with hopes of finding what they feek for : and whereas their Minds can fary" 
never be fully fatisfied, without the Intuition of him, for whom they are created ; fb they will • 
always be reftlefs and tolling about, till He appears to them in His Glory. , 

This Difpofition of Minds, is doubtlefs very confonant to their Condition ; it being infinitely . , 
better reftleily to feafch after Truth, and Happinefs which they do not pofiefs, than to fix on a 
falfe and ill-grounded fecurity, by taking up with Falfhood, and Seeming Goods, the ordinary 
DefTerts they feed on : Men ought not to be infenfible to Truth and Flapinefs, and what is New 
and Extraordinary ought to quicken them. For there is a Curiofity, which we may permit them, 
or rather which we ought to recommend to them. So then common and ordinary things con- 
taining not the true Good ; and the Ancient Opinions of Philofophers, being moft uncertain ; 
it is reafonable we fhould be Curious for New Difcoveries, and always unquiet in the Enjoyment 
of ordinary Goods. 

Should a Geometrician go to give us New Propositions contrary to Euclide's ; and pretend to 
prove that Science full of Errours, as Hobbs has eifay'd in a Book«he wrote againft the Pride of 
the Geometricians ; I confefs we fhould" be to blame to be pleas'd with fuch forts of Novelties ; 
fince Truth being found, we ought to be conftant in embracing it, our Curiofity being given us 
only to excite us to the Difcovery. And therefore 'tis no common fault with Geometric ~im s, tp 
have a Curiofity for new Opinions in their Science : They would quickly be difgufted with a 
Book, whofe Propositions -contradicted thofe of Euclid: for that, being infallibly afTufd ot the 

troJi 



144 F. Malebranche Concerning Book IV. 

truth of His Proportions, by inconteftable Demonftrations, their Curiofity' muft ceafe on that 
refpeO: : An infallible fign that our Inclination for Novelty, proceeds only from our want of Evi- 
dence, as to the Truth of things we defire naturally to know-, and our notpolTetTing the, Infinite 
Goods, which we naturally long to enjoy. 

'Tis then juft and equitable, that men fhould be excited by Novelty, and fond of perfuing it: 
n« But however there are Exceptions to be made, and fome Rules to be obferv'dj which may eafily 
to moderate ^ e ^educ'd ^ rom our AiTertion, viz. That the Inclination for Novelty, is only given us to dij cover 
Curkfity. Truth, and our real Good.>\ 

Thefe Rules are three in number ; the firft of which is, That Men muft not love Novelty in 
matters of Faith, which are not under the fur ifd ill ion of Re af on. 

The fecond, That Novelty is no reafon to induce us to believe things to be true or good ; that 
is, we muft not judge any Opinion true, becaufe tis Novel ; nor any Good capable of contenting us, 
becaufe 'tis new and extraordinary, and we have never yet enpfdit. 

The third, That when we are moreover ajjurd that fome Truths' lie fo deep, that 'tis Morally 
impojjible to difcover them: and that fome Goods are fo little, and fender, that they can never fa- 
tisfie us -, the Novelty ought not to raife our Curiofity, nor muft ice give way to be feducd by falfe 
Hopes. But we will explain thefe Rules more at large, and (hew that the want of pbferving them 
engages us in a vaft number of Errours. 

We commonly meet with Men of two quite oppofite humours : fome that will always blindly 

ill. and implicitly believe ; others, that will ever plainly and evidently perceive. The former having 

■A parti-- fcarce ever made ufe of their Reafon, indifferently believe whatever they hear-, the' latter refolv- 

C(// 5 E *?}!~ ing always to exercile their Mind, even in matters that are infinitely above ir, equally defpife all 

frit of thefe ^ ons °f Authorities. Thofe are commonly of a ftupid or weak capacity, as Children and Women v 

Rules. thefe are Haughty and Libertine Wits, as Heretic ks and Pbilofopbers. 

We very rarely meet with Men exaclly poiz'd in the midtt of thefe two Extremes, who leek 
not for Evidence in matters of Faith, by a vain and fruitlefs Agitation of Mind •, or that fome- 
times believe not without Evidence falfe Opinions about Natural things, by an indifcreet Defe- 
rence, and fervile Submiflion of Spirit. If they be Men of Religion, and defer greatly to the 
Authority of the Church, their Faith extends fometimes, if I may be allowed to fay fo, to Opini- 
ons purely Philofophical -, and they pay them the fame refpecl as the Truths of the Gofpel; whilft 
their illegitimate Zeal too readily prompts them to cenfure and condemn all of a different Sen- 
timent and Perfuafion. Hence they entertain injurious fufpicions againft Perfons that make 
New Difcoveries ; and 'tis fufficient to pafs for a Libertine with them, to deny Subflantial Forms'; 
that the Creatures feel Fleafure and Fain, and other Philofophical Opinions,-, which they be- 
lieve true, without any evident Reafon ; only becaufe they imagine fome necelTary Dependencies 
between thefe Opinions and. matters of Faith, 

But if Men are more bold and daring, the Spirit of Pride carries them to defpife the Au- 
thority of the Church •, . and they are hardly brought to fubmit to it. They delight in harffi 
and prefumptuous Opinions, and love to be thought Bold Wits-, and upon that prdipeft, talk 
of Divine things irreverently, and with a fort of domineering Arrogance ; defpifing, as too cre- 
dulous, fuch as fpeak modeftly of fome receiv'd Opinions. Laftly, they are extremely dif- 
pes'd to doubt of every thing, and are quite oppofite to thofe, who too eafily fubmit to the 
Authority of Men. 

'Tis manifeft, that thefe two Extremes have nothing laudable, and that thofe that require not 
Evidence in Natural Questions-, are no lefs culpable than others, who demand it in the Mylierws 
of Faith. But yet the former, who hazard the being miftaken in Philofophical Queftions, by 
too eafie a Belief, are doubtlefs more excufable than the latter, who run in danger oi tierefie, 
by a prefumptuous doubting. For 'tis lefs perillous to fall into infinite Errours of Philolophy, 
for want of examining them, than into one Herefie, for want of an humble Submiffion to the 
Authority of the Church. 

The Mind repofes it felf upon finding Evidence, but 'tis tofs'd and difturb'd when it finds 
none ; becaufe Evidence is the Character of Truth. And therefore the Errour of Libertines 
and Hereticks proceeds from their Doubting that Truth is to be met vvitli in the Deciflons of the 
Church -, becaufe they fee it not with Evidence, and hoping at the fame time, that the Points 
of Faith may be evidently known. Now their paffion for Novelty is corrupt and diforder'd, be- ■ 
caufe having already the Truth, in the Faith of the Church, they ought no longer to feek for 
it : befides that the Truths we are taught by Faith, being infinitely above our Reafon, they 
could not be difcover'd, fuppofing, according to their falfe Notion, thac the Church was guil- 
ty oj Errour. 

But as many Err, by refufing to fubmit to the Authority of the Church •, fo there are no few- 
er that deceive themfelves, by fubmitting to the Authority of Men. The Authority of the 
Church muft always be yielded to, becaufe it can never err: but we mult never blindfoldly re- 
fign to the Authority of Men, becaufe they are always liable to miltake. The Do&rines of the 
Church infinitely tranfeend the powers of Reafon, but the Do&riries of Men are fubjeft to it : 
So that if it be an intolerable Vanity and Prefumption to follow the Guidance of our Mind, in 
feeking tor Truth in matters of Faith, without Refpect to the Authority of the Church ; it is 
likewife a fordid Levity, and a delpicable Meanuefs of Spirit, blindly to believe upon the Au- 
thority of Men, in Subjects depending on Reafon, 

Not- 



Chap. lit. The Search after Thith. Ufa j 

Notwithftanding which, it may be faid, that molt of thofe who bear the Name of Leanied 
in the World;, have pufchas'd their Reputation merely by getting by rote the Opinions of Arifto- 
tie, Plato, Epicurus, and fome other Philofbphers, and by blindfoldly embracing, and wilfully 
maintaining their Opinions. An Acquaintance with the Sentiments of fome Philofbphers, is 
enough to entitle to Degrees, and exteriour Badges of Learning in the Univerfities : And provi- 
ded a Man fliall fwear in Verba Magiftri, he mail fpeedily commence a Doctor. Moft Com- 
munities have a Ped, and Learning peculiar to themfelves, which every private Perfon is oblig'd 
ro ftand and fall by. What is true in one Society is falfe in another. They fometimes take 
pride in maintaining the Doctrine of their Order againft Reafon and Experience ; and think they 
are oblig'd»to warp and dittort the Truth, or make their Authors buckle, that they may be con- 
fident with it : Which has occafion'd an infinite multitude of trifling Diftinftions, which are ib 
many By-ways to lead infallibly to Errour. 

If any Truth be now a-days difcover'd, Arifiotle muft have known it -, but \fArifotlc be againft 
it, the Difcovery is falfe. Some make that Philofopher fpeak one way, fome another 5 for all 
Pretenders to Learning teach him to fpeak in their own Dialect. There is no Impertinence but 
he is introduced as uttering -, nor any New Difcovery, but is found enigmatically treafur'd up in 
fome corner of his Books. In a word, he conftantly contradicts himfelf •, if not in his Works^ 
at leaft in the Mouths of his ProfeiTors. For though the Philbfophers declare, and indeed defign 
to teach his Doftrine, yet 'tis an hard thing to find two to meet upon his Opinions •, becaufeinef- , 
left his Books are fo obfeure, and abound with fo many loofe, indefinite, and general Terms, 
that even thole Mens Notions may with fome likelihood be afcrib'd to him, that are the moft op- 
pofite in the World. He may be made to fay any thing in fome of his Works, becaufe he fays 
juft nothing, whilft he makes much Noife •, as Children make the Bells found what they have a 
mind to, becaufe they are very noifie, but inarticulate. 

'Tis true, it feems reafonable to fix and determine the Mind of Man to particular Opinions^ 
to keep it from rambling, and extravagance : But why muft it be done by Falfhood and Errour ? 
Can Errour be thought capable of reuniting divided Minds } If we confider how rare it is to find 
Men of Senfe and Parts fatisfy'd with reading Arifiotle, and perfuaded they have acquir'd true 
Science, though grown old in poring on his Books, we lhall evidently perceive that nothing 
but Truth and Evidence can quiet the Agitation of the Mind ; and that Difputes, Averfions,- 
Errours, and Herefies, are kept up and fortify'd by the Corrupt Courfe and Method of Mens Stu- 
dy. Truth confifts in indivifibili, is incapable of Variety, and nothing elfe can reunite Mens 
Minds : But Errour and Falfbood can only divide and difturb them. 

I make no queftion but there are fuch as honeftly believe, that he, whom they ftyle the Prince 
of Phibfophers, is guilty of no Errour -, and that his Works are the Magazines of true and found 
Philofophy. There are Men who imagine, that in the fpace of two thoufand Years, the Time 
fince he wrote, no Man has been able to fay he has made a Blot, or been guilty of a Miftake -, 
and fo making him infallible in a manner, they can pin their Faith upon him, and quote him as 
infallible. But 'tis not worth while to ftand toanfwer fuch Gentlemen asthefe, becaufe their Ig- 
norance muft needs be exceeding grofs, and meriting more to be pitied than oppugn'd : I defire only 
of them, if they know that either Arifiotle, or any of his Followers, have dedue'd any Truth 
from the Principles peculiar to him ; or if poffibly themfelves have done it, that they would de- 
clare it, explain it, and prove it -, and I promife them never more to fpeak but to Arjflctle's 
Praife and Commendation. His Principles lhall no longer be calumniated as ufelefs, fince they 
have at laft been ferviceable to prove one Truth. But we have no Reafon to hope this : For the 
Challenge has been long fince oftefd, and M. Des Cartes, among the reft, has done it in his Me- 
taphyseal Meditations, almoft Forty Years ago, and oblig'd himlelf to demonftrate the Falfhood • 
of that pretended Truth. And there is great Probability no Man will ever venture to attempt 
what M. Des Cartes's -greateft Enemies, and the moft zealous Defenders of Arijlotle's Philofophy 
never yet durft undertake. 

I beg leave then, after this, to fay, That it is Blindnefs, Shwifbnefs of Spirit, and Stupidity^ 
thus to betray Reafon to the Authority of Arifiotle, Plato, or whatever other Philofopher : That 
'tis Lofs of Time to read them, out of no other Defign than to remember their Opinions ; and 
'tis to ioajie that of others too,, to teach them in that manner. And 1 may fay with St. Auguftin, £ UK tan l 
That a Alan muft befottijhly curious, who fends his Son to the College td learn the Opinions of his J^^^i 
Tutour. That the Philofophers cannot inftruft us by their Authority-, and to pretend to it is a filium fu- 
piece of Injuftice : That 'tis a kind of Madnefs and Impiety to take a folemn Oath of Allegi- um mictac 
ance to them .- And, Laftly, that 'tis to detain Truth in an unjuft Bondage, from Intereff, and inSch .^*P? 
Partiality, to oppofe the New Opinions of Philofophy, that may be true;, to keep up the credit g[^ e u r ^ogi- 
of fuch as are known to be either falfe or ufelefs. tec difcat > 



p CttA P. 



46 F. . M a l e bra n c h e Concerning Book IV, 



CHAP. IV. 

A Continuation of the fame SubjeSi. I. An 'Explication of the Second Rule 
concerning Curiojity. II. An Explication of the Third. 

l - ,'T^ H E Second Rule to be obferv'd is, That Novelty flmtll never pafs with us as a Reafon to 
Rui e S con- -*- believe things to be true. We have often faid, That a Man ought not to acquiefce in Er- 
cemhgcu- rour, and the feeming Goods which he enjoys: That 'tis juft he fhould feek for the Evidence of 
riojity. Truth, and the True Good, which he does not pofTefs, and confequently have an Inclination for 
things, that are New and Extraordinary : Yet he is not, for all that, to cleave to them, or to be- 
lieve, out of a Levity of Humour, that Opinions are true, becaufe novel j and that Goods are 
real, becaufe they have not been experienced. Novelty fhould only put hirri upon examining 
New things carefully •, which he ought not to defpife, becaufe he does not know them -, nor 
rafhly to believe, to contain what his Hopes and Wifh.es aim at. 

But here follows a thing of common Obfervation : When Men have examin'd Ancient and 
Received Opinions, without perceiving the bright Light of Truth ; when they have tailed Com- 
mon Goods, without rinding the folid Pleafure that fhould attend the Poffeflion of Good -, and 
when their Defires and Longings are not abated by ordinary Goods and Opinions : If then they 
hear of any thing new and unexperienc'd, the Idea of Novelty gives them Grounds of hoping 
that this is the very thing they fearch for. And becaufe they commonly Hatter themfelves, and 
willingly believe things are as they wifh them to be, their Hopes ftrengthen as fall as their De- 
fires increafe, till at laft they infenfibly grow into imaginary Affurances : Hereupon they fo infe- 
parably annex the Idea of Novelty to the Idea of Truth, that the one is never excited without 
the other •, and that which is neweft, feems always truer and better than what is more ordinary 
and common. Wherein they widely differ from fome others, who from an Abhorrence of Here- 
fie, having join'd the Idea of Novelty with that of Falfity, imagine all New Opinions falfe, and 
including fomething of dangerous Importance. - 

Thence it may be concluded, That this cuftomary Difpofition of the Mind and Heart of Man, 

in refpecl of all that bears the Chara&er of Novelty, is one of the moft general Cauies of their 

Errours : It hardly ever conduQs them to the Truth •, but when it does, 'tis purely by Chance, 

and good Luck ; and it conftantly obviates their PofTeflion of their True Good, by engaging them 

in that Multiplicity of Divertifements, and faljly feeming Goods, the World is fill'd with ; which 

is the moft dangerous Errour Man can fall into. 

ii. The Third Rule againft the excefiive Defires of Novelty, is, That when we are otherwife a£ 

The Third fur'd that fome Truths lie fo deep, that 'tis morally impoffible to difcover them > and that fome 

Rule con- Goods are fo little and flender, that they cannot make us happy, the Novelty of them ought 

2SJ Cu ' not to excite our Curiofity. 

Every one may know by Faith, Reafon, and Experience, That all created Goods are notable 
to fill the infinite Capacity of the Will. We are taught by Faith, that all worldly things are Va- 
nity ; and that our Uappinefs confifts neither in Riches nor Honours. Reafon affures us, that fince 
it is not in our Power to bound our Defires, and that we are carried by a Natural Inclination to 
the loving all Goods •, that we cannot become Happy, but by poffefTing H I M who contains 
them all. Our own Experience makes us fenfible, that we are not Happy in the Poffeflion of the 
Goods we enjoy, becaufe we are ftill defirous of others. Laftly, We daily fee that the mighty 
Goods which Princes, and the moft Potent Kings enjoy on Earth, are incapable of filling their 
Defires : That they have even more Difturbances and Troubles than other Men •, and that being 
on the higheft Point of Fortune's Wheel, they muft be infinitely more fhaken and agitated by its 
Motion than thofe which fit lower and nearer its Axis : For in fhort, they neverfall, but 'tis 
from a Precipice •, they receive no little Wounds, and all that Grandeur which attends them, 
and which they incorporate with their own Being, only enlarges and extends them, that they may 
receive a greater Number of Wounds, and be more expos'd to the Infults and Blows of Fortune. 

Faith, Reafon, and Experience thus alluring us, that earthly Goods and Pleafures, which we 
have never tafted, could not make us Happy, rhough we fhould enjoy them •, fpecial Care ought 
to be taken, according to the Third Rule, to fuperlede being fhttei'd with the vain Hope of Fe- 
licity, which Hope infenfibly increafing, proportionably to our Paflions and Defires, will at laft 
end in a falfe Confidence, and an ill-grounded Aflurance. For when we are extreamly paflionate 
for any Good, we always imagine it excelhvely great ; and by degrees perf uade our felves we 
ihall be happy in the Enjoyment. 

Thefe vain Defires then muft be refitted, fince to try to latisfie them would be a fruitlefs At- 
tempt : But efpecially for this Reafon, that when we give way to our Paffions, and fpend our 
Time to afford them Satisfa£lion, we lofe GOD, and all things with him ; we only run from 
one feeming Good to another, live always in falfe Hopes, diftrafit and agitate our felves a thou- 
land ways, and meet with perpetual Oppofitions and frultrations, becaufe the defired Goods are 
fought, but can't be poflefs'd by many at once; and at laft we die, and can enjoy nothing more : 

For 



Chap. V. The Search after Truth. ixj 

aTii 

of 



For, as we are taught by St. Paul, They that will be rich, fall into temptation and a fnare, and 2 Tim. 6.9, 
into many foolifh and hurtful lufts, which drown men in dejirutfion and perdition : for the love of 



money w the root of all evil. 

But if we ought not to be follicitous for the Goods of the Earth, which are new to us, as be- 
ing certain that the Happinefs we are in fearch of, is not to be found in them 3 much Ids ought 
we to defire to know the new Opinions about a vaft many difficult Queftions : as being otherwife 
convinc'd, that an humane Mind can never difcover the truth of them. Moll of the Queftions 
treated of in Morals and Phyficks, are of that nature-, which may afford us Reafon to fuipeft the 
generality of thofe Books we fee daily compos'd upon very obfcure and moft perplexing Subjects. 
For though, abfolutely fpeaking, the Queftions they contain are foivable-, yet, fo few Truths be- 
ing hitherto difcover'd, and fo many to be known before we can come to thofe that are handled 
in thefe Books •, they cannot be read without hazarding to lofe much by them. 

But yet this is not the Method that is taken, but the quite contrary : Men examine not whe- 
ther what is faid be poffible. Promife them only extraordinary things, as, the Reftitution of Na- 
tural Heat, Radical Moifture, Vital Spirits, or other Unintelligible Matters h and you excite their 
vain Curiofity, and prepolTefs them. 'Tis enough to dazle them, and win their AlTent, to offer 
them Paradoxes ; to make ufe of obfcure Words, Terms of Influence, or the Authority of fome 
unknown Authors ; or to make fome very fenfible and unufual Experiment, though it have no 
reference to the thing advanc'd. For Confufion is Conviction to fome forts of People. 

If a Phyfician, a Chirurgeon, or an Empirick, quote but fome Greek and Latin Sentences, and 
talk to their Hearers in new and extraordinary Terms, they take them for Great Men =, Ihey give 
them the Prerogative of Life and Death, and believe them as they would an Oracle : They imagine 
themfelves too, that they are elevated to a pitch above the common fize, and pierce to the bottom 
of things. And if one happen to be fo indifcreet, as to teftifie, that five or fix infignificative Words 
that prove nothing, will not go down for Reafon •, they think a Man void of Common-fenfe, and 
that he denies Firft Principles : And indeed, thefe Gentlemen's Firft Principles are five or fix Latin 
Words of an Author,* or fome Greek Paffage, if they have greater Abilities. 

It is even neceffary for skilful Phy/icians to talk fbmetimes in an unknown Tongue to their Pa- 
tients, to purchafe Reputation, and . to make themfelves attended to. 

A Phyfician who can go no farther than Latin, may pafs well enough in a Country Parifti, be- 
caufe Latin is Greek and Arabick to the Illiterate. But if a Phyfician cannot at leaft read Greeks 
to learn fome Aphorifm of Hypocrates, he muft not expect to pafs for a Scholar with the Inhabi- 
tants of a City, who commonly underftand Latin. And fo the moft Learned amongft them, 
knowing this Humour of the World, are fbrc'd to talk like Cheats and Quacks; and we are not 
always to take an Eftimate of their Parts and Learning from the Difcourfe they have in their Vifits. 



€ H A P. V. 

I. Of the Second Natural Inclination^ or' of Self-love. II. The Divifion of 
it into Love of Being y and of Well-being \ or y of Greatnefs and Pleajure. 

THE Second Inclination which the Author of Nature conftantly impreffes on our Will, is, 
The Love of our felves, and Our own Prefervdtion. 

We have already faid, That GOD loves all his Works ; and that it is only his Love which L 
preferves them in their Being ; and that 'tis his Will, that all Created Spirits mould have the °f the Se- 
fame Inclination with his own. 'Tis his Will therefore, that they all have a natural Inclination £T/"*/f\ 
for their own Prefervation, and that they love themfelves. So that Self-love is reafonable, be- t - m nc or '"f 
caufeMan is really amiable^ in as much as GOD loves us, and would have us love our felves : self hue; 
but it is not reafonable to love our felves better than GOD; fince GOD is infinitely more lovely 
than we are. It is injuft for us to place our ultimate End in our felves, and to centre our Love 
there, without reference to GOD; fince having no real Goodnefs, or Suhfiftence" of our felves, 
but only by the participation of the Goodnefs and Being of GOD, we are no farther amiable than 
we ftand related to him. 

Nevertheless, the Inclination we mould have for GV D, is loft by the Fall -, and our Will now 
has only an infinite Capacity for all Goods, or Good in general •, and a ftrong Inclination to pofiels 
them, which can never be deftroy'd. But the Inclination which we ought to have for our own 
Prefervation, or our Self-love, is fo mightily increas'd, that 'tis at laft become the abfolute Mafter 
of our Will : It has evenchang'd and converted the Love of GOD, or the Inclination we have for 
Good in general, and that due to other Men, into its own nature. For it may be faid, that the 
Love of our felves at prefent ingroiTes all, becaufe we love all things but with relation to our 
ielves ; whereas we fhould love GOD only firft, and all things after as related to him. 

When Faith and Reafon certifie us, that GOD is the fbvereign Good, and, that he alone carf 
fill us with Pleafures, we eafily conceive it our Duty to love him, and readily afford him our Af» 
fe&ions ; but, unaffifted by Grace, Self-love always is the firft Mover. All pure and defecate Cha- 
rity is above the ftrength of our corrupt Nature ; and fo far are we from loving GOD for himfelfy 
that Humane Reafon cannot comprehend how 'tis poffible to love him, without Reference to our 

felves, 



. i aS ' F. Malebranche Concerning Book IV 

felves, and making our ultimate End our own Satisfa&ion. Self-love therefore is the only Matter 

of our Will, ever iince the Diforders of Sin: and the Love of GOD, and our Neighbour,- are only 

Confequences of it -, iince we love nothing at prefent, hut with the hopes of fome Advantage, or 

•becaufe we actually receive fome P leaf /ere therein. 

Ir : This Self-love branches into two forts ; viz. Into the Love of Greatnefs, and the Love of Plea- 

Tbe Diw/I-fure 5 or into the Love of ones Being, and the Perfection of it, and into the Love of Well-being 

m of Self- or Felicity. 

love, of Be- By the Love of Greatnefs, we afTecl Power, Elevation, Independency, and a Self-fubfifting Be- 
mu-behi - n §' ^ e are > a ^ ter a ^ ort:, amD itious °f having a Necejfary Being', and in one fenfe defire to be 
or of Great- <® Gods : for GOD only has properly Being and Neceffary Exiitence, for that every Depending 
nefs and Nature exifts only by the Will of its Upholder. Wherefore Men, in defiring the Neceflity of 
r leaf me. .their Being, defire Power and Independency, which may fet them beyond the reach of the Power 
of others. But by the Love of Pleafure, they defire not barely Being, but Well-being • Pleafure 
being the belt and molt advantageous Mode, of the Soul's Exiftence. 

For it mutt be noted, That Greatnefs, Excellency, and Independency of the Creature, are not 
Modes of 'Exiftence, that render it more happy of themfelves^ for it often happens, that a Man 
grows miferable, in proportion to his growing great : But as to Pleafure, 'tis a Mode of Exiftence, 
which we cannot Actually receive, without being Atlually more happy. Greatnefs and Indepen- 
dency are commonly External Modes, confifting in the relation we have to things about us. But 
Pleafures are in the very Soul, are real Modes, which modifie her, and are. naturally adapted "to 
content her. And therefore we look upon Excellency, Greatnefs, and Independency, as things 
proper for the Prefervation of our Being, and ufeful fometimes, by the order of Nature, to the 
continuance of our Well-being. But Pleafure is always a Mode of the Mind's Exiftence, which of 
it felf renders it Happy and Content. So that Pleafure is Well-being -, and the Love of Pleafure, 
the Love of Well-being. 

Now this Love of Well-being is fometimes more powerful and ftrong than the Love of Being : 
and Self-love makes us defire Non-exiftence, becaufe we want Well-being. 'Phis Defire is incident 
to the Damn'd, for whom it were better, according to the Saying of our SAVIO UR, not to be at 
all, than to be fo /// as they are^ becaufe thefe Wretches being the declar'd Enemies of him who 
contains in himfelf all Goodnefs, and who is the fole Caufe of all the Pleafures and Pains we are 
capable of\ 'tis impoflible they fhould enjoy any Satisfaction. They are and will be eternally 
miferable, becaufe their Will {hall ever be in the fame Difpofition and Corruption. Self-love there- 
fore includes two Loves, that of Greatnefs, Power, and Independence, and generally of all things 
thought proper for the prefervation of our Being •, and that of Pleafure, and of all things necef- 
fary to our Well-being ; that is, to our being Happy and Content. 

Thefe two Loves may be divided feveral ways : whether becaufe we are compounded of two dif- 
ferent parts, of a Soul and Body, by which they may be divided-, or becaufe they may be diftin- 
guifh'd or fpecify'd by the different Obje£ts, that are ferviceable to our Prefervation. But I mall 
infift no longer upon this, becaufe, defigning not a Treatife of Morality, there is no need of ma- 
king an exact Difquifition and Divifion of all the things relating to us, as our Goods. Only this 
Divifion was neceflary to reduce into fome order the Caufes of our Errours, 

Firft, I fhall fpeak to the Errours that are caus'd by the Inclination we have for Greatnefs, and 
whatever fets our Being free from Dependence upon others. In" the next place, I fhall treat of 
thofe which proceed from our Inclination to Pleafure, and whatever meliorates our Being as much 
as poflible, and contents us moft. 



CHAP. VI. 

I. Of the Inclination we have for whatever elevates us above others. II. Of 
the falfe Judgments of fome Religious Perfons. III. Of the falfe Judg- 
ments of the Superjlitiom and Hypocrites. IV. Of Voetius, Mr. Des 
Cartes' j" Enemy. 



i. 



WHatever tends to exalt us above others, by making us more perfe£t, as Science and Venue-, 
or gives us Authority over them by rendring us more powerful, as Honours and Riches ; 
dmathnwe feems to put us in a fort of Independence. All thofe that are below us, reverence and fear us-, 
whatever are alwa y s P re P ar5cl to execute what we pleafe for our Prefervation, and are afraid of offending 
detates m us or tufting our Defires : which makes Men conftantly endeavour to be Matters of thefe Ad- 
above vantages, which elevate them above others : for they don't confider that their Being and Well- 
others, being depend, in truth, on GOD alone, and not on Men: and that real Greatnefs, which fhall 
make them everlattingly happy, confifts not in the Rank they bear in the imagination of others, 
as impotent and miferable as themf elves -, but in an humble Submiffion to the Will of GOD : who 
being jult, will not fail to reward fuch as perfevere in the Order he has prefcrib'd them. 

But Men not only defire actually to peffefs Science and Venue, Dignities and Riches ; but lay 
out their whole Endeavours, that they may at leaft be thought really to poiTefs them. And if it 

may 



ons. 



1 ' ■• i 

Chap. VI. Ihe Search after Truth. iip 

may be faid of them, That they are more follicitous to be Truly Rich, than to be thought Jo -, We 
may fay too, they are lefs careful to be Truly Vertuous, than to appear fo : for, as was hand 1 - 
ibmly laid by the Author of the Mora/ Reflexions $ Vertue would, not go far, unlefs Vanity bore 
her Company. 

The Reputation of being Rich, Learned, Vertuous, produces in the Imagination of thole about 
-us, or that are of neareft Concernment to us, very advantageous Difpofitions on our behalf -, it 
lays them proftrate at our feet, actuates them on our account, and infpires them with all the 
Motions that tend to the prefervation of our Being, and the augmentation of our Greatneis : 
which makes Men careful to preierve their Reputation, as a Good they have need of, to live con- 
veniently in the World. 

All Men then have an Inclination for Vertue, Science, Honours; and Riches •, and for the Re- 
putation of poffeffing thefe Advantages. We will now make it appear, by fome Inftances, how 
thefe Inclinations may engage us in Errour : and will begin with the Inclination for Vertue, or 
for the Appearance of it. 

Thofe who feriouily labour to become Vertuous, employ moll of their Thoughts and Time in 
the learning Religion, and the exercife of Good Works : They defire, with St. Paul, to know 
only CHRI S T Crucify 'd, the Remedy of the Difeafe, and Corruption of their Nature: They 
with for no more Light than is requifite to their living as becomes Chrijiians, and to difcover 
their Duties : And next they ftudy only to grow fervent and punctual in Devotion ; and fo trouble 
not themfelves with thofe Sciences which feem barren, and infignificant to their Salvation. 

Which Conducl is not to be blam'd, but highly eiteem'd. Happy fhould we think our felves il 
exactly to have ferv'd it, as we repent the not having fufficiently perfii'd it. But what is reprova-^/^^^ 
ble is, That there being undoubtedly Sciences purely Humane, of greateft Certainty as well as7?f gmnti 
Ufe, which take off the Mind from fenfible things, and accuftom or prepare it infenfibly to reUfh/Sj j£.- 
the Truths of the Gofpel : Some pious Perfons too liberally condemn them without Examination,^? 
. as either unprofitable or uncertain. 

True it is, that molt of the Sciences are very uncertain and ufeleis. 'Tis no Miftake, to think 
they contain only very infignificant Truths. No body's oblig'd to ftudy them 5 ; and 'tis better to 
defpife them altogether, than to be charm'd and dazl'd with them. However, we may affirm, 
That the Knowledge of fome Metaphyseal Truths is raoft necefiary. The Knowledge of an Uni- 
verfal Caufe, or of the Exiftence of a GOD, is of indifpenfible neceffity^ fince even the Cer- 
tainty of Faith depends on the Knowledge which Reafon affords of the Exiftence of a GOD: 
We ought to know, that 'tis His Will that conftitutes and governs Nature ; that the Strength 
and Power of Natural Caufes is merely his Will : in a word, that all things depend on GOD all 
manner of ways. 

Again, 'tis neceffary to know what is Truth ; the means to diftinguiffi it from Errour : The 
Diftin&ion betwixt Bodies and Spirits, and the Confequences that may be drawn from it, as the 
Immortality of the Soul, and many others of like nature, which may be infallibly known. 

The Knowledge of Man, or of one's Self, is a Science that cannot reafonably be delpis'd : It is 
ftor'd with infinite things, abfolutely necelTary to be known, in order to an Accuracy and Pene- 
tration of Mind. And if it may be faid, that a grofs and ftupid Man is infinitely fuperiour to 
Matter, becaufe he knows that he exifts, which Matter does not know : Thofe who are acquaint- 
ed with the Nature of Man, are certainty much above the Ignorant and Stupid, becaufe they 
know what they are, which the others don't. 

But the Science of Man does not only merit our Efteem becaufe it exalts us above others, but 
much more for abajing us, and humbling us before GOD. This Science throughly acquaints us 
with the Dependence we have on him in all things, even in our molt, cuftomary Actions : It ma- 
nifeftly difcovers the Corruption of our Nature, difpofes us to have recourfe to him, who alone 
can cure us •, to faften upon him, to diftruft our felves, and quit our Self adherencies and Engage- 
ments : and furnifhes us with feveral other very requifite Difpofitions of Mind, to fit us for the 
Grace of the Gofpel. 

Nor can a fuperficial Tincture, and a general Knowledge, at leaft ofMathematicks and Nature, 
be difpens'd with. Thofe Sciences mould be learn'd when we are young, as dilengaging the 
Mind from things fenfible, and preventing its growing foft and effeminate : they are very ufeful 
to the Conducl: of Life/ and even bring us -to GOD ; the Knowledge of Nature doing it diretfly 
of it felf, and that of Mathematicks collaterally, by the Difguft it infufes, for thefalfe Imprefli- 
ons of the Senfes. 

The Vertuous and Religious would do well not to dif-efteem theie Sciences, nor look on them 
as uncertain or ufelefs, till they are certain they have ftudy'd them fo throughly, that they can 
pafs a found Judgment on them. There are others enough, which they are at liberty to defpife 
as peremptorily as they pleale. They may fentence to the Flames the Heathen Poets and Philofo- 
phers, the Rabbins, with fome Hijlorians, and a multitude of Authors, on whofe Stock many fst 
up for Fame and Learnings and we fhall eafily forgive them. But let them not condemn the 
Knowledge of Nature, as contrary to Religion ; fince Nature being rufd by the Will of GOD, 
the True Knowledge of it gives us to underftand and admire the Divine Power, Greatnefs, and 
Wifdom. For, lalt of all, it is probable that G D has form'd the Univerfe, that Spirits might be 
employ'd in ftudying it ; and by that ftudy be brought to know and reverence its Author* So that 
thofe who condemn the ftudy of Nature, feem to be Oppofers of rhe Will of GOD ; but that they 
would have it thought, that fince the Fall the Humane Mind is incapacitated for that ftudy. Nor let 

Q.q ^ 



icjo F. Malebranche Concerning Book IV, 

it be laid, that the Knowledge concerning Man puffs up the Mind, and fenders it vain and arro- 
gant -, becaufe thofe who are iiippos'd to underftand Humane Nature beft ( though frequently they 
underftand it very little) are intolerably proud and prefumptuous. For 'tis plain, that no Man 
can be well acquainted with himfelf, but he muft be fenfible of his Weaknefs and his Mifery. 
II L " So then it is not true and folid Piety that fo commonly condemns what it does not underftand, 
Of the but rather Superftition and Hypocrifie. The Superftitious, out of a flavifli Fear, and a dejecfiori 
falfe Judg- and timeroufnefs of Spirit, ltart and boggle at a lively and penetrating Wit. Explain to them, 
ments of f or usance, the natural Reafons of Thunder, and its Effects, and you fhall be a reputed Atheift. 
fltthTani But 'Hypocrites, by a diabolical Malignity, transform themfelves into Angels of Light : for they 
H^omtes. employ the appearances of Truths of univerfally facred and rever'd Authority, to withftand, frorrf 
out of partial Interefts, fuch Truths as are rarely known, and of little Reputation. Thus they 
oppugn Truth by her own Image : and whilft they ridicule in their Heart what is reverenc'd by 
the World, they eftablifh their Reputation fo much more deep and impregnable in the Minds of 
Men, as the Truth they have abus'd is more facred and inviolable. 

Such Perfons are the ftrongeft, powerfulleft, and moil formidable Enemies of the Truth. They 
are not indeed very common : but there need be but few to do a world of mifchief The Shew 
■ of Truth and Vertue frequently do more Evil, than Truth and Vertue themfelves do Good. For 
one fubtile Hypocrite is enough to overthrow what coft a great many truly wife and vertuous, 
much labour and pains to build. 
cfVoetius. Monfieur Des Cartes, for inftance, has demonstratively prov'd the Exiftence of a GOD, the Im- 
mortality of our Souls, and a great many other both Metaphyseal and Pbyjica/ Queftions: and 
our Age is under infinite Obligations to him for the Truths he has difcover'd to us. Notwith- 
ftanding, there ftarts up an inconsiderable Perfon, and takes upon him ( being an hot and vehe- 
ment Declamer, and in Efteem with the People for the Zeal he manifefted for their Religion ) to 
compofe Books full of Calumnies againft him, and accufe him of the vileft Crimes. Des Cartes 
was a Catholic k, and was Tutor'd in his Studies by the Jefuits, whom he frequently mention cl 
with an honourable refpecf. This was enough with that malicious Spirit, to perfuade a People, 
oppofite to our Religion, and eafie to be provok'd upon Matters fo nice as thofe of Religion are, 
that he was an Emiffary of the Jefuits, and had dangerous Defigns : becaufe the leaft fhadow of 
Truth in Points of Faith, has more influence on Men's Minds, than real and effective Truths in 
Matters oiPbyficks or Metaphyficks, for which they have little or no regard. Des Cartes wrote 
of the Exiftence of a GOD; and this was fufficient for this Slanderer to exercife his falie Zeal, 
and to opprefs all the Truths that made for his Enemy's Defence. He accus'd him of Atbeifm, 
and of cunningly # and clandestinely teaching it -, like that infamous Atheift Vanino, burn'd at Tou- 
loufe, who, to cover his Malice and Impiety, wrote for the Exiftence of a GOD. For, one of 
the Reafons he alledges for his Enemy's being an Atheift-, was, that he wrote againft the Albeifts, 
as did Vanino, for a cloak to his Villany. 

So eafie is it for a Man to overwhelm Truth, when fupported with the fhews of it, and when 
once he has obtain'd an Authority over weaker Minds. Truth loves Gentlenefs and Peace ; and 
though me be very ftrong, yet fhe fometimes yields to the Pride and Arrogance of Falfhood and a 
Lye, drefs'd up and-arm'd in her own Appearances. She knows that Errour cannot finally prevail 
againft her ; and if it be her Fate fometimes to live profcrib'd and in obfcurity, 'tis only to wait 
more favourable opportunities of manifefting her felf : for fhe generally at laft breaks out in 
greater Strength and Brightnefs, even in the very place of her Oppreffion. 

'Tis no wonder to hear an Enemy of Des Cartes, a Man of a different Religion, and ambitious 
to raife himielf upon the Ruins of Men above him, an injudicious Haranguer ; in a word, a Voetius, 
to talk contemptuouily of what he neither does nor will underftand. But 'tis to be admir'd, that 
fuch as are neither Enemies to Des Cartes, nor his Religion, fhould be poffefs'd with an Averiion 
and Contempt of him, on the account of the Reproaches they have read in Books compos'd by 
the Enemy both to his Perfon and his Church. 

That Heretick's Book, intitled Defperata Caufa Papatus, is a fufficient Proof of his Impudence, 
Ignorance, Outrage, and defire of feeming Zealous, thereby to purchafe a Reputation amongft 
his Flock: which fhews that he's not a Man to be trufted on his Word. For as we are not to 
believe all the fabulous Stories he has heap'd together in his Book againft our Religion ; fo we are 
not to believe, on the ftrength of his Affirmation, thofe bitter and hainoufly injurious Accufations 
he has forg'd againft his Enemy. 

'Tis not then the part of a Rational Man, to enter into a Perfuafion that M. Des Cartes was a 
dangerous Perfon -, becaufe they have, perchance, read it in fome Book, or heard it laid by others, 
whole Piety is awful and refpecfed : for Mens bare words are not to be credited, when they ac- 
cufe others of the higheft Crimes ; nor is the Zeal and Gravity it is fpoken in, fufficient Induce- 
ment to perfuade us of the Truth of it. For, in fhort, 'tis poihble for Folly and Falfhood to 
be fet off in the fame manner as better things, efpecially when the Speaker is won over to the 
Belief of them out of Simplicity and Weaknefs. 

'Tis eafie to be informed of the Truth or Falfhood of the Indiftment drawn up againft M. Des 
Cartes ; his Writings being eafie to come by, and not difficult to be understood by an Attentive 
Perfon. Let a Man therefore read his Books, that better Evidence may be had againft him than a 
bare Hear-Jay ; and after he has well read them, and digefted them, it may be hop'd the Plea of 
Atbeifm will be thrown out, and on the contrary, all due Refpeft and Deference paid to a Man, 

who 



Chap. VII. The Search after Truth. i&i 

who in a molt fimple and evident manner has demonftrated not only the Exiftence of a GOD, 
and the Immortality of the Soul, but a great number of other Truths, that till his time were 
never thought on. 



CHAP. VII. 

0/" fta Dejire of Science, and of the Judgments of the falfly Learned. 

TH E Mind of Man is doubtlefs of a little Reach and Capacity, and yet he longs to know 
every thing : All Humane Sciences are unable to fatisfie his Defires, though he has not room 
to comprehend any one in particular. He is conftantly difquieted, and impatient for Knowledge, 
either becaufe he hopes to find what he feeks for, as we have faid in the foregoing Chapters ; or, 
becaufe he is perfuaded that his Soul is agrandiz'd by the vain poffeflion of fome extraordinary 
Knowledge. 

The irregular Defire of Happinefs and Greatnefs, puts him upon the Study of all Sciences, ho- 
ping to find Happinefs in moral, and looking for that falfe Greatnefs in fpeculative Knowledge. 

Whence comes it, that there are Men who fpend their Life in Reading the Rabbins, and iiich 
like Books, written in foreign, obfcure, and corrupt Languages, by injudicious and fenflels Au- 
thors j but from a Perliiafion that the Knowledge of the Oriental Tongues gives them a wonderful 
Lift and Exaltation above others that know nothing of them ? and what can bear up their Courage 
under lb ungrateful, unpleafant, painful, and ufelefs a Study, but the hope of Eminency, and the 
profpecl: of fome vain Greatnefs ? And indeed, they are look'd upon as extraordinary Men : they 
are complemented upon their profound Learning-, they are more awfully liftned to than others: 
and though we may, for the moft part, pronounce them the molt injudicious of all, if it were 
only for wafting their Life on fo inhgnificant a Bufinefs, which can neither make them wifer nor 
happier ; yet they are fuppos'd to have greater Senfe and Judgment than others : Becaufe they are 
more knowing in the Derivation of Words, we think them more learn'd in the Nature pf Things. 

'Tis for the lame Reafon that AJironomers employ their Time and Fortune to get an accurate 
Knowledge of what's not only ufelefs, but impoflible to be known : They would find in the 
Courles of the Planets fuch an exaft Regularity, as does not belong to them;, and erecl: Agrono- 
mical Schemes to foretel EfFe£ts, the Caufes whereof they do not know. They have fram'd a 
Selenography, or Geography, of the Moon, as if Men defign'd to travel thither ; and have already 
lhar'd that World amongft the molt famous AJironomers : few of them but are awarded fome 
Province in this Country, as a Recompence for their Labours : And I queftion whether they think 
it not a piece of Honour to have been in the good Graces of him who fo magnificently diftribu- 
ted thefe Kingdoms. 

What makes Rational Men fo hot in the Study, of this Science, whilft at the fame time they are 
grofly ignorant as to molt ufefiil Truths, but that there feems to be fomething great in the Know- 
ledge of Heavenly Tranfacfions : The Knowledge of the lealt thing happening in the Upper 
World, feems more Noble, Sublime, and befitting the Greatnefs of their Mind, than the Know- 
ledge of things vile, abjecl, and corruptible, as they think Sublunary Bodies. The Excellency of 
a Science, derives from the Excellency of its Ob jetl '. This is a notable Principle! The Knowledge 
of the Motion of Inchangeable and Incorruptible Bodies, is therefore molt noble and elevated of 
all other-, and as fuch, feems worthy of the Greatnefs and Excellency of their Mind. 

Thus it is Men fuffer themfelves to bedazled with a falfe Idea of -Greatnefs, which flatters 
and excites them. The Imagination Itruck, falls down before the Phantom, which it reverences, 
to the blinding Reafon that mould judge of it, and turning it upfide down. Men feem to be in 
a Dream, -when they judge of the Objects of their Paffions ; to have their Eyes feal'd up, and to be 
deltitute of common Senfe. For what is there of fo great Importance in the Knowledge of the 
Motions of the Planets ? Don't we know enough already to regulate our Months and Years ? Why 
fo much ado, to know whether Saturn is incircled with a Ring, or a great multitude of Little 
Moons ? and why mult we make Parties hereupon ? What Reafon is there for a Man ro boalt him- 
felf upon the Prediction of the Greatnefs of an Eelipfe I when poflibly the Succefs was owing 
only to a luckier Guefs. There are Men appointed and encourag'd by the Royal Order to obferve 
the Stars -, let us fit down content with their Obfervations. This Employment they follow with 
Reafon, becaufe they engage in it by Duty : It is their proper Bufinefs ; and therefore their La- 
bours are fuccefsful, as grounded upon Art, and carried on with all imaginable Accuracy and 
Application ; and they want nothing to promote their Endeavours. Thns we ought to be fully 
fatisfy'd as to a Matter that concerns us fo little, whilft they communicate to us their Difco- 
veries. 

'Tis requifite that many Perfons ftudy Anatomy, fince its Knowledge is exceeding ufeful •, that 
Knowledge being moft to be defir'd which has moft Life and Advantage. Whatever contributes 
any thing to our Happinefs, or rather to the eafing our Infirmities, and mitigating ourMiferies, 
may, and mult be ftudied. But to be prying whole Nights at the end of a Telefcope, to difccver 
in the Heavens fome Spot, or new Planet or other -, to ruin a Man's Health and Happinefs, to' 
neglect all his Bufinefs, that he may pay conftant Vifits to the Staff) and meafuie their Magni- 
tudes' 



i $2 F. Malebranche Concerning Book IV. 

tudes and Situations, is, in my mind, entirely to forget both what a Man is at prefent, and what 
he fhall be hereafter. 

. But you'll fay perhaps, that this manifeits the Greatnefs of him who made thefe mighty Ob- 
jects : To which I fay, That the leaf Fly fhews forth the Power and Wifdom of GOD, to thofe 
who attentively confider it without prejudice to its Littlenefs, more than all that the Afironomers 
know concerning the Heavens • Yet Men are not made to confider Flies •, and we think their pains 
but ill employ'd, who have ftudied to inform us how the feveral Lice of every refpe&ive Ani- 
mal are made, and how different Worms are transform'd into Flies and Butter-flies. They may, 
if they pleafe, for their diverfion, when they have nothing elfe to do, bufie themfelves about 
thefe things : but they ought not to fpend their whole time upon them, unlefs they are become 
infenfible to their mileries. 

But it lies upon them to be inceffantly endeavouring to know GOD and themfelves, to labour 
ferioufly to get rid of their Errours and Prejudices, of their Pafhons, and Inclinations to Sin ; to 
be importunate in the fearch of Truths moft needful for them: for at laft thofe. fhall be found to 
be moft judicious, who are moft careful in the Enquiry after the folideft Truths. 

The principal Caufe which engages Men in thefe falfe Studies, is, their having conjoin'd the 
Idea of Learned to thefe vain and unfruitful Sciences, inftead of annexing it to the fblid and ne- 
ceifary. When once a Man has the Thoughts of growing Learned in his Head, and the Spirit of 
- Polimathy begins to work, he is little concern'd to know what Sciences are moft neceilary, either 
to guide him by the Rules of Vertue, or to perfect his Reafon: he only fixes his Eye on fuch as 
go for the Learned in the World, and obferves what they have in them that makes them fo confi- 
derable. All the moft folid and neceifary Sciences being of common and eafie accefs, can neither 
■ make their PoiTeftbrs admir'd nor refpe£ted : for common things, however fine and admirable in 
themfelves, are carelefly and fupinely regarded •, which makes the Pretenders to Learning, dwell 
but little on Sciences neceifary to the Conduct of Life, and the Perfe&ion of the Mind. For 
thefe raife not in them that Idea of the Sciences which they had form'd, as not being thofe they 
admir'd in, others, and which they would have others to admire in them. - 

The Go/pel, and Morality, are Sciences too common and ordinary for them: they love to be 
skill'd in the Criticifms of fome words to be met with in the Ancient VbiloJ ophers or Greek Poets. 
The Tongues, as Arabick and Rabbinage, and all except their genuine native Language, feem wor- 
thy their Study and Application : If they read the Holy Scriptures, 'tis not to learn Piety and Re- 
ligion ; but, Points of Chronology and Geography, and Difficulties of Grammar, take them wholly 
up : and they are more earned to know thefe things, than the falutary Truths of the Gotpel : they 
aim at the polfeflion of the Science they have foolifhly admir'd in others ; and for which they are 
likely to be admifd by other Pools in their turn. 

'Tis fo with them in point of Natural Knowledge -, not the moft Ufeful, but the leaft Com- 
mon, is their Beloved. Anatomy is too mean and low for them -, but Aftronomy is more noble and 
exalted. Ordinary Experiments are unworthy their Application •, but thofe rare and wonderful Ex- 
periments which can never inftru£l us, are thofe they moft carefully obferve. 

Hifiories that are the moft Rare and Ancient, they glory to know : and whilft they are igno- 
rant of the Genealogy of Princes that at prefent Reign, are diligent in fearching for the Pedigree* 
of thofe who died four thoufand Years ago. They fcorn to learn the moft common Hifiories of 
their own Times, yet endeavour to be critically skill'd in the fables and Fitfions of the Poets. 
They know not fo much as their own Relations -, yet will, if you defire it, cite feveral Authorities 
to prove that a Citizen of Rome was allied to an Emperour: and a great many other fuch things. 

Hardly can they tell the Names of the common Garments in prefent life, yet bufie their Heads 
to know what were in wear with the old Greeks and Romans. Their own Country Animals they 
are ignorant of; while they grudge not to fpend feveral Years in cofnpofing huge Volumes on the 
Creatures of Scripture -, that they may feem to have a better guefs than others at the Signification 
of unknown Terms : Such a Book is the Hearts-delight of its Author, and of its learn'd Readers 5 
for being patch'd up of Greek, Hebrew, and Arabick Paffages, &c. of Rabbinical and fuch like 
dark and extraordinary Citations; itfatisfies the Vanity of its Author, and the ridiculous Curio- 
fity of thofe that read it, who fancy themfelves learneder than others, when they can confidently 
affirm there are fix different Words in Holy Writ fignifying a Lion, or the like. 

They commonly underftand not the Map of their own Country, or even the Model of their 
Town, whilft they ftudy the Geography of Ancient Greece, Italy, of the Gauls in Julius C<efar''s 
Time, or of the Streets and publick Places of old Rome. Labor fiidtorum, fays the Wife-man, 
affligct eos qui nefciunt in urbem pergere. They know not the way to their City, yet are foolifh- 
ly fatigu'd with fruitlefs Enquiries : They know not the Laws or Cuftoms of the Places where they 
live, yet carefully ftudy the Ancient Right, the Laws of the Twelve 'Tables, the Cuftoms of the 
Lacedemonians, or of the Chinefe, or the Ordinances of the Great Mogul. Laftly, they would 
know whatever's Rare, Extraordinary, and Remote, and unknown by others, having by an Over- 
throw of Reafon affix'dthe Idea of Learning to thefe things: whilft to be efteem'd Learned, 'tis 
enough to know what others know not, and yet be ignorant of the belt and moft neceifary Truths. 
True, the Knowledge of all thefe things, and the like, is call'd Science, Erudition, Dottrine ; Ufe 
will have it fo : But there is a Science which the Scripture ftiles Folly : Doffrina fiultorum fatui* 
tas. I never yet obferv'd that the Holy Spirit, which beftows fo many Elogies on Science, in Sa- 
cred Writ fays any thing in Commendation of that falfe Science I have been fpeaking of 

CHAP. 



Chap.VIIf. . The Search after Truth. t$$ 






GHAP. VIII. 

I. Of the Defire of feeming Learned. II. Of the Cotwerfation of the Faljly 
Learned. III. Of their Works. 

IF the immoderate Defire of Growing Learned makes Men oftentimes more ignorant, the De- L 
fire of being thought fo, not only renders them more ignorant, but feems to give a total Subver«0f '*f D ^ 
fion to their Reafon. For the World abounds with fuch as lofe common Senfe, becaufe they wi\U' re f^,' 
out-Jhoot it^ and (peak nothing but filly things, becaufe they will fpeak only in Paradox. They'" 5 mn " 
deviate fo far from, the common Thoughts of Mankind, whilft they purpofe the acquiring the 
Character of Rare and Extraordinary Wits, that they effectively gain their point, and are never 
confider'd without much Admiration or Contempt. 

They are regarded with Admiration, when being rais'd to fome Preferment or Honour, which 
conceals them, we fancy them as much above others in their Parts and Learning, as they are by 
their Vitality and Birth. But we frequently make a very different Eftimate, when viewing them 
near at hand, and drawing the Curtain of their furrounding Grandeur, we find them contempti- 
ble, or even Fools and Changelings. 

The Falfly Learn'd (hew themfelves manifeftly in the Books they write, asalfo in their ordina- 
ry Converfation. It will not, perhaps, be amifs to give a proof of it. 

As it is Vanity, and Defire of Oftentation, which engages them in their Studies •, fo when they tt 
find themfelves in Company, the Paflion and Defire of Preheminency. re-kindles and tranfports °ff e . Con f 
them. They are inftantly fo high upon the Wing, that we lofe fight of them ; nor can they ol^jfjff 
ten themfelves tell where they are. They.are fo fearful of not being above all their Auditors^ that Learn d. 
they are yex'd to think any one can teach them : they" will ftomach the Demand of an Explica- 
tion, and upon the leaft oppofition put on the Look of Scorn and Arrogance. In brief, The things 
they lay are fo novel, and extraordinary, and fo remote from common Senfe, that. the Wife have 
much ado to hold from laughing, while the Ignorant are ftunh'd and thunder-ftruck. 

The firft Heat being over, if any Man of an Head ftrong, and fettl'd enough not to be over- . 
turn'd, (hews that they are out, they will however ftick obftinately to their Errours : the very 
Look of their confused and giddied Hearers, turns their own Head round , and the fight of fo ma- 
ny Approvers, which they have convinc'd by the Imprefnon, convinces, them by rebound $ at leaft, 
if it does not convince them, it flumes them with. Courage to maintain their falfe Opinions. 
Their Vanity will not fuffer them to make any Retraction : they conftantly invent fome Reafon 
for their Defence. They never fpeak with greater. Fervency and Zeal, than when they have no- 
thing to fay. They fancy it an Affront, and a Defign to make them delpicable, to offer any Rea- 
fon againft them : and the ftronger and more judicious it is, the more it provokes their Pride 
and Averfion. 

The bed way to defend Truth againft them, is, not to difpute it : for, 'tis bette? both for theni 
and. us to leave them to their Errours than provoke their Hatred. We muft take care not to wound 
their Heart, when we would heal their Mind ; the Wounds of the former being more dangerous 
than thofe of the latter : befide that, we fometimes fortune to have to do with a Perfon trulv 
Learned, whom 'tis poffible we may deipife, for want of rightly taking his Conceptions. We 
muft therefore requeft of thofe who talk in fo decifive a Strain, to explain themfelves as diftincl:- 
ly as they can, without fuffering them to change the Subject, or make ufe of obfcure and equi- 
vocal Terms : and if they be truly Learned, fomething may be got by their Difcourfe. But if 
they be falily Learned, they will quickly be entangled and confounded by their own Words, and 
can thank no body for it but themfelves. And even from hence we may, perhaps, receive fome 
Inftruft ion or Diverfion, if we may be allow'd to divert our felves with others Infirmities, wheri 
we try to cure them. But what is more confiderable, we (hall prevent the weaker fort, who hear 
them with Admiration, frorh engaging in Errour, by following their Decifions. 

For it muft be obferv'd, that Fools, or fuch as are Machinally manag'd, and follow fenfible Im- 
preffions, being far more numerous than Men of an enlarg'd Thought, artd governable by Reafon; 
one of thefe Pretenders cannot dictate and determine upon a Point, but there always are more who 
believe him on his Word, than others who diftruft him. But becaufe thefe falily Learn'd recede 
as far as poffible from common Thoughts: either out of a defire of finding an Opponent, whom 
they roughly handle, to elevate and (hew themfelves -, or a Subverfion of Mind, and Spirit of 
Contradiction : their Decifions are, for the moft part, falfe or obfcure, and they are feldom at- 
tended to, without drawing the Contagion of Errour. 

Now the Method of diicovering the Corruptnefs or Solidity of others Opinions, is very diffi- 
cultly put in practice. The Reafon whereof is, That thefe Pretenders to Science are not the on- 
ly Perfons who would be thought to know every thing : ; Tis a Failing almolt univerfal ; . but more 
efpecially incident to Men of fome Reading and Study : which makes them always forward td 
talk, and explain their own Notions ; but negligent and inadvertent as to other mens. Such as arg 
moft Complaifant and Rational, inwardly delpifing another's Opinion, make (hew only of an' 
Attentive Meen, whilft their Eyes betray their Thoughts, and (hew that they are bufied upon a 

R x quite . 



i 54 P. M A J- E b R a n c h e Concerning Book IV. 

quite contrary thing •> not on anfwering what is faid to them, but on what they defire to prove : 
which is the thing that frequently renders Converfation fo difagreeable. For as there is nothing 
more grateful, or wherein a Man could honour us more, than the comprehending our Reafons 
and approving our Opinions ; fo there is nothing fo offenfive as to fee others not take, nor care to 
take our Meaning. For 'tis no pleafure to talk and converfe with Statues ; efpecially Statues that 
are only fo to us, becaufe they have little Efteem for us, are carelefs to pleaie us, and follicitous 
only to content themfelves, by recommending their own Abilities. But if Men could hear, and 
anfwer well at once, Difcourfe would be molt ufeful, as well as pleafant : whereas whilft every 
one endeavours to be reputed Learned, all that's got by it is Conceitednefs, and unintelligible Dif- 
putes. Charity is fometimes wounded, and Truth feldom diicovered. 

But the Ramblings which the Faljly Learned, are in their Converfation fubjett to, are in fome 
meafure excufable. It may be faid in their behalf, that in thefe Difcourfes Men ufe not much 
Caution and Advertency ^ and that the niceft and moft judicious fall frequently into Trifles and 
Impertinencies : and that they don't intend a Collect ion mould be made of their Sayings, as was 
piScalige^s and Cardinal du Perrons. 

There is Reafon in thefe Excufes, and we are eafie to believe thefe Faults deferve fome fort of 
Indulgence. We are indeed willing to talk in Company •, but there are fome unfortunate Seafons, 
in which we but ill fucceed. We are not always in temper to think, or to fpeak juftly : and 
the time is fo fhort in fome Conjunctures, that the Mind never fo little clouded or abfent, mife- 
rably falls into extravagant Abfurdities, even in PerfOns moft accurate and piercing. 

But though the Faults which the Fallly Learned are guilty of in Converfation, are excufable - y 
yet thofe they commit in their Books, after due Thinking and Confederation, are unpardonable 5 
efpecially if frequent, and not .compenfated by fome good things : For by writing an ill Book, 
a Man occafions lofs of time to a multitude of Readers^ lubjetts them to the fame Errours he him- 
felf is guilty of, and caufes them to deduce ftill many others from them : which is not a little 
Evil. 

But though it be a greater Crime than is imagined, to compofe an Evil, or only an Vfelefs 
Book ; yet the Author is oftner rewarded than punijh'd for it. For fome Crimes there are which 
efcape the Lam, either becaufe they are the Fafhion, or becaufe the Judges are not courageous 
enough to condemn fuch Criminals as they think more Ingenious than themfelves. 

For Authors are commonly look'd on as rare and extraordinary Perfons, above the ordinary fize 
of Men ; and therefore are reverenc'd inftead of being defpis'd and punifh'd. So that there is 
little hopes of having a Tribunal erected for the trying and condemning all the Books that tend 
only to 'debauch and corrupt Reafon. 

And for this Reafon, we muft never expect to have the Republick of Learning better govern'd 
than any other ; as confifting of Men no lefs than the reft. But in order to free our felves from 
Errour, 'tis fit that even greater Liberty be permitted in this than other Republicks, where Novel- 
ty is always dangerous. For it would be a means to confirm us in our prefent Errours, to rob 
the Literate World of its Liberty, and indifferently to condemn all forts of Novelties. 

'Tis hop'd then, I fhall not be blam'd for fpeaking againft the Government of the Learned Com- 
monwealth, and endeavouring to mew, that frequently the Great Men of it, who for their pro- 
found Learning are the Admiration of the reft, are at bottom but haughty and vain Creatures, 
void of Judgment, and all true Science. I am oblig'd to ufe this freedom of Speech, to prevent 
a blindfold Submiflion to their Decifions, and engaging in their Errours. 
ill. The Proofs of their Vanity, their want of Judgment, and of their Ignorance, are evidently de- 

°f t} * duc'd from their own Works : For if a Man would take the pains to examine them with purpofe 
the Fatly t0 J U( *S e °f tnem ty the Light of common Senfe, un-foreftalFd with an Efteem for thefe Authors, 
Leaned, he might find that the Defigns of their Studies are moftly fuch as an injudicious Vanity has for- 
med, and their principal End, not the perfecting their Reafon j and much lefs the regulating the 
Motions of their Heart -, but only the puzzling others, and feeming Wifer Men than they. 

From this Profpect it is (as has been faid before) that they treat but of rare and unufual Sub- 
jects, and explain themfelves in as rare and unufual Terms, and quote only rare and extraordi- 
nary Authors. They difdain to write in their own Language, as being too common ; or in plain, 
perfpicuous, and eafie Latin, fince their Defign is, not to be Underftood, but only to Write, and 
to be Admir'd. They feldom apply themfelves to Subjects that are ferviceable to the manage- 
ment of Life •, that's too trite and vulgar : it not being their purpofe to be ufeful to others, or 
themfelves, but only to be reputed Learned. 

They either alledge no Reafons of things which they advance \ or if they do, they are fo my- 
fterious and incomprehenfible, as neither themfelves, nor any body elfe, can evidently conceive. 
Clear Reafons they have none •, but if they had, they would not ufe them : becaufe they fur- 
prize not the Mind, are thought too fimple and common, and fuited to the Abilities of all Man- 
kind. They rather bring Authorities to prove, or with pretence to prove their Notions : for the 
Authorities employ'd feldom prove any thing by the Senfe they contain, but only by being Greek 
and Arab'ich But perhaps it will be pertinent to fpeak fomething of their Quotations, which will , 
acquaint us in part with the difpofition of their Mind. 

It is, methinKs, manif eft "that nothing but a falily-term'd Learning, and a Spirit of Pol\mathy y 
could bring thefe Citations into fafhion, as they have formerly been, and are Itill at this day with 
fome of the Learned. For 'tis ufual with fome Authors to be perpetually quoting long Senten- 
ces, without any Reafon for it ; whether becaufe the things they advance are too clear to be 

doubted 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. . i ei 

doubted of; or that they are too intricate and obfeure to be made out by the Authority of their 
Authors-, fince they could know nothing of them: or laftly, becaufe the Citations inferted are in- 
ferviceable to adorn and beautifie their Difcourfe. 

'Tis repugnant to common Sehfe, to bring a Greek Pafjage to prove the Air tranfparent, becaufe 
'tis evident to all the World •, to employ the Authority of Ariftotle to perfilade us that Intelli- 
gences move the Heavens, becaufe we are certain Ariftotle could not know it; and laftly, to min- 
gle ftrange Languages, Arabian and Ferfian Proverbs with French, Englijh, or Latin Books, writ- 
ten for every body : iorafmuch as thefe Citations cannot be ornamental ; at leaft, 'are fuch fanta- 
Iticai Ornaments as difguft rnoft Perfons, and can fatisfie but very few. 

Neverthelefs, the greateft part of thole who would fain be thought Learned, are fo extream- 
ly pleased with this kind of GibbriJJ), that they blufli not to quote in ftrange Tongues which they 
do not underitand ; and tug might and main to draw into their Books an Arabick PaiTage, which 
they cannot fo much as read. Thus they puzzle themfelves ftrangely, to effect a thing repugnant 
to good Senfe; but that facrifices to their Vanity, and makes them efteem'd by Sots. 

One very confiderable Fault is ftill behind $ which is, that they are but in little care to feem 
to have read with Choice and Judgment : all they defire being, to be reckon'd great Readers, efpe- 
cially of obfeure Books, that they may feem more Learned; of Books that are fcarce and dear, 
that they may be thought to have every thing ; of wicked and impious Books ( which honeft 
Men are afraid to read ) with much the fame Spirit as fome boaft to have afred Crimes, which" 
others dare not. Hence they rather cite very Dear, very Rare, very Ancient and Obfeure Books, 
than other more Common and Intelligible : Aftrological, Cabaliflical, and Magical, Books, than 
fuch as are good and wholefome: as if they did not fee, that Reading being a kind of Con- 
verjing, they mould rather defire to feem induftrioufly to have fought the Acquaintance of Good 
and Intelligible, than Wicked and Obfeure Authors. 

For, as no Man in his Senfes would chufe out for ordinary Converfe People that want an Inter- 
preter, when the fame things that are to be learn'd of them might be known another way ; fo 'tis 
ridiculous to read Books not to be underftood without a Di&ionary, when the fame things may- 
be had in thofe that are more intelligible. And, as it is a fign of a deprav'd Nature, to affect 
the Company and Converfation of the Impious-, fo 'tis the Criterion of a corrupt Heart, to delight 
in reading Wicked Books. But 'tis an extravagant Pride, for a Man to pretend to have read thofe 
which he has not: which yet is a thing of very common occurrence. For we find Men of Thirty 
Years (landing, quote more ill Books in their Works, than they could have read in many Ages : 
whilft they would have others believe, they have very exa&ly read them. But rnoft of the Books 
of fome of thefe Learned Gentlemen, owe their Birth to the kind Dictionary, and all their Read- 
ing may be redue'd to the Indexes of the Books they quote, and lome Common Places heap'd to- 
gether from out of different Authors. 

I venture not to enter into the Particulars of thefe things, nor to give Inftances to prove them ; 
for fear of provoking Perfons fo fierce and cholerick as thefe Learned Pretenders, as not caring to 
be revil'd in Greek and Arabick. Befides that, 'tis needlefs more fenfibly to evince what I have 
faid by 'particular Allegations, the Mind of Man being ready enough to tax the Management of 
others, and make particular Application of this Difcourfe. In the meantime, let them hug 
themfelves, and feed upon this vain Fantom of Greatnefs ; and give one another the Applaufes 
which we deny them. For we have been, perhaps, already too troublefome, by rnolefting them 
in their fo feemingly fweet and grateful Enjoyments. 



CHAP. IX. 

How the Inclination for Honours and Riches conduces to Errour. 

HOnours and Riches, no lefs than Vertue and Science, which we have already fpoke of, are 
principal Acquirements to give us the Attendant over other Men. For there feems to ac- 
crue to our Being a Growth and Enlargement, and kind of Independency from the PofTeffion of 
thefe Advantages. So that the Love we have for our felves, naturally ftreaming out to Honours 
and Riches, every body may be faid to have fome fort of Inclination for them. We will explain 
in brief, how thefe Inclinations obviate the Difcovery of Truth, and engage us in Falftiood and 
Errour; 

It has been ffiewn in feveral places, that much Time and Labour, Afiiduity and Contention of 
Mind, muft go to the clearing up Compound Truths, furrounded with Difficulties, and depend- 
ing on many Principles. Whence it is eafie to conclude, that Men ofpublick Characters, of great 
Employments, who have large Eftates . to look after, and great Affairs to manage, and whofe 
Hearts "are fix'd upon Riches and Honours, are not the fitteft Enquirers after Truth; and that they 
commonly err in point of all things, difficultly known whenever they pretend to judge of them ; 
And that becaufe, 

Firft, They have little time to lay out in the Search of Truth* 

Secondly, Thev take but little Pleafure in this Search* 

• J Thirdly, 



1^6 F. M A LEER AN CHE ConUtning Book IV. 

Thirdly, They are very incapable of Attention, becaufe the Capacity of their Mind is divided 
by the multitude of the Ideas of the things they wifti for j which take up their Thoughts whether 
they will or no. 

In the fourth place, They fancy they know every thing, andean hardly be indue'd to believe 
their Inferiours have more Reafon than themfelves : fome Matters of Faclt they may vouchfafe to 
learn of them, but ate above being taught by them folid and neceffary Truths : contradict them, 
or difabufe them, and they fly but in a Paffion. 

In the fifth. place, Becaufe much Incenfe of Applaufe is ufually given them in all their Imagi- 
nations, though never fo falfe and remote .from common Senfe-, and fiich as differ from their* 
Opinion, though only to defend undeniable Truths, are rally'd and ridicul'd : And 'tis the fulfome 
Flatteries of thofe about them, that ftrengthen them in their Errours, encourage that illegitimate 
Efteem of themfelves, and fet them up for unappealable Judges of all things. 

In the fixth place, They dwell only upon Serifible Notions, as fitter for common Converfation, 
and to keep up the Efteem of Men, than the pure and abftraft Ideas of the Mind, which we 
employ in the finding out of Truth. . . 

Laftly, Thofe Who afpire to any Dignity, ftrive, as much as poffible, to accommodate and de- 
mean themfelves to the Meafure and Capacity of others j becaufe nothing provokes Mens Envy 
and Averfion like the pretending to uncommon Notions. Rare it is for Men, whofe Minds and 
Hearts are taken up with the Thoughts and Defires of making their Fortunes, to be able to difco- 
ver hidden Truths : but when they do, they abdicate them out of Intereft, and becaufe theDefence 
of them will not accord with their Arhbition. A Man muft fide commonly with Injujiice to be- 
come a Magifirate: Solid and uncommon Piety is a frequent Bar to a Benefice ^ and the generous 
Love of Truth, often deprives Men of the Pulpit it mould be taught in. 

All thefe Reafons in conjunction, extremely fubjecl: Men to Errour ■„ and incapacitate, for the 
Difcovery of occult Truths, fuch as are exalted above others by their Honours, Birth, and For- 
tune, or who are only intent upon making Eftablifhments, and railing Eftates. For among the 
things that are requifite to the avoiding Errour^ in Queftions any Whit ahftrufe, there are two 
especially not eafie to be met with in the Perfons foremention'd •, viz. Attention of Mind, to go 
to the bottom of Things-, and Retention, not to judge of them with too much Precipitation* 
Thofe very Men who are Ele&ed for the Inftrufting others, and who mould have no other Aim 
or Intereft, than the qualifying themfelves for that purpofe, commonly grow Erroneous as foon as 
they take Publick Employments : either becaufe having but little time to themfelves, they cannot 
give Attention and Application to things that require much ; or, that being ftrangely ambitious of 
being thought Learned, they confidently pronounce of all things without Referve, and are impa- 
tient either of Oppofition or Inftru&ion. 



CHAP. X. 

Of the Love of Pleafure, with regard to Morality. I. That Pleafure is to 
be fhunrid, though it mahg us happy. II. It ought not to carry us to the 
loving Senfible Goods. 

WE have treated in the three laft Chapters, of the Inclination we have for the Prefervation 
of our Being -, and fhewn how it occafions us to fall into feveral Errours. We (hall now 
fpeak to That we have for our Well-being ; that is, for Pleafures, and whatever makes us more 
happy or content, or is thought capable of doing it : And we will attempt to difcover the Errors 
that lpring from this Inclination. 

There is a Tribe of Philofopbers, that endeavour to perfuade the World, That Pleafure is no 
Good, nor Pain an Evil; that 'tis poffible to be happy in the midft of moft violent Pains, and mi- 
ferable in the midft of the greateft Pleafures. As thefe Philofopbers are very Pathetical and Ima- 
ginative, they carry away weak Minds which give way to the Impreffion their Difcourfe produces 
in them : For the Stoicks are fomewhat Vifionar y, and Vifionifts are vehement ; and fo eafily im- 
print on others the falfe Sentiments they are themfelves prepoffefs'd with. But becaufe there is 
no Conviilion againft Experience, and internal Confidence, or Senfation ; all thefe pompous and 
magnificent Reafons, which dazle and ftagger the Imaginations of Men, vanifh with all their 
Gaudery and Luftre, as foon as the Soul is touch'd with any fenfible Pleafure and Pain. And thofe 
who have plac'd all their Confidence in this falfe Perfuafion of their Mind, find themfelves, up- 
on the leaff Aflault of Vice, deftitute of Wifdom, forcelefs, and unnerv'd: they are fenfible they 
were deceiv'd, and find they are vanquifh'd. 
L If the Philofopbers cannot give their Difciples Strength to Conquer their PaJJjons, they fhould 

pleafure at leaft forbear to feduce them, and make them fancy they have no Enemies to Afj'ault. Things 
"omnJdty ^ 10ulci b . e *P°ken as they are : Pleafure is always a Good, and Pain always an Evil : But it is not 
it mutes w always for our Good, to enjoy Pleafure ^ and 'tis fometimes advantageous to fufter Pain. 
haw. But to make my Meaning more intelligible, we muft know, 

Firft, 



Chap. X. the Search after Truth, i^j 

Firft, That none but GOD is powerful enough to act upon us, and to produce in us the Senfe 
of Pleafure and Pain. For 'tis manifeft to every Man that confults his Reafon, and defpifes the 
Reports of Senfe, that 'tis not the Senfible Objects that really act upon us, nor is it any more the 
Soul that produces in her felf her Pain and Pleafure occafwnally from them. , ., 

Secondly, That in ordinary Procedure no Good is to be given, but to encourage us to, or rer 
compence us for fome good Action ; nor any Evil to be afflicted, but either to prevent a wicked 
Action, or to punifh it-, and therefore fince GOD always acts with Order, and by the Rules of 
Jultice, every Pleafure rauft incline us to fome Good. Attion, or Reward us for it, and every Pain 
avert us from fome bad Atfion, or punifh us for it. , . 

Thirdly, There are Alliens which are good in one fenfe, and evil in another. 'Tis, for inftanceV ' 
an evil Action to expofe ones felf to Death when GOD forbids it ; but a good, when, he com- 
mands it. For all our Actions are good or bad, becaufe GOD has commanded or forbidden them 
by his firft General Will, which is the Order and Injlitution of Nature ; or by his other Wills or 
particular Commandments, which are neceiTary to its re-eftablifhment. 

I affirm then, That Pleafure is always good, but that it is not always advantageous to enjoy it 5 
and that firit, Becaufe initead of engaging us to him, who alone is capable of caufing it ; it dif- 
engages us from him, to unite us to the falfly feeming Caufe of it: it loofens us from GOD, to 
unite us to a vile Creature. For though thofe whom true Philofopby has enlightned, think fome- 
times that Pleafure is not caus'd by External Objects, which may in fome meafure incline them to 
the acknowledging and loving GOD in all things ; yet fince the Sin, the Reafon of Man is fo 
feeble, and his Senfes and Imagination fo prevalent over his Mind that they fpeedily corrupt his 
Heart, whilft he deprives not himfelf, according to the Advice of the Gofpel, of whatever leads 
not of it felf to GOD. For the bell Philofopby is unable to cure the Mind, and withftand the 
Corruptions of Pleafure. 

Secondly, Becaufe Pleafure being a Reward, it is an Act of Injuftice for a Man to produce in 
his Body thofe Motions which oblige- GOD, purfuant to his firft Will, to give us the Senfation 
of Pleafure, when we don't deferve it ; either becaufe the Action we do is unprofitable, or crimi- 
nal •, or that being full of Sin, we have no Right to demand a Recompence. The Enjoyment of 
Senfible Pleafures was juftly due to Man in his Regular Actions, whilft he remain'd Innocent. But 
fince the Fall, there are no Senfible Pleafures entirely innocent, or incapable of harming us when 
we tafte them. For it is commonly fufficient only to tafte them, to become their Slave. 

Thirdly, GOD being Juft, cannot chufe but punifh one day the Violence that was done him, 
by obliging him to reward with Pleafure criminal Actions committed againft him. When our 
Soul fhall be dif-united from our Body, GOD will be difpens'd from the Obligation he has im- 
pos'd upon himfelf of giving Senfations anfwerable to the Motions of the Animal Spirits ; but he 
will ftill be oblig'd to fatisfie his Juftice : and fo that will be the feafon of his Wrath and Venge- 
ance. Then though he change not the Order of Nature, but remain ever fix'd and immutable 
in his firft Will, he will punifh the unmerited Pleafures of the Voluptuous with Pains that will 
never have an end. 

Fourthly, Becaufe the Certainty we have in this Life of the future Execution of that Juftice^ 
exagitates the Mind with dreadful Anxieties, and throws it into a fort of Defpair, which renders 
the Voluptuous miferable, even amidft the greateft Pleafures. 

Fifthly, Becaufe of thofe difquieting Remorfes, which almoft ever attend the molt Innocent 
Pleafures, by reafon we are inwardly convinced we don't deferve them : which Remorfes rob us 
of a certain internal Joy that is found even in the Severities of Repentance. 

And therefore though Pleafure be a Good, yet it muft be acknowledg'd, that the Enjoyment of 
it is not always to our Advantage, for the foregoing Reafons : And for others of like nature, molt 
requifite to be known, and eafily deducible from them-, it muft be granted, that it is molt com- 
monly highly advantageous to fuffer Pain, though really an Evil. 

Neverthelefs, every Pleafure is a Good, and actually makes happy the Enjoyer at the time of 
Enjoyment, and fo long as he enjoys it i and every Pain is an Evil, and makes the Sufferer actually 
unhappy at the inftant of fuffering, and fo much as he fuffers it. The Righteous and Holy may- 
be faid to be the molt miferable of all Men in this Life, and molt worthy of Companion. Si in 
vita tantum in Cbrifio fperamus, miferabiliores fumus omnibus bominibus, fays St. Paul. For thofe i Cor. 155 
that weep, andfuffer Per fecution for Rigbteoufnefs fake, are not bleffed for fuffering Perfecution^. 
for the fake of Rigbteoufnefs, but becaufe the Kingdom of Heaven is Theirs ; and a great Reward 
is laid up for them in Heaven: that is, becaufe they fhall be happy. Such as are perfecuted for 
Righteoufnefs, are thereby Righteous,, Vertuous, and Perfect, as being in the Divine Order, and 
becaufe Perfection confifts in the obferving it. But they are not happy, becaufe they fuffer. There 
fliall be a time when they fhall fuffer no more, and then they fhall be happy, as well as righ- 
teous and perfect. 

However, I deny not but the Righteous even in this Life may be in fome meafure happy, by 

the Strength of their Hope and Faith, which bring thofe future Goods as it were prefent to their 

Minds : For it is certain, that the vigorous and lively Hope of any Good brings it clofer to the 

Mind, and anticipates the Enjoyment : and thus makes a Man happy in part, fince 'tis the Tafle 

\ and the Poffeffion of Good, 'tis Pleafure, that ?nakes us happy. 

Therefore we ffiould not tell Men that Senfible Pleafures are not good, and that they render 
the Poifeffors never the Happier, fince this is falfe ; and at rhe time of 'Temptation they find it fo 
to their Misfortune. They ought to be told, That thefe Pleafures are in their own nature good, 

Sf and 



1 58 <F. M a t e b r a n c h e Concerning Book I V* 

and after a fort capable to make them happy ; yet for all that to be avoided, for fuch like Rea- 
fons as the foremention'd :, but that they have riot ftrength enough to withftand them of them- 
felves, beeaufe they defire to be happy by an invincible Inclination, which thefe tranfitory Plea- 
fures, to be avoided by them, in fome mealure fatisfie : and therefore are under a fatal neceflity 
of being loft, unlefs refcued and alTifted. Thefe things are to be inculcated to them, to give them 
a diftin£t Knowledge of their own Imbecillities, and their need of a Redeemer. 

We ought to fpeak to Men as our Lord, and not as the Stolcks do, who underftand neither the 
Nature nor Diftemper of an humane Mind. We muft continually tell them they are to Irate and 
defpife themfelves, and not look for a Settlement and Happinefs here below ; that they mull con- 
tinually bear their Crofs, or the Inftrument of their Suffering, and lofe their Life at prefent, to 
fave it everlaftingly. Laftly, we mull mew them their Obligation to a£t quite contrary to their 
Defires, to make them fenfible of their Impotence to Good. For their Will is invincibly bent on 
Happinefs 5 which 'tis impoffible actually to obtain, without doing what they have a Mind to. 
Perhaps being fenfible of their prefent Evils, and knowing their future, they will humble them- 
ielves on Earth : poffibly they will cry to Heaven, will feek out a Mediator, Hand in fear of fen- 
fible Objefts, and conceive a falutary Abhorrence for whatever Hatters Concupiicence and their 
Senfes. Probably they may enter into that Spirit of Prayer and Repentance fo neceffary to the ob- 
taining Grace, without which no Strength, no Health, no Salvation can be expected. 
II. We are inwardly convinc'd, that Pleafure is good:, which inward Conviction is not faife : for 

it ought Pleafure is really To. We are naturally convinc'd, that Pleafure is the Character of Good, and that 
"wtot™ 7 na£ura ^ Conviftion is certainly true : for whatever caufes Pleafure, is unqueftionably very good, 
loving Sen- and amiable^ But we are not affur'd that fenfible Objecls, or even our Soul it felf, are capable of 
fible Goods, producing Pleafure in us. For there is no reafon why we fhould believe it, but a thoufand why 
we mould not. Thus fenfible Objects are neither good nor amiable : they are to be employed, as 
lerviceable to the Prelervation of Life-, but we muft not love them, as being incapable of afting 
upon us. The Soul ought only to love what is good to her, and able to make. her happier and 
more perfect : and therefore^nothing but what's above her can be the Obje£t of her Love, fince 'tis 
evident her Perfection can derive from nothing that is not fo. 

But beeaufe we judge that a Thing is the Caufe of fome Effe£t when it conftantiy attends it, .we 
imagine that fenfible Obje&s a£t on us, beeaufe at their approach we have frefh Senfations, and 
beeaufe we fee not him who caufes them really in us. In tailing a Fruit, we have a Senfation of 
■Sweetnefs ; and we attribute that Sweetnefs to the Fruit, which we judge both to caufe it and con- 
tain it. We fee not GOD, as we fee and touch this Fruit ; nay, we do not fo much as think 
on him, nor perhaps on our felves. And fo we judge not that GOD is the true Caufe of that 
'Sweetnefs -, nor that it is a Modification of our Soul : but impute both the Caufe and Effe£t to 
the Fruit we eat. 

What I have faid of Senfations relating to the Body, may be underflood ofthofe which have 
no relation to it •, fuch are thole which are incident to pure Intelligences. 

A Spirit contemplates it felf, and finds nothing wanting to its Happinefs or Perfection, or elfe 
fees that it is not in polTeffion of what it defires. Upon the View of its Happinefs it feels Joy ; 
upon the fight of its Mifery it feels Sorrow. It immediately imagines, that 'tis the fight of its 
Happinefs which produces in it felf this Senfation of Joy •, beeaufe this Senfation ftill accompanies 
this Perception -, and fancies likewife that the fight of its Mifery is what produces in it the Senfa- 
tion of Sorrow : beeaufe the latter is a conftant Attendant of the former. The true Caufe of thefe 
Senfations, which is GOD alone, does not appear to it ; nor does it, it may be, think on GOD. 
For GOD a£ts in us in an imperceptible manner. 

GOD rewards us with a Senfe of Joy, when we find our felves in the ftate we ought to be in, 
to the intent we may continue in it, that our Anxiety may ceafe ; and that we may fully enjoy 
our Happinefs without fuffering the Capacity of our Mind to be taken up with any thing elfe. 
But he produces in us a Senfation of Sorrow, when we know we are not in our cOnvenienr ftate, i 
to the end we may not flay in it •, but reftlelly feek out for the Perfection which we want. For 
GOD continually drives us towards Good, when we know that we do not polTefs it, but gives 
us a powerful Check when we fee we are fully poffefs'd of it. Wherefore 'tis evident to me, that 
the Senfations of Intellectual Joy and Sorrow, no lefs than Senfible, are not the voluntary Produ- 
ctions of the Mind. 

Our Reafon then fhould conftantiy teach us to difcover that invifible Hand which fills us with. 
Good, and which lies difguis'd to our Mind under Senfible Appearances. This Hand we are to 
adore and to love, and alfo to fear -, fince though it loads us with Pleafures, it can likewife over- 
whelm us with Pains. We ought to love it with a Love of Choice, an enlightned Love, a Love 
worthy of GOD, and our felves. Our Love is worthy of GOD, when it proceeds from our 
Knowledge of his being Amiable : and this Love is worthy of our felves ; for that being Rea- 
fonable Creatures, we ought to bellow our Love on that which Reafon teaches us is worthy of it. 
But we love fenfible Things with a Love unworthy our felves, and undeferv'd by them : whilft 
being reafonable, we love them without any Reafon for it-, as not clearly knowing them to be 
lovely : and on the contrary, knowing they are not. But we are betray'd by Pleafure to the Love 
of them -, the blind and irregular Love of Pleafure being the true Caufe of the falfe Judgments of 
Men in Subjects of Morality. 

CHAP- 



-. * f 

Chap. XI. The Search after Truth, i £ . 



G H A P. XI. 

Of the Love of Pleafure, with Reference to Speculative Sciences. I. How 
it dijables us from dif covering Truth. II. Some Injiances. 

OUR Inclination for Senfible Pleafures being mifgovern'd, is not only the Original of thoie 
dangerous Errours we are guilty of, in Subjects of Morality, and the general Caufe of the 
Corruption of our Manners -, but likewife one of the main Caufes of the Depravation of our 
Reafon : And it infenfibly engages us in moft grofs, but lefs dangerous Errours, in point of Sub- 
lefts purely Speculative-, becauie itdifables us from bringing a fufficient Attention to comprehend 
and judge well of things that do not affect us. 

We have fpoken feveral times already of the Difficulty we find to apply our felves to Subjects 
fomewhat Abftratf, the Subject of our Difcourfe requiring it. As towards the End of the Firft 
Book, where "we fhew'd that Senfible Ideas more affecting the Soul, than Ideas purely Intellectual, 
ihe was more taken up with the out-fide manners than the Things themfelves. So again, in the Se- 
cond, where treating of the Tendernefs of the Fibres of the Brain, we fhew'd whence the Soft- ' 
nefs of certain Effeminate Minds proceeded. Laftly, in the Third, when {peaking of the Atteto-. 
iian of the Mind, it was neceffary to mew, that it was very carelefs of things Speculative •, but . . 
very attentive to fuch as affected her, and made her feci Pleafure or Pain. 

Our Errours have moft c ommonly feveral Caufes contributing to their Rife •, fo that it ought not 
to be thought it is for want of Order, that we repeat almoft the fame things, and affign feveral 
Caufes of the fame Errours •, it is really becaufe they have fo many. I ftill fpeak of Occafional 
Caufes •, for we have often declar'd, they have no other true and real Caufe, than the wrong ufe 
of our Liberty -, which wrong ufe confilfs in our not ufing.it fo much as we might, as we have 
explain d at the beginning of this Treatife. 

We are not therefore to be blam'd, if, in order to make it fully conceiv'd, how, for Inftance, 
the Senfible Manners Things are involv'd in, furprize and lead us into Errour, we were oblig'd, by 
way of Anticipation, to fpeak of our Inclination for Pleafures in the other Books, which feems 
fitter to have been referv'd for this, wherein we purpofely treat of the Natural Inclinations ; (and 
the fame may be faid of other things in other places :) All the harm that will come of it, is 
this, that we may difpenfe with many things here, which we had been oblig'd to explain, if it 
had not been done elfewhere. 

All things in the Humane Nature are fo link'd and twin'd to one another, that we find our 
felves often, as it were, over-whelnfd with the Number of things neceilary to be faid at the 
fame time, to fet our Conceptions in an open and clear Light. We are fometimes fore'd to let 
things go unfeparated, which Nature has join'd together ; and to proceed againft our own pre- 
fcrib'd Method, when this Method throws us in Confufion, as it inevitably does on fome Occa- 
sions. And yet, after all, it is impoflible to make others take in all our Conceptions. All that 
can commonly be pretended to, is, to put others in a Capacity of difcovering with Pleafure and 
Etife what we have difcovef d our felves with great Pains and Patigation. And fince 'tis impo£ 
lible to make any Difcovery without Attention, our Studies mould be chiefly employ 'd on Means 
of making others Attentive. This is what we have eflay'd to do, though, we muft acknowledge, 
but weakly perform'd ; and we are the willinger to confefs we have been defective, that the Con- 
feffion may provoke our Readers to fupply themfelves, what is wanting in us, to make them at- 
tentive, in order to penetrate the Bottom of Subjects., which deferve to be thorowly confider'd. 

Infinite are the Errours wherein our Inclination for Pleafures, and in general for whatever affects 
us, engages us -, becaufe that Inclination diffipates the Sight of the Mind, and fixes it continually 
on the confus'd Ideas of theSenfes, and the Imagination ; and inclines us to judge over-haftily 
of all things by the bare Relation which they have to us. 

Truth never appears but when we fee things as they are in themfelves ; which we never do, I. 
unlefs we fee them in him who contains them, in an intelligible manner. When we perceive ,. f H b ^ lt 
them within our felves, we perceive them at a very lame and imperfect rate ; or rather we per- ^ m "-r 
ceive our own Senfations, and not the things we deiire to perceive^ and which we falfly think vermg 
we do. - T ™tb< 

To fee things as they are in themfelves, requires much Application, becaufe atprefent we can- 
not unite to GOD without great Pain and Reluftancy : But to fee them in our felves, requires 
no Application at all on our part, fince we arefenfible of what touches us whether we will or no. 
We do not naturally find any Preventing Pleafure in our Union with GOD; the pure Ideas of 
things do not touch and quicken us : Therefore the Inclination we have for Pleafure, is not a 
Means to. apply and unite us to G D, but on the contrary ilackens our Engagements ro-him, and 
perpetually removes us farther from him, carrying us continually to confider things by their Sen- 
fible Ideas, becaufe thefe falfe and impure Ideas are thofe that affect: us. Love of Pleafure then, 
and the Actual Enjoyment of it,' which revives and corroborates this Love, throw us continually 
off Truth, to plunge us into Errour, 



Hi 



Thoft 



:e 



1 6o F. Malebrauche Concerning Book IV. 

Thole therefore who would draw near to Truth, to be illuminated by its Light, muft begin by 
the Privation of Pleafure. They muft carefully iliun whatever fenfibly affefts, and agreeably 
mares the Mind. For the Voice of Truth cannot be heard, unlefs in the Silence of the Senfes and 
thePaffions : An Averfion to the Worlds -and -'Contempt for all Senfible things, being equally ne- 
ceflary to the Perfection of the .Mind as to the Converfion of the Heart. 

When our Pleafures are great, and our Sedations lively, we are incapable of the moft fimple Truths ; 
nor do we agree to common Notions, unlefs of a fenfible Make and Character. When our Pleafures' 
or other Senfations are moderate, we may difcover fome plain and eafie Truths : But if it were pof- 
fible to be abfolutely delivered from Pleafures and Senfations, we mould be able eafily to difcover 
the moft abftra£t and difficult Truths that are known. For proportionably to our Removing from 
what is not GOD, we approach to GOD himfelf •, we avoid Errour, and difcover Truth. But ever 
fince the Ivz//,fince the disorderly Love of Preventing Pleafure, which domineers and triumphs, the 
Mind is grown fo weak, that it can pierce into nothing '•; and ib materialize, and dependent on its 
Senfes, that it cannot lay hold of things abftra£l and unafTecling. With much ado it perceives com- 
mon Notions, and for want of Advertency, frequently concludes them falfe or obfcure. It cannot 
diftinguifh the Truth of things from their Utility, the Relation they have to one another, from the 
Relation they have to it f elf, and often takes thofe to be moft true that are moft ufeful, agreeable 
and moving. Finally, this Inclination infects and muddies all our Perceptions of Objetts, and con- 
fequently all the Judgements that we make of them. Here follows fome Examples : 
II. " 'Tis a common Notion, that Vertue is preferable to Vice ; that 'tis better to be Sober and Chaffy 
Some In- than Intemperate and Voluptuom. But the Inclination for Pleafure fo ftrangely confounds that Idea 
Jlances. on certain Occafions, that we have but a tranfient glimpfe of it, nor can draw thofe Confequences 
from it that are neceffary to the Management of Life. The Sou/is violently bent upon the Pleafures 
fhe hopes for, that fhe fuppofes them innocent, andfeeks only for the Means of enjoying them. 

Every body well knows that 'tis more eligible to be Juft than Rich : That Juftice exalts a Man 
more than the PofTeflion of the moft magnificent Buildings, which often ferve more to manifeft 
the Greatnefs of the Injuftices and Crimes of the PoiTeiTor, than his own Grandeur. But the Plea- 
fure that wretched Men feceive in the vain Oftentation of their falfe Grandeur, fufficiently fills up 
the narrow Capacity of their Mind, to conceal and obfcure fo evident a Truth from them. They 
abfurdly imagine they are Great Men, becaufe they have Great Houfes. 

Special Algebra, (or Analyticks,) is certainly the flneft, I mean the moft fruitful and moft certain 
of all Sciences. Without it^ the Mind has neither Penetration nor Extent -, and with it, it is ca- 
pable of knowing almoft whatever is poflible to be certainly and evidently known. As imperfect 
as this Science has been, it has made Famous all that have been skill'd in't,and knew how to employ 
it, having by it difcover'd Truths thatfeem'd incomprehenfible to other Men. It is fo well propor- 
tion'd to an Humane Mind, that without dividing its Capacity with things ufelefs to the Queftion, 
it infallibly condufts it to its Point. In a word, it is an Vniverfal Science, and as it were the Key 
of all other. Yet as valuable as it is in it felf, it has no Charms nor Luftre to captivate Men 5 
for this Reafon only, that it is not of a Senfible Nature. It has been buried in Oblivion for many 
Ages, and there are ftill very many that know not fo much as the Name ; and fcarce one in a thou- 
fand to be found that underftands any thing of it. The moft Learned, who have reviv'd it in our 
Days, have not yet carried it very far, nor handled it with that Order and Perfpicuity it deferves. 
Being Men no lefs than others, they have grown at length difgufted with thefe pure Truths, whilft 
unaccompanied with Senfible Pleafure •, and the Uneafinefsof their Will, debauch'd by Sin ; the Le- 
vity of their Mind, which depends on the Motion and Circulation of the Blood, have with-held 
them from reeding and growing upon thofe great, thofe vaft and fecond Truths, which are the Im- 
mutable and Univerfal Rules of all tranfitory and particular Truths poflible to be exaQly known. 

Metaphyfick likewife is an Abjlratl Science, which flatters not the Senfes, nor does the Soul receive 
any Pleafure in the Study ofit^ and for the fame Reafon it is fo miferably negle&ed, that 'tis ufual 
to find Perfons ftupid enough confidently to deny Common Notions. There are thofe who ftick 
not to deny, that we may, or ought to affirm of a thing, what is included in the clear and diftincl: 
Idea we have of it: That Nothing has no Properties: That a thing cannot be annihilated without a 
Miracle: That a Body cannot move by any Force of its own : That a Body in Motion cannot com- 
municate to occurrent Bodies more Motion than it has it felf ; and other things of the lame kind. 
They have never confider'd thefe Axioms with a View fteady, and diftinct enough, to fee clearly 
the Truth of them ■, and they have fometimes try'd Experiments, which have abufively convinc'd 
them, that fome of thefe Axioms were falfe. 

They have feen in certain Junctures, that two vifible Bodies meeting each others, have ceas'd to 
move at the Inftant of their Collifion. They have obferv'd in others, that the impuls'd Body had 
mere Motion than the vifible impelling ; and this fenfible Obfervation of fome Experiments, the 
Reafons whereof they don't perceive, makes them determine about things againft certain Princi- 
ples, and which go for common Notions with all Attentive and Confidering Men. Ought they 
not to confider, that Motions may be communicated from Vifible to Invifible Bodies, when Bo- 
dies meet in their Motion ? And from Vifible to Invifible on other Occafions ? When a Body is 
fufpended by a Cord, 'tis not the Sciffars which cut the Cord, which gives Motion to that Body, 
but an Invifible Matter : When we throw a Fire-coal into an heap of Gun-pouder, 'tis not the 
Motion of Coal, but an Invifible Matter which feparates all the Parts of the Pouder, and actu- 
ates them with a Motion capable of blowing up an Houfe. A thoufand unknown Ways there 
are whereby the Motion of an Invifible Matter is communicated to Grofs and Vifible Bodies : 

At 



Chap. XL The Search after Truth; 

At leaft it is not evident that it cannot be done, as it is evident that the moving Force of Bodies 
can neither be augmented nor diminifh'd by the ordinary Strength of Nature. 

Thus Men feeing that the Wood they throw on the Fire ceafestobewhatitwas 1 , and that all the 
fenfible Qualities they obferve in it, vanifli away, imagine from thence they have Right to conclude 
it poffible for a thing to return into Nothing, whence it came.. They fee the Wood no more and 
rhey fee but a few Allies that fucceed it, and thereupon judge that the greater} part of the Wood 
is reduc'd to nothing, as if it could not be feparated into Parts not poflible to be feen. At leaft 
it is not fo evident rhat this is impoflible, as it is evident that the Power which gives Being to 
all things is not liable to Change ; and that by the ordinary Force of Nature, Being cannot be 
reduc'd to Nothing, as Nothing cannot begin to be. But few Men know what it is to retire into 
themfelves, to hear the Voice of Truth fpeaking to them within, by which they ought to judge 
of all things -, 'tis their Eyes that govern their Determinations. They judge by what they feel, 
and not by what they conceive -, for They feel with Pleafure, but conceive with Pain. 

Demand of allthe Men in the World, whether it may not be affirm'd without Danger of Er- 
rour, that xheWhole is greater than its Part -, and I am positive not one will be found, but will im- 
mediately anfwer pertinently to the Question. Ask them afterwards, whether we may with the 
fame Security affirm of a thing, what we clearly conceive to be included in the Idea rcprefenting it, and 
you'll find that few will grant it without boggling and hefitation ; more will deny, and rnoft of all 
will not know what to fay to't. And yet this Metaphyseal Axiom,- viz. That we affirm of a thing 
what we clearly conceive to be contain d in the Idea that reprefents it, is more evident than this 
I Axiom, Tlie Whole is bigger than its Part : For as much as this laft is not an Axiom, but only a 
Conclusion in refpe£l of the former -, it may beprov'd from the former Axiom, That the Whole 
is bigger than its Part 5 but the former can't be prov'd by any other, as being absolutely the 
Firft and the Foundation of all clear and evident Knowledge. Whence comes it then that no bo- 
dy hefitates at this Conclufion, and yet many doubt of the Principle from whence 'tis taken -, but 
only that the Ideas of Whole and Part are fenfible, and we fee, as we may fo fay, with our Eyes, 
that the Whole is bigger than its Part, but have no ocular Proof of the Truth of the prime Fun- 
damental Axiom of all the Sciences ? 

Whereas there is nothing in this Axiom which naturally fixes and, applies the Mind, we muft 
be willing to confider it, and that too with fome Conftancy and Refolution, to be evidently con- 
vine'd of the Truth of it. The Earneftnefs of the Will mult fupply the Defe£t of fenfible In- 
ducements : But the Thoughts of considering Objects which have no Charms for the Senfes, ne- 
ver enter Mens Heads ; or if they do, their Endeavour is too languid and ineffectual. 

For (to carry on our faid Instance) they think 'tis, evident, That the Whole is bigger than its 
Part ; that a Mountain of Marble is poflible ^ and that a. Mountain without a Valley is impofli- 
ble, but that there is not equal Evidence for the Exiftence of a. GOD. Neverthelefs, we may aflert, 
that there is equal Evidence -in all thefe Propositions, fince they are all at an equal distance from 
the firft Principle. 

This is the firft Principle : We muft attribute that to a thing which we clearly conceive to be con- 
tain'd in the Idea that reprefents it. We clearly apprehend rhere is more Magnitude in the Idea 
we ha.ve~o-f~~tbeWl)ole, than in that we have of its Part •,. that Poffible Exiftence is contain'd in the 
Idea of a Marble Mountain, Impoffible Exiftence in the Idea of a Mountain without a Valley, and Ne- 
cejjdry Exiftence in the Idea we have of G D -, that is,- of a Being Infinitely Perfe£t. Therefore the 
IVhole is greater than its Part -, therefore a Marble Mountain is poffible to exift ; therefore 'tis im- 
poflible for a Mountain without a Vale to exift \ therefore GOD, or Being Infinitely Perfect, necefla- 
rily~ exifts. It is vifible that thefe Conclusions are equally remote from the firft Principle of all the 
Sciences, and therefore are equally evident in themfelves ; and fo 'tis as evident that GOD exifts, as 
that the Whole is bigger than its Part. But becaufe the Ideas of Infinite, of Perfections, of Necejfary Ex- 
iftence, are not fenfible, as are the Ideas of Whole and Part, Men fancy they have no Perception or what 
they have no Senfation; and though thefe Conclusions are equally evident in themfelves, yet they are 
not equally receiv'd. 

There are Men who would fain perfuade us, that they have no Idea of an Infinitely Perfect Be- 
ing -, which makes me wonder how they came to anfwer pofitively to the Demand, Whether an 
Infinitely Perfect Being is round, or fquare,or the like : For they ought to fay, they didnotknow 4 
if it were true that they had no Idea of it. 

There are another fort who acknowledge it is good Arguing to conclude, that GOD is not an 
Impoflible Being, from the Perception we have that the Idea of GO D involves no Contradiction, 
or Impoflible Exiftence ; and they will not allow us to conclude in like manner, that GOD ne*- 
-ceiTarily exifts, from our conceiving NecefTary Exiftence to be included in the Idea we have of him. 

Laftly, There are others who pretend, that this Proof of the Exiftence of a GOD is a Fallacy-, 
and the Argument is conclusive only on the Supposition of the Truth of GOD'S existing, as if we 
did not prove it. Our Proof is this : We are to attribute to a thing what we clearly conceive to 
be included in the Idea that reprefents it. This is the General Principle of all the Sciences. Ne- 
ceffary Exiftence is included in the Idea that reprefents a Being Infinitely Perfe£t. They willingly 
grant it •, and confequently we muft conclude, that an Infinitely Perfect Being exifts. . Allow'd, 
"fay they, on Supposition that this Being exifts. 

But let us make a like Anfwer to a like Argument, that we may judge of the folidity of their 

Anfwer. A like Argument is this : We are to attribute to a thing what we clearly conceive to be 

included in the Idea that reprefents it. This is the Principle. We clearly conceive four Angl&s 

to be included in the Idea which reprefents a Square ; or, we clearly conceive poflible Exiftence 

T t td 



•N 

162 F. M a l E b r a n c he Concerning Book VI. 

to be included in the Idea of a Marble Tower. Therefore a Square has four Angles ; therefore 
a Marble Tower is poffible. I fay thefe Conclufions are true, fuppofing a Square has four An- 
gles, and that a Marble Tower is poffible •, juft as they anfwer, That GOD exifts, fuppofing he 
exifts ; that is, in fhort, that the Conclufions" of thefe Demonji rat ions are true, fuppofing they are true. 
'Tis true, fhould I form fuch an Argument as this : We mull: attribute to a thing what we clear- 
ly conceive to be included in the Idea that reprefents it -, we clearly conceive neceifary Exiftence 
to be included in the Idea of a Body Infinitely Perfect : Therefore an Infinitely Perfect Body ex- 
ifts. Should I form fuch an Argument, I lay, I might reafonably be anfwer d, that it was inconclu- 
ding for the actual Exiftence of a Body Infinitely Perfect •, and that all it could inferr, was this, 
That fuppofing fuch a Body was in Being, it would have an independent Exiftence. The Reafon 
whereof is this, that the Idea of a Body Infinitely Perfect is a Fief ion of the Mind, or a compos'd 
Idea, and which confequently may be either falfe, or contradictory, as indeed it is. For we can- 
not clearly conceive a Body Infinitely Perfect, becaufe a Being particular and finite, as Body is, 
cannot be conceiv'd Univerfal and Infinite. 

But the Idea of GOD, of Being in General, Unlimited, Infinite Being, is no Fiction of the Mind. 
'Tis not a compos'd Idea that includes any Contradiction -, there is nothing more fimple, though it 
comprehends whatever is, or whatever may be. Now this Simple and Natural Idea of Being, or 
of Infinite, includes neceifary Exiftence : For 'tis evident that Being, ( I fay not this or that Be- 
ing) has its Exiftence of it lel'f •, and that Being connot be aQually inexiftent, fince 'tis impoffible 
and contradictory, that true Being fhould be without Exiftence. Tis poffible for Bodies not to be, 
becaufe they are fuch particular Beings, which participate of Being, and depend on it : But Being 
without Reftricf ion, is necefiary, independent, and derives what it is only from it felf ; all that is, 
proceeds from it ; and on that account it felf is, whatever is .- But- were there not any thing in par- 
ticular, this would be, becaufe it is from it felf-, and it could not be clearly, conceiv'd, as not Be- 
ing, were it not for our reprefenting it as Being in particular, or fuch a Being, and our confider- 
ing quite another Idea than belong'd to it. For thofe that perceive not that GOD is-, com- 
monly confider not Being, but this or that Being, and confequently a Being that may or may not 
exift. 

However, in order to make this Argument of the Exiftence of a GOD more diftin&ly con- 
ceiv'd, and to give a clearer Anfwer to fome Objections that might be made to it, we muft re- 
member that, in perceiving a created Being, we fee it not in it lelf, nor by it felf ; but, as has 
been prov'd in the Third Book, by .the View of certain Perfections that are in GOD, reprefent- 
ing it. So that the ElTence of that Creature may be feen without feeing its Exiftence ; we may 
fee in GOD what reprefents it, though it does not exift : And for that Reafon, neceifary Exi- 
ftence is not included in the Idea that reprefents it -, it not being neceifary that it exift, in order to 
our feeing it. But the Cafe is different with the Infinitely 'Perfect Being ; we can't fee him but 
in himfelf : For nothing Finite can reprefent what's Infinite. GOD therefore cannot be feen, but 
he muft exift. The Efience of a Being Infinitely Perfect cannot be feen, without feeing its Exift- 
ence. We cannot fee it barely as a poffible Being ; For what is there to contain it ? Nor can we 
think of it but it muft exift. 

But 'tis to no purpofe to offer thefe Demonftrations to the Common fort of People : Thefe 
are E)emonftrations which we call Perfonal, becaufe they convince not XJniverfally. If we would 
convince them, we muft apply fuch as are of a more fenfible Nature ; and finely they are plenti- 
ful enough: For there is no Truth that has more Proofs than that of the Exiftence of a GOD. 
This we urg'd only to (hew, that Abftratf Truths, making little Impreffion on our Senfes, pais 
for Illufions and Chimera's : Whereas grofs and palpable Truths, that ftrike the Senfes, forcing the 
Soul to confider them, induces us to believe they have much Reality, becaufe ever fince the Fall 
they have made powerful Impreffions on our Mind. 

For the fame Reafon 'tis never to be hop'd, that the Vulgar of Men will ever fubmit to that 
Demonftration, which proves Brutes to be infenfible , namely, that fince they are innocent, as all 
the World allows ; and, I fuppole, if they were capable of Senfation, it might happen that under 
an Infinitely Juft and Omnipotent GOD, an Innocent Creature might fuller Pain ; which is a 
Penalty, and the Punifhment of fome Sin. Men are commonly incapable of feeing the Evidence 
Oper. Perf. of this Axiom, Sub jujlo Deo, auifquam^ nifi mereatur, mifer ejfe non potefl ; which St. Aufiin 
with a great deal of Reafon urges againft Julian, to prove Original Sin, and the Corruption of 
our Nature. Tfiey fancy there is nothing of Strength, or Truth in this, nor in many other Axi- 
oms, which prove that Beafts have no Senfation ; becaufe, as has been faid, thefe Axioms are 
Abltract, have nothing fenfible or palpable in them, and make no Impreffion on the Senfes. 
Thofe fenfible Actions and Motions perform'd by Beafts for the Prefervation of their Life, though. 
* 1 [peak only probable Inducements, affect us more, and confequently weigh more with us to believe they 
("common en & UIQ ^^ wnen we ftrike them, and they cry, than that abftract Reafon of Pure Intelletf^ 
opinion, though moft certain and evident in it felf: For 'tis plain, that molt Men have no other Reafon to 
which if, believe that Beafts have Souls, than the fenfible View of all thofe things they do for the Prefer- 
cki* ■ vat i° n anc * Security of Life. 

■form'dfrlm Which from hence is fufficiently apparent, that moft People fancy there is no Soul in an Egg, 
the Egg, though the Tranfmutation of an Egg into a Chicken, * is infinitely harder than the bare Conler- 
though per-- vation of the Chicken when compleatly fbrnfd : For as greater Art is requir'd to fabrick a Watch 
haps it u out f a pj ece of Iron, than to make it go when 'tis perfectly made-, fo a Soul fhould rather be 
mSrf /S^dmitted in tlie ^SS> * or the formation of the Chicken, than for making the Chicken live, 
it, ' when 



Chap. XII. The Search after Truth., i6^ 

when entirely form'd. But Men don't fee with their eyes the admirable ConduO: that goes to the 
forming of a Chicken, as they ftill fenfibly obferve its method oflooking out what's neceffary to 
its own Prefervation. And therefore they are not difpos'd to believe there are Souls in Eggs, from 
any fenfible Impreflion of thofe Motions which are requifite to transform them into Chickens-, 
but they afcribe Souls to Animals, by reafon of the fenfible Impreflion they receive from the ex- 
ternal Attions thefe Animals perform for their vital Prefervation : though the Reafon I have here 
alledg'd, is ftronger for the Souls of Eggs than of Chickens. 

This fecond Reafon, namely, that Matter is incapable of Senfation and Defire, is, without 
doubt, a Demonftration againft thofe who afcribe Senfe to Animals, whilft they confefs their Souls 
corporeal. But Men will rather eternally confound and perplex thefe Reafons, than acknowledge 
a thing repugnant to barely probable, but molt fenfible arid patbefick Arguments ; and there is nd 
way fully to convince them, but by- oppofing other Senfible Proofs to theirs, and giving an ocular 
Demonftration, that all the Parts of Animals are mere Mcchanifn •, and that they may move with- 
out a Soul, by the bare Impreflion of Objefts, and their own particular Frame and Conft itution : 
as Monfieur Des Cartes has begun to do, in his Treatife concerning Man. For all the moft certain 
and evident Reafons -of the pure Intellect will never obviate the obfeure Proofs they have from the 
Senfes: and it were to expofe our felves to the Laughter of fuperficial and inattentive Perfons, to 
pretend to prove by Reafons fomewhat higher than ordinary, that Animals have no Senfe. 

We rauft therefore well remember, that the ftrong Inclination we have for Divertifements,Plea~ 
fures, and in general, for whatever affe&s us, expofes us to a multitude of Errours^ becaufe our 
Capacity of Mind being limited, this Inclination conftantly difturbs Our Attention to the clear and 
diftinft Ideas of the Pure Underftanding, proper for the Diicovery of Truth, to apply it to the 
falfe, obfeure, and deceitful Ideas of the Senfes -, which influence the Will more by the Hope of 
Good, and Pie -afire ; than they inform the Mind by their Light and Evidence.. 

CHAP. XII. 

Of the EjfeSis which the Thoughts of future Happinefs and Mifery are ca-^ 
pable of producing in the Mind. 

IF it often happens that little Pleafures and light Pains, which we actually feel, or even which 
we expeSr. to feel, ftrangely confound our Imagination, and difable us from judging on things 
by their true Ideas ; we cannot imagine but the Expectation of Eternity muft needs work upon 
our Mind : But 'tis requifite to confider what it is capable of producing in't. 

We muft in the firft place obferve, That the Hope of an Eternity of Pleafures, does not work 
lb ftrongly on our Minds, as the Fear of an Eternity of Torments : The Reafon is, Men love 
not Pleafure fo much as they hate Pain. Again -, by a Self-confcious Senfation which they have of 
their Corruptions, they know they are worthy of Hell : and they fee nothing in themfelves defer- 
ving of fo great Rewards, as is the participating the Felicity of God himfelf. They are fenfible 
as often as they «)///, and even fometimes againft their Will, that far from meriting Rewards, 
they deferve the greateft Punifliments ; for their Confcience never quits them : But they are not 
fo conftantly convinced that GOD will manifeft his Mercy upon Sinners, after having fatisfy'd 
his Juftice upon his SON. So that even the Righteous have more lively Apprehenfwns of an Eter- 
nity of Torments, than Hopes of an Eternity of Pleafures. Therefore the profpecf of Punifhment 
works more upon them, than the profpeel of Reward. Here follows what it is capable of pro- 
ducing, not all alone, but as a principal Caufe. 

It begets infinite Scruples in the Mind, and ftrengthens them in fuch a manner, that 'tis alrrioft 
impoflibleto get rid of them. It ftretches Faith, (as I may fo fpeak) as far as Prejudices, and 
makes Men pay that Worfhip which is due to GOD alone, to imaginary Powers. It obftinately 
fixes their Mind on vain or dangerous Superftitions -, and caufes them fervently and zealoufly to 
embrace Humane Traditions and Practices, needlefs to Salvation ; few and PbanfiicA-like Devo- 
tions, which fervile Dread has invented. Finally., it flings fome Men into the darknefs of De- 
fpair •, fo that confufedly beholding Death as Nothing, they brutally wifti to perifh, that they 
may be freed of thofe dreadful Anxieties and Difquiets that torment and frighten them. 

The Scrupulous and Super jiitious have commonly more of Charity than Self-love ; but only Self- 
love poffeiTes the Defperate : for rightly to conceive it, a Man muft extremely love himfelf, who 
rather chufes no Being than an ill one. Women, Young People, and thofe of a weak and timo- 
rous Mind, are moft obnoxious to Scruples and Superftitions, and Men more liable to Defpair. 

'Tis eafie to conceive the Reafons of all this : For the Idea of Eternity being manifeftly the 
greateft, moft terrible, and dreadful, of all thofe that aftonifh the Mind and ftrike the Imagina- 
tion, muft needs be attended with a large Retinue of additional Ideas, all which contribute to a 
wonderful effeft upon the Mind, by reafon of the Analogy they have to that great and terrible Idea 
of Eternity. 

Whatever has any relation to Infinite, cannot be a little thing •, or if it be little in it felf, by 
that relation it grows fo vaft and immenfe, as not to be co'mpar'd with any thing Finite. There- 
fore whatever has, or is fancied to have any relation to that unavoidable Dilemma, concluding for 
an Eternity either of Torments or Delights; neceffarily difmays the Mirid, that's capable of any 
Reflexion or Thought, Wome% 



i^4 F. Malebranche Concerning Book IV. 

Women, Young People, and feeble Minds, having, as I have formerly iaid, the Fibres of their 
Brain loft and pliable, receive very deep Traces, or Impreflions, from that two-edg'd Considera- 
tion; and when, through the plenty of their Spirits, they are more difpos'd to Senfation than 
juft Reflexion on things, they admit, through the Vivacity of their Imagination, a great number 
of fpurious Impreflions, and falfe acceffary Ideas, which have no natural Relation to the principal. 
Neverthelefs, that Relation, though imaginary, nourifh.es and confirms thofe fpurious Traces, and 
falfe acceffary Ideas which it has produced. 

When Men are engag'd in a troublefome Law-fuit, which they don't underftand, and it take* 
up all their Thoughts; they commonly fall into needlefs Fears and Apprehenfions, that there are 
certain things prejudicial to their Caufe, which the Judges never think of, and which a Lawyer 
would not fear. The Succefs of the Affair is of fo great Concernment to them, that the Concuf- 
lion it produces in their Brain, fpreads and propagates it felf to diftant Traces, that have natural- 
ly no relati6n to it. 'Tis juft fo with the Scrupulous; they cauflefly fancy to themfelves Subjects 
of Fears and Difquiet-, and inftead of examining the Will of GOD in Holy Writ, and referring 
to Men of untainted Imagination, they coriftantly intend an Imaginary Law, which the diforderly 
motions of Fear have engraven in their Brain. And though they be inwardly convinc'd of their 
Infirmity, and that GOD requires not certain Duties they prefcribe themfelves, as being incon- 
fiftent with his Service ; yet they cannot forbear preferring their Imagination to their Underftand- 
ing, and fubmitting rather to fome confus'd and terrifying Senfations, that throw them into Er- 
rour, than to the Evidence of Reafon, which brings them back to a good AlTurance, and reduces 
them into the right way of Salvation. 

There is commonly a good ftock of Vertue and Charity in Perfons tormented with Scruples, but 
not fo much in People devoted to certain Super -ft it ions ; and whofe principal Employment is fome 
fewifh and Pharifaick Practices. GOD requires to be worfhip'd in Spirit and in Truth : He 
is not fatisfy'd with our making Faces, and paying external Ceremonies •, with our bending the 
Knee before him, and praifing him with a Lip-offering, when our Heart is far from him. If Men 
•are content with thefe exteriour Marks of Refpeft, 'tis becaufe they cannot fathom the depth of 
the Heart; for even they would be worfhip'd in Spirit and in Truth. GOD demands our Mind 
and our Heart, which as he has created, fo he preferves only for himfelf : But many there are, 
who, to their own misfortune, deny him thofe things which he has all manner of Right and 
Claim to. They harbour Idols in their Hearts, which they adore with a fpiritual and true Wor- 
ftiip, and to which they facrifice themfelves, and all they have. But becaufe the true GOD 
threatens, in the RecefTes of their Confcience, to punifh their exceflive Ingratitude with an Eter- 
nity of Torments, and yet they cannot think of quitting, their belov'd Idolatry ; they therefore be- 
think themfelves of an external Performance of fome good Works. They berake themfelves to 
Tafiing, to Aim/giving, and Saying of Prayers, as they fee others do ; and continue fome time in 
fuch like Exercifes : but whereas they are painful to thofe that have not Charity, they commonly 
'forfake them, to fubftitute fome little PraUicks, and eafie Devotions, in their room ; which ftriking 
in with Self-love, neceffarily, but infenfibly, fubvert the whole Syfiem of Morals which our LORD 
has left us. They are faithful, fervent, and zealous Defenders of thofe Humane Traditions which 
Un-enlightnedVeifons make them believe molt ufeful, and the frightful Idea of Eternity daily re- 
prefents,' as abfolutely necefTary to their Salvation. 

It fares not fo with the Righteous : They hear no lefs than the Wicked the Menaces of their 
GOD; but the confus'd Noife of their Paffions does not deafen them to his Counfels. The falfe 
Glarings of Humane Traditions do not dazle them fo far, as to make them infenfible to the Light 
of Truth. They place their Confidence in the Promifes of CHRIST, and follow his Precepts ; 
as knowing that the Promifes of Men are as vain as' their Counfels. However, it may be laid, 
that the Dread which the Idea of Eternity breeds in their Minds, fometimes effe&s fo great a Com- 
motion in their Imagination, that they date not abfolutely condemn thefe Humane Traditions -, 
and that fometimes they approve them by their Example, becaufe they have AfJieiv. ofWifdomin 
£ol,2. 23. JVill-zwrfhip and Humility, like thofe Pharifaick Traditions mention'd by St. Paul. 

But that which more especially deferves to be confider'd in this place, and which does not fo 
much relate to Moral as Intellectual Diforder, is, that the fore-mention'd Fear ftretches the Faith 
as well as Zeal of thole it infefts, to things falfe, or unworthy the Holinefs of our Religion. 
There are many who believe, and that with a ftiff and obftinate Faith, That the Earth refts im- 
movably in the Centre of the World : That Brutes are fenfible of Real Pain : That Senfible Qua- 
lities are ftrew'd and diffus'd over Objects : That there are Forms or Real Accidents, diftinguifh'd. 
from Matter ; and a world of the like falfe or uncertain Opinions, becaufe they conceit it would 
be repugnant to their Faith to deny them. They are frighted with the Expreflions of the Holy 
Scripture, which fpeaks to our Capacity, and confequently makes ufe of the received manners of 
Speech, without defign of making us Philofophers. They believe not only what'the Spirit of GOD 
means to teach them, but likewife all the Opinions of the Jews : They can't fee, for example* 
that Jofhua fpeaks before his Souldiers, as even Copernicus, GaliUus, and Des Cartes would fpeak 
to the Vulgar part of Men ; and that though he had been of the Opinion of thefe Philofophers, 
he would not have commanded the Earth to fland ftill, fince he could not have manifefted to his 
Army, in words which they did not underftand, the Miracle G'OD fhew'd for his People. Don't 
thofe who believe the Sun immoveable, fay to their Servants, to their Friends, or to thofe who are 
of their Opinion, that The Sun Rifes and Sets ? Do they affett to fpeak differently from others, 
whenever their chief Defign is not to Philofophize i Was Joflnta fo admirably vers'd in Aftronowy? 

Or 



Chap. XIII. The Search after Truth. i'6$ 

Or if he was, did his Souldiers underftand it > But were he and his Souidiers Aftronomers, could 
we think they would be playing the Pbilofopbers, when their Thoughts were intent on Fight- 
ing ? Jojhua therefore muft have ipoke as he did, though both he and his Souldiers were of the 
fame Opinion that the beft Aftronomers hold now-a-days. And yet the Words of that great Ge- 
neral, Sun, ftand thouflill upon Gibeon •, and what is faid afterwards, that the Sun flood Hill ac- 
cording to his Command •, perfuade a great many, that the Opinion of the Earth's Motion is not 
only dangerous, but alfo abfolutely Heretical, and unwarrantable. They have heard that fome 
Devout Men, whom we are to treat with much Deference and Refpeft, have cenfur'd and con- 
demn'd it ; and have fome confus'd Notion of what happen'd to a Famous * Aftronomer of our * Galilxus 
own Age, upon that occafion : All which leems fufficient to make them obftinately believe, that p»t into the 
Faith is concern'd in that Opinion. A certain confus'd Senfation, rais'd and encourag'd by a Mo- Inquifi&on 
tion of Fear, which yet they are fcarce aware of, throws them into Sufpicions of thofe who follow tl'mlngthe 
Reafon in things of Reafon's Jurifdi&ion. Hence they regard them as Hereticks, they hear them Earth 
but with Impatience, and Regret of Mind : and thefe their fecret Apprehenfions breed in them as mov'd. 
great a Reverence and Submiffion to thefe Opinions, and feveral others purely Philofopbical, as. 
to Truths that are ObjeQs of Faith. 



CHAP. XIII. 

I. Of the Third Natural Inclination \ viz. The Friendfliip we have for other 
Men. II. It makes us approve the Thoughts of our Friends , and deceive 
them by undue Praifes. 

OF all our Inclinations taken in the general, and in the Senfe explain'd in the firft Chapter, 
there remains now to be fpoken to, only that which we have for thofe we live with, and 
for all the Objecfs round about us : of which I mall fay but little, fince it rather refpe£ts Morals 
and Politicks than our Subject. And whereas this Inclination is always accompany^d with the Paf- 
fwns, it might perhaps be more appofitly treated of in the next Book : ' But 'tis not of fo great 
concern, to be fo nicely methodical in this Cafe. 

That we may rightly comprehend the Caufe and Effe&s of this Natural Inclination, it is re- f 
quifite to know, that GOD loves all his Works, and that he ftri&ly unites them to one another n f^ f ^ 
for their mutual Prefervation. For Loving incelfantly the Works he produces ( it being his Love t „" a i In %„ 
that produces them ) he alfo continually impreffes on our Heart a Love for his Works •, that is, nation, viz; 
he produces conftantly in our Heart a Love like his own. And to the intent the Natural Love we The Friend* 
have for our felves might not iwallow up, or too much infringe upon that which we have for ex-jf^ W J 
teriour things ; but on the contrary, that thefe two Loves which GOD puts in us, might cherifh ^herMeni 
and ftrengthen each other : he has lb artfully united us with all things about us, and elpecially 
with thofe Beings of the fame Species as our felves, that their Evils naturally afflict us, their Joy 
rejoyces us ^ their Rife, their Fall, or Diminution, feem to augment or diminifh refpe&ively our 
own Being. The new Honours of our Relations or Friends, the ffefh Achievements of thofe who 
have the neareft Engagements to us : The Conquefts and Victories of our Prince, and even the 
late Difcoveries of the New World, give, as it were, an additional gtowth to our Subjlance. 
Belonging to all thefe things, we rejoyce at their Grandure and Extent : We gladly would, that 
even the World was without Bounds ; and that Notion of fome Pbilofopbers, that the Works of 
G D are infinite, not only feems worthy of G D, but moft agreeable to Man i, Who can con- 
ceive nothing nobler, than the being apart of Infinity h whilft as inconfiderable as he is in him- 
felf, he fancies he feels himfelf infinitely enlarged by an expanfion of Thought into the infinite 
Beings that furround him. 

Tis true, the Union we have with all thofe Bodies that rowl in the vaft fpaces, is not very 
binding • and confequently infenfible to the greateft part of Men : and there are fome who inte- 
refs themfeives fo little in the Difcoveries made in the Heavens, that one would think they had 
no natural Union to them ; did we not know that it was for want of Knowledge, or for their too 
applicative Adherencies to other things. 

The Soul, though united to the Body which fhe animates, is not Avjzysfenftble of the Motions 
that occur in it •, or if fhe be, yet (he does not always actually confider them. The Paffion where- 
by (he's a fled being, often greater than the Senfation wherewith (he's affeffed, makes her feem to 
have a ftri&er Adherence to the Objett of her Pafiion, than to her own Body. For 'tis chiefly by 
the Paflions that the Soul expands her felf abroad, and finds fhe is actually related to all fur- 
rounding Beings t as it is efpecially by Senfation that fhe expands through her own Body, and 
finds fhe is united to all the Parts that compofe it. But as we are not to conclude that the Soul 
of a Man, in a Paffion, is not united to his Body, becaufe he expofes himfelf to Death, and is 
unconcern'd for his own Prefervation •, fo it ought not to be imagin'd we are not naturally en- 
gag'd to all things, becaufe there are fome we are not at all concern'd for. 

Would you know, for inftance, whether Men have any Adhefions to their Prince, Or their Coun- 
try ? Enquire out fuch as are acquainted with the Interefts of them, and have no particular Engage- 
ments of their own to take them up ; and you will then fee how earneft they are for News, how 
impatient to hear of Battels, how joyful for a Victory, and how melancholy upon a Defeat. And 
this will convince you how ftrrctly Men are united to their Prince, and their Country <• 

it if in 



£6 JP. M a l e b r a n c h e Concerning Book I V* 

In like manner, would you know whether Men are united to China? Japan? the Vianet s or Fix'd 
Stars ? Enquire out, or only imagine to your felf, fome whofe Country or Family enjoy a fettfd 
Peace, who have no particular Paffions, and that are not actually fenfible of the Union that binds 
them to nearer Objects than the Heavens •, and you will find, if they have any Knowledge of 
the Magnitude and Nature of thefe Stars? they will rejoyce at the Difcovery of any of them h 
will confider them with Pleafure : and, if they have Art enough, will willingly be at the pains 
of obferving and calculating their Motions. 

Such as are in the hurry of Bufinefs, have little Curiofity for the Appearance of a Comet? or the 
Incidence of an Eclipfe? but Men that have no fuch Dependencies to nearer things, find themfelves 
confiderable Employment about fuch Events : becaufe indeed there is nothing but what we are uni- 
ted to, though we have not always the Senfe of this Union ■? as a Man does not always feel the 
Soul united, I don't fay to his Arm or Hand, but to his Heart and Brain. 

The ftrongeft Natural Union which GOD has eftablifh'd between us and his Works, is that 
which cements and binds us to our Fellow-Brethren, Men. GOD has commanded us to love 
them as our Second-felves •? and to the end that Elective Love? with which we prolecute them, 
might be refolute and conftant, he fupports and Itrengthens it continually with :a Natural Love? 
which he imprefTes on us : and for that purpofe has given us fome invifible Bonds, which bind 
and oblige us neceiTarily to love them ■? to be watchful for their, as our own Prefervation, to re- 
gard them as parts necelTary to the whole, which we conftitute together with them : and with- 
out which we could not fubfift. 

There is nothing more admirably contriv'd, than thofe Natural Correfpondencies obfervable 
between the Inclinations of Men's Minds? between the Motions of their Bodies? and again, be- 
tween thefe Inclinations and thefe Motions. All this fecret Chain-work is a Miracle, which can 
never be fufficiently admir'd, nor can ever be underftood. Upon the Senfe of fome fudden furpri- 
zing Evil, or which a Man finds, as it were, too flrong for him to overcome by his own Strength, 
he raifes, fuppofe, a loud Cry. This Cry forc'd out frequently without thinking on it, by the 
difpofition of the Machine? ftrikes infallibly into the Ears of thofe who are near enough to afford 
the Afliftance that is wanted : It pierces them, and makes them underltand it, let them be of what 
Nation or Quality foever: for 'tis a Cry of all Nations and all Conditions, as indeed it ought to 
ibe. It makes a Commotion in the Brain, and inltantly changes the whole Difpofition of Body 
in thofe that are ftruck with it •? and makes them run to give fuccour, without fo much as know- 
ing it. But it is not long before it acts upon their Mind? and obliges their Will to defire? and 
their Underjianding to contrive? means of affifling him who made that Natural Petition ? pro- 
vided always, that urgent Petition, or rather Command, be juft, and according to the Rules of 
Society. For an indifcreet Out-cry made Upon no occafion, or out of an idle Fear, produces in 
The Afiiftants Indignation or Laughter, inftead of Pity :• becaufe to cry without caufe, is to abufe 
things eftablifh'd by .Nature for our Prefervation. That indifcreet Cry naturally produces Averfion, 
and the defire of Revenging the Affront that was offer'd Nature ■? that is, The fettled Order of 
things : if he that made it without caufe, did it wilfully. But it ought only to produce the Paf- 
fion of Derifion, mingled with fome Compaflion, without Averfion, and defire of Revenge-, if it 
were a Fright, that is, a falfe Appearance of a preffing Exigency, which caus'd the Clamour. For 
Scoff? or Ridicule? is neceiTary to re-affure and correct the Man, as Fearful-? and Compajfon to fuc- 
cour him as Weak. 'Tis impoftible to conceive any thing better order'd. 

I pretend not to explain, by an Example, what are the Springs and Movements, or fecret 
Combinations in Men's Brain, as in that of all other Animals, whereby the Author of Nature 
maintains the Concordance and Union necelTary to their Confervation. I only make fome Refle- 
xion upon thefe Contrivances, to put Men upon considering them, and diligently fearching and 
difcovering (not how thefe Engines play, or how their Movement is communicated through the 
Air, the Light, and all the little Bodies that furround us, for that's near incomprehenfibie, and. 
not neceiTary, but ) what Effect s they have. By feveral different Obfervations, we find there are 
Ties which unite us together, but we cannot accurately difcern how it is perform'd. We eaiily 
fee that a Watch points out the Hour, but it requires time to find out the Reafons of it. And 
there are fo many different Movements in the Brain of the leaft of Animals, as far furpafs the molt 
compound Clock-work in the World. 

As the perfect Knowledge of our Machinal ConftruQure is not poflible •? fo it is not abfolutely 
neceffary : but the Effects its Springs and Movements are capable of producing, are indifpenfibly 
neceffaiy to be known, for the well-managing our felves. There is no neceffity of knowing how 
a Watch is made, to make ufe of it ■? but to ufe it in meafuring out our Time, 'tis at leaft necef- 
fary to know that it fhews the Hours. Yet there are Men fo little capable of Reflexion, that we 
might almoft compare them with Machines purely inanimate. They feel not in themfelves the 
Elater'wm? which fiackens upon the fenfe of Objects. They are frequently tofs'd and agitated, 
without perceiving their own Motion •? are Slaves, and yet infenfible of their Bonds. Finally, 
they are conducted a thoufand different ways, without perceiving the hand of their Conductor. 
They fancy themfelves the fole Authors of the Motions which they perform : and not diltinguifh- 
ing what pafTes within them, purfuant to a free Act of their Will, from what the Impreffion of 
furrounding Bodies produces -, they think they are their own Guides, even when they are guided 
by another. But this is not a place proper for the Explication of thefe things. 

Thofe Alliances which Nature's Author has founded between our Natural Inclinations, in order 
to unite us to one another, feem yet more worthy our Application and Enquiries, than ihofe be- 
tween "Bodies, or between Minds? with reference to Bodies ; For all things are fo admirably 

difpos'd, 



Chap. XIII. The Search after Truth. j Si 

difpos'd, that thole very Inclinations which feem molt repugnant to Society, are the moft ufeful 
to it, when they are ibmewhat moderated. 

The Defile, for Inftance, which all Men have of Great nefs, direttly tends to the Subverfion of 
all Societies. Never thelefs, this Defire is fo temper'd by the Order of Nature, that it conduces more 
to Public k Welfare than many other weak and languid Inclinations : For it breeds Emulations, it pro- 
vokes Men toVertue, it bears up their Courage in the Services pay'd to their Country ; and fo many 
Conquefts would not be obtain'd, did not the Soldiers, and eipecially the Officers, aipire to Glory 
and great Commands : So that all the Particulars that conftitute Armies, labouring only for their 
private Interefts, fail not to procure Happinefs to their' Countries. Which evidences how highly 
advantageous it is to the PublickGood, that all Men fhouldhavea fecret Ambition for Greatnefs 
and Promotion, provided it be moderated. 

But if all the Particulars mould feem what they really are, mould they frankly confeis to others, 
they defign'd to be the principal Parts of the Body they compofe, and never to be the meanelt, this 
would not be the means to unite them together. All the Members of a Body cannot be the Head 
and Heart ; there muft be Feet and Hands, Little as well as Great, Members to Obey as well as to 
Command. And if every Member of a Society mould openly fay, he would Command, and never 
Obey, as in effe£l every one naturally wimes, 'tis vifible that all Politick Bodies would fall to Ru- 
ine and Confufion, and Injuftice would reign on Earth. 

It was neceflary therefore, thatthofe who have the moftSenfe, and are the fitteft to command, 
as the topmoft and nobleft Parts of a Community, mould be naturally Civil -, that is, mould be 
difpos'd by a fecret Inclination, to exprefs to others by their Behaviour, and by the Civility and 
Courtefie of Expreffion, how unworthy they think themfelves of any Confideration, and that 
they are the meaneft of all •, but that thole they addrefs to, are worthy of all. forts of Honours, 
and that they pay them the greateft Efteem and Veneration.- Laftly, to fupply the Defect of 
Charity, and Love of Order, it was needful for thofe that command others, to have the Art of 
deceiving them, by an imaginary Abatement, confifting in external Civilities, and good Words, 
that they might enjoy an unenvy'd Preheminence ; which is neceflary in all Bodies : For by that 
means each Particular poiTelTes after a fort the Grandeur he delires. The great polTefs it really, * and * / ftea\ 
the Little and Weak only in Imagination, being in a meafure perfuaded by the Compliments of* <*■ Man 't 
others, that they are not confider'd as they are, that is, theLowelt and Meaneft of the People. * ar * he 

By the way, it is eafie to conclude, from what we have faid, that 'tis a gteat Offence to Civility Earthly 
to fpeak often of one's felf, efpecially to one's own Advantage, though we had all poffible Accom- Grandeur 
pliftimentsj it being not allow'd to fpeak toPerfons we converfe with, as if we looked down upon confifts only 
them, unlefs in fome Circumftances, and when certain external Characters give us a fenfible Prehe- m . the . Itncl " 
mine nee : For Contempt is the greateft of Injuries ; 'tis that which is moft capable of diiTolving &mtls>tli 
Society •, and we can never hope that a Man, whom we have given to underftand. we think beneath 
us, will affociate with us, becaufe no Man can endure to be thought the meaneft Member of the 
Body he is of 

The Inclination therefore Men have to Complimenting, is the fitteft to counterbalance that other 
f or Efteem and Elevation ; and to foften that internal Pain thofe feel, who are the loweft Parts of 
the Body-Politick. Nor can we doubt but the Mixture of thefe two Inclinations is very effica- 
cious to the keeping up Society. 

But there is a ftrange Corruption in thefe Inclinations, no lefs than in Friendship, Companion, 
Good-will, and others, which tend to the uniting Men together. What ought to hold up a Civil 
Society, is commonly the Caufe of its Difunion and Downfal -, and, not to depart from my Sub- 
je£t, is often the Caufe of the Communication and Eftablimment of Errour. 

Among all the Inclinations necelTary to Civil Society, thofe which fubj^ct us moft. to Errour, are 
Friend fhip, Favour, Gratitude, and whatever induce us to fpeak too advantageoufly on others in 
their Piefence. 

We fet no Bounds to our Love of the Perfon of our Friends -, together with them we love what- u. 
•ever after any fort appertains to them ; and whereas they commonly exprefs thek Vehemence and This /«=; 
Pafhon for the Defence of their Opinions, they infenfibly incline us to believe, approve, and defend cl ™athn 
them, with as great or greater Obftinacy and Paffion than themfelves ; becaufe it would often look ^wTte 
but ill in them, to be hot in maintaining their Opinions, whereas we might defend them, without Thoughts of 
being blam'd for it : For in them it would be Self-love, in us Generofity. our Friends, 

Our Affection for other Men proceeds from as many Accounts, as they may pleafe, and ferve us and deccive 
feveral ways ; hike nefs of Humours, of Inclinations, Employments; their Air, their Behaviour, their them by m- 
Yertue, Eft ate, the Affetfion or Efteem they exprefs for us, the Services they have formerly done, 
or thofe we hope from them, and many other particular Reafons, determine us to love them : If 
it fortune then that any one of our Friends, that is, fome Perfon who has the fame Inclinations, 
an handfome Deportment, delightful Difcourfe, a vertuous Repute T oris of great Quality ; who 
teftifies an Efteem and Attention for us, who has done us any former Service, or from whom we 
hope any future ; or, in fine, whom we love for any other particular Reafon : If fuch a Perfon, 
I fay, chances to advance any Propofition, we greedily embrace it, without confulting our Rea- 
fon. We maintain his Opinion, inlbllicitous for the Truth of it, and even fometimes againft the 
Conviction of our Confcience, according as we are determin'd, by either the Obfcurity and Con- 
fufion of our Mind, the Corruption of our Heart, or the Advantages we hope to reap from our 
Falfe Generofity. 

There is no need of bringing particular Examples of what I fay, fince we rarely can be in 
Company an Hour together, without obferving feveral, if we make but a little Reflexion. Fa- 
vour 



> 68 F. M a t e b r a n e h e Concerning Book VI. 

vour and Laughter, according to the Common Saying, are feldom on the fide of Truth, but al- 
moft always on the fide of thole we love. "lis a Well-bred and Obliging Gentleman that ipeaks-, 
he is certainly therefore in the right : If what he fays be only probable, it's look'd upon as true ; 
if abfolutely impertinent and ridiculous, it will at leaft amount to a Probability. If it be a 
Man that loves me, efteems me, has done me fome Kindnefs, or is difpos'd or capacitated to do 
it, has maintain'd my Opinion on other Occafions, I fhall be both ungrateful and unwife, if I op- 
pugn his, or even fail to applaud him. Thus Truth is fported with, and made to truckle to our 
lnterelt, and we carefs the falfe Opinions of each other. 

A worthy Man ought not to take it ill to be inform'd, or inftru&ed, if it be done by the Rules 
of good Manners ; but if our Friends are difgufted, when we modeftly reprefent to them their 
Miftake, we mult permit them to love themfelves and their Errours, fince they will have it fo, 
and becaufe we have no Power to command them, nor to change their Mind. 

But a true Friend ought never to approve rhe Errours of his Friend •, for we ought to confider, 
that we do them greater Injury than we imagine, when we defend their Opinions without diftin- 
£tion. Our Applauies ferveonly to fwell their Heart, and itrengthen them in their Errours, where- 
by they grew incorrigible, and act, and decide atlait, as if they were infallible. 

Whence comes it that the molt Rich, the moft Powerful, the molt Noble, and generally all 
that are above others, believe themfelves commonly infallible, and deport themfelves as if they 
had more Reafon than Men of a Lower and Meaner Condition, but from a fervile Approbation 
indifferently given to all their Thoughts > So likewife the Approbation we give our Friends, in- 
fenfibly leads them to believe themfelves wifer than others ; which makes them arrogant, pre- 
fumptuous, and imprudent, and obnoxious to the groflelt Errours, without perceiving them. 

For which Reafon it is, that our Enemies often do us better Service, and open our Mind more by 
their Oppofitions, than our Friends by their Applaufes, becaufe the former keep us to our Guard^ 
and make us give heed to what we advance -, which one thing fuffices to acquaint us with our 
Ramblings, but the latter lull us to ileep, and give us an ungrounded Confidence that makes us 
Vain and Ignorant. Men Ihould never therefore admire their Friends, and fubmit to their Opini- 
ons, out of an AffetTwn ; as they ought not out of Difaffeflion, to oppofe their Enemies. But they 
ought to diveft themfelves of the Spirit of flattery and Contradiction, that they may grow fincere, 
and approve the Evidence of Truth where ever they find it. 

We ought moreover to fix it well in our Mind, that molt Men are difpos'd to Flatter or Com- - 
pliment us, through a kind of Natural Inclination, either to (hew their Parts, or to obtain the 
good Favour of others from the Hope of a Return-, or, laltly, out of a kind of Tnvidioufnefs and 
'Raillery : And we ought never to let our Brains be turn'd with any thing they can fay to us. Is 
it not a thing of daily Practice, to fee Men that are unacquainted, cry up each other to the Hea- 
vens, upon the very firlt Intercourfe ? And what more common than for Men to give exceffive 
Praifes, and to exprefs even Extatick Admiration to a Perfon upon a Publick Performance, even in 
the Company of thofe with whom they have ridiculed him juft before? Whenever a Man cries 
out, and turns pale with Admiration, as if altonilh'd at what he hears, 'tis no good Proof that 
the Speaker utters Wonders ; but rather, that he has a flattering Auditory, that he has Friends, 
or it may be Enemies, that give themfelves diverfion: That he talks in an engaging Itrain, that 
he is Rich, or Powerful ; or, if you will, 'tis a good Proof that his Difcourfe is founded on the 
confus'd and oblcure, but very moving and agreeable Notions of the Senfes •, or that he has a lively 
Imagination, fince Praifes are beftow'd on Friendfhip, Riches, Honours, Probabilities, but rarely 
upon Truth. 

'Twill perhaps be expected, that having treated in general of the Inclinations of the Mind, I 
Sfhould now defcend to an exa£t Difcuflion of all the particular Motions it is fenfible of, upon the 
Sight of Good and Evil, viz. That I mould explicate the Nature of Love, Hatred, Joy, Sorrow, 
and all the Intellectual Paffions, yvhethet General or Particular, Simple or Compound. But I have 
not oblig'd my lelf to account for all the different Motions whereof the Mind is capable. 

I am willing to have it knows, that my principal Defign in all the foregoing Treatife concern- 
ing the Search after Truth, was to make Men fenfible how weak and ignorant they are, and how 
lubje£t to Errour and Sin. I have faid it, and I fay it again, perhaps ir will be remembred, I had 
never defign'd a Thorough particular Explication of the Nature of the Mind ; but I have been oblig'd 
to lay fomething of it, to lay open its Errours in their Principle, to unfold them methodically, in 
a Word, to make my J elf intelligible. If I have tranfgrefs'd rhe Bounds I had prefcrib'd my iel£ 
it was becaufe I had, methought, new things to fay, which feem'd of moment, and which I be- 
liev'd might be read withPlealure. Perhaps I wasmiltaken^ but that Preemption was neceflary 
to encourage me to write them. For who would fay any thing, if he did not hope to be attended 
to > I have faid, it's true, leveral things which ieem to have lefs Analogy with the prefent Sub- 
let than would be the particular Treatment of the Motions of the Soul, and I acknowledge it. 
But 'tis not my Intention to put my felf under any Conltraint, when I propofe to my lelf a Me- 
thod. I lay down a Rule to go by ; but I prefume it may be permitted me to turn afideas I walk, 
when any thing falls in my way to be confider'd. I prefume too I have the Liberty of diverting 
to a Relting Place, provided I loie not Sight of the Road I am to purfue. Such as will not 
eafe themfelves with me, may go on if they pleafe, 'tis but turning to a new Page. But if they 
take it amifs, I would let them know that there are many who find that the Relting Places I have 
made choice of, make their Journey eafier, and more pleafant. 

The End of the Yirft Volume. 



CO 
P R E FA C E to the Second Volume; 

Which may ferve as an Anfwer to the ANiMADVE R SIO NS on the Firft:. 

SOme time fince was publiuYd a Book entituled, Animadverfions upon the Search after Truth, wherein^ 
at the fame time, arc examined part of M. des Cartes\r Principles, being a "Letter by an Academic k in 
Paris, ifc. Tis laid this Book attacks me, and truly not without Reafon -, for the Title fhews it, and 
the Author manifetts it was his Dehgn -, which gives me a Right and impofes on me a fort of Obligation of ' 
fpeaking my Thoughts of it. For befides that, I ought to diiabufe fome people who delight in thefe petty 
Quarrels, and immediately determine on the fide of the Criticks that gratifie their Paffion •, 1 think my felf 
bound to give fome Anfwer to the AggrefTor, that I may not bethought to be filent out of Infolence or Im- 
potence. ■ s- . • ■ . , • 

The Animadverter may pardon me, if he pleafes, if I fometimes feem to give him Provocation-, I 
Ihould be very foiry fo much as to defign it. But I cannot defend my felf without wounding him, nor re- 
pell the Blows he makes at me, without making him feel, . and others know his Weaknefs and Imbecillity. 
Self-defence is a natural Obligation, but the Defence of Truth is abfclutely indifpenfible. 

See here in fhort his Defign : He fuppofes the Book he animadverts on, is a Method for laying the Foun- 
dations of the Sciences. He reduces this Method to fourteen Heads, and (hews that they are either Sup- 
pofitions without Proof, or AlTertious without Foundation, and coniequently that the Subftance of the 
Book is intirely ufelefs to the Enquiry after Truth; though there are here and there fome Obfervations in it 
that place it in the rank of Works which have gain'd the Eftirriatioh of our Age. . 

I anfwer in General, that the Author of the Animadverfions has not underitood, or has diffembled the 
Underftanding the Defign of the Book he impungs ; it being plain that the principal Defign of it, is to dis- 
cover the Errours we are fubjecF to. 'Tis true it treats of the Nature of the Senfes, Imagination and In- 
tellect ; but 'tis manifeft, and I ptecaution in feveral places, that this is only to difcover thefe Errours in 
their Caufes : This being the Method I always endeavour to obferve, as believing it moil: advantageous to 
the enlightning the Mind. 

The Title of the firft Page of the Book he oppofes, wherein are to be feen in Capitals, CONCERN- 
ING THE ERROURS OF THF SENSES-, the very Table of the fame Book, or rather the Place 
where I make the Divifion of the whole Work, might have taught him my Defign, if he had de- 
fir'd to know it, where he might have read thefe words, which methinks are clear enough : And Chap. 4. B. 1. 
fo all the Errours of Men, and the Caufes of them, may be reduced to five Heads, and we fhall 
treat of them according to that order, Firft, We fhall /peak of the Errours of the S E'.N. SES. Secondly, Of 
the Errours of IMAGINATION. Thirdly, Of the Errours of the PURE INTELLECT Fourth- 
ly, Of the Errours of our INCLINATIONS. And fifthly, Of the Errours of the PASSIONS. And 
thus having made an Ejfay to rid the Soul of the Errours which Jhe is fubjetl to, WE SHALL, Laftly 
LAY DOWN A GENERAL METHOD- TO CONDUCT HER IN THE SEARCH OF 
TRUTH. 'Tis plain enough from this Divifion, that the firft Volume, which is the fubjeSt of our Au- 
thor's Animadverfions, treats only of the Senfes, Imagination and Intellect, and that the Method which he 
fuppofes I have given, ought to be the Subject of the Second Volume 

Neverthelefs as he is pleafed to make me undertake a Defign I do not execute, that he may have the 
more to Charge upon my Conducl, fo he goes to prove it was my Defign to lay down a Me- 
thod in that Book. I do him no Injury, fays he, in looking on his Book as a Method to lay the Page 9, 10. 
Foundations of the Sciences: For befides that the Title expreffes fo much, he declares himfelf 
upon the Point in the following manner ■, " Let us examaine the Caufes and Nature of our Page r. 
" Errours, and fince the Method of examining things, by confidering them in their Birth and 
" Origin, is the moft regular and perfpicuous, and ferves better than others to give us a thorough know- 
" ledge of them, let us try to put it here in practice. 

I do a Man no Injury, when I fay he defigns to draw an Hercules ; but'if I fhew that inftead of an Her- 
cules, he takes a Polyphemus, or Therfites, I make him ridiculous : Should I fay with many others, that the 
Animadverter is a Cartefian, or that he defigned by his Animadverfions on my Book to defend the Doftrine of 
Ties Cartes, I fhould not wrong him ; but if at the fame time I fhould fhew that he oppofes me without un- ' 
derftanding me, I ihould poflibly offend him. 'Tis then injuring a Man, to charge upon him Defigns which 
he never had, to render him ridiculous. But a Man mult be wretchedly in the wrong who impofes them 
on fuch as have, like me in feveral places, explain'd themfeives clearly upon the Subject. 

But the Title of my Book evidences as much, for 'tis concerning the Search after Truth. I anfwer, That to 
fearch out Truth, two things are requifite -, firit to be delivered from the Prejudices of Childhood, or vulgar 
Errours ; Secondly, to have a good Method. The Title of the Book is comprehenfive of thefe two parts. I 
have given the firft in the former Volume, but the Animadverter will needs have it, that I have given the 
fecond ; which finely is unreafonabie. He ought rather to correel: the Title by the Book, if the Title dif- 
pleafed him, than to go about to ruine a whole Book for the Title's -fake. 

But, continues our Aurhor, I declare my felf upon the Point in this manner, " Let us exa- 
" mine the Caufes and Nature of our Errours, and fince the Method of examining things, by Page 10, 
" confidering them in their Birth and Origin, is the moft regular and perfpicuous, and ferves 
" bettet than others to give us a thorough knowledge of them ; let us try to put it here in prattice. 

I have been fhewing, that I have declar'd diftin6Uy enough in the Divifion I have made of my work, that 
I gave not my Method in the firft Volume -, this cannot be doubted. But let us fee whether this paifage 
was enough to make him think I have given a Method: I fay, Let us examine the Caufes and Nature of 
our Errours. My Defign therefore according to-this Paffage, is to examine the Caufes and Nature of our 
Errours. That's plain. I continue, And fince the Method of examining things by confidering them m their 
Birth and Origin, is more regular and perfpicuous than others -, let us try to put it in pratfice, 

(a) My 



PREFACE. 

Mv Defign therefore is to exafnine the Caufes and Nature of our Errours methodically h can any one from 
hence believe I have given a Method? If fo, we may believe there is no Author but has given a Method, 
fince there is none but has the fame Defign as my felf to write methodically. I might even lay that the Ani- 
madverter has defign'd to give a Method, and impugn him by his own Weapons, but that he had rather 
be thought to have written without any. Thefe are the Proofs imployed by him to demonitrate I have 

81 The fomteer/ Heads of this Imaginary Method, are in the places whence they are taken either incidental 
Propofirions, or Anfwers to Objeaions, or Opinions he afcribes to me, for want or Undemanding what .he 
engages ; or laftly Examples, which of themfelves neither are nor can be Heads of a Method. Here fol- 
lows the firft of thefe Heads. ■ _"L..-.:;..-. . , <. • ! „ A A • 

I begin thus " The Mind (or Soul) of Man being neither material nor extended, is un- 
p,*e r " doubtedly a fimple Subftance, indivifible, and without any Compofmon of Parts notwith- 

" Handing it has been the cuitom to diftingifli in it two Faculties, namely, the Underitand- 
« ins and the Will-, which it is neceiTary in the firft place to explain: for it feems, &?c. And m order to 
render the abftraa Ideas of thefe two words fenfible, I explain them not as our Author mifreprefents me, 
with delation to the Effence of Matter, which he fuppofes unknown; but by Relation to. the Properties 
which all the World acknowledge are in Matter: i.e. the capacity of being movd, and or receiving diffe- 
rent external Figures, and internal Configurations. „. t , , „ ' , , • IMAX-I. 
The Animadverter fuppohng, as has been faid, that the Book he impugns is a Method, be- 
Pa-e 20. • gins thus : The firft thing to be obfervd when a Man pretends to the fear ch of Truth, is not to 
tuppofe he has already found it, though he be in perfect poffejfion of it, &c. And lower, Which 
ge "' thins the Author feems not to have Sufficiently confide? d; for at his very firft. Jetting out, he 
engages in the fuppofition of a thing, the Knowledge whereof is the principal motive to bis Enquiry after Truth, 
and which he ought not to determine before he had exhaufted the greateji ^iieflions in Phlofophy. Thus it is 
he enters on his matter in his firjl Chapter. The Mind of Man being neither material nor extended, &e. 
'tis eafie to fee this Supposition is not indifferent, &c. ' ' , . 

I aniwer, firft, that it was not my Defign to give a Method in the Book he impugns, but only to prepare 
the Mind by delivering it from Prejudices. 

Secondly, that though it had been my Defign, I might have-fuppos'd fome Truths, which are commonly 
acknowledge as that the Soul is not material: efpecialy if I employ them not as a Foundation to build 

TanlwerSthe third place, that thePropofitionhe will have to be an Head of my Method is an incidental 
Propofition. The bare conftruaion of the words, is a fufficient indication ; the procefs of the Difcourfe 
an undeniable proof-, and all that I fay in this place might fubfift though the Soul were material. Tk not 
the part of a good Critick fo take an incidental Propofition, for a Fundamental and an Head of a Method. 
Nor is this to prove I have fiippos'd to have found the Truth I am in quell of* fince the thing I fuppofe, 
or rather which I do not examine, is not of any ufe to me. ^ , . 

When it was neceiTary to the fequel of Difcourfe, to know that the Soul was a kind of 

* Book i. Being diflina from Matter, * I have prov'd it, or referf d to thole that have. But why will 

•Ch. 9. B. ? . in he oblige me to prove a thing in. this place, .which would be ufelefs to the following Dil- 

feveral places. cour f e b anci j f^ouid have been forry to have prov'd here? Whether the Soul be material or 

not it is always true, that it has been the cuftom to diftinguifh. two Faculties in it, the Un- 

derftanding and Will. Thefe two words are in ufe, and I may employ them , they are perhaps obfcure and 

I ought to define them •, and becaufe their Ideas are abftraa, I may make them fenfible. This is what I 

have done, and I cannot yet fee what any one can blame in- it. , 

At my very firft: fetting out, he fays, I engage in the fuppofition of a thing, the knowledge whereof is the 
principal motive to my Enquiry after Truth, and which I ought not to determine before having exhaufted the 

ereateft §>ue (lions in Philqfophy. ~ „.., ,„ r • ^ • \ 

All this Difcourfe is falie, I engage not in a Suppofition, for incidental Proportions come not into account. 
The principal motive to my Enquiry after Truth, is not to know whether the Soul be Material 01 : Immaterial ; 
and fo far is this Queftion W being infoluble, till having drained the greateji ^iteftions of Phlofophy, that its 
Refolution depends on no other. This Queftion is not complex'd, and the bare Companion or Ideas which 
anfwer to the terms is fufficient to refolve it, as I mall (hew in the fixth Book, though this is not difcover- 
able by thofe who make more ufe of their Imagination than their Reafon. There is no neceflity of explain- 
ing this more at prefentr we need but know that this Suppofition is an incidental Propofition, from which I 
draw no Conference, and which I ihould have been to blame to prove -, and yet if we will 
Page 22. credit the Animadverter, What is worft of all, is that thkfole Anticipation is enough to ruine 

all the hopes the Search after Truth might have raised in us. v TT 

In the four or five firft Pages which our Animadverter fpends in refuting the firft pretended Head of the 
Imaginary Method, many things would deferve our confideration, if we thought our felves obliged to let 
the World know all his Faults 5 for he impofes on me here, as in other places, without any Proof, Opi- 
nions and Defigns which never entred my Head ; and he does it with a confidence which is capable of fur- 
online all thofe who believe others on their Words. I am willing to think he is too honeft : and fincere a 
Man to prevaricate, and to be prodigal of that Refpea which is due to the Publick -, but if fo, there is 
Levitv or Temerity in his enterprife : he mould not have undertaken to oppoie what he did not underftand. 
Yet I cannot chufe but relate how he finifhes his firft Attack ; we fhall know what we are to think of the 

reft bv the Beginning and End. ■ 1 1 , , 

I laid that the Soul being a Simple and Indivifible Subftance has no patts ; however it had been the cu- 
ftom to diftinguifh in it two Faculties, the Underftanding and Will, 0V. This has given occafion to the A- 
nimadverter to accufe me of Contradiftion j and after having prov'd, after his manner, by many Interroga- 
tions and Rhetorical Figures extremely convincing, he concludes with thefe words which reprefent his 
ttrhnle figurative Reafoning in fhort, and for that Reafon he has put it m Italickj Which is the fame thing, 
fi«te^?/5s!^^rM SOUL IS WITHOUT ANT COMPOSITION OP PARTS, 
BUT Wt I AM WING TO EXPLAIN HOW SHE CONTAINS THEM Toufee, 
Sir continues he that this Suppofition fervcs only to throw us immediately into objcurity-, befulcs that y it 

1 " J c 



PREFACE. % 

is contrary on other grounds to the fuccefs of this Method. But who ever took Faculties for Parts? Cer- 
tainly the Paffion for Criticifing muft be very blind, to put into the Mouth of a Man of Parts, fo extraor- 
dinary Companions, and to nuke him believe the World muft be content with them. But let us examine 
his fecond Head of my pretended Method, and fee how he impugns it. 

After having fhewn that to the avoiding Errour, we muft only give our confent to things appearing in 
fuch Light and Evidence as make it impoflible for us to withhold it, without clearly tln- 
derftanding the fecret Reproaches of our Reafon : I adjoyn h " Tis not however to be de- Page ?. 
" nied but there are fome Truths, befides thofe of Faith, for which it would be unreasonable 
" to demand indifputable Demonltrations, as are thofe which relate to matter of Fa£t in Hiltory, and other 
" things which have their dependence on the Will of Men h for there are two kinds of Truth, the one ne- 
" ceffary, the other contingent. And becaufe thefe two words Neceffary and Contingent, are not it may 
be clear enough, I explain them thus : " I call neceffary Truths thole which are immutable by their Na- 
" ture, and thole which have been fix'd and determined by the Will of God, which is not fubje£fc to change : 
" All other forts of Truth are contingent. And lower, We demand therefore an exact obfervation of the 
" Rule we have been eftablifliing in the Search of neceffary Truths, the knowledge of which may be call'd 
" Science ; and we muft be content with the greatelt probability in Hiftory, which includes the knowledge- 
" of things contingent. For under, &c. 

I wifh it might be examin'd, firft, whether the things I have been faying are clear or ohicure ? Whether 
it may not be fuppos'd there are necelTary Truths, as that 2 times 2 are 4, and contingent Truths as that 

Mr. lhall fay fuch a thing at fuch an hour, efpecially when we have no defign of eftablifliing any 

Syftem upon this Suppolition ? Whether there be any thing more certain than this Suppolition, whereby it 
may be proved. Laftly, whether a Man can reafonably perfuade himfelf, that I lay down for one of the 
Heads of my Method, or a Suppolition elTentiai to any Syftem, a Propolition which begins with FOR. 

This being fuppos'd I come now to produce the Reafonings of our Animadverter againft what I have laid 
of contingent and neceffary Truths, I lhall only place in the Margin fome Notes or Anfwers I lhall think 
neceffary :, this being the Ihorteft and ealieft way for me •, fince it is an harder thing than is imagined to an- 
fwer clearly fuch as are unintelligible and inconfequent Reaibners. For we muft at leaft put their Objecti- 
ons in fome form to folve them, which cannot be always done, either becaufe they will not bear it or be- 
caufe we do not underftand them. For my own part, I am very glad it cannot be imagined I ufe the Ani- 
madverfions, as the Animadverter has us'd the Search -, or that from different Paffages of this Book I com- 
pofe an incomprehenilble peice of Nonfenfe. 

ANIMADVERSIONS. 

The Second Suppofition concerning Neceffary Truths , Page <?„ 
ANIMADVERSIONS. ANSWER. 

TH E Second thing fuppofed by the Author is, that there (a) ' / "lp I S becaufe this is more certain 
are two forts of Truths, Neceffary and Contingent. I JL than any thing elle, and that 

know not for what reafon he looks upon what he here afferts, there is nothing certain if this be not. For 

as (a) undeniable, and why he does not think of proving it. if Two times Two are neceffarily equal to 

For this is one of the moll considerable Queftions that has em- Four, if a Whole be neceffarily bigger than 

ployed the Learned, efpecially the Ancients ; infomuch that the its Part , there are neceffary Truths. I 

foil Philofophers were (b) all, except Parmenides, of a con- know not for what reafon the Animadverter 

trary opinion to that he maintains in this place. Yet Parme- would have me think of proving what can- 

nides acknowledged but one neceffary Truth, whereas he lup- not be prov'd, unlefs by fbmething more 

pofes a very great number. Protagoras believ'd there was no obicure and difficult. This is 

Truth on the part of things, fo far was he from owning any not to Philofophize * after * Pref. Page^ 

neceffary •, and that Man was the Meaiure and Rule of all that the manner of the ancient A- 

could come in Queftion ^ that there was nothing but mere Ap- cademy. 

pearances, and no Realities, and confequently there were no (b) This is curious and far fetch 1 d. All 
Truths to feek, or Errours to avoid, all being equally true, or the firft Philofophers, except Parmenides 
rather equally falfe. The Pyrronifis have ftill maintained there have denied there were neceffary and con- 
was nothing certain or truly determined, or 'that if there were, tingent Truths. What wonder is it? 'Tis 
yet we could not know it. The new Philofophers grant that a fine thing, this Erudition ; certainly Me- 
individuals are no wife immutable* but are fubjecl: to continual ditation can never teach us what we learn 
Viciffitudes -, which being fo, what becomes of neceffary Truths ? from the reading the Ancients, though we 
I fpeak not of thofe which are found in the Mathema ticks, that % underftand them but by halves. . But 'tis 
ought to make a Queftion (c) apart-, but of thofe he fuppofes * vifible that our Author underftands the' old 
in Phyficks, Medicine and Morality, though I ftill except thofe Philofophers -no better than the new. 
which regard the Effence or Exiftence of a God. Where then (c) I fay indeed that ought to make a 
could he place them, except in the (d) Species and Effences Queftion apart, but he will let it have 
of the fame Individuals which are fubjecl: to change ? And if no part. 

thefe Effences or Species are nothing but Ideas, as may be fu- (d) The demand is pleafant, but the 

ipetted if their immutability be only in appearance, mould not Author would not have made it , if he 

we, in following that fuppofition, engage in an Errour, which had but read the Third Book of the 

would abfolutely exclude us from the knowledge of the true Search after Truth , lince I have there 

ftate of things? clearly given my Thoughts upon thefe 

things. But it feems our Author takes 
Truths for certain little Beings, which are born and die every Moment. 

But let us fee what the Author calls neceffary Truths, for at leaft he explains what he means by thefe 

words, " I call neceffary Truths, thole which are immutable by their Nature, and thofe which have been 
" fixed and determined by the Will of God, which is not fubjecl to change. 

. To 



4 PREFACE. 

To fay that thefe Truths are immutable by their Nature, what is it more than to fay, they are immu- 
table becaufe immutable, unlefs this fignihes they are effentially fp without any external affiftance? But 
if thefe Truths were neceiTary in this manner, how were they determin'd by the Will of God, fince God 
being free, as the Author will not deny, he might, if he had 

pleas'd, have not determin'd them to be immutable (e). And (c) There are two forts of immutable' 
if fo, they are immutable only by Grace, becanfe God will'd Truths. Some are immutable of them- 
it fo,' and' determin'd them to that ftate of immutability. felves, or by their Nature, as that twice 

Two are Four-, and others becaufe they 
have been determin'd by the Will of God, which is not fubje£t to change ; as that a Bowl Ihould move 
another on fuch an encounter. 'Tis eaiie to fee he has not underilood what he pretends to oppofe. He 
was not aware that the ConjuCtive Particle and had fometimes the fame purport as the Disjunctive or-, 
for if he had obferv'd it, he could with no good Grace have ferioufly wrangled upon the Ambiguity of a 
Particle. He might have eafily confider'd that Truths which are NeceiTary by their Nature, as that Two 
times Two make four, need not the Will of God to make them fuch. But be it granted, that I had not 
fufficiently explain'd my fell'-, yet the place on which he criticifes being but accelfary to my Defign, it was 
not neceiTary to explain my felf more at large. Would a Man be at the pains of reading it, he might fee 
I needed only to fay, there were neceiTary Truths, and that I was not oblig'd to examine the caufe of their 
nececeffity. , 

This being fo, how come they to be immutable by their Nature, fince it was poffible for them to be 
liable to change ? But if it were not poffible for them to be fubjecf to change, how could they be deter- 
min'd by God to be immutable? and how could he have hYdthem by the operation of his Will? 

The Author may explain himfelf upon this Point, if he think convenient-, mean time it is no little con- 
cern to know whether God can change the EfTences of things, and make two Contradictories true at the 
fame time h for as a celebrated Divine of our Age has faid upon the lame words that are now under exa- 
mination, Is God the Author of the Truth of his own Exigence ? Or ought we to affirm that we can form 
a right-lined Triangle, whofe three Angles fnall be greater than two Rights , or that mall have one Side 
longer than the other two ? In a word, if it be poffible for Contradictories to be true and falfe at the 
fame time, what will become of humane Reafoning? And (f) For my part I know not what he 
what mall we fay to thofe Theological Conclufions, which drives at : this is a very commodious way 
allure us that God is not Corporeal, that he is not fubjeCt to of cridcifing 5 z Man has Reafon when* 
Change, that he has always been ? (f) &c. ever he defires it. 

(g) Might we not fay in following this Hypothefis, that its ^ (g) He impofes on me three Falfities in 
poffible for him to have been eternally, and not to have been fix Lines, Ifhave never determin'd upon this 
eternally ; that he 'is liable and not liable to change ? I mean Queftion, neither in undue Circumftances, 
not to pronounce upon fo difficult a Queftion, but I may af- nor with infuirlcient Proofs h fori have not 
firm the Author had no right to do it, efpecially in the Cir- fo much as fpoken of it -, but if he has a 
cumftances he has done it, and without alleadging fufficient mind to know my Thoughts ofit, I fear not 
Proofs. t0 affirm that God cannot caufe Contradic- 

tories to be true and falfe at the fame time. 

Yet methinks I perceive a fhew of Reafoning in thefe words, and by the Will of God which is notfubjetl 
to change. He feems to confider the Will of God as the Caufe of the Neceffity of thefe Truths. But if 
fo, he proves too much in the place where we complain he proves nothing at all; for if what God wills 
be' immutable, becaufe his Will is not fubjeCt to change ; it follows that whatever he wills, muft have an 
equal immutability, fince it is the lame Will which is the Caufe of it : Mean while it is certain he wills 
things which are fubjeCl to change, when he determines the (h) He confounds Beings with Truths. 
Exiftence or Non-exiftence of Creatures in the Viciffitude of Man is capable of Reafon and Senfe. A 
times (h). Thus though God Ihould have fix'd thefe Truths Globe may be divided into two Hemi- 
but for fome Ages, his Will thereby would be no lefs immu- fpheres. A Man and a Globe are fubje£t 
table, than for his producing daily all thofe admirable changes to change, but thefe Truths are immu- 
whic'h make the Beauty of the Univerfe. table. 

But the Author will lay, God wills that thefe Truths mould be immutable for ever. But how could he 
know this, had he any particular Revelation ? yet he fpeaks as positively as if lie was very certain. 

It may be he bottoms upon this, that if thefe Truths feem 
immutable to us whilft they are fubjeCl to change, we mould 

err in pretending to Science (I). But if it were fo, all that (I) All this concerns not me, but only 
could thence be concluded is that the firft Philofophers , the (hews the Fecundity of our Author. 
Academicks and Fyrronifls, have better Philofophiz'd than the 

Feripateticks, Cartefw.ns, and other Dcgwatijh; and I do not believe the Author would eftablifh his Phi- 
lofophy upon fuch a Sophifm, unlefs there were neceffary Truths^ we could have no true Science -, there- 
fore there are neceffary Truths. 

(m ) But though we might fuppole there were neceiTary (m) Confider, if you pleafe, all thefe 
Truths in Phyfick, Medicine, &c. and might determine about Flourifhes, endeavour to undeiftand them, 
this Queftion, without being utterly excluded from the know- and admire how the Imagination feduces 
ledge of Truth. Reafon : I think our Author may be faid 

Though thefe Truths were neceiTary by their Nature, and to refemble a Man , who imagining he 
their immutability by fome new Myltery was ftill an effeCl of fees his Enemy at hand, mould prefently 
the free determination of the Will of God. charge againft the Phantom, mould pierce 

Though the neceffity of thefe Truths proceeded from the it with his Sword, fhould cut off its Head ; 
immutability of this Will, whilft yet it is the Caufe of all the and then, over-joy'd with fo. fuccefsful 
( Changes happening in the Univerfe. and eafie a Conqueft, mould triumphant- 

Though we fhould be moreover aflur'd that God had refolv'd ly exclaim , though my Piftols had mif- 
to preferve thefe Truths in an entire immutability. carried, my fword had run him through ^ 

We muft ftill fuppole in order to enter into his Opinion, the but though my Sword had milTed him, 
knowledge of the Exiltence of God and of his Will, of his Li- yet I had cut off his Head; but laftly, 
berty and of his Power. - though 



P-tL E;F A C t. '" 5 

though his Head fhould have remained upon his Shoulders, yet I found him fo feeble and eafily to be con- 
quered, that I had nothing to fear from him. 'Tis vifible from all thefe Flourifhes, that our Author fan- 
cies he has feverely handled me, whilft yet I am as infenfible of his Wounds, as the Enemy the poor Man 
thought he had fo cruelly Butcher'd. , 

(n) Which obliges me to make fome Reflexions upon what (n) I ought in our Author's opinion to 
he has borrowed from Faith to add to Reafons Philofophical, have begun with Theology to prove me- 
which is what we may look upon as his third Suppofition. thodically there are neceflary and contin- 

gent Truths : but I do not believe that 
Conduct would have had the Approbation of many People 5 and feeing it is an hard task to content the 
Criticks, I cannot believe our Animadverter would have been well fatisfied. This third Head, which I am 
going to comment on, as on the preceding, fufficiently {hews us what he is. 

After having prov'd that we muft yield only to Evidence, except in matters of Faith, which 
are not lubmitted to the difquifition of Reafon; I conclude with thefe words. " Myfteries Page 9, 
" then of Faith muft be diftinguifhed from things of Nature : we ought equally to fubmit 
" to Faith and to Evidence, but in the concernments of Faith we. muft not look for Evidence, as in thofe 
" of Nature we ought not to take up with Faith ; that is, with the Authority of Philofophers. In a word, 
" to be a Believer 'tis required to affent blindly, but to be a Philofopher it is neceflary to fee plainly. 

Myfteries of Faith muft. be diftinguifhed from things of Na- (0) I know not whether what I lay 
ture. Thus judicioufly fpeaks the Author, and concludes with ought to be rank'd amongft Proverbs and 
thefe words, which might even pafs for (0) a Proverb : To Quibbles, for that depends upon the Taft -, 
be a Beli ever 'tis required to affent blindly, but Jo be a Philofopher and I refer my felf to thofe whom the 
'tis ncceffary to fee plainly. Mean while I wonder he obferves Paflion for criticifing has not made over 
not in his Book the Refolution he made of not (p) mingling fcrupulous and dainty. They likewife may 
the concerns of Religion with the decifions of Philofophy: for refleft: whether this nicenefs fuits well 
it's too vifible that one half of his Book is nothing but Reflexi- with the Author of this Difcourfe, and 
ons upon original Sin, deprav'd Manners, and corrupt Inclina- whether he ought fo much to pretend to 
tions, which Chriftian Morality is to correft. an exquifite Taft. 

(p) There's a great difference between mingling and confounding. I mail always diftinguiffi things of 
Faith from thofe of Nature, as I here fay ought to be done. But I never made a Refolution not to lpeak 
of God or Chriftian Morality in treating about the Search after Truth. The Author feems not to under- 
ftand me, that he may play the Critick with lels trouble. 

(q) I blame not his Piety in this, not believe it a thing un- (q) Can he not fee that thefe things are 
becoming a Chriftian to labour upon thefe Subje&s. But that not of themfelves Articles of Faith, and 
ought to be referv'd for Sermons. that we may fpeak of the Goodnefs of 

God, deprav'd Manners, and corrupt Incli- 
nations without having recourfe to Faith. 

(r ) Or if he had defign'd to take the occafion of infinuating (r) There are in thefe Animadverfions 
thefe Morals, as knowing that the true way of moving the fome little Raileries which provoke to 
Heart pathetically is to do it by difcovering to the Mind the Pity, but this might raife ones Indigna- 
Truths that are of neareft concernment to it $ he might have tion. Let him know once for all, that if 
fatisfied that laudable defire, but fhould have contriv'd for that I confented to the Publication Of this 
purpofe particular Chapters, which he has done too in fome Book, 'twas chiefly becaufe it 
places. But once more, a very little thing will ferve to con- contains thofe things which he Page 12, 
found the Light we begin to receive in the Search after Truth. condemns as Enthufiafms. 

(s) We cannot at the fame time fatisfie both Reafon and (s) If he fpeaks of himfeif, we ought 
Faith, fince Reafon obliges us to open our Eyes, and Faith to take his word for it, 
commands us to {hut them. 

(t) And yet I find he has fo interwoven his principal Pro- (t) What he has faid is true, but what 
pofitions with the Credenda of Religion, that he feems to talk he goes to conclude from it is falfe, it be- 
more like a Divine than Philofopher. For exam- ing Reafon and not Faith which teaches 

Page 6. pie, among other things he concludes, That (u) if us God is no Deceiver. 

the Will had not this Liberty^ but muft have embraced (u) He has here fupprefs'd two words, 
every thing that came cloath'd with an appearance of Truth, it which give all the force to my reafoning, 
would have almoft ever been deceived; whence probably it might which runs thus, If it muft infallibly and 
be concluded that the Author of its Being was the Author of its necelTarily have embraced every thing ; we 
Errours and Seducements. And afterwards, We have therefore fhall fee by and by what reafon he had 
a Liberty given us by God, that we might avoid falling into Er- for this Retrenchment, 
rour. 'Tis vifible this reafoning is founded on the Author's 

fuppofing God will not deceive us (x). But may it not be doubt- (x) Reafon teaches us, that God is no 
ed whether God has not made us for the enjoyment of proba- Deceiver, 'and Faith fuppofes it •, which 
bility only, and refolv'd to referve the knowledge of Truth as is quite contrary td what the Animadver- 
his own peculiar ; or whether he defigns not this as a pure ac- ' ter imagines". 

ceflion to our Happinefs (y) in Heaven •, wherefore we ought (y) It cannot be doubted when we have 
not to conclude that he would be a Deceiver, if he mould not Reafons for it ^ but it is needlefs to ftand 
afford us the means of difcovering it. to anfwer all thefe Queftions. 

(z) I leave it, Sir, to you to think what the Pyrronifts (z) I do nbt conclude it with that Ar- 
would fay, if they ftiould hear this arguing. Many fuch there gumfcnt : Mine is good, and this good for 
are in the procefs of this piece , efpecially in the laft part , nothing ■, there is difference between I_N- 
whereof moft Chapters contain Arguments which include the- F A L L I B LY and N E C E 3 S A R I LY 
ological Queftions (a). forcing us to embrace Errour, and not. giv- 

ing us the means to difcover Truth. Certainly thefe words, Infallibly and Neceffarily, ought not to be" 
fupprefs'd. 

(a) He cannot {hew a place in the whole Book he animadverts on, where I fuppoie any Article of Faith 
as a Principle from whence to draw any Confequences Effential to the Search of Truth.' But he imagines 
if a Man fpeaks but of the Goodnefs of God, deprav'd Manners, and corrupt Inclinations, he is treating of 
fome Article of Faith, (b) (b) Whether 



6 f R E F A C E. 

(b) Whether then he confiders all thefe Suppofitions as Arti- (b) Methinks thefe two Conclufions 
eles of Faith, or regards them as Truths demonftrahle by Phi- have no other aim than to gain by fur- 
lofophy, he ought ftill to diftinguifli them from the Fundamen- prife ibme little Applaufes from fuch as 
tals of his Work. give them gratis. 

If he confiders them as Articles of Faith, he is very well 
p rfuaded they are obfcure ; If he looks on them as conclufions 
of Humane Science, his Method ought to precede them, and 
not imploy them as Principles to depend upon. 

If I thought the World would be concern'd to know exactly that the Animadverter has not underftood 
what he has pretended to encounter, I would thus continue him on to the end of his Book, and would 
make it undeniably appear that he has hardly ever taken my Senfe, and that he had no Idea of my Defign ; 
but I believe that reafonable Men will be very indifferent in this particular:, and therefore not to weary 
them to no purpofe, and yet to difcharge that Debt which fome perfons think I owe to Truth, I will an- 
fwer in few words all the Chapters of the Animadverfions ^ and I defire fuch as mail have leafure and cu- 
riofity enough, to examine whether my Anfwers are jult, by confronting the Animadverfons with the Search. 
In the fourth Article or Chapter, the Animadverter oppofes my Opinions at large, without knowing them. 
He does not confider there are two forts of Traces, one which the Mind forms to reprefent things by, as 
the Trace which accompanies the Idea of a Square •, the other which accompanies ahftraft Ideas but re- 
prefents them not ; fuch are the Traces which the Sound of Words and the Sight of Characters produce irt 
the Brain, which naturally have no power to reprefent or raife Ideas. This one Diftincf ion overthrows the 
grand Reafonings of our Author. 

In this fifth Chapter he puts upon me many Opinions which I never had. 'Tis not true, 
Page 44. That I acknowledge all our Ideas to be but Modes of our SouPs exifiing. On the contrary, I 
have in the third Book which he reflects on, given a Chapter on purpofe to /hew that Opi- 
nion indefenfible. When a Man will play the Critick, 'tis fit, methinks, he mould read the 
Page 47. Book he takes to task. Nor is it true, that I own that the Ideas we receive by the Senfes^ re- 
prefent only the Effecls produced in us by external Objetfs. I have faid the contrary in feveral 
places, in the fifteenth Chapter of the firft Book, and elfewhere. Why does he not cite, or rather why 
does he not examine what he Criticifes on ? For what remains, I cannot diftincf ly conceive all the Argu- 
mentations he here makes. I know not the Reafon of them : thofe who attentively read them may think of 
them what they pleafe. But I fcruple not to affirm, that he is fo far from impugning my Opinion about 
the manner of the Minds perceiving external Objects ; that on the contrary, what he fays in this Article 
(hews he knows nothing of it. 
In his fixth Chapter, he impofes on me what he calls my fixth Supposition ; or rather he has no know- 
ledge of my Opinion upon that Subject : To me he feems not fo much as to have read what I 
Page 56,57. have written on it 5 he affirms in feveral places that I bottom upon Mr. des Cartes"' s refolution 
upon that ^uefticn, when yet my Opinion is intirely different from his. But 'tis evident to 
all that underftand Mr. des Cartes, and have read what I have faid upon that Queftion, that the Author 
neither underftands mine nor Mr. des Cartes's Opinions. Mean-while he argues vehemently without know- 
ing what he oppofes, and even fometimes without difcovering what he aims at. 

The Author is very much in the wrong in his feventh Chapter, to require me to prove the 
Page 62. Exiftence of Extenfion^ when I mean only to aflault the Errours of the Senfes in point of 
fenfible Qualites, and I mould have repented if I had follow'd that Method. I prove what 
is ferviceable to me in the fequel, and I eftablifh nothing upon the Suppofition he attributes 
Page 64. to me. Moreover I cannot tell how it came into his Head, after feven years, to complain of an 
Anfwer of Monfieuj^Rohault -, he mould have replied to it whilft he was alive, but he want- 
ed courage : for every one knows with what accuracy and force that learned Man repell'd the Blows that 
were ofier'd him, and with two or three words, pronounc'd without all manner of Heat and Paifion, hum- 
bled the Imagination of fuch as being full of themfelves, thought to cover him with confufion. 

In anfwer to the eighth Chapter, I defire the Author to take notice, firft, that there is dif- 
Page 80. ference between an Evil, and the Reprefentation of it ■, and therefore the Will may fly the for- 
mer, and yet aquiefce in the latter. Secondly, that though the Will be nothing but the na- 
tural Motion of the Soul towards Good in general ? yet the Reft or Acquiefcence of the Soul in evident 
Truths proceeds from the Will, becaufe Reft is produ'd by Motion. God will ftill imprint on us this na- 
tural Motion of Love, when we fhall intirely repofe our felvesupon him. For the Motion of Love doth 
not ceafe by the poifeffion of Good, and by the view of Truth, as Motion of Bodies is interrupted by Reft. 
We might fay farther, that even Bodies reft not as capable of Figures, but with refpecl: to Motion. The 
reft need no Anfwer, if the Reader will carefully confider thofe places in the Search which he attacks ; for 
'tis needlefs to anfwer Objections which vanifh upon a diftincl: Underftanding of what I have written, 
though they appear confiderable in themfelves. 

In the ninth Chapter the Author oppofes my own Objections, and neglects the Anfwers I have given them j 
and not knowing there are feveral forts of Liberty, he fancies, with a great deal of Joy, that I have fallen into 
a Contradiction. 

I have nothing to fay to his Tenth Chapter, but that what he comments on feems too clear 
Page 98. to ltand in need of his Reflexions ^ and that I think it cannot reafbnably be doubted there is a 

City in Italy call'd Rome, though it cannot be mathematically demonftrated. 
In the eleventh Chapter, the Author does notobferve that I have referred to fome Books of St. Aufiin, 
and the Meditations of Mr. des Cartes, to prove a thing, which yet is fufficiently receiv'd, and which he 
pretends I had no right to fuppofe. He ought to know my Defign was not to eftablifh a Syftem, and to re- 
member that all I vigoroufly demand, is, to enter into fome diffidence of our Senfes ; as I have caution'd in 
the laft Chapter concerning the Errours of the Senfes. 

In anfwer to the Coniequences he infers in his Twelfth Chapter, againft an Example alleadg'd by me, and 
which he will have to pals for an Head of my Method, we need but (ay, that Men ought to reafon only 
upon their clear and diftincl Ideas, whithout being follicitous about what they cannot reach -, and that 'tis not 
neceflary to know whether there are actually Bodies without us, to conclude many Phyfical Truths. 

I have 



PREFACE. ; 

I have no more to fay to his Thirteenth Chapter, bur that I wifh a Man would attentively read what I 
have laid concerning the manner of our knowing the Soul, in the Seventh Chapter of the Second Part of 
the Third Book, and the Chapter following, where I fpeak of the Effence of Matter. 

Laft of all, to do juftice to the Reafonings of the laft Chapter ^ it fuffices to know diftin&ly my manner 
of explaining how we fee external Objefts. 

This is all I thought neceffary to anfwer to the Animadverter, as being perfuaded that thofe who tho-r 
roughly conceive my Notion will have no need of an Illuftration upon the pretended Difficulties he urges to 
me ; and others who have not read nor comprehended the things I treat of in the Book he oppofes, would 
not underftand the largeft Anfwers I could give them. 

'Tis fufficiently manifeft from the three firft Chapters of the Animadverfions, which I have refuted more 
at large, what, we are to think of the other, which I have anfwerd in a word or two. Thofe who have Time 
and Inclination may examine them more exactly : but for my own part I mould think I wafted both my 
own time and that of others , if I fhould ftay to collect all the Paralogifms which are fcatter'd through his 
Book, to acquaint thofe perions with them, who doubtlefs have little or no delire to know them. 

The Reafon and Judgment of worthy Men cannot fuffer thofe long-winded Difcourfes, which tend to no 
good, but onely (hew the Spleen and ill Humour of their Authors ; and 'tis a ridiculous thing to imagine 
that others interefs themfelves in our Quarrels, and to call them to be WitnelTes of the weakneis and vain ef- 
forts of our Adverfary. 

He that attacks me has no reafon to find fault with my manner of Defence ; for if I anfwer not all his 
Animadverfions in an ample way, 'tis not becaufe I defpife him. He may conclude, that I mould not have 
warded off the Blows he defign'd me, if I did not think him able to hurt me ; and I think I have more reafon 
to complain of the negligence of his Animadverting, than he has to be angry at my manner of anfwering 
him. Had our Author zealoufly buckled to engage me, I am perfuaded he had found me Exercife :, for I judge 
hot of the Strength of his Parts by a venturous Sally of his Pen, which he feems only to make by way of Paf- 
time. Thus the negligence he manifefts is to my advantage, and for my part I complain not of his remif 1 
nefs, as being unworthy his Application and his Anger. All that I am forry for, is, that he fpeaks not fe- 
rioufly of ferious things j that he fports with Truth, and wants fome of that Refpeft which is due to the Pub- 
lick, when he trys to over-wit it feveral different ways, as this Anfwer in part has manifefted. 

If I have been oblig'd to lpeak of him as I have done on fome occafions, he muff, thank no body but 
himfelf} for I have fupprefs'd, for fear of difpleafing him, many Exprefhons and Thoughts, which his man- 
ner of a£ting breeds naturally in the Mind. I have fo great an Averfion to all ufelefs Contefts, and that are pre- 
judicial to Charity, that I will never anfwer thofe who oppofe me without underftandingme, or whofe Dif- 
. courfes give me fome reafon to believe they have fome other motive than the Love of Truth. As for 
others I fhall endeavour to fatisfie them. I fee' plainly, that if I were oblig'd to anfwer all that have the 
good Will of affaulting me, I mould fcarce ever enjoy the repofe I defire. But as there is no Law in France 
which hinders them from lpeaking, fo there is none which forbids me to be filent. 

It may be whilft I am filent, my Infulters may find themfelves ill treated by fome invifible hand -, for I 
cannot help it, if the Love of Truth provokes fome Wits, who might do it with better Grace, to defend a 
Work in which they had no part. But I wifh this promife I make, and freely without any conftraint, may 
be remembred $ and that thofe Writings may not be imputed to me, which I might make, but which I de- 
clare I never will. Mean-time I think that thofe that have nothing folid to oppofe to me, had much better 
lay nothing, than fatigue the World with Writings, which break Charity, and are ufelefs to the difcovery 
of Truth. 



ADVERTISEMENT. 

Since the firft Impreffion of this fecond part, two Books have been publifh'd relating to it. The firft en- 
tituled, Animadverfions upon the Animadverfions on the Search after Truth, wherein is difcovered, &c. 
lam highly oblig'd to the Author of thefe Animadverfions for the Honour he feems to do me by the Title 
of his Book} but fince this Title may make the World believe I had fome hand in his Work, I think my 
felf oblig d to fay, that though I am very well fatisfied with his Perfon, I am not extremely pleas'd with 
his Book. Methinks that thofe who meddle in defending or oppofing others, ought to read their Works 
carefully, fo as to be throughly acquainted with their Opinions. But the Search after Truth, you'll fay, me- 
rits not the Application of Men of Parts: True, it deferves not therefore that the Perfon fpoken of, who un- 
doubtedly is a Man of great Senfe and Worth fhould either impugn or defend it. 

The Title of the fecond Book runs thus^ The Animadverter" s Anfwer to the Preface of the fecond Volume 
of the Search after Truth, wherein is examined &c. I intreat thofe who interefs themfelves in the diffe- 
rence of others, not to believe me on my bare word, nor eafily to imagine I am in the right. I think I have 
Liberty to demand of them, that they will carefully examine the Anfwers I have made to the Animadverfions 
in that Preface, and the Argumentations of the Animadverter, in reference to the Book oppos'd > fol think 
I may without offence to the Author of this Anfwer, require of thofe who would judge of it, not to ima- 
gine he has reafon on his fide, upon a flight and tranfient reading of his Book. I defire them not to judge of 
any of his Anfwers before having examined it, with reference to this Preface and the preceedmg Books. 
Take here for an inftance the firft of his Anfwers, which begins thus. 

I SI 1 "Pucrp T 1 

Upon what the Author of the Search pretends, the Animadverter impofes on him The Animad* 
touching his Defign ( a ). ' - gj* An ' 

5 Tis not impofing on him, to make his Book pafs for a Collection ofObfervations, thought by him ufefultothe 

difcovery of Truth. 'Tis plain I have pofitively declared that I look upon his Book, as a Collection oj many Re* 

marks^ &c. If the Author had confider'd thefe words, he would not have aceus'd me of impofing on him s 

' fox 



8 PREFACE. 

for he could not deny but he had a Defign of offering fomething ferviceable to the difcovery of Truth, which 
is all that I attributed to him. And lower, Wherein I even prove that that is not to be imputed to him, 
which he affirms I impofe upon him. Laflly, he concludes this Article with thefe words ; "lis therefore 
evident the Author of the Search cannot prove I impofe on him, unlefs he will maintain he had a Defign of 
Writing a Book altogether ufelefs to the Search of Truth. 

Thefe Words ?night pojjibly make a Man imagine, I had without Reafon accused the Animadverter cfimpo- 
fing on me in the Dejign of the Search -, but whoever would but confront what he here fays with the foregoing 
Preface, or with what he has f aid himfelf pag. 9, 10. of his Animadverfions, would 1 hope be of another 
mind. That I may not give the trouble of turning to it, thefe are my words. 

Neverthelefs as he is pleas'd to make me undertake a Defign I do not execute, that he may have the more 
to charge upon my Conduft, fo he goes to prove it was my Defign to lay down a Method in that Book. I 
do him no injury, fays he, in looking on his Book as a Method to lay the Foundation of the Sciences. For befides 
that the Title expreffes fo much, he declares himfelf upon the Point in the following manner : " Let us 
" examine the Caufes and Nature of our Errours ; and fince the Method of examining things by confideiing 
" them in their Birth and Origin is the moft regular and perfpicuous, and ferves better than others to give 
w us a thorough knowledge of them, let us try to put it here in pra&ice. 

Methinks tiyefe words, I do him no injury, fays he, &c. which I cite out of the Animadverfions, are clear 
enough, and that a Man need but underftand Englifh to fee that the Animadverter impofes on me a 
Defign of giving a Method, and pretends too to prove it by the Title of the Search, as alfo by a paffage 
of the fame Book ; and yet he boldly concludes this Article with thefe words , 'Tis therefore evident the 
Author of the Search cannot prove I impofe on him, 2tc. 

But what ! he has pofitively declar'd he look'd upon the Search after Truth, as a Colle&ion of many Ob- 
fervations. I cannot deny, fays he, but he had a Dejign of offering fomething ufeful to the difcovery of Truth, 
which is ALL (mark that word) I attribute to him. Since he has a mind to be diverted, fee my Anfwer. 

A Painter has drawn a Polyphemus, and Handing behind his Piece, hears fome Critick fay, Look here, 
Gentlemen, the Artift defign'd to paint an Hercules •, but if you mind it, it is a Polyphemus. The Pain- 
ter, out of patience, ftarts from behind the Scene, and gives the Spectators to undreltand, he had no Defign 
of reprefenting an Hercules, and that he impofes on him. The Critick furpriz'd, addreffes the Painter, Sir, 
why fo angry? what did you defign to reprefent? Polyphemus, returns the Painter. Strange, Sir! replies 
the Critick, why do you fay I impofe on you ? I call thefe Gentlemen to witnefs, that ALL that I laid, 
was, you had drawn a Polyphemus : upon which the Painter withdraws contented, and fays no more. 

I think my felf therefore obliged to reft filent upon fuch like Anfwers. I have fhewn by the Animadver- 
ter's own words, that he impofes on me a Defign of giving a Method in the firft Book of the Search, and • 
that he likewife pretends to prove it. I have cited the place of the Animadverfions, from whence I have 
taken my proof. Neverthelefs, this Author affirms he does not impofe on me-, that 'tis evident I can- 
not prove it •, that he proves quite contrary ; that what I fay he impofes on me is not to be imputed to me -, 
that ALL he atributes to me is a Defign of offering fomething ufeful to the difcovery of Truth. In a 
word, that he has pofitively declared he look'd on the Search as a Colle&ion of many Obfervations > as if 
from his regarding the Search as a Collection, it were to be concluded I had no other Defign. 

I fay no more then, but hope this Example may keep Men from judging without examining. I have ta- 
ken the three firft Pages of his Book, and have not given my felf the liberty of chufing, which ought to be 
confider'd ; yet I intend not this for an Anfwer, remembring the obligation I have laid on my felf at the end 
of the preceding Preface •, and I had rather thofe who think I have not 'fatisfied the Animadverfions, becaufe 
I have anfwer'd but three Chapters at length, fhould fay, this Book whereof I anfwer but three Pages re- 
mains without Reply, than weary the World with Anfwers, which tend only to the juftifyng other Replies. 



■ . !»■■ 



F. MALE* 





F. MALEBRANCHE's 

Jt_j xV X -. X *3 jL-j 

Concerning the 

SEARCH after TRUTH. 



TOMEII. BOOKV. 

CHAP. L 
Of the "Nature and Original of Pajpons in general. 

TH E Mind of Man has two effential or neceffary Relations extreamly difFerent ; the one 
to God, and the other to its Body. As mere Mind, it is eflentially united to the Di- 
vine Word, the Eternal Wifdom and Truth ; fince it is only by that Union that 'tis ca- 
pable of thinking, as is proved in the Third Book. As a humane Mind, it has an ef- 
•fential Relation to its Body, fince it is by Virtue of that Union that it imagines and perceives 
by its Senfes, as is explained in the Firji and Second Book. We call the Mind Senfe or Imagina- 
tion, when the Body is the natural or occasional Caufe of its Thoughts : and we call it Under' 
fianding, when it a&s by it felf, or rather, when God a&s in it, or his Light illuminates it feve- 
ral different ways, without a neceffary Relation to what is done in the Body. 

It's even fo with the IK/7/ of man-, as a Will, it effentially depends on the Love that God 
bears to himfelf, on the Eternal Law, and in fhort on the Will of God. It is only becaufe God 
loves himfelf, that we love any thing-, for if God did not love himfelf, or did not continually 
influence the Soul of man with a Love like his own ; that is, with the Motion of Love, whichr 
a Man feels in himfelf for Good in general -, we mould love nothing, we fliould will nothing-, 
and ccnfequently mould be deftitute of Will -, fince Will is nothing elfe but that Impreflion of 
Nature that carries us towards Good in general, as hath been faid feveral times *. *5 M £ r ; 

But the Will, confidered as the Will of Man, effentially depends upon the Body, fince it is cf}a P- ?• 
by reafon of the Motion of the Blood and Animal Spirits, that it feels its felf affected with all al V* elfe °- 
its fenfible Commotions. And therefore I have called Natural Inclinations all the Motions, which re " 
the Soul has common with pure Intelligences, together with fqme in which the Body hath a great 
Share, but of which it is only the indirect Caufe and End, and I have explained them in the fore- 
going Book. Here I underltand by Paffions, All the Motions which naturally affett the Soul, 

on occafwn of the extraordinary Motion of the Blood and Animal Spirits. And lb mall thefe fenfi- 
ble Commotions be the Subject of this Book. 

Though the Paffions be infeparable from the Inclinations, and Men be only fufceptible of a fen- 
fible Love and Hatred, becaufe they are capable of a Spiritual Love and Hatred -, however it was 
thought fit to treat of them feparately, in order to prevent Confufion. For if it be confidered, 
That the Paffions are far ftronger and livelyer than the Natural Inclinations -, that they have for the 
moft part other Objecfs, and are always produced by different Caufes : it will be granted, That 
we do not diftinguifh, without Reafon, things that are infeparable in their own Nature. 

Men are capable of Senfations and Imaginations only becaufe they are capable of pure Intellecti- 
ons, the Senfes and Imagination 'being infeparable from the Mind ; and yet none finds fault with 
thofe that diitincbly treat of thofe Faculties of the Soul, which are naturally infeparable. 

Laft ©fall, the Senfes and Imagination differ not -more from the pure Undemanding, than the 
Paffions from the Inclinations. And therefore as the three firft Faculties ufe to be diftinguifhed, fo 
ought alio the two Lift:,' that we may the better diftinguifh what the Soul receives from its Au- 
thor, with Relation to its Body, from that which it alio lias from him, but without that Relation. 

The only Inconveniency that may grow out of the diftincfion of two things fo naturally united, 
is the necefiity of repeating fome things that had been faid before, as is ufual in the like occafions. 

Man is one, though he be Compounded of feveral parts, and the union of thofe parts is fo 
intim.ite, that one ot' them cannot be affected without a Commotion of the whole. All his 

A Faculties ' 



F. Malebranche Concerning Book V 1 . 

Faculties are linked together, and fo fubordinated, that it is impoffible to explain fome of them, 
without touching upon the others: St) that when we labour to find out a Method to prevent Con-- 
fufion, we neceflarily fall into Repetitions : but 'tis better to repeat, than not to be Methodical, 
becaufe we ought above all to be plain and intelligible ; and therefore whatever we can doe in 
this occafion, is to repeat^ if poffible, without wearying the Reader. 

The Paihons of the Soul are Imprefiions of the Author of Nature, which incline us to love 
our- Body, and Whatever is ufeful for its prefervation : As the natural Inclinations are Impreflions 
of the- lame Author;, that principally move us to love him as the Sovereign Good. 

The natural or occafional Caufe of thefe Impreffions is the Motion of the Animal Spirits, which 
difperfe through the Body, to produce and maintain in it a difpofition fuitable to the Object per- 
ceived, that the Mind and Body may in that conjuncture mutually help each other. For 'tis the 
Inftitution of God that our Willings be attended with fuch Motions of our Body, as are fit to pur 
them in execution •, and that the Motions of our Body which Machinally rife in us, at the per- 
ception of fome Object, be followYi with a Paflion of the Soul, that inclines us to will what feems 
at that time profitable to the Body. It is the continual Impreffion of the Will of God upon us, 
that keeps; us fo ftrictly united to a portion of matter •, for if that Impreffion of his Will mould 
ceafe but a moment, we fhould inftantly be fid of the Dependency upon our Body, and all the 
Changes it undergoes. 

For I cannot underftand what fome people imagine, that there is a necelTary Connection betwixt 
the Motion of the Blood and Animal Spirits, and the Commotions of the Soul. Some fmall Par- 
ticles Of Choler violently move in the Brain, muft therefore the Soul be agitated with fome Paffi- 
on, and muft that Paflion be Anger rather than Love ? What Relation can there be conceived be- 
twixt the Idea of an Enemy's Imperfections, the Paflion of Contempt or Hatred, and the Corpo- 
real Motion of fome Particles of the Blood, that beat againft fome parts of the Brain ? How they 
can imagine that the one depend upon the other, and that the Union or Connection of two things 
fo diftant, and fo incompatible, as the Mind and Matter, can be caufed and preferved any other- 
wife, than by the continual and Almighty Will of the Author of Nature, is to me unconceivable. 

Thofe that fuppofe that Bodies necelTarily and by themfelves communicate their Motion to each 
other, in the inftant of their concourfe, make but a probable fuppofition ? neither is their preju^ 
dice altogether groundlefs, fince Bodies feem to have an EiTential Relation to Bodies. Bat the. 
Mind and Body are two forts of Beings fo oppofite, that thofe who think that the Commotions! 
of the Soul neceflarily follow upon the Motion of the Blood and Animal Spirits, do it without 
the leaft probability. For nothing but our own Confcioufnefs of the Union of thofe two Beings,' 
and the Ignorance of the continual Operations of God upon his Creatures, can make us imagine 
another Caufe of the Union of our Soul and Body, than the Will of God. 

It is hard to determine, whether that Union d'r Connection of the thoughts of the Mind of 
Man, with the Motions of his Body, is a punifhment of Sin, or a Gift of Nature. And fome 
perfons believe it a rafh and imprudent Attempt to chule one of thefe Opinions rather than the 
other. It is well known, that Man before his Sin was not a Slave, but abfolute Matter of his 
Paffions, and that he could, merely by his Will, Hop at his pleafure, the Agitation of the Blood 
that caufed them. But we can hardly perfuade our felves that the Body did not importune the 
Soul of the frrft Man to find out fuch things as were fit for the prefervation of his Life : We 
can fcarce believe but Adam before his Sin found Fruits pleafant to the fight and grateful to the 
Taffe, if we rightly confider the words of the Holy Scripture ; nor (hall we come to think that the 
Oeconomy of the Senfes and Paflions, which is fo wonderfully contrived and adapted to the pre- 
fervation of the Body, is a Corruption of Nature, inftead of its Original Inftitution. 

Doubtlefs Nature is at this prefent corrupted : the Body acts too violently upon the Mind : 
and whereas' it ought only to make an humble Reprefentation of its wants to the Soul, it domi- 
neers over her, takes her off from God, to whom fhe ought to be infeparably united, and conti- 
nually applies her to the fearch of fuch fenfible things, as tend to its prefervation. She is grown 
as it were material and tereftrial ever fince her Fall ; the EiTential Relation and Union that fhe had 
with God being broken, that is to fay, God being withdrawn from her, as much as he could be 
without her deftruction and annihilation. A. thoufand diforders have attended the abfence or de- 
parture of him that preferv'd her in Order •, and without making a longer Enumeration of our Mi- 
series, I freely confefs that Man fince his Fall is corrupted in all his parts. 

That Fall however has not quite deftroyed the Work of God -, for we can ftill difcover in Man, 
what God at firft put in him ; and his immutable Will, that conftitutes the Nature of every 
thing, was not changed by the Inconftancy and Ficklenefs of the Will of Adam. Whatever God 
has once wilfd he ftill wills, and becaufe his Will is efficatious, brings it to pafs. The Sin of 
Man was indeed the Occafion of that Divine Will, that makes the Difpenfation of Grace, but 
Grace is not contrary to Nature h neither do they deftroy each other - y fince God is nor oppofed 
to himlelf, that he never repents, and that his Wifdom being without Limits, his Works will 
be without End. 

And therefore the Will of God, that conftitutes the Difpenfation of Grace, is -fuperadded to 
that which makes the Oeconomy of Nature, in order to repair and not to change it. There are 
then in God but thefe two general Wills, and the Laws by which he governs the World depend 
on one or other of them It will plainly appear, by what follows, that the Palhons are very well 
order'd, if conlidered only in reierence to the Prefervation of the Body, though they deceive us 
in fome \ery ore and particular Oc^afions. which theuniverfal Caufe did not think fit to remedy, 

* Thence 



Chap, H. • The Search after Truth. 4 

Thence I conclude, That the Paflions belong to the Order of Nature, fince they cannot be ranked 
under the Order of Grace. 

. Tis true, that feeing the Sin of the firfi man has deprived us of the Help of an always- 
prelent God, and always ready to defend us ; It may be laid, That Sin is the Caufe of our ex- 
ceihve adhefion to fenfible tilings, becaufe Sin has eftranged us from God, by whom alone we 
can be rid of our Slavery. 

But without infilling longer upon the Enquiry after the firft Caufe of the PaiTions let- us ex- 
amine their Extent, their particular Nature, their End, their life, their DefeQs, and whatever 
they comprehend. 



CHAP. II. 

# 

Of the 'Union of the Mind with fenfible things j or of the Force and Extent 
of the Paffions in general. 

F all. thofe who read this Work would be at the pains to refleft. upon what they feel within 
themfelves ; it would not be necelTary to infill upon our Dependency upon all fenfible Ob- 
jects. I can fay upon this Head but what every one knows as well as I do, if he will but think 
on it; and was 'therefore very much inclined topafs it over. But Experience having taught me, 
That Men often forget themfelves lb far, as not to think or be aware of what they feel, nor to en- 
quire into the Reafon of what pafles in their own Mind; I thought it fit to propofe fome Confi- 
derations that may help them to refle£t upon it. And even I hope, That thofe who know fuch 
things will not think their Reading ill bellowed : for though we do not care to hear limply re- 
hearied what we very well know, yet we ufe to be affe&ed with Pleafure at the hearing of what • 
we know and feel together. 

The moft honourable Se£l of Philofophers, of whofe Opinions many Pretenders boaft ftill now 
a-days, will perfuade us, That it is in our power to be happy. The Stoicks * con- 
tinually lay, We ought only to depend upon our felves •, we ought not to be vexed . * Tmc bea tum effe te 
for the Lois of Dignities, Eftates, Friends, Relations; we ought to be always calm S7™ %ltJ- fum 
and without the leaft Difturbance whatever happens; Banifhrnent, Injuries, Affronts, h his qu& homines' erU- 
Difeafes, and even Death are no Evils, and ought not to be feared, and a thoufand »«<■,_ optant, cujlodiunt, ni- 
Paradoxes of that Nature, which we are apt enough to believe ; both becaufe of m ! W!erif ) mn dko l™* 
our Pride, that makes us affeft Independency, as that becaufe Reafon teaches us JS :S * "' Sen - 
that moft part of the Evils, which really afflict us, would not be able to difturb us, 
if all things remained in good Order. 

But God has given us a Body, and by that Body united US to all fenfible things : Sin has fub- 
jefled us to our Body, and by our Body made us dependent upon all fenfible things. It is the Or- 
der of Nature, it is the Will of the Creatour, that all the Beings that he has made mould hang 
together: And therefore being united to all things, and the Sin o? the firfi Man having made us 
dependent on all Beings, to which God had only united us : there is now none but he is at once 
united and fubje&ed to his Body, and by his Body to his Relations, Friends, City, Prince, Coun- 
try, Cloaths, Houfe, Eftate, Horfe, Dog, to all the Earth, to the Sun, the Stars, and the Heavens. 

It's then ridiculous to tell Men, that it is in their power to be happy, wife, and free : It is to 
leer them, ferioufly to advife them they ought not to be affli&ed for the Lofs of their Friends -or 
Eftates. For as it were abfurd to exhort Men not to feel Pain when they are beaten, or not to be 
fenfible of Pleafure when they eat with an Appetite ; fo the Stoicks are either unreafonable, or 
not in good earneft, when they cry, That we ought not to be forry for the Death of our Father, 
the Lofs of our Goods, our Banifhrnent, Imprifonment, and the like ; nor to be glad of the hap- 
py Succefs of our Affairs : fince we are united to our Country, Goods, Friends, tS>c. by a Natural 
Union, which at prefent has no dependence on our Will. I grant that Reafon teaches us, we 
are to undergo Banifhrnent without Sorrow : but the fame Reafon likewife teaches us we ought 
to endure the cutting off our Arm without Pain ; becaufe the Soul is fuperiour to the Body, and* 
that, according to the light of Reafon, her happinefs or mifery ought not to depend upon it: 
but "tis ridiculous to argue againft Experience, which in this occafion will convince us that things 
are not fo, as our Reafon intimates they ought to be. 

The Philofophy of the Chriftians is quite different from that; they deny not but Pain is an 
Evil, and that it is hard to be feparated from thofe things to which Nature has united us, or tc» 
rid our felves from the Slavety Sin has reduc'd us to. They agree that it is a Diforder that the 
Soul mail depend upon her Body, but they own withall that ihe depends upon it, and even fo 
much that Ihe cannot free her fell' from that Subje£tion but by the Grace of our Lord. ' I fee, faith Rom. 7. 
St. Paul, anoiher Law in my Members warring againfi the Law of my Mind, and bringing me into 2 3> 2 4<, 
Captivity to the Law cf Sin, which is in my Members. wretched Man that I am! wbofiia// de- 
liver me from the Body of this Death? the Grace of God through Jefus Chriji our Lvrdjimll do iL 
The Son of God, his Apoltles and all his true Difciples command us above all to be Patient, be- 
caufe they know that Mifery mull: be the Expectation and Portion of the Righteous. In fhort, true 
Chriftians or true Philofophers, fay nothing but what is agreeable to found Reafon and Experience ; 
whereas all Naturecontinual.lv imougns the proud Opinion and prefurnption of Has Stoicks* 

the 



F. Male-branche Concerning BookV. 

The Chriftians know that to free themfelves in fome manner from the Subjection they are under, 
they muft endeavour to deprive themfelves of all thofe things that they cannot enjoy without Plea- 
fire, nor want without Pain \ it being the only means to preferve that Peace and Liberty of Mind, 
which they owe to their Deliverer's Beneficence. On the contrary the Stoicks^ following the falfe 
Notions of their Chimerical Philophy, imagine that they are wife and happy, and that they need 
but think upon Vertue and Independency, to become Vertuous and Independent. Sound Reafon 
and Experience alTure us, that the belt, way not to feel the fmart of ftinging is to fhun the Nettle : 
but the Stokks fay, " Sting me never fo much, I (hall by the ftrength of my Mind, and the help 
cc of my Philofophy, raife my felf fo high above my Body, that all your pricking mail not reach 
tc me. I can demonftrate that my Happinefs depends not upon it, and that Pain is not an Evil h 
cc and you fhall fee by the Colour of my Face, and by the whole deportment of my Body, that 
u my Philofophy has made me invulnerable. 

Their Pride bears up their Courage, however it hirjders not but that they mould fufTer Pain 
with Vexation, and be really miferable ; fo that their Union with their Body is not deftroyed, nor 
their Pain vaniihed :, but all this proceeds from their Union with other Men, ftrengthened by the 
defire of their Efteem, which in fome manner withftands the Union of their Soul with their Bo- 
dy. The fenfible view of the Spectators, to whom they are united, flops the Courfe of the Ani- 
mal Spirits that mould follow upon the pain, and blots out the Impreffion they would make up- 
on their Face :, for was there no body to look on them, that Phantafm of Conftancy and Liberty 
of Mind would prefently vanifh : So that the- Stoicks do only in fome degree withftand the Union 
of their Soul to their Body, by making themfelves greater Slaves to other Men, to whom they 
are united by a drift of Glory. And 'tis therefore an undoubted truth, that all Men are united 
to all fenfible things, both by Nature and their Concupifcence ^ which may fufficiently be known 
by Experience, and of which all the Actions of Mankind are fenfible demonftrations, though Rea- 
ibn feems to oppofe it. 

Though this Union be common to all Men, 'tis not however of an equal Extent and Strength 
in all -, for as it proceeds from the Knowledge of the Mind ^ fo it may be faid that we are not 
actually united to unknown Objecf s. A Clown in his Cottage does not concern himfelf with* the 
Glory of his Prince and Country, but only with the honour of his own and the Neighbouring 
Villages ^ becaufe his Knowledge does not extend farther. 

The Union with fuch ObjeQs as we have leen, is ttronger than the Union to thofe we have 
only imagin'd, or heard relation of-, becaufe by Senfation we are more ftricf ly united to fenfible 
things, as leaving deeper Impreflions in our Brain, and moving the animal Spirits in a more vio- 
lent manner, than when they are only imagin'd. 

Neither is that Union fo ftrong in thole that continually oppofe it, that they may adhere to 
the Goods of the Mind, as it is in thofe who fuffer themfelves to be carried away and inflav'd by 
their Paffions, fince Concupifcence increafes and ftrengthens that Union. 

Laft of all, the feveral Employments and States of this Life, together with the various difpofi- 
tions of divers Perfons, cauie a confiderable difference in that fenfible Union which Men have with 
Earthly Goods : Great Lords have greater Dependencies than other Men, and their Chains, as I 
may call them, are longer. The General of an Army depends on all his Souldiers, becaufe all 
his Souldiers reverence him. This Slavery is often the Caufe of his Valour •, and the defire of 
being efteem'd by thofe that are WitnefTes of his Aftions, often drives him to Sacrifice to it more 
fenfible and rational defires. The fame may be faid of all Superiours, and thofe that make a great 
Figure in the World, Vanity being many times the Spur of their Vertue, becaufe the love of Glo- 
ry is ordinarily ftronger than the love of Truth. I lpeak here of the love of Glory, not as a fimple 
Inclination but a Paffion, fince that love may become fenfible, and is often attended with very- 
lively and violent Commotions of the Animal Spirits. 

Again the different Ages and Sexes are primary Caufes of the difference of Paffions. Children 
love not the fame things as adult and old Men, or at leaft love them not with that Force and 
Conftancy. Women depend only on their Family and Neighbourhood ; but the dependencies 
of Men extend to their whole Country, becaufe 'tis their part to defend it ; and that they are 
mightily taken up with thofe great Offices, Honours and Commands, that the State may beftow 
upon them. 

There is fuch a variety in the Employments and Engagements of Men, that it is impoffible to 
explain them all. The difpofition of Mind in a Married Man is altogether different from that of 
a fingle Perfon $ for the former is in a manner wholly taken up with the care of his Family. A 
Fryar has a Soul of another make, and depends upon fewer things than the Men of the World, 
and even than Secular Ecclefiafticks, but he is ftronger filmed to thofe few things. One may 
argue in the fame manner concerning the different States of Men in general, but the little fenfi- 
ble engagements cannot be explain'd, becaufe they differ almoft in every private Perfon j it of- 
ten hapning that men have particular Engagements altogether oppofite to thofe that they ought 
to have in reference to their condition. But though the different Genius and Inclinations of 
Men, Women, Old Men, Young Men, Rich, Poor, Learned, and Ignorant, in fhort of all the 
different Sexes, Ages and Conditions, might be fully treated of in general ; yet they are too 
well known by thofe that are converfant with the World, and of all the thinking part of Man- 
kind, to increafe with them the Bulk of this Book^ efpecially, feeing that our Eyes may afford 
us a very plcafant and folid Inltruction of all fuch matters. But if any chufe to read them in 
Greek, rather than to learn them by his own reflection on what he fees, I refer him to the fecond 

Book 



fchap. II. The Search after Truth* | 

Book of the Rhetoricks ofAriftutle^ which I take to be the Mailer-Piece of that Philofopher ■, 
becaufe he lays there few tilings, in which he can be miitaken •, and that he feldorri ventures to 
prove what he aliens. 

It is therefore evident that the fenfible Union of the M hid of Men, with whatever has any Re- 
lation to the prefervation of their Life, or of the Society of which they are Members, differs in 
different Perfonsj reaching farther in thofe that have more Knowledge, that are in a higher Sia- 
tion and are indued with a larger Fancy •, whereas that Union is flricf er and ftronger in thole that 
are more fenfible, that have a lively er Imagination, and have more blindly given up themfelves to 
the violence of their Paffions. 

Such Confederations upon the almofl infinite Bands that iliften Men to fenfible Obje&s, are of" 
an extraordinary Ufe-, and the bell way to become a great proficient in this fort of Learning, is 
the ftudy and obfervation of our felves^ fince from the Inclinations aad Paffions, of which we are 
confeious in our lelves, we can be fully afl»r'd of all the inclinations of other Men, and can make 
a good guefs at a great part of the Paffions they are fubjeft to : to which adding the Information 
we can get of their particular Exgagements, and of the different Judgments that follow from eve- 
ry different Paffion, of which we fhall fpeak hereafter-, it may perhaps not prove fo hard a Task 
to guefs moil part of their Actions, as it is for an Aftronomer to foretell an Eclipfe. For though 
Men be free, yet it feldom happens that they make ufe of their Liberty, in oppoiition to their na- 
tural Inclinations and violent Paffions. 

Before the Clofe of this Chapter I muff obferve, that it is one of the Laws of the Union of the 
Soul and Body, that all the Inclinations of the Soul, even thofe me has for Goods, that have noi 
.relation to the Body, fhould be attended wuth Commotions of the Animal Spirits, that render 
thofe Inclinations fenfible ; becaufe Man being not a pure Spirit, it is impoffible he fhould have 
-any Inclination altogether pure, and without mixture of any Paffion whatfoever. So that the love 
of Truth, Juftice, Vertue, of God himfelf, is always attended by fome Motion of the Animal Spi- 
rits that render that love fenfible, though we be not aware of their fenfibility, being then taken 
up with lively er Senfations. Juft as the Knowledge of Spiritual things is always accompanied 
with traces on the Brain, which indeed make that Knowledge more lively, but commonly more 
confufed : 'Tis true we are frequently inapprehenfive of the Imagining Faculty's mixing in any 
manner with the Conception of an abftract ed Truth. The Reafon of it is, that thofe Truths are 
not reprefented by Images, or traces of Nature's Inftitution, and that all the traces that raife fucli 
Ideas, have no Relation with them, but fuch as proceeds from Chance, or the Free-will of Men. 
For Inftance, Arithmeticians and Algebraifts, who apply themfelves to very abftracled Objects, 
make however a very great ufe of their Imagination, in order to fix the view of their Mind upon 
thefe Spiritual Ideas. The Cyphers, the Letters of the Alphabet, and the other Figures which 
they fee or imagine, are always join'd to thofe Ideas, though the traces that are wrought by thefe 
Characters have no proper Relation to thofe abftra&ed Objects, and fo can neither change nor ob- 
fcure them : Whence follows, that by a proper Ufe and Application of thefe Cyphers and Letters, 
they come to difcover fiich remote and difficult Truths, as could not be found out otherwife. 

Since therefore the Ideas of fuch things as are only perceivable by the pure Underftanding, carl 
be connected with the traces of the Brain, and that the fight of Object s that are beloved, hated or 
fear'd by a Natural Inclination, can be attended with the Motion of the Animal Spirits •, it plain- 
ly appears, that the thoughts of Eternity, the fear of Hell, the hope of an Eternal Happtnels, 
though they be Objects never fo infenfible, can however raife in us very violent Paffions. 

And therefore we can lay that we are united in a fenfible manner, not only to fuch things as 
relate to the prefervation of our Life, but alfb to Spiritual things, with which the Mind is im- 
mediately, and. by it felf united. And even it often happens, that Faith, Charity, and Self-Love, 
make that Union with Spiritual things ftronger, than that by which we are. join'd to all fenfible 
Objecf s. The Soul of the true Martyrs is more united to God, than to their Body ^ and thofe 
that fuffer Death for afferting a falfe Religion, which they believe to be true, give us fufficiently 
to know, that the fear of Hell has more power upon them than the fear of Death. There is for 
the raoft part fo much heat and obfl inacy on both fides, in the Wars of Religion, and the defence 
of Superftitions, that it cannot be doubted but fome Paffion has a hand in it ^ and even a Paffion 
far ftronger and ftedfafter than others, becaufe it is kept up by an Appearance of Reafon, both in 
fuch as are deceived, and in thofe that follow the Truth. 

We are then united by our Paffions to whatever feems to be the Good or the Evil of the Mind, 
as well as to that which we take for the Good or Evil of the Body. Whatever can be known to 
have any relation to us can affeft us, and of all the things we know, there is not one but it has 
fome reference or other to us. We are fomewhat concern'd even for the molt abftrafted Truths, 
when we know them •, becaufe there is at leaft that Relation of Knowledge betwixt them and 
our Mind, and that in fome manner w T e look on them as our Property, by virtue of that Know- 
ledge. We feel our felves as wounded when they are impugned ; and if we be wounded, thenfure- 
ly we are affected and difturb'd. So that the Paffions have fuch a vaft and comprehensive Do- 
minion, that it is impoffible to conceive any thing in reference to which it may be laid, that Men 
are exempt from their Empire. But let's now fee what is their Nature, and endeavour to difco- 
ver whatever they comprehend. 

t CHAP, 



F. Malebranche Concerning Book V. 



CHAP. III. 

A particular Explanation of all the Changes^ happening either to the Body or 
Soul in every Pajpon. 

SEven things may be diftinguifhed in each of our Paffions, fave Admiration only, which is in- 
deed but an Imperfect Paffion. 
The firft is the Judgment the Mind makes of an Object, or rather the confufed or diftinct View 
of the Relation that Object has to us. 

The fecond is a New Determination of the Motion %f the Will towards that Object, provided 
it be or feem to be a Good. Before that View, the Natural Motion of the Soul was either 
undetermined, that is to lay, fhe was carried towards Good in general, or it otherwife deter- 
mined by the knowledge of fome particular Object. But in the very inftant of the mind's per- - 
ceiving that Relation of the new Object to it Jelf, that general Motion of the Will is forthwith 
determin'd, conformably to the perception of the Mind. The Soul advances, near that Object by 
her Love, that fhe may relifh it, and difcover her good in it, through a fenfible delectation which 
the Author of Nature affords her, as a Natural Reward of her Inclination to Good. She judged 
that that Objeft was a Good by an abftracted and unpathetick Reafon, but fhe perfifts in the per- 
fuafion of it, through the Efficacy of Senfation ; and the lively er that Senfation is, the ftronger is 
her adhefion to the Good that feems to be the Caufe of it. 

But if that particular Object be confidered as Evil, or able to deprive us of fome Good, there 
happens no New Determination in the Motion of the Will -, but only the Motion towards the 
Good, oppos'd to that feemingly evil Object, is augmented : which augmentation is greater or lef- 
ler, as the Evil feems to be more or lefs formidable to us. For indeed we bate only becaufe we 
love, and the Evil that is without us is judg'd no farther Evil, than with reference to the Good of 
which it deprives us : So that Evil being confider'd as a privation of Good, to fly from Evil is to 
fly the privation of Good, which is the fame thing as to tend towards Good ; and therefore there 
happens no new determination of the Natural Motion of the Will, at the prefence of an unwel- 
come Object ■, but only a Senfation, painful, diftafteful or imbitter'd, which the Author of Nature 
* Before inflicts on the Soul, as a pain naturally confequent to her being depriv'd of Good. * Reafon alone 
sin, that had not been fufficient to carry her to it, wherefore this painful and vexing Senfation is fuper- 
Sevfation a( jded to quicken her. Thence I conclude, that in any Paffion whatfbever, all the Motions ofthe 
pain but on- Soul towards Good, are the Motions of Love. But as we are affected with divers Senfations, ac- 
fyawar- cording to the various Circumftances that attend the View of Good, and the Motion of the Soul 
ning-, be- towards it-, fo we 'come to confound our Senfations with the Commotions ofthe Soul, and to 
^' f?^ * imagine as many different Motions in the Paffions, as there are different Senfations. 

elfewhere, Adam might, whenever he pkafed, flop the Motion of the Animal Spirits that produce Pain : So that, if he ever felt pain, 'twas 
becaufe he consented to feel it ; or rather he never felt any, becaufe he never had a mind to feel it. 

Upon this head it muft be obferved that Pain is a true and real Evil, and no more the Privation 
of Pleafure, than Pleafure the Privation of Pain : for there is a great difference betwixt not feel- 
ing or being depriv'd of fuch a Senfation of Pleafure, and the actual enduring of Pain : So that 
every Evil is not precifely fo, becaufe it deprives us of Good, but only that Evil, as I have ex- 
pjain'd, that is without us, or is not a Modification of our Soul. Neverthelefs as by Goods and 
Evils we commonly underftand things good or evil, and not the Senfations of Pleafure and Pain, 
which are rather the natural Tokens by which the Soul diftinguifhes Good from Evil ; it may be 
faid methinks without Equivocation, that Evil is nothing but the privation of Good, and that the 
natural motion of the Soul, that removes us from Evil, is the fame with that which carries us to 
good-, for in brief, all natural Motion being an Impreffion of the Author of Nature, whofe acting 
centers in himfelf, and who can incline us only towards himfelf : The true Motion ofthe Sdul 
is always eflentially the Love of Good, and but accidentally an Averfion from Evil. 

I grant that Pain may be confider'd as an Evil, and in that fenfe the Motion of the Paffions, 
which is ftir'd up by it, is not real, fince we never will Pain ; and though we pofitively will the 
abfence of Pain, yet 'tis only becaufe we pofitively will the Prefervation or Perfection of our Being. 

The third thing to be obferv'd in every Paffion is the Senfation that attends them ; the Senfation 
of Love, Hatred, Defire, Joy, Sorrow, which are all different in the different Paffions. 

The fourth thing is a new Determination ofthe courfe of the Animal Spirits and Blood to the 
outward and inward parts ofthe Body. Before the View ofthe Object ofthe Paffion, the vital 
Spirits were difpers'd throughout the whole Body, for the prefervation of all its parts in general ; 
but at the appearance of that new Object, all this Order and Oeconomy is difturb'd, and moft part 
ofthe Spirits are thrown into the Mufcles ofthe Arms, Legs, Face, and other exteiiour parts of 
the Body, to put them in a difpofition fuitahle to the ruling Paffion, and to give it fuch a gefture 
and motion, as are neceffary for the obtaining or avoiding the imminent Good or Evil: But if its 
own Forces are infufh'cient for its occafions, thefe fame Spirits are diftributed in fuch a manner as 
make it machinally utter certain words and cries ; and which diffufe over the Face and the reft of 
ihc Body, fuch an ail and comportment, as is capable of actuating others with the fame Paffion 

it 



fchap. lit. The Search after Truth. j 

it felf is pofTefs'd with. For Men and Beafts having a mutual cohelion by the Byes and Ears, 
when any one of them is in a violent Commotion, it heceffarily affeCts the Spectators and Hea- 
rers, and naturally makes upon their Imagination 1'uch an Impreflion as troubles them, and njoves 
them to preferve it. 

As to the reft of the Animal Spirits , they violently delcend into the Heart, Lungs, Liver, 
Spleen, and other Vifcera, thence to draw contributions, and to haften thofe parts to fend forth' 
a fufficient and timely fupply of Spirits, neceffary to preferve the Body in that extraordinary Con- 
tention. 

The fifth thing is a fenfible Commotion of the Soul, who feels her felf agitated by an unex- 
pected overflow of Spirits. This fenfible Commotion of the Soul always attends that Motion 
of the Spirits, that the Soul may participate of all that affeCts the Body •, even as the Motion of 
Spirits is raided in the Body, when the Soul is carried toward any ObjeCt. For the Body and 
Soul being mutually united, their Motions are reciprocal. 

The fixth thing are feveral Senfations of Love, Hatred, Joy, Defire, Sorrow, that are produ- 
ced, not by the Intellectual view of Good or Evil, as thofe that have been already mention'd, 
but by the various concufhons that are caufed in the Brain by the Animal Spirits. 

The feventh thing is a certain Senfation of Joy, or rather internal Satisfaction, which detains 
the Soul in her Paflion, and affures her that fhe is in the fitteft State fhe can be, in reference to 
the ObjeCt fhe confiders. This internal fatisfaCtion attends all the Paflions whatfoever, whether 
they proceed from the fight of an Evil, or from the fight of a Good, Sorrow as well as Joy. This. 
fatisfaCtion makes all the Paflions pleafant, and induces us to yield our confent, and give up our 
felves to them ; and 'tis that fatisfaCtion which muft be overcome by the Delights of Grace, and 
the Comforts of Faith and Reafon. For as the Joy of the Mind, is the refult of a certain or evi- 
dent Knowledge that we are in the beft ftate that can be in relation to. the ObjeCts perceiv'd by. 
the Underftanding j fo the pleafantnefs of the Paflions is a. natural confequence of that confufed 
Senfation we have of being in the beft ftate we can be in reference to thofe things we perceive 
by our Senfes. Now 'tis by the Joy of the Mind, and the Comforts of Grace, that the falfe de- 
light of the Paflions, which makes us Slaves to fenfible Goods, muft be vanquifhed. 

All the forementioned things are to be found in all the Paflions, unlefs they be raifed by con- 
fufed Senfations, and that the Mind perceive not die Good or Evil from whence they proceed z, 
for then 'tis plain that they have not the three firft qualifications. It likewife appears that all 
thefe things are not free, fince they are in us without our Confent, and even againlt it fince the 
Sin ^ but that the Confent of our Will is the only thing which is really in our power. However 
it will be fit to explain all thefe things more at large, and to make them more fenfible by fome 
Inftances. 

Let us fuppofe a Man to whom an Affront has been actually offer'd, or one whofe Imagination 
is either naturally ftrong and lively, or over-heated by fome Accident, as a Difeafe or a Surfeit 
of Sorrow and Melancholy. This Man in his Clofet fancies that fuch a one, who perhaps does 
not think upon him, Is willing and ready to wrong him. The fenfible View, or the Imagination 
of the Oppofition betwixt the Actions of his Enemy and his own defigns, will be the firft Caufe 
of his Paflion. 

That the Motion of this Man's Will may acquire fome new determination, it is not abfolute- 
ly neceffary that he fhould receive, or imagine he receives any Affront ; for 'tis fufficient that his 
Mind only fhould think on it, without his Body's being concern'd in it. However as this- new 
determination would not be the determination of a Paflion, but only a moft weak and languifhing 
Inclination : 'Tis better to fuppofe that fome- great -oppofition is actually made to this Man's 
Defigns, or that he ftrongly fancies that it will be fo •, than to make another Suppofition, where- 
in the Senfes and Imagination are little or not at all concern'd. 

The fecond thing to be confider'd in this Man's Paflion, is an increafe of the Motion of his 
Will towards that'Good, of which his real or pretended Enemy endeavours to deprive him : the 
ftronger the oppofition is, or appears, the more considerable will be the increafe. He at firft 
hates his Adverfary, only becaufe he loves that Good, and his Hatred againft him grows in pro- 
portion to his Love for it ; becaufe the Motion of the Will in the Paflion of Hatred is at bottom 
nothing elfe but a Motion of Love ; that Motion of the Soul towards Good not differing from, 
that by which fhe avoids its Privation, as has been already obferv'd. 

The third thing is a Senfation fuitable to that Paflion ; in our Inftance 'tis a Senfation of Ha- 
tred. But though the Motion of Hatred be the fame with that of Love, yet the Senfation of 
Hatred is altogether different from that of Love, as any one may experience in himfelf. Motions 
are ACtions of the Will, but Senfations are Modifications of the Mind. The Motions of the Will 
are natural Caufes of the Senfations of the Mind ^ and thefe Senfations of the Mind reciprocally 
encourage and keep up the Motions of the Will in their Determination. The Senfation of Hatred 
is in the Man before us, the natural refult of the Motion of his Will, excited upon the view of 
Evil, and this Motion is afterwards maintained by the Senfation it hath produced. 

What we have juft now faid of this Man might happen to him, though he had not a Body. 
But becaufe he's made up of two Subftances naturally united, the Motions of his Soul are com- 
municated to his Body, and thofe of his Body to his Soul$ fo that the new Determination, or. 
the increafe of the Motion of his Will, naturally caufes a new Determination in the Motion of 
the Animal Spirits, which is always different in all the Paflions, though the Motion of the Soul 
\>q ftill almoft the fame. ' ... 

The 



9 F. M alee ran che Concerning BookV. 

The Spirits therefore are violently driven into the Arms, Legs and Face, to difpofe the Body in 
a manner adapted to the Paflion-, and to fhed over the Face the Look of" an injured Perfon, with 
reference to all the Circumftanees of the Injury received, and to the Quality and Capacity both of 
the Agent and Patient. That Expanfion of the Spirits is fo much the more ftrong, abundant and 
quick, as the Good is greater, the Oppofition more vehement, and the Brain livelyer affected. 

And therefore if the Perfon whereof we fpeak only imagine himfelf injur'd, or if he receive 
a real but flight injury, that makes no confiderable concuflion in the Brain, the Expanfion of the 
Animal Spirits will prove weak and languiftiing, and perhaps inefficient to alter the natural and 
ordinary Difpofition of the Body. But if the Outrage be exceeding great, or the Imagination en- 
iiam'd, the Brain will be extraordinarily fliaken, and the Spirits ib violently difpers'd, that in a 
moment they will imprint on the Face and Body the Symptoms of the ruling Paflion. If he be 
llrong enough to obtain the Viftory, his Countenance will be fierce and threatning. If weak and 
unable to withftand the overwhelming Evil, he will appear humble and fubmiflive. His Moans 
and Tears naturally exciting in the Spectators, and even in his Enemy Motions of Pity, he will 
draw from thence thofe fuccours which he could not expect from his own ftrength. True it is, 
that if the Spirits and Fibres of the Brain, in the Spectators and Adverfary of that unhappy Wretch' 
be already agitated with a violent Motion, contrary to that which breeds Compaflion in the Soul, 
the bemoanings of the Diftrefs'd will but increafe their Fury ; and fo would his undoing be inevi- 
table, fhould Jie always keep the fame Countenance and Afpe£t. But Nature has provided for it, 
for at the light of the imminent lofs of a great good, there are naturally produced on the Face 
fuch Arrange and furprizing Characters of Rage and Deipair, as to difarm the moft Barbarous Ene- 
mies, and to make them as it were unmovable. That ffightfull and unexpected fight of the Li- 
neaments of Death, drawn by the Hand of Nature upon the Face of an unfortunate Perfon, flops 
in the very Enemy, ftricken therewith, the Motions of the Spirits and Blood, that carried him to 
Revenge ; and in that favourable moment of Audience, Nature printing again an humble fubmif- 
five air upon the Face of the poor Wretch, that begins to entertain fome hopes, becaufe of the 
unmovablenefs, and alteration of the Countenance, of his Enemy, the Animal Spirits of that E- 
nemy receive a new determination, of which they were not capable a moment before •, and this 
Machinal Motion of Compaflion which he yields to, inclines the Soul to yield to the Pleas of 
Charity and Mercy. 

Becaufe a Man taken up with a Paflion cannot, without a great plenty of Spirits, produce or 
preferve in his Brain an Image of his Mifery lively enough, nor a Concuflion fufficiently ftrong, 
to give his Body an extraordinary and conftraind Difpofition : the correlponding Nerves within- 
the Body receive upon his fight of the Evil, the Concuflions and Agitations that are neceffary to 
infufe, into all the Veflels that communicate with the Heart, fit Humours, to the producing fuch 
Spirits as the Paflion requires. For the Animal Spirits fpreading through the Nerves that go to 
the Liver, Spleen, Pancreas, and all the other Vifcera, agitate and (hake them, and by their Agi- 
tation force out fuch Humours as thofe parts keep in referve, for the Wants and Exigencies of the 
Machine. 

But if thofe Humours always flowed in the fame manner into the Heart; if they received an 
equal Fermentation in different times, and the Spirits, that are made of them, regularly afcend-' 
ed into the Brain, we fhould not fee fuch hafty Changes in the Motions of the Paflions. For 
inftance, the fight of a Magiftrate would not flop, of a fudden, the extravagant Tranfports of an 
enraged Perfon, perfuing his Revenge ; and his Face, all fiery with Blood and Spirits, would not 
in an inftant turn pale and wan for fear of Punifhment. 

So, to hinder thofe Humours that are mixed with the Blood from entering the Heart conftant- 
ly in the lame manner, there are Nerves that furround all the Avenues thereof which being com- 
prefied or dilated by the Impreflion, that the fight of the Object, and the ftrength of the Imagk 
nation produce in the Spirits, fhut up or open the way to thofe Humours. And left the faid Hu- 
mours Ihould undergo the fame Agitation and Fermentation in the Heart in divers times; there 
are other Nerves that caufe the Beatings of it, which being not equally agitated in the different 
Motions of the Spirits, drive not the Blood with the Tame force into the Arteries. Other Nerves 
ipread through the Lungs, diflribute the Air to the Heart, by conftringing or relaxing feverai 
Branches of the Trachea ufed in Refpiration, and order the Fermentation of the Blood proportio- 
nably to the Circumftanees of the predominant Paflion. 

Laft of all, to regulate with the greateft Accuracy and Readinefs the Courfe of the Spirits, 
there are Nerves f unrounding the Arteries, as well thofe that end in the Brain, as thofe that car- 
ry the Blood into the other parts of the Body; fo that the Concuflion of the Brain, which accom- 
panies the unexpected Sight of fome Circumfcnce, for which 'tis convenient that the Motions of 
the Paflion fhould be alter d, fuddenly determines the Courfe of the Spirits to the Nerves thus 
furrounding the Arteries ; that by their Contraction they may fhut up the Paflage to the Blood 
that afcends into the Brain, and by their Dilatation lay it open to that which runs into all the 
other Pans of the Body. 

When thofe Arteries that carry the Blood to the Brain are free and open ; and on the contrary, 
thofe that difperfe it through the reft of the Body are ftrongly bound up by thefe Nerves, the. 
Head mull all be full of Blood, and the Face appear all fiery ; but fome Circumftance altering the 
Commotion of the Brain, that cauled that Difpofition in the Nerves, the Arteries that were flrait 
bound are loofened, and on the contrary, the Arteries of the Brain ftrongly contracted. Then is 
the Head emptied of Bloud, the Face covered with Palenefs, and the imall quantity of Blood, 

which 



Chap. III. the Search after Truth. 

. -which i-flues from the Heart, and which the Nerves before mentioned admit into it, as the Fewel 
to keep in Life, defcends ffiofl or all into the lower parts of the Body * the Brain- wants Aaimal 
Spirits, and all the reft of the Body is feized with Weaknefs and Trembling. 

To explain and prove the Particulars of what we have mentioned, it would be neceffary to giv» 
a general Knowledge of fbyficks. and a particular of the Humane Body •, but thole two Scieaqe,s 
are ltill too imperfect to be treated of with as much Accuracy as I could Willi: beiides ih i 
jhould I proceed farther in this Matter,, it would carry me too far from my Subject •, and there- 
fore I only defign here to give a grofs and general Idea of the Pallions, and am fatisfied, provided 
that this Idea be not falfe. 

Thofe Concuffions of the Brain, and Motions of the Blood and Spirits, are the fourth thing to 
be found in every Paffion, and produce the fifth, namely the fenfible Commotions of the Soul. 

At the very Inftant that the Animal Sprits are driven from the Brain into the reil of the Body, 
to produce fuch Motions as' are fit to keep up the Paffion 5 the Soul is carried towards the good 
perceived : and this more or lefs ftrongly, according as the Spirits come down from the Brain 
■with more or lefs vehemence ; for 'tis that Concuffioii of the Brain which agitates the Soul and 
the Animal Spirits. 

The Motion of the Soul towards Good is fo much ftronger, as the View of Good is more fenfible 
and apparent -, and the Motion of the Spirits that proceed ftom the Brain, and flow into the other 
parts of the Body, is the more violent, as the Vibration of the Fibres of the Brain, caufed by the 
ImprelVion of the Object, or of the Imagination, is more forcible ; becaufe that Concuffion of the 
Brain occafioning a more fenfible and lively View of Good, necelTarily makes the Commotion of 
the Soul in the Paffions to increafe proportionably to the Motion of the Spirits. 

Thofe Commotions of the Soul are not different from thofe that immediately follow the In- 
tellectual View of Good, which we have mentioned before : only they are ftronger and livelyer, 
becaufe of the Union of the Soul and Body, and the fenfiblenefs of the View that produces them: 

The fixth thing to be met with is the Senfation of the Paffion 5 the Senfation of Love, Hatred, 
Defire, Joy or Sorrow. This Senfation is not at all different from that which has been fpoken of; 
omy 'tis livelyer, becaufe the Body has a greater mare in it : but 'tis always attended with confu- 
ied Senfation of Satisfaction, that makes all the Paffions grateful ; which is the laft thing to be 
found in each of them, as has been already hinted. 

The Caufe of this laft Senfation is fuch-, At the fight of the Object of a Paffion, or of any new 
Circumftance, part of the Animal Spirits are driven from the Head to the outward Parts of the 
Body, to put it in the Difpoiition that the Paffion requires ; together with which fom'e other 
Spirits make a violent defcent into the Heart, Lungs, and other Vifcera, to draw from thence 
the necefTary Supplies, as has been already fufKclently explained. Now the Body is never in a 
convenient State, but the Soul relifhes it with great Satisfaction - y whereas it is never in a State 
contrary to its Good and Prefervation, but that fhe endures it with pain. And therefore when we 
follow the Motions of our Paffions, and ftop not the Courfe of the Spirits, which the View of 
the Object of the Paffion produces in the Body, to put in it the moft convenient State with rela- 
tion to that Object, the Soul by Nature's Law is affected with a Senfation of Satisfaction and De- 
light, becaufe her Body is in the Difpoiition it requires : whereas when, according to the Laws 
of Keafon, the Soul ftops the Current of the Spirits, and withftands thofe Paffions, fhe fufTers a 
Pain proportionable to the Evil that may from thence ariie to the Body. 

For as the Reflection that the Soul makes upon her felf is necelTarily accompanied with the Joy 
or Sorrow of the Mind, and afterwards with the Joy or Sorrow of the Senfes ; when doing her 
Duty, and fubmitting to the Orders of God, fhe is confeious that fhe is in a due and convenient 
itate ; or when having given her felf up to her Paffions, fhe is afterwards affected with Remorfe, 
which teaches her that fhe is in a corrupt Difpoiition : So the Courfe of the Spirits raifed for the 
good of the Body, is firft attended with fenfible, and afterwards with Spiritual Joy or Sorrow, 
according as the Courfe of the Animal Spirits is retarded or promoted by the Will. 

There is however this notable difference betwixt the Intellectual Joy that attends the clear 
Knowledge of the good Eftate of the Soul, and the fenfible Pleafure that accompanies the confu- 
fed Senfation of the good difpoiition of the Body ; that the intellectual Joy is folid and fubftan- 
tial, without Remorfe, and as immutable as its Original Caufe, the Truth ; whereas fenfible Joy/ 
is almoft ever followed with the Sorrow of the Mind, or the Remorfe of the Confidence, and is 
as reftlefs and fickle, as the Paffion or Agitation of the Blood from whence it proceeds. To con" 
elude, the firft is for the moft part attended with an exceeding Joy of the Senfes when it is derived 
from the Knowledge of the great good that the Soul polTefTes •, whereas the other is veiy rarely ac- 
companied with any great Joy of the Mind, though it proceeds from a Good^ confiderable for the 
Body, but contrary to the Good or Perfection of the Soul 

'Tis neverthelefs true, That without the Grace of our Lord, the fatisfaction the Soul relifhes 
when fhe gives her felf up to her Paffions is more grateful, than that which fhe enjoys when fhe 
follows the Rules of Reafon ; which fatisfaction is the Source of all the Diforders that have at- 
tended the Original Sin, and would have made us all Slaves to our Paffions, had not the Son of 
God rid us from their Tyranny, by the Delectation of his Grace. For what I have faid on behalf 
of the joy of the Mind in oppofition to the Joy of the Senfes, is only true amongft the Chriftians, 
and was altogether falfe in the Mouths of Seneca, Epicurus, and all the moft rational of the Hea- 
then Pbilofopbers , becaufe the To/ce of Cbriji is only fioeet to thofe that belong to him, and his 
Burthen only light, when his Grace helps us to fupport the Weight of it. 

C CHAP. 



io F. Male br an Che Concerning Book V» 



CHAP. IV. 

that the Pleafure and Motion of the Paffions engage us in Erronrs, and falfe 
Judgments about Good ; That we ought continually to refifl them. Horr to 
impugn Libertinifm; 

AL L thofe general Qualities and Effects of the Paffions, that we have hitherto treated of, are 
not free, they are in us without our Leave, and nothing buc the Confent of our Will is 
wholly in our Power. The View or Apprehenfion of Good is naturally followed with a Motion 
of Love, a Senfation of Love, a Concuffion of the Brain, a Motion of the Spirits, a new Com- 
motion of the Soul that encreafes the flrft Motion of Love, a new Senfation of the Soul, that 
likewife augments the firft Senfation of Love ; and laftly, a Senfation of Satisfaction which re- 
compenfes the Soul for the Bodies being in a convenient State. All this happens to the Soul and 
Body naturally and mechanally ; that is, without her having any part in it, nothing but her Con- 
fent being her own real Work. This Confent we mull regulate, preferve, and keep free, in fpite 
of all the Struggle and Attempts of the PafTions. We ought to fubmit our Liberty to none but 
God, and to yield to nothing but to the Voice of the Author of Nature, to inward Evidence, and 
Conviction, and to the fecret Reproaches of our Reafon. We ought never to confent, but when 
we plainly fee, we mould make an ill life of our Liberty, in withholding our Confent. This is 
the principal Rule to be obferv'd for the avoiding of Errour. 

God only makes us evidently perceive, That we ought to yield to what he requires of us ; to 
him alone therefore we ought to devote our Service?. Theje is no Evidence in the Allurements 
and CareiTes, in the Threats and Frightnings caufed in us of the Paffions -, they are only confu- 
ted and obfeure Senfations, to which we muft never yield up our felves. We muft wait till all 
thofe falfe Glimpfes of the Paffions vanifli, till a purer Light illuminates us, till God fpeaks in- 
wardly to us. We muft enter within our felves, and there feek him that never leaves us, that 
always enlightens us. He fpeaks low, but his Voice is diftinct ; his Light is weak, but pure. But 
no, his Voice is as ftrong as 'tis diftinct, and his Light is as bright and active as 'tis pure. But 
our Paffions continually keep us from home, and by their Noife and Darknefs, hinder us from 
being inftructed by his Voice, and illuminated by his Light. He fpeaks even to thofe that ask him 
no Queftions-, and thofe, whom Paffions have carried fartheft from him, fail not yet many times 
Heb. iv. to hear fome of his Words, but loud, threatning, aftonifhing Words, Sharper than a two-edged 
12, 13. Sword, piercing into the inmoft Recefles of the Soul, and difcerning the Thoughts and Defigns of 
the Heart. For all things are open to his Eyes, and he cannot fee the unruly Actions of Sinners, 
without ladling them inwardly with fmarting Reproofs. We muft then re-enter into our felves^ 
and approach near him •, we muft interrogate him, liften to him, and obey him ; for by always 
liftning to him, we fhall never be deceived :, and always obeying him, we mail never be fubject- 
ed to the Inconftancy of the Paffions, and the Miferies due to Sin. 

We muft not, like fome pretenders to Wit, whom the Violence of Paffion has reduced to the 
Condition of Beafts •, who, having a long time defpifed the Law of God, feem at laft to have 
retained no Knowledge of any other than that of their infamous Paffions : We muft not, I fay, 
imagine, as do thofe Men of Flefh and Blood, that it is following God, and obeying the Voice 
of the Author of Nature, to give up our felves to the Motions of Paffions, and to comply 
with the fecret Defires of our Heart : This is the utmoft poffible Blindnefs ; 'tis, according to 
St. Paul, the temporal Punifhment of Impiety and Idolatry, that is to fay, the Defert of the 
moft enormous Crimes. And herein indeed the greatnefs of this terrible Punifhment confifts, that 
inftead of allaying the Anger of God, as do all the. others in this World, it continually exafperates 
and encreafes it, till that dreadful Day comes, wherein his juft Wrath fhall break out to the Con- 
fufion of Sinners. 

Their Arguings however feem likely enough, as being agreeable to common Senfe, countenane'd 
by the Paffions, and fuch, I am fure, as all the Philofophy of Zeno could never overthrow. We 
muft love Good, fay they ; Pleafure is the Sign which Nature has affix'd to it to make it known, 
and that Sign can never be fallacious, fince God has inftituted it to diftinguifh Good from Evil. 
We mult avoid Evil, fay they again •, Pain is the Character which Nature has annex'd to it, and 
■a Token in which we cannot be miftaken ; fince it was inftituted by God for the diftinguifhing 
ic from Good. We feel Pleafure in complying with our Paffions, Trouble and Pain in oppofing 
them^ and therefore the Author of Nature will have us to give up. our felves to our Paffions, and 
never to refift them, fince the Pleafure and Pain wherewith he affects us in thofe Cafes, are the 
infallible Criterion of his Will. And confequently, it is to follow God, to comply with the De- 
fire of our Hearts ; and 'tis to obey his Voice, to yield to the Inftinct of Nature, which moves 
us to the fatisfying our Strifes and our Paffions. This is their way of Reafoning, whereby they 
confirm them felves in their infamous Opinions : And thus they think to fhun the fecret Reproofs 
of their Reafon - ? and in Pun'rihment of their Crime God fuffers them to be dazzled by thofe falfe 
(ilimpfes-, delulive Glarings, which blind them inftead of inlightning them, and ftrike them with 
fuch an infenfible Blindneis, as they do not 16 muck as wifh to be cured of it, Qod delivers 

them 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. t i 



them to a reprobate Senfe, he gives them up to the Defiles of their corrupt Heart ; to fhamefiil 
Poffibhs, to Actions unworthy or' Men, as the "Holy Scripture fpeaks, that having fatned them* 
felvej-by their Debauches, they may to all Eternity be the fit Sacrifice of his Vengeance. 

Bat let us lblve this Difficulty which they offer. The Sect of Zeno^ not knowing how to un* 
tie the Knot, has cut it, by denying that Pleafure is a Good, and Pain an Evil: But that's too 
venturous a Stroke, and a Subterfuge unbecoming Philofophers, and very unlikely, I am lure, to 
convert thofe who are convine'd by Experience, That a great Pain is a great Evil. Since there- 
fore Zeno^ and all his Heathen Fhilofophy, cannot lblve the Difficulty of the Epicures^ we mult 
have recourfe to a more folid and inlightned Philofophy. 

3 Tis true, that Pleafure is Good, and Pain Evil ^ and that Pleafure and Pain have been join'd 
by the Author of Nature to the life of certain Things, by which we judge whether they are'Good 
or Evil, which make us perfue the Good and Hy from the Evil, and almoft ever follow the Mo- 
tions of the Paffions. All this is true, but relates only to the Body, which to preferve,and keep 
long a Life much like to that of Beafts, we muft fuffer our felves to be ruled by our Paffions and 
Delires. The Senfes and Paffions are only given us for the good of the Body j fenfible Pleafure 
is the indelible Character which Nature has affix'd to the Life of certain Things, that without 
putting our Reafon to the trouble of examining them, we might prefently imploy them for the 
preieivation of the Body ^ but not with intent that we fhould love them: For we ought only to 
love thole Things which Reafon undoubtedly manifefts to be our Good. 

We are Reafonable Beings-, and God, who is our Sovereign Good, requires not of us a blind, 
an iniiinctive, a compell'd Love, as I may fay, but a Love of Choice, an enlightned Love, a Love 
that fubmits to him our whole Intellectual and Moral Powers. He inclines us to the Love of 
him, in (hewing us by the Light that attends the Delectation of his Grace, that he is our Chief 
Good -, but he moves us towards the Good of the Body only by Inftinct and a confufed Senfation 
of Pleafure, becaufe the Good of the Body is undeferving of either the Attention of our Mind, 
or the Exercife of our Reafon. 

Moreover, our Body is not our felves ; 'tis fomething that belongs to us, and, abfolutely 
fpeaking, we cannot fubfift without it : The Good of the Body therefore is not properly our 
Good •, lor Bodies can be but the Good of Bodies. We may make ufe of them for the Body, 
but we muft not be taken up with them. Our Soul has alfo her own Good, viz. the only Good 
that is fuperiour to her, the only one that preferves her, that alone produces in her Senfations of 
Plealute and Pain : For indeed none of the Objects of the Senfes can of themfelves give us any 
Senfation of them ^ it is only God who allures- us of their Prefence, by the Senfation he gives us 
or them ; which is a Truth that was never underftood by the Heathen Philofophers. 

We may and muft love that which is able to make us fenfible of Pleafure, I grant it : But by that 
very Reafon we ought only to love God, becaufe he only can act upon our Soul ^ and the utmoft 
thai lenfiob Objects can do, is to move the Organs of our Senfes. But what matters it, 
you'll fay, iiom whence thofe grateful Senfations come ? I will tafte 'em. O thou ungrateful 
Wretch ! know the Hand that fhowres down Good upon thee. You require of a juft 
God unjuit Rewards : You delire he fliould recompence you for the Crimes you commit againft 
him, and even at the very time of committing them •, you make ufe of his. immutable Will, 
which is the Order and Law of Nature, to wreft from him undeferved Favours j for with a 
guilty Managery you produce in your Body fuch Motions as oblige him to make you reiifh. all 
forts of Pleafures. But Death fhall dhTolve that Body - y and God, whom you have made fubfer- 
vient to your unjuft Defires, will make you fubfervient to his juft Anger, and mock at you in his. 
turn. 

'Tis very hard, I confefs, that the Enjoyment of Corporeal Good mould be attended with 
Pleafure, and that the PolTeffion of the Good of the Soul fhould often be conjoin'd with Pain 
and Anguilh. We may indeed believe it to be a great Diforder, by this Reafon, that Pleafure 
being the Character of Good, and Pain of Evil, we ought to polTefs a Satisfaction infinitely great- 
er in loving God, than in making ufe of fenfible Things-, fince He is the true, or rather the only 
Good of the- Mind. So doubtlefs will it be one Day, and fb was it moft probably before Sin 
entred into the World : Atleaft, 'tis very certain, that before the Fall Man fuffered no Pain in 
difcharging his Duty* 

But God is withdrawn from us fince the Fall of Adam ^ he is no more our Good by Nature^ 
but only by Grace j we feel now no Delight and Satisfaction in the Love of him, and he rather 
thrufts us. from, than draws us to him. If we follow him, he gives us a Rebuff^ if we run afc 
ter him, he ftrikes us ^ and if we beobftinate in our Perfuit, he continues to handle us more ie- 
verely, by inflicting very lively and fenfible Pains upon us. And when, being weary of walking 
through the rough and ftony Ways of Vertue, without being fupported by the Repaft of Good, 
or itrengthned by any Nourifhment, we come to feed upon fenfible Things, he faftens us to them 
by the reiifh of Pleafure, as though he would reward us for turning back from him, to run after 
counterfeit Goods. In fnort, fince Men have finn'd, it feems, God is not pleas'd that they fhould 
love him, think upon him, or efteem him their only and fovereign Good. It is only by the de- 
tectable Grace of Cbriji our Mediator, that we fenfibly perceive that God is our proper Good. 
For Pleafure being the fenfible Mark of Good, we then perceive God to be our Good, when the 
Grace of our Redeemer makes us love him wfth Pleafure. 

Thus the Soul not knowing her own Good, either by a clear View, or by Senfation, without 
the Grace of Jefus Cbrift^ fhe takes the Good of the Body for her own ; me loves it, and clofes 

to 



12 F. Malebranche Concerning Book V: 

to it with a ftricter Adhefion by her Will, than ever fhe did by the firft inftiiution of Nature. 
For Corporeal Good being now the only one left that is fenfible, mull needs operate upon Man 
with more Violence, ftrike his Biain livelier, and confequently be felt and imagined by "the Soul 
in a more fenfible manner : And the Animal Spirits receiving a more vehement Agitation, the Will 
by conlequence mutt love it with a greater Ardency and Pleafure. 

The Soul might before Sin blot out of her Brain the too lively Image of Corporeal Good, and 
difiipate the fenfible Pleafure this Image was attended with. The Body being fiibject to the Mind^ 
the Soul might on a fudden ftop the quavering Concuffion of the Fibres of the Brain, and the Com- 
motion of the Spirits, by the meer Confideration of her Duty : But fhe loft that Power by Sin. 
Thofe Traces of the Imagination, and thofe Motions of the Spirits, depend no more upon her ^ 
whence it neceifarily follows, that the Pleafure, which by the Inttitution of Nature is corrjoin'd 
* Sec Dial, to tliofe Motions and Traces, mutt ufurp the whole PolTeffion of the Heart. • * Man cannot long 
5. of chri- refill that Pleafure by his own Strength •, 'tis Grace that mult obtain a perfect Victory ; Reafon 
[nan Con- a \ one can ne yer doe it : None but God, as the Author of Grace, can overcome himfelf as the Au- 
about'tiie tnor °f ^ at ure, or rather exorate himfelf as the Revenger of Adam's Rebellion, 
end: The Stoicks, who had but a confufed Knowledge of the Diforders of Original Sin, could not 

anfwer the Epicures. Their Felicity was but Idea/, fince there is no Happinefs without Pleafure, 
and no Pleafure to be fenfibly perceiv'd by them in Vertuous Actions. They might feel indeed 
fome Joy in following the Rules of their . phantaftick Vertue j becaufe Joy is a natural Confe- 
quence of the Confcioufnefs our Soul has of being in the molt convenient State. That Spiritual 
Joy might bear up their Spirits for a while, but was not ftrong enough to withftand Pain, and over- 
come Pleafure. Secret Pride, and not Joy, made them keep their Countenance ; for when no 
body was prefent, ail their Wifdom and Strength vanifhed, juft as Kings of. the Stage lofe all 
their Grandeur in a Moment. 

It is not fo with thofe Chriftians that exactly follow the Rules of the Gofpel. Their Joy is 
folid, becaufe they certainly know, that they are in the molt convenient State : Their Joy is great, 
becaufe the Good they poffefs through Faith and Hope is Infinite ^ for the Hope of a great Good 
is always attended with a great Joy •, and that Joy is fo much livelier, as the Hope is ftronger^ 
becaufe a ftrong Hope reprefenting the Good as prefent, neceffarily produces Joy, as alfo that fen- 
fible Pleafure which ever attends the Prefence of Good. Their Joy is not reltlefs and uneafie, 
becaufe grounded on the Promifes of God, confirm'd by the Blood of his Son, and cherifhed by 
that inward Peace and unutterable Sweetnefs of Charity, which the Holy Ghoft fheds into their 
Hearts. Nothing can feparate them from their true Good, which they relifh and take Compla- 
cency in by the Delectation of Grace. The Pleafures of Corporeal Good are not fo great as 
thofe they feel in the Love of God. They love Contempt and Pain : They feed upon Difgraces, 
and the Pleafure they find in their Sufferings, or rather the Pleafure they find in God, for whom 
they defpife all the reft, to unite themfelves to him, is fo ravifhing and tranfporting, as to make 
them fpeak a new Language, and even boaft ^ as the Apoftles did of their Miferies and Abufes - , 
Aft <; when they departed from the prefence of the Council, rejoicing that they were counted worthy to 
" 4 ' f H ff er fhame for the Name of fESUS. Such is the Difpofition of Mind in true Chriftians', 
when they are molt bafely affronted for the Defence of Truth. 

CHRIST being come to reftore the Order which Sin had overthrown, and that Order re- 
quiring that the greateft Goods be accompanied with the molt folid Pleafures •, it is plain, that 
things ought to be in the manner we have laid. But we may farther confirm and ftrengthen Rea- 
fon by Experience •, for 'tis known, that as foon as any Perfon has formed but the bare Refolution 
to defpife all for God, he is commonly affected with a Pleafure or internal Joy, that makes him 
as fenfibly and lively perceive that God is his Good, as he knew it evidently before. 

The true Chriitians allure us every Day, that the Joy they feel in an unmixt loving and ferving 
God, is inexpreflible ; and 'tis but reafonable to believe the Relation they make of what happens 
within them. On the contrary, the Impious are perpetually vexed with horrible Difquietudes ; 
and thofe that are fhar'd betwixt God and the World, partake of the Joys of the Juft, and of 
the Vexations of the Impious : They complain of their Miferies, and 'tis reafonable to believe 
that their Complaints are not groundlefs. God ftrikes Men to the Quick, and through the very 
Heart, when they love any thing befides him ; and 'tis this Stroke that caufes a real Mifery. He 
pours an exceeding Joy into their Minds, when all their Adherencies are to him only, and that 
Joy is the Spring of true Felicity. The Abundance of Riches and Elevation to Honours being 
without us, cannot cure us of the Wound God makes ■, and Poverty and Contempt, that are 
likewife without us, cannot hurt us under the Almighty's Protection. 

By what we have faid, 'tis plain, That the Objects of the Paflions are not our Good, that we 
mult not follow their Motions, unlefs it be for the Prefervation of Life -, that fenfible Pleafure 
bears the like Proportion to Good, as Seniations to Truth -, and that as our Senfes deceive us in 
Matters of Truth, fo do likewife our PafTions in point of our Good h that we ought to yield to 
the Delectation of Grace, becaufe it evidently moves us to the Love of a true Good, is not fol- 
lowed with the fecret Reproaches of Realbn, as the blind Inftinct and confufed Pleafure of the 
Pailions :, but is always attended with a fecret Joy, fuitable to the good State we are in. Laft of 
ail, fince. God alone can operate upon the Mind of Man, he cannot find any Happinefs out of 
God, unlefs we would fuppofe that God rewards Difobedience, or that he commands to love 
*svre\ what liej} delerves to be loved. • 

CHAP, 



Chap. V. The Search after Truth. 1 3 



CHAP. V. 

That the Perfection of the Mind confifs in its %)nion with God, by the Know- 
ledge of Truth , and the Love of e VeYtne\ and contrariwise, that its Im- 
perje&ion proceeds only from its Dependency on the Body, caufed by the 
DiJ order of the Senfes and Pajpons. 

THE fhorteft Reflection is fufficient to let Us know, that the Good of the M,ind muft needs be 
fomething of a Spiritual Nature, for our Bodies are much inferiour to our Mind $ they are 
unable to act upon it by their own ftrength ^ they cannot immediately unite themfelves to it 5 
laftiy, they are not intelligible of themfelves, and therefore cannot be its Good : whereas Spiri- 
tual things being intelligible of their own Nature, can be united to the Mind, and confequently 
be its Good, provided they be Superiour to it. For that a thing may be the Good of the Mind, 
it muft not only be Spiritual as it felf -, but it muft alfo be Superiour to it, that it may aft up- 
on it, enlighten it^ and reward it •, fince otherwife it cannot make it perfe£ler and happier, nor by. 
confeqnence be its Good. Now, of all Intelligible or Spiritual things, God alone is thus Supe- 
riour to the Mind ^ whence it follows, That nothing but God alone, either is, or can be, our true 
Gool^ and that we cannot become either more happy or more perfeCt, but by enjoying, him. 

Every one is perfuaded that the Knowledge of Truth, and the Love of Vertue, make the Mind 
more perfect ; and that the Blindnefs of the Mind, and the Depravation of the Heart, leffens its 
natural Perfection. The Knowledge of Truth, and the Love of Vertue, cannot then be any thing 
elfe but the Union of the Mind to God j or, if I may fo fpeak, a FolTeflion of him : and, oil 
the contrary, the Blindnefs of the Mind, and the Depravation of the Heart, can be nothing elfe 
but a feparation of the Mind from God, and its Union with fomething Inferiour to it, viz. with 
the Boay •, fince that is the only Union that can make it imperfeCt and unhappy. And therefore 
to know the Truth, or to know things as far as they are agreeable to the Rules of Truth, is 
rcUy to know Gcd. And to love Vertue, or to love things as far as they are amiable, or accord- 
ing to the Rules of Vertue, is to love him. 

The Mind is fituate, as.it were, betwixt God and Bodies, betwixt Good and Evil, between 
that which enlightens, and that which blinds it ; that which rules, and that which mifrules it ; that 
which can make it perfect and happy, and that which can. render it imperfeCt and miferable. When 
it dif covers feme Truth, or fees things as they are in their own Nature -, it fees them in the Ideas 
of God, that is, difcovers them by a clear and diftinCt view of what is in God reprefenting them. 
F01, as I have obferved elfewhere, the Mind of Man contains not in it felf the Perfections or Ideas 
of all the Beings it is capable of perceiving : 'tis not the univerfal Being, and therefore cannot 
fee in it felf fuch things as are diftinguim'd from it felf. It does not inftruCt or enlighten it felf\ 
fcy conluking with it felf, as being neither Perfection nor Light to it felf-, it ftands in need to be 
enlightned by the immenfe Light of Eternal Truth. Thus the Mind, by knowing Truth, is united 
to God, and in fome manner knows and poffeffes him. - 

We may not only fay, That a Mind perceiving the Truth, partly knows God, who compre- 
hends it •, we may add alfo, That in fome fort it knows things as God himfelf knows them* 
For the Mind knows their true Relations, and fo does God -, the Mind fees them in viewing the 
Perfections of God that reprefent them •, God perceives them the fame way : for God neither per- 
ceives by Senfe, nor Imagination ; but fees in himfelf, as being the Intellectual World, the Cor- 
poreal and Senfible World, which he has created. 'Tis the fame with the Mind in its Knowledge 
of Truth: it comes not to it by Senfation or Imagination ; for Senfations and Pantafms ofter 
but falfe Reprefentations of things to the Mind h fo that whofoever difcovers the Truth, fees it in 
the Intelle&ual World, to which'tis united, and in which Good fees it ; for this material and 
fenfible World, is not intelligible of it felf: fo that the Mind fees in the Light of God as does 
God himfelf, all the things which it plainly fees, though it fees them very imperfectly and fo ve- 
ry differently from God in that refpeCt. Thus when the Mind fees Truth, it not only is united 
to God, poffefTes and beholds God, but alfo fees Truth in one fenfe as God himfelf fees it. 

So when we love according to the Rules of Vertue, we love God ; for by regulating our Love 
according tq thefe Rules, the Impreffion of Love towards him, which he continually produces 
in our Heart, is not turn'd off by free Will, nor changed into Self-Love. The Mind at that time 
freely follows the Impreffion which God gives : and God never giving any Impreffion which does' 
not tend towards him-, fince he only aCts for himfelf* it is plain, That to love according to the 
Rules of Vertue, is to love God. 

But 'tis not only to love God ; 'tis likewife to love as God loves : He loves himfelf only, and 
his Works but becaufe they relate to his Perfections, and proportionably to the degrees of Con- 
formity they have with them ^ It being the fame Love by which God loves himfelf, and what-, 
ever he has made or done. To love according to the Rules of Vertue, is to love God only, to 
love him in all things, and to love things proportionably as they partake of his Goodnefe and 
Perfections -, fince this is to love them according to the degree they are lovely, In fhort, 'tis to 

D love 



i,i F. Malebranche Concerning BookV. 

iove by tlie Impreflion of the fame Love by which God loves himfelf-, for 'tis the Love by which 
God loves himfelf, and whatever elfe with relation to him, that animates us, when we love as we 
ought : whence I conclude, That we then love, as God loves. 

. It is therefore evident, That the Knowledge of Truth, and the regular Love of Vertue, conftitute 
all our Perfe&ion, fince they are the coftomary Attendants on our Union with God ; which alio 
affords us the Enjoyment of him, as far as we are capable of it, in this Life : whereas the Blindnefs 
of the Mind, and the Depravation of the Heart, make our Imperfection -, and are the Refults of the 
Union of our Soul and Body, as I have proved in feveral Places j mewing that we never know 
the Truth, nor love the real Good, when we follow the Imprefnons of our Series, Imaginations, 
and Paihons. 

All this is evident •, and yet Men, who all paflionately defire the Perfection of their Being, care 
but little to increafe the Union which they have with God ; nay, they are continually at work 
to ftrengthen and enlarge that which they have with fenfible things. The Cauie of that fur- 
prizing Diforder cannot be too much explain'd: 

The Poffefuon of Good mull naturally produce two Effects in the Pofleflbur •, at once muft 
render him more perfect, and more happy : however it does not always fall out lb. 'Tis im- 
pofiible indeed that the Mind mould actually enjoy a Good, without being actually more perfect ; 
but it may happen that it actually enjoys it, without being actually happier. Thofe that know 
Truth belt, and love raoft the moft lovely Goods, are always actually more perfect,. than thofe 
that live in blind Ignorancej and difbrderly Practice ; but they are not always actually happier. 
It is even fo with Evil; it ought at onee to make both imperfect and unhappy ^ but though it 
always makes Men more imperfect, yet it does not always make them more unhappy ; or at leaft 
makes them not unhappy proportionably to its making them imperfect. Vertue is often bitter 
and diftaftful, whereas Vice is fweet and pleafant ; fo that it is efpecially by Faith and Hope, 
that pious Men are truly happy ; whilft the wicked have the actual Enjoyments of Pleafures 
and Delights. It ought not to be fo indeed, but however it is fo •, Sin has brought forth that 
Diforder, as I faid in the foregoing Chapter, and that Diforder is the principal Caufe, not only 
of the Corruption of our Morals, but alfo of the Ignorance and Darknefs of our Mind. 

By that Diforder it is that our Imagination perfuades it felf, that Bodies may be the Good of 
the Mind : For Pleafure, as I have often faid, is the fenfible Character, or Mark, of Good. But 
now of all the Pleafures we enjoy upon Earth, the moft fenfible are thofe which we imagine 
to receive by the Body. We judge, though too inconfiderately without doubt, that Bodies can 
be, and are, effectually our Good. And 'tis fo hard to oppofe the Inftinct of Nature, and to 
withftand the Arguments of the Senfes, that the defign of it does not fo much as come into our 
Mind. We think not on the Diforders introduc'd by Sin. We confider not that Bodies can act 
. upon the Mind but as occafional Caufes : that the Mind cannot immediately, or by it felf, enjoy 
any Corporeal thing, and that all the ways it has of uniting to an Object are by its Knowledge 
and Love -, that God only is fuperiour to it, can reward or punifh it, by Senfations of Pleafure or 
Pain, that can enlighten and move it, in a word, act upon it. Thofe Truths, though moft evi- 
dent to attentive Minds, are not however fo powerful to convince us, as is the deceiving Ex- 
perience of a fenfible Impreffton. 

When we confider fomething as part of our felves, or look on our felves as a part of that 
thing, we judge it our Good to be united to it j we love it, and this love is fb much the greater, 
as the thing, whereunto we think our felves united, feems to be a more considerable part of the 
whole we make up together with it. Now there are two forts of Proofs, which perfuade us 
that a thing is part of our felf, viz. the Inftinct of Senfation, and the Evidence of Reafon. 

By the Inftinct of Senfation I am perfuaded that my Soul is united to my Body, or that my 
Body makes part of my Being ; but I have no full Evidence of it, fince I know it not by the 
light of Reafon, but by the Pain or Pleafure I feel at the pretence and impreffion of Objects. My 
Hand is prick d, I fuffer Pain •, thence I conclude, that my Hand makes part of my felf: my Cloaths 
are rent, and I endure nothing •, therefore, I fay, my Cloaths are not my felf: my Hair is cut with- 
out Pain, but cannot be pluck'd up without fmart ; that puzzles the Philofopher, and he knows 
not what to determine. In the mean while this perplexity fhows, that even the wifeft rather judge 
by the inftinct of Senfation than by the light of Reafon, that fuch or fuch things belong or belong 
not to themfelves. For fhould they determine them by Evidence, and the light of Reafon, they 
would quickly know, that the Mind and the Body are two forts of Beings, altogether oppofite ; 
that the Mind cannot be united to the Body by it felf, and that the Soul is wounded when the 
Body is ftruck, only becaufe of her Union with God. "lis then only by the Inftinct of the Senfa- 
tion that we look on our Body, and all the fenfible things to which we are united, as part of our 
felves, that is, as belonging to that which thinks and feels in us : For what is not, cannot be known 
by evident Reafon, fince Evidence difcovers Truth alone. 

But on the contrary, 'tis by the light of Reafon that we know the Relation we have with In- 
tellectual things. We difcover, by a clear View of the Mind, that we are united to God in a more 
ftrict and eflential manner than to our Body ^ that without him we are nothing, and neither can 
doe, nor know, neither will, nor be fenfible of any thing : that he is our All, or if we may fo 
f peak, that we make up a whole with him, of which we are but an infinitely fmall part. The 
light of Reafon difcovers us a thoufand Motives to love God only, and to difpife Bodies, as un- 
worthy of our Love. But we are not naturally fenfible of our Union to God, nor perfuaded 
that he is our All, by the Inftinct of fenfe ; 'tis only the Grace of our Lord which produces in fdme 

Men 



Chap. V. The Search after Truth. , |-| 

Men that fpiritual fenfe to help them to overcome the contrary Senfations, by which they are united 
to their Body. For God, as the Author of Nature, inclines Minds to the love of him by a Know- 
ledge of Illumination, and not of InftincT: ; and in all probability, 'tis but fince the Fall that God, 
as the Author of Grace, has fuperadded Inftintt to Illumination ; becaufe our light is at prefent lb 
mightily impair'd, as to be incapable of bringing us to God, being befides continually weakif d by 
contrary pleafure or inftinfr, and rendred ineffectual. 

We therefore difcover by the light of the Mind, that we are united to God, and to the intel- 
lectual World which he contains ^ and are convinced by Senfation, that we are united to our Body, 
and by it to the material and fenfible World God has Created. But as our Sedations are more 
lively, moving, frequent and lafting than our Illuminations, fo 'tis not ftrange that our Senfa- 
tions Ihould agitate us, and quicken our love for fenfible things :, whereas our Light dilTipates and 
vanifhes, without producing any zeal and ardency for Truth. 

'Tis true that feveral Men are perfuaded that God is their real Good, love him as their All, 
and earneftly defire to ftrengthen and increafe their Union With him. But few evidently know, 
that by meditating on the Truth we unite our felves to God, as far as natural ftrength can attain ; 
that it is a fort of Enjoyment of him, to contemplate the true Ideas of things ; and that that ab- 
ftra&ed view of fome general and immutable Truths, on which all the particulars depend, are 
flights of a Mind that fequefters it felf from the Body to unite it felf to God. Metaphyficks, 
ipeculative Mathematicks, and all thofe univerfai Sciences, which regulate and contain the par- 
ticular, as the Univerfal Being comprehends all particular Beings, feem to be Chimerical to molt 
Men, as well to the pious as to thofe that do not love God. So that I dare hardly make bold 
to fay, that the ftudy of thole Sciences is the moft pure and perfecf Application to God, that the 
Mind may be naturally capable of-, and that it is by the fight of the Intellectual World, which is 
their Object, that God has produced and frill" knows this fenfible World, from which Bodies re- 
ceive their Life, as Spirits live from the other. 

Thofe that purely follow the Impreffions of their Senfes, and motions of their Paffions, are not 
capable of relifhing the Truth, becaufe it flatters them not. And even the Vertuous, who conftaht- 
ly oppofe their Paffions when they proffer them falfe Goods, do not always refift them when 
they conceal from them the Truth, and make it defpicable ; becaufe one may be pious without be- 
ing a Man of parts. To pleafe God we need not exa£tly know, that our Senfes, Imagination, 
and Paffions, always reprefent things otherwife than they are ; fince it appears not that our Lord 
and his Apoftles ever intended to undeceive us of feveral Errours upon this matter, which Def car- 
tes has difcover'd to us 

There is a great difference betwixt Faith and Underftanding, the Gofpel and Philofophy : the 
greateft Clowns are capable of Faith, but few can attain to the pure Knowledge of Evident Truth. 
Faith reprefents to vulgar Men God as the Creator of Heaven and Earth, which is a fufficientmo- 
tive-of Love and Duty towards him - y whereas Reafon, knowing that God was God before he was 
Creator, not only confiders him in his Works, butalfo endeavours to contemplate him in himfelf; 
or in that immenfe Idea of the infinitely" perfe£t Being, which is included in him. The Son of 
God, who is the Wifdom of his Father, or the Eternal Truth, made himfelf Man, and became 
ienfible, that he might be known by Men of Flefh and Blood, by grofs material Men -, that he 
might inftrucl: them by that which was the Caufe of their Blindnefs, and draw them to the love 
of him, and dife-ngage them from fenfible goods* by the fame things that had enflav'd them; 
for having to doe with Fools,, he thought fit to take upon him a fort of Polly whereby to make 
them wife: So-that the moft pious Men, and trueft Believers, have not always the greateft 
Underftanding. They may know God by Faith, and dove him by the help of his Grace, with- 
out underftanding, that he is their- All, in- the fenfe Philofophers underftand him* and without 
thinking, that the abftra&ed Knowledge of Truth is a fort of a Union with him. We ought 
not therefore to be furprized^ if fb few Perfons labour to ftrengthen their natural Union with God 
by the Knowledge of Truth, fince to this there is required a continual oppofirion of the Impreffions 
of the Senfes and Paffions,. in' a very different way from that which is ufual with the Vertuous, 
who are not always perfuaded* that the Senfes.and Paffions abufe them in the mariner that has been 
explain'd in the foregoing Books. 

The Senfations and Thoughts, in which the Body has a fhare, are the fole and immediate Caufe 
of the Paffions,. as proceeding from the Coneuffion of the Fibres of the Brain, railing fome parti- 
cular Commotion in the Animal Spirits-: And therefore Senfations are the only fenfible proofs of 
our- dependence on fome things*; which they excite us to love : but we feel not our Natural Uni- 
on with God, when we know the Truth, and do not fo much as think upon him, becaufe he is, 
and operates in us fo privately and infenfibly, as to be imperceptible to our felves: And this is 
the Reafon that our natural Union with God raifes not our Love for him. But it goes quite 
otherwife with our Union to fenfible things. All our Senfations prove it, and Bodies appear be- 
fore our Eyes* when they a£t in us. Their Action is vifible and manifeft. Our Body is even 
more prefent to us than our Mind, and we confider the former as the beft part of our Selves. 
So that our Union to -our Body, and by it to fenfible Objects, excites in us a violent Love, which 
increafesthat Union,, and makes us depend on things that are infinitely below us. 

CHAP, 



i6 F. Malebranche Concerning BookV. 



CHAP. VI. 

Of the more general Errours of the Pajpons y with fome '-particular Infances. 

TI S the part of Moral Philofophy to difcover the particular Errours concerning Good, in 
which our Paflions engage us, to oppofe irregular affections, to reftore the Integrity of \he 
Heart, and to rule the Courfe of our Life. But here we chiefly aim at giving Rules to the Mind, 
and finding out the Caufesof our Errours, in reference to Truth-, fo that wef hall not proceed far- 
ther in thofe Matters that relate to the Love of true Good. We are tending to the Inftruction of 
v the Mind, and only take the Heart in the way, in as much as the Heart is its Mafter. We fearch 

into Truth it felf, without a fpecial Refpeft to our felves-, and we confider its Relation with us 
only becaufe that Relation is the Spring of Self-love's diiguifing and concealing it from us : for 
we judge of all things by our Paflions, whence it is that we miftake in all things, the Judgments 
of Paflions never agreeing with the Judgments of Truth. 

* Amor ficut nee Odium, ventatis Judi- J T J S wh f $U*| V" ^^ Words , of 

cum nefcit. Vts Judicium Ventatis audire ? J Be ™<"~d * Either Love nor Hatred know bozo 

Joan.^0. Sicut audio, fie judico: non ficut odi, non *° make t a >**"» f'ft? t0 ?™f WtU yo* 

ficut amo, non ficut timeo. Eli Judicium h / ar f true Judgment i As I hear ,1 judge, fays our 

Joan. 19 .7.M utUlud, Nos Legem Habemus, & \ord-, be Jays not as I bate, as 1 love or as If ear. 

fecundum legem noftram debet mori. Eft ? en M h f e « >&*'*' of Hatred: We have a 

Joan. ii. & Timor n, ut illud\ Si dimittimus eum J? w » $ the l™** and %**** \™ h <: ™&t to 

{s. fie, venient Romani, & tollent noltrum lo- £t **?' £ 3**&™* ft'' If we , le 1 t , him a " 

cum & gentem. Judicium verUmoris, ut lo " e ' fi the ^rfees, the Romans mail come, 

2 Sam.i8. David de filio parncida, Parcite, inauit, pu- and Seaway oui .Place :and .Nation. Hereanotber 

5 ero Abfalom. & Bern, degrad. bumilitatis. f^J't ° fD ^ 4^ ° fhs Fmade 

6 oon, Spare the young Man Abfalom. 

Our Love, Hatred, and Fear caufe us to make falfe Judgments only. Nothing but the pure 
Light of Truth can illuminate our Mind ; nothing but the diftinct Voice of our common Mafter 
can caufe us to make true Judgments, provided we only judge of what he fays, and as he fays, in 
Imitation only of our Lord, as I bear I judge : But let's fee how it is that our Paflions feduce us, 
that we may the eafier refill them. 

The Paflions are fo nearly related to the Senfes, that, remembring what hath been faid in the 
fir ft Book, it will not be difficult to explain, how they lead us into ErroUr ; becaufe the general 
Caufes of the Errours of the Paflions are altogether like to thofe of the Errours of the Senfes. 

The raoft general Caufe of the Errours of the Senfes, is, as we there have fhewn, our attributing 
to external Objects, or to the Body, the proper Senfations of our Soul, annexing Colours to the 
Superficies of Bodies, difFufing Light, Sounds and Odours in the Air, and fixing Pain and Titil- 
lation to thofe Parts of our. Body that receive fome Changes by the Motion of other contiguous 
Bodies. 

Almoff the fame thing may be faid of the Paflions : we too rafhly afcribe to the Objects, that 
canfe, or feem to caufe, them, all the Diipofitions of our Heart, our Goodnefs, Meeknels, Malice, 
Sowrenefs, and all the other Qualities of our Mind. The Object that begets fome Paflion in us, 
feemes afrer a fort to contain in it felf the Paflion produced in us, when we confider it, as fenfible 
things feem to contain in themfelves the Senfations, which their Prefence excites in us. When we 
love any Perfon, we are naturally inclin'd to believe that he loves us, and can hardly imagine that 
he defigns to hurt us, or to oppofe our Defires. But if Hatred iucceed in the place of Love, we 
cannot Perfuade our felves that he has any Affect ion for us -, we interpret all he does in the worft 
Senfe, we are always diftruftful and upon our Guard, though he thinks not upon us, or perhaps 
intended to doe us Service. In fhort, we unjuftly attribute to the Perfon that ftirs up a paflion in 
us, all the Difpofitions of our Heart, and with as much Imprudence, as we afcribe to the Objects 
of the Senfes, all the Qualities of our Mind. 

Moreover by the fame Realbn that we believe, other Men receive the lame Senfations from the 
fame Objects as we do ; we think they are agitated with the fame Paflions, for the fame Subjects 
if they are in a State of being fufceptible of them. We fuppofe them to love and defire the fame 
things as we our felves do, whence proceed fecret Jealoufies and Hatreds, if thedefired Good can- 
not be enjoyed entire by feveral^ for the contrary happens in Goods that can be pofTefTed without 
Divifion by feveral Perfons, as Science, Vertue, the Sovereign Good, and the like. We alfo fup- 
pofe that they hate, fear or fly from the fame things that we do^ whence proceed fecret Plots 
or publick Affociations, according to the nature arid Irate of the thing hated, by which means we 
hope to rid our felves of our Miieries. 

We therefore afcribe to the Objects of our Paflions the Commotions they produce in us, think- 
ing that all other Men, and even fometimes Bealts, are agitated as we are ; and befides judge yet 
more rafhly, the Caufe of our Paflions, which is often but imaginary, is really in fome Object . 

When we have a paflionate Love for any Body, his Grimace and Faces are charming, his Ug- 
J'ujeis is not diftaftfu), his ill-compofed Motions andGeftures are regular, or at leaft natural. If 
he never fpeak, he is wife-, if he be a great Talker, he is witty > if he fpeak upon all adventures, 

he's 



€hap, VI. The Search after Truth. f f 

hes Univerfal ; if he continually interrupt others, it is becaufe he's full of Fire, of Life, and 
Spirit h if he pretend to top dnd fway every where, 'tis becaufe he deferves it. Thus can Paffion 
cover or diffemble the Imperfections of Friends, and advantagioully fet off their molt iiiconfider- 
able Qualities. i .. 

But when that Friendfhip, which only proceeds as other Paffions do, from the Agitation of the 
Blood and Animal Spirits, comes to cool, through want of Heat and Spirits fit to nourifh it-,, when 
Intereit or fome falie Relation alters the Difpofition of the Brain •, then' Hatred fucceeding Love, 
is lure ro reprefent to us in that Object of our Paffion all the Delects that are capable of ltirring 
up our juft Averiion. We perceive in him Qualities quite, contrary, to thofe we admired befpre : 
Vve are afham'd of having lov'd him •, and the ruling Paffion never fails to juftifie it felf, and to 
ridicule that which it has follow'd. i : ., . . . • 

The Power and Injuftice of Paffions are not included within fuch narrow Limits as thofe we 
have defcribed, but extend infinitely farther h not only difguifing their principal Object, but alio 
whatever has any reference to it. They make us love not only the Qualities of our Friends, but 
alfo raoft part of thofe of the Friends to our Friends. And in thofe who are endued with any 
strength and extent of Imagination, the Paffions have fo vaft a reach and out let, that it is not 
poffible to determine their Limits- ... 

Thofe Things I have mention'd, are fuch general and fruitful Principles of Errour, Prejudice, and 
Injuftice, that it is impoffible to obferve all the Confequences of them: Molt of the Truths, or 
rather Errours, entertained in fome Places, Times, Commonalties, and Families, proceed from 
thence. What is followed in Spain, is rejected in trance-, what is true at Parts, is falfe at Uomej 
what is certain amongft the Dominicans, is uncertain amongft the Yranafcans ; and what appeals 
undoubted to the Black Fryars, feems an Errour to the White The Dominicans believe themfelves 
obliged to flick to Sr. Thomas. Why ? Becaufe that Doctor was one of their Order ; Whereas the 
t'rancifcans follow the Opinion of Scotits, becaufe he was a Black Fryar. 

There are likewife Truths and Errours proper to certain Times. _ The Earth turned two thovr- 
land Years ago •, then it remain'd unmovable till our Days, wherein it has began to turn again. 
Ariflvtle was formerly burnt, and a Provincial Council, approved by the Pope, molt wifely for- 
bad' his Phyficks to be taught: He was admired ever fince, and falls now again into Contempt; 
Opinions that are now publickly received in the Schools, were formerly rejected as Herefies, and 
their Affertors excommunicated by the Bifhops -, becaufe Paffions ltirring up Factions, Factions 
eftablifh thofe forts of Truths or Errours, that are as inconfiftent as the Principle they proceed 
from. Men may indeed be indifferent as to the Unmovablenefs of the Earth, * or the EiTence of V Condi 
Bodies, confider'd in themfelves ; but they are no longer fo, when they look on thofe Opinions as Avgl. per 
defended by their Adverfaries. Thus Hatred, kept up by a confuted fenfe of Piety, breeds an in- s J' e!r "^' 
difcreet Zeal, that kindles by degrees, and at laft produces fuch Events, as are not fo furprizing "' ia 7 ' 
to all. the World, till a great while after their arrival. 

We can hardly imagine that Paffions fhould reach fo far, becaufe we know not that their" Im- 
petuofity extends to whatever may latisfie them. Perhaps Hainan would have done no harm to 
the Jewijh People -, but becaufe Mordecai, a Jew\ forbore to falute him, he on a fudden defign'd. 
the deftroying of the whole Nation, that his Revenge might be the more fplendid. 

Two Men fue each other about a Piece of Land ; they ought only to produce in Court their 
Titles to it, and to fay nothing but what relates to the Cafe, or to fet it off fair. However, they 
f eldom fail to flander one another, to contradict each other in every thing, to raife trifling Con- 
tentions and Accufations, and to intricate the Suit with an infinity of AccelTary Circumftances, 
which confound the Principal. In fhort, the Paffions reach as far as the fight of the Mind does, 
in thofe that are affected by them. I would fay, there is nothing to which we may fuppofe their 
Object to be related, but their Motion will extend to it ; which is done after the following 
manner. 

The Tracks of the Obje£ts are fo connected to each other in the Brain, that it is impoffible the 
Courfe of the Spirits fhould violently move any one of them, without railing feveral others at 
the fame time. The principal Idea of the Thing perceiv'd, is therefore necelTarily accompanied 
with a vaft number of acceuary Ideas, which increafe more and more, as the Impreffion of the 
Animal Spirits is more violent. Now that Impreffion cannot but be very violent in the Paffions, 
becaufe they continually hurry into the Brain abundance of fuch Spirits as are fit to preferve the 
Traces of the Ideas which reprefent their Object. So that the Motion of Love or Hatred extends 
not only to the Chief Obje£t of either Paffion, but alfo to all the Things that are found any ways 
relating to it -,- becaufe the Motion of the Soul in the Paffion follows the Perception of the Mind, 
as the Motion of the Animal Spirits in the Brain follows the Traces of the Brain, as well thofe 
that excire the principal Idea of the Paffion's Obje£t, as thofe that are related to it. 

And therefore we muft not be' furprized if Men carry their Hatred or Love to fuch a heighth, 
and commit fuch ftrange and capricious A£tions. Every one of thofe Effects has its proper Caufe, 
though unknown to us -, becaufe their acceffary Ideas being not always like to ours , we cannot 
rightly judge of them : So that Men act always by fome particular Reafon, even in thofe Actions 
that appear molt extravagant to us. 



CHAP, 



*8 F. Malebranche Concerning BookV 



CHAP. VII. 

Of the Taffions in particular : And frfi, Of Admiration, and its ill EjfeSisi 

WHatever I have faid hitherto of the Paflions is general, yet 'tis no hard matter to draw par- 
ticular Inferences from it : If one do but reflect: upon what occurs in his own Breaft, and 
upon the Anions of others, he will difcover at one View, a greater number of thofe Truths, than 
can be explain'd in a confiderable time. However, there are fo few who think of retiring into 
themfelves, and make any Attempt to that purpofe, that, to quicken them, and raife their At- 
tention, it will not be amifs fomewhat.to defcend into Particulars. 

It feems, when we handle or ftrike our felves, that we are almoft infenfible ; whereas if We be 
but never fo little touched by others, we receive fuch lively Senfations as awaken our Attention. 
In a word, as it never comes into our Mind to tickle our lelves -, and if it did, perhaps the At- 
tempt would be unfuccefsful : So, almoft for the fame Reafon, the Soul cares not to feel and found 
her felf, isprefently diigufted at that fort of Exercife, and commonly is incapable of feeling or 
knowing all the Parts that belong to her, till touch'd and made fenfible to her by others : So that 
it will be necelfary, for the facilitating fome People in acquiring the Knowledge of themfelves, 
to mention fome of the particular Effects of the Paffions, to teach them,, by touching them, of 
what Make and ConftitutiOn their Soul is of 

.In the mean while, thofe that (hall read the following Thoughts, mull be forewarn'd, that they 
will not always be touched to the Quick, nor be a Ware that they are fubjett to the Paflions and 
Efrours of which I (hall fpeak ^ becaufe particular Paflions are not always the fame in all Men. 

All Men indeed have the fame natural Inclinations, which referr not to the Body -, and likewife 
all thofe that relate to it, when 'tis in a very good Conftitution : But its various Tempers and 
frequent Alterations, produce an infinite Variety in particular Paflions : To which diverfity of 
Conftitutions, if that variety of Objects be added, which caufe very different Impreflions upon 
thofe who follow not the fame Employments and manner of Life, it will plainly appear', that fuch 
a Perfon, who is lively touched by fome Things in one Place of his Soul, may be abfolutely in- 
fenfible as to many others. \ fo that we mould commonly miftake, mould we always judge of the 
Commotions of others by what we feel in our felves. 

I am not afraid of being deceiy'd, when I affert, That all Men would be happy •, for I fully and 
certainly know, that Qhinefe and Tartars, Angels and Devils, in a word, all Spirits whatfoever, 
have an Inclination for Felicity : Nay, I know that God mall never produce any Spirit without 
that Defire. I never faw either Cbinefe or Tartar • fo that I never learn'd it from Experience, 
nor yet from my inward Cohfcioufnefs, which only teaches me that I would my felf be happy. 
God alone can inwardly convince me, that all other Men, Angels, and Devils, defire Happinefs $ 
and he only can affure me, that he will never create a Spirit that mall not care for Felicity : For 
who.elfe can pofitively affure me of what he does, and even thinks ? And as he cannot deceive me, 
fo I may fafely relie on what I learn from him : And, therefore I am certain that all Men would 
be happy, becaufe that Inclination is natural, and independent on the Body. 

It goes quite otherwife with particular Paflions : For, becaufe I love Mufick, Dancing, Hunting, 
Sweet-meats, high-feafon'd Dimes, &c. I cannot certainly conclude that other Men have the fame 
Paflions. Pleafure is doubtlefs fweet and grateful to Men 5 but all find it not in the fame Things. 
The Love of Pleafure is a Natural Inclination, not depending upon the Body, and therefore general 
to all Men : But the Love of Mufick, Hunting, or Dancing,, is not general, becaufe the Diipofiti- 
on of the Body from which it proceeds being different in feveral Perfons, the Paflions they pro- 
duce are not always the fame. 

General Paflions, as Defire, Joy, and Sorrow, are the Mean betwixt natural Inclinations and par- 
ticular Paflions. They are general, as well as Inclinations j but they are not always of the fame 
ftrength ^ becaufe the Caufe which produces and feeds them is not always equally active. There 
is an infinite Variety in the Degrees of Agitation of the Animal Spirits, in their Plenty and Scar- 
city, in their Solidity and Finenefs, and in the Relation betwixt the Fibres of the Brain and thofe 
Spirits. 

And therefore it often happens, that we touch not Men in any part of their Soul, when we 
treat of particular Paflions ; but if they chance to be touched, they are violently moved. On the 
contrary, the mentioning of general Paflions and Inclinations never fail to affect us, but fo weakly 
and faintly, that we are fcarce fenfible of it. I mention this, left any mould judge of what I fay by 
his own Commotions, that he either has, or fhall receive from my Difcourfe j but rather that he 
mould judge of it by considering the Nature of the Paflions I fpeak of. 

Should we purpofe to handle all the particular Paffions, and diftinguifh them by the Objects that 
raife them, it is plain, the Task would be endlefs,and we mould only repeat the fame thing: The 
former, becaufe the Objects of the Paflions are infinite •, the latter, becaufe we fhould be conftant- 
ly engaged in the fame Subject. The particular Paflions for Poetry, Hiftory, Mathematicks, Hunt- 
ing, Dancing, are but one general Paflion : For, for example, the Paflions of Defire or Joy for 
whatever pi eafes, are not different Paflions, though delightful Objects in particular differ much. 

And therefore the Number of Paffions mult not be multiplied by the Number of Objects, which 

are 



Chap. VII. % The Search after Truth, { g 

are infinite ; but only by the principal Relations they may have to us : And fo it will appear, as 
we mail explain it hereafter, that Love and Hatred are the Mother-Paffions, which produce no 
other general Paffions, befides Defire, Joy, and Sorrow : that the particular Paffions are made up 
only of thole Three primitive, and more or lefs compounded, according to the number of acceffu- 
ry Ideas, that attend the principal Idea of the Good or Evil, which has rais'd them,- or as the 
Good and Evil are more or lefs circumftanciated with reference to us. 

If we remember what has been laid of the Connection of Ideas, and that in all great Paffions 
the Animal Spirits being extreamly agitated, ftir up in the Brain all the Traces any ways related 
to the moving Object * we fhall own, that there is an infinite Variety of different Paffions, which 
have no particular Names, and Cannot be explain d but by faying they are inexplicable. ' 

If the primitive Paffions, of the Complication of which others are made up, were not iu- 
fceptible of more or lefs, it would not be difficult to determine the Number of all the Paffions - 
but that number of complicated Paffions mult needs be infinite, becaufe one and the fame Paffiorl 
having infinite Degrees, may by its Conjunction with others be infinitely complicated ; io that 
there were perhaps never two Men affected with the fame Paffion, if by that Name be under- 
Hood an even Mixture and Likenels of all the Motions and Senlations that are occafionally rais'd 
in us upon the prefence of fome Object. 

But as more or lefs do not alter the Species^ fo it may be faid, that the Number of Paffions is 
not infinite ; becaufe the Circumftances that attend Good or Evil, which excite the Paffions, are 
not innumerable. But let us explain our Paffions in particular. 

When we fee any thing the firft time, or when having feen it feveral times accompanied with 
fome Circumftances, we fee it again attended with others, we- are furprized, and admire it. Thus 
a new Idea, or a new Connection of old Ideas, raifes in us an Imperfect Paffion, which is the firft 
of all, and nam'd Admiration. I call it vnperfett, becaufe 'tis not excited either by the Idea or 
S jnfe of Good : The Brain being then ftruck in fome unufual Places, or in a new manner, the Soul 
is ieniibly moved, and therefore mult needs ftrongly apply her felf to what is new in that Object • 
for the fame Reafon that a bare Tickling the Soale of the Feet raifes a very lively and moving 
Senfation in the Soul, rather by the Novelty than by the Strength of the Impreffion. 

There are other Reafons of the Application of the Soul to new Things-, but I have explained 
them, where I fpeak of the Natural Inclinations. Here we confider the Soul only as related to 
the Body, in which reipect the Commotion of the Spirits is the natural Caufe of her Application 
to new Things. 

In Admiration, ftrictly taken, we confider things only as they are in themfelves, or as they ap- 
pear, and look not on them as related to us, or as good or bad. Hence it comes, that the Spirits 
difperfe not through the Mufcles to give the Body the Difpofition that is required for perfuing 
Good, or fhunning Evil •, and ihake not the Nerves that go to the Heart and other Vifcera, to ha- 
Iten or retard the Fermentation or Motion of the Blood, as it happens in other Paffions. All the 
Spirits go the Brain, to print a lively and diftinct Image of the furprizing Object, that the Soul 
may confider and know it again -, whilft the reft of the Body remains in the lame pofture, and as 
immovable : For as there is no Commotion in the Soul, fo there is no Motion in the Body. 

When the admired Things appear great, Admiration is always follow'd with Efteem, and fome- 
times with Veneration j whereas it is always accompanied with Contempt, and fbmetimes with 
Difdain, when they appear little. 

■ The Idea of Grandeur caufes a great Motion of the Spirits in the Brain, and the Tracks that 
reprefent it are kept very long : And likewife a great Motion of the Spirits raifes in the Soul an 
Idea of Greatnefs, and powerfully fixes rhe Mind on the Confideration of that Idea. 

On the contrary, the Idea of Littlenefs produces but an inconfiderable Motion of Spirits in the 
Brain, and the Traces reprefenting it are fbon blotted out : And likewife a fmall Motion of Spi- 
rits raifes in the Soul an Idea of Meannefs, and ftays the Mind but little on the Confideration of 
that Idea. Thofe things deferve to be taken notice of. 

When we confider our felves, or fomething united to us, our Admiration is always accompa- 
nied with fome moving Paffion, which however only agitates the Soul and the Spirits, that go to 
the Heart -, becaufe there being no Good to feek, nor Evil to avoid, the Spirits difperfe not them- 
felves through the Mufcles, to difpofe the Body to fome Action. 

The Contemplation of the Perfection of our Being, or of fomething belonging to it, naturally 
produces Pride, or Self efteem, Contempt of others, Joy, and fome other Paffions. The Contem- 
plation of our oWn Grandeur, caufes Haughtinefs ; that of our Strength, Valour, or Boldnels 5 
and that of any other Advantage naturally raifes fome other Paffion, which is ftill a kind of Pride. 

On the contrary, the Confideration of fome Imperfection of our Being, or of fomething be* 
longing to it, naturally produces Humility, Contempt of our felves, Reverence for others, Sor- 
row, and fome other Paffions. The fight of our Littlenefs caufes Pufilanimity • that of our 
Weaknefs, Timidity ■„ and that of any Difadvantage whatfoever, naturally raifes fome other Pa£ 
lion, which is ftill a kind of Humility. But neither that Humility, nor that Pride, are properly 
Vermes or Vices h being only Paffions or involuntary Commotions, which yet are very ufeful to 
Civil Society, and even in fome Cafes abfolutely neceffary for the prefervation of the Life or 
Goods of thofe that are actuated by them; 

"Tis neceflary, for inftance, to be humble and timorous, and even outwardly to teftifie that Di- 
fpofition of the Mind, by a modeft Look, and refpectful or timorous Deportment, when we are in 
tlie Pretence of a Perfon of Qualm:, or one that is proud and powerful ; It king almoft ever profi- 
table 



so F. MALEBRANCHte Concerning Book V. 

table for the Good of the Body, that the Imagination fhould ftoop before fenfible Grandeur, and 
give it outward Marks of its inward SubmifliOn and Veneration. But this is done naturally and 
machinally,, without the Confent of the Will, and fqmetimes notwithftanding its Oppofition. 
Even fuch Beafls, as Dogs, which Hand in need of prevailing upon thofe with whom they live, 
have ordinarily their Bodies fo difpofed, that it machinally takes the Pofture that is molt iuitable, 
. in reference to thole that are about them : For that is absolutely neceflary to their Preferva'tion; 
And if Birds, and Ib'me other Creatures, want fuch a Difpofition, 'tis becaufe they need not af- 
iwage the Fury of thofe whom they can efcape by Flight, or whofe Help is not neceiTary for the 
Prefervation of their Life. 

It can never be too much obferv'd, that all the Paflions which are raifed in us, at the fight of 
fomething external, machinally fpread on the Face thofe Looks that are fit and fuited to our pre- 
sent State • that is, thofe that are apt by their Impreflion machinally to difpofe the Spe&ators to 
fuch Paffions and Motions as are ufeful tor the Good of Civil Society. Admiration it felf, when 
produced in us by the Perception of fomething external, which others can confider as well as we, 
puts the Face in fuch a Shape as is fit to ftrike others with a machinal Impreflion of Admiration ; 
and which acls fo regularly on the Brain, that the Spirits contain'd in it are driven to the Mufcles 
t of the Face, to fafhion it into a Look altogether like our own. 

This Communication of the Paflions of the Soul and the Animal Spirits, to unite Men toge- 
ther, in reference to Good and Evil, and to make them altogether like, not only by the Difpofition 
of their Mind, but alio by the Pofture of their Body, is fomuch the greater and more obfervable, 
as the Pailions are more violent ^ by realbn that the Animal Spirits are then agitated with more 
ftrength. And this mull needs be fo, becaufe the Good and Evil being then greater, or more 
Drefent, requires a greater Application, and a ftricl er AfTociation of Men to feek or avoid them, 
feut when the Paflions are moderate, as Admiration ufually is, their Communication is infenfible -, 
and they do not alter the Countenance, by which the Communication ufes to be wrought: For 
there being no urgent Occafion, it would be needlefs to put a Force on the Imagination of others, 
or to take them off from their Bufinefs, to which their Application is perhaps more requifite, 
than to the looking on the Caufls of thofe Paflions. 

There is nothing more wonderful, than that Oeconomy of the Paflions and Difbofitions of the 
Body, in refersnce to the furrounding Objects. All our machinal Actions are moft becoming the 
Wifdom of our Maker. God has made us fufceptible of all thofe Paflions chiefly to unite us with 
all fenfible Things, for the Preiervation of Society, and of our corporeal Being ; and hisDefign is 
fo exacfly perform'd by the Conflruftion of his Work, that we cannot but admire his Wifdom in 
the Contrivance of the Springs and Texture of it. 

However, our Paflions, and all thofe imperceptible Bands which tie us to the furrounding Ob- 
jects, often prove, by our own Fault, fruitful Caufes of Errours and Diforders. For we make 
not of our Paffions the Ufe we ought to do ^ we allow them every thing, and know not fo much 
as the Bounds we ought to prefcribe to their Power ; fo that the weakeft and leaft moving Paf- 
fions, as Admiration for inftance, have ftrength enough to draw us into Errour. Some Examples 
whereof are thefe. 

When Men, and efpecially thofe that are endu'd with a lively Imagination, contemplate the 
beft fide of themfelves, they find for the moft part a great deal of Self-complacency and Satisfa- 
ction ^ and their internal Satisfaction is increafed by the Companion they make betwixt them- 
felves and others that are not fo airy and fpirituous : Befides that they have many Admirers, and 
that few of their Oppofers gain Succefs and Applaufe •, for Reafbn is feldom or never applauded, 
in oppofition to a ftrong and lively Imagination. In fhort, the Face of their Hearers takes on fuch 
fubmiflive and dutiful Looks, and expreffes, at every new Word they fay, fuch lively Strokes of 
Admiration, '.that they admire themfelves too •, and that their Imagination , pufFt up with their 
pretended Advantages, fills them with an extraordinary Satisfaction of themfelves. And fince we 
cannot fee Men in the heighth of a Paflion, without receiving feme impreflion from it, and adopt- 
ing, as I may fay,' their Sentiments -, how fhould it be poflible that thofe who are furrounded 
with a Throng of Admirers, fhould give no accefs to a Paflion that is fo flattering and fo grateful 
to Self-love ? 

Now that high Efteem which Perfons of a ftrong and lively Imagination have of themfelves 
and their good Qualities, puffs them up with Pride, and gives them a Magifterial and Decifive 
Comportment •, they liften to others, but with Contempt -, they anfwer, but with Jeering •, they 
think, but with reference to themfelves ; and as they look on the Attention of the Mind, that is 
fo requifite for the difcovery of Truth, as a Slavery •, fo they are altogether indocible. Pride, 
Ignorance, and Blindnefs, go hand in hand. The bold, or rather vain-glorious Wits, will not be 
the Difciples of Truth, and never retire into themfelves, unlefs it be to contemplate and admire 
their fuppofed Perfections ^ fo that he who refills the Proud, fhines in the middle of their Dark- 
neis, without diflipating it. 

There is, on the contrary, a certain Difpofition of the Blood and Animal Spirits, that occafi- 
ons too mean Thoughts of our felves. The Scarcity, the Dulnefs, and Finenefs of the Animal 
Spirits, join'd to the Courfnefs of the Fibres of the Brain, cauie the Imagination to be weak 
and languiihing : And the Contemplation, or rather the confufed Senfe of that Faintnefs of Ima- 
gination, is what breeds in us a vicious Humility, which we may call Meannefs of Spirit. 

All Men are fufceptible of the Truth, but all apply not themfelves to him who alone is able 
to teach it. The Proud make their Addrefs and liften but to themfelves =, and the Dif fpirited 

make 



feliiijp. VIl; I he Scorch aficr Truth. i l 

make their Application to the Proud, and fubmit themfelves to their Determinations'. Both the 
one and the other give ear to bare Men. Proud Minds follow the Fermentation of their own 
"Blood, that is, their own Imagination-, and the Low-fpirited are over-fwuy'd by the over-ruling 
Countenance of the Proud, and lo are' both fubjected to Vanity and Lies. The Proud is like a 
rich and powerful Man, who has a great Retinue, who meafures his own Grearnefs by the num- 
ber or his Attendants, and his Strength by that ot the Horfes ol his Coach: whereas the Low-fpi- 
rited is like a poor, weak, and languiihing Wretch, who though he have the lame Spirit and Prin- 
ciples, yet becaufe he is Matter Ot Nothing, imagines he is almolt Nothing himielf However, 
our Retinue is not our felf, and fo far is the plenty of the Blood and Animal Spirits, the vigour 
and impctuouihefs of the Imagination, from leading us to the Truth, that on the contrary nothing 
carries us fo rar from it-, whereas 'tis the Dull, if 1 may fo call them, that is, the cool and fedate 
Minds, that are the fitteit for the Difcovery of folid and hidden Truths. Their Paflions being filent 
and quiet, they may liften in the Recefs of their Reafon to the Truth that teaches them •, but moll 
unhappily they mind not its Words, becaufe it fpeaks low, without a forcible found, and that no- 
thing wakens them but a mighty Noiie. Nothing convinces them but what glitters to appear- 
ance, and is judg'd great and magnificent by the Senfes ; they love to be dazled with Brightnefs, 
and rather chufe to hear thole Philofophers, who tell them their Stories and Dreams, and alfert, 
as the ralfe Prophets of former times, that the Truth has ipoken to them (though it has not) than 
to liifen to Truth it felf. For they have already fuffef d four thoufand Years, and that without op- 
pofition, humane Pride to entertain them with Lies, which they reverence and keep to, as to Ho- 
ly and Divine Traditions. It feems the God of Truth is wholly gone from them j they think on 
him and confult him no more, they meditate no more, and cover their neglect and lazinefs, with 
the deluiive pretences of a facred Humility. 

'lis true, that we cannot of our felves difcover the Truth ^ but we can doe it at all times with 
the alhitance of him that enlightens us, and can never doe it with that of : all the Men in the 
World. Thofe that know it belt cannot fhew it to us, unlefs we ask it of him, to whom they 
have made their Application; and unlets he be pleafed to anfwer our Queftions, that is, our At- 
tention, as he has clone theirs. We are not therefore to believe, becaufe Men fay this or that, for 
every Man is a Liar -, but becaufe he that cannot deceive fpeaks to us, and we mull perpetually 
interrogate him for the folution of our Difficuties. We ought not to truft to them that fpeak 
only to the Ears ; inftruct but the Body, or at the utmoffc move but the Imagination. But we 
ought attentively to liften unto, and faithfully believe him who fpeaks to the Mind, informs the 
Reaibn, and piercing into the moll abftrufe RecefTes of the inward Man, is able to enlighten and 
itrengihen him, againft the outward and fenlible Man, that continually labours to feduce and cor- 
rupt him. I often repeat thefe things, becaufe I believe them moll worthy of a ferious Confidera- 
tion. God alOne is to be honour'd, becaufe he only can endue us with Knowledge, as 'tis he a- 
lone that can fill us with Pleafure. 

There is fometimes in the animal Spirits, and the reft of the Body, a Difpofition that provokes 
to i-iunting, Dancing, Running, and other Corporeal Exercifes, wherein the Force and Activity 
of the Body are molt confpicuous : Which Difpofition is very ordinary to young Men, efpecially 
before their Body be in a State of Confiftency. Children cannot Hay in one place, and will al- 
ways be moving, if they follow their humour. For whereas all their Mufcles are not yet ilrength- 
ened, nor perfectly finilht •, therefore God, who as the Author of Nature, regulates the Pleafures 
ot the Soul, with reference to, the Good of the Body, cauies them to be delighted with fuch 
Exercifes as may invigorate it. Thus whillt the Flefh and Fibres of their Nerves are yet fofr, 
the Channels through which the animal Spirits mull necelTarily How, to produce all forts of Mo- 
tion, are wore, and kept open, Flumours have no time to fettle, and all Obltrucvtions and Caufes 
of Corruption are removed. 

The confuted Senfation that young Men have of that Difpofition of their Body, makes them 
pleafed with the thoughts of their Strength and Dexterity. They "admire themfelves when they 
know how to meafure their Motions, and to make extraordinary ones, and are ambitious of be- 
ing in the prefence of Spectators and Admirers. Thus they llrengthen by degrees their Inclina- 
tion to Corporeal- Exercifes," which is one of the principal Caufes of Ignorance and Brutifhnels. 
For hefides the time that is by that meanes lavifht away, the little ufe they make of their Under- 
Handing, caufes the chief part of the Brain, in whofe tra&ablenefs the force and quicknefs of the 
Mind elpecially eonfiits, to become altogether inflexible, and the animal Spirits, through difufe, 
are difficultly difpers'd in the Brain, in a manner requilite to think of what they pleafe. *■ 

This incapacitates moft part of the Nobility and Gentry, efpecially fuch as follow the War, to 
apply themfelves to any thing. They anfwer with a Word and a Blow, as the Proverb lays -, for 
if you fpeak any thing that they, don't willingly hear, inltead of thinking upon a fuitable Reply, 
their Animal Spirits infenfibly flow into the Mufcles that raife the Arm, and make them anfwer 
without Confideration, with a Blow, or a Threatning Gefture^ becaufe their Spirits, agitated by 
the Words thev hear, are conveyed to fuch Places, as are moft open through Habit and Exercife. 
The fenfe of their Corporeal Strength confirms them in thofe intuiting Manners h and the fubmif- 
five Afpect of their Hearers puffs 'em up with fuch an abfurd Confidence, as makes them believe 
they have laid very fine things, when they have but haughtily and brutifhly uttered Impertinen- 
cies ^ being iiater'd bv the Fear and Caution of the Standers by. 

It is noc pofhble to have applied our felves to any Study, or to make actual profeihon of any. 
Science, to be either Author or Doctor, without being confeious of it. But that very Confcioul- 

F nefs 



F. Malebranche. Concerning Book 



■%-\ /^ MaiPrranch f.. C oncer nina Bonk V 



nefs naturally produces infome Menfucha vaft Number of Imperfections, that it would be better 
with them if they wanted thole Honourable Qualities. As they look upon them as their moft con- 
filerable Perfections, fo they are extreamly pleafed with that Contemplation •, they let them before 
the Eyes of others With all the poffible Dexterity, and conceive they have thereby right to judge of 
every thing without Examination. If any be fo couragious as to contradict them, they at firit en- 
deavour skillfully, and with a fweet and obliging Countenance, to infinuate what they are, and 
what right they have to determine of fuch Matters : And if any ftill prefume to oppofe them; 
and that they be at a lofs for an Anfwer, they do not ftick openly to declare what they think of 
themfelves and of their Adverfaries. 

Every inward Senfe of any Qualification we enjoy, naturally fwells up the Courage. A Troop- 
er well mounted and accoutred, who neither wants Blood nor Spirits, is ready to undertake any 
thing ^ that Difpofition infpiring him with an undaunted Boldneis. So it goes with a Man of Let- 
ters ; when he fanfies himielf to be Learned^ and that the Haughtinefs of his Heart has corrupted 
his Mind, he becomes, if I may lb Ipeak, bold and fierce againft Truth. Sometimes he rafhly 
impungs it without knowing it, at other times he confciouily betrays it ; and relying upon his ima- 
ginary Learning, is always ready to affert, either the Affirmative or Negative, according as he is 
poifeiTed with a Spirit of Contradiction. 

It goes quite otherwife with thofe that make no Orientation of Learning : they are not pofitive -, 
neither do they fpeak, unlefs they have fomething to fay ; and it even often happens that they re- 
main filent when they fhould fpeak. They have neither that Fame, nor thole outward Charac- 
ters of Learning, which fpur Men on to fpeak without Knowledge, and fo may decently hold 
their Peace : but the Pretenders are afraid to make a flop, fince they are fenfible they lhall be de- 
fpis'd for their Silence, even when they have nothing to lay -, and that they are not always in dan- 
ger of falling into Contempt, though they fpeak but Impertinencies, provided they utter them 
with a Scientifick Confidence. 

What makes Men capable of thinking, enables them to know the Truth •, but neither Honours, 
Pviches, Univerfity-Degrees, nor Chimerical Erudition, makes them capable of thinking. It's their 
own Nature, for they are made to think, becaufe they are created lor the Truth. Even bodily 
Health qualifies them not for thinking well, but only is a lefs Hinderance than Sicknels. Our 
Body amlts us in fome manner in perceiving by Senfe, and imagining -, but not at all in con- 
ceiving. For though without its Help we cannot attentively meditate, nor oppofe the continual 
Impreffion of the Senies and Pafiions, which endeavour to perplex and obliterate our Ideas, be- 
eaule in this prefent State, we cannot overcome the Body, but by the Body ; yet 'tis plain that the 
Body cannot illuminate the Mind, nor produce in it the Light of Underftanding, fince every Idea 
that difcovers the Truth proceeds from Truth it felf. All that the Soul receives from the Bo- 
dy relates only to it, and when (he follows thofe Glimpfes, Ihe fees nothing but Phantafms and 
Dreams h that is to lay, Ihe fees not things as they are in themfelves, but only as they have rela- 
tion to her Body. 

As the Idea of our own Greatneis or Littlenefs is a frequent occafion of Errour, fo likewife the 
Ideas of outward things that have refFerence to us, make no leis dangerous an Impreffion. We 
have already obferv'd that the Idea of Greatneis is always attended with a great Motion of Spirits, 
and a great Motion of the Spirits is ever accompanied with the Idea of Greatnefs : and that on the 
contrary, that of Littlenefs is always followed with a fmall Motion of Spirits, which is in its turn 
accompanied with the Idea of Meannels. From that Principle 'tis eafy to infer, that fuch things 
as produce in us great Motions of Spirits, muft naturally appear greater, ftronger, and more real 
and perfect than others :, for in the word Greatneis I comprehend all thole Qualifications, and fuch 
like. So that fenfible Good muft needs leem to us more confiderable and lblid, than that which 
cannot be felt ; if we judge of it by the Motion of the Spirits, and not by the pure Idea of 
Truth. A great Houfe, a fumptuous Retinue, a fine Furniture, Offices, Honour, Riches, will then 
appear to us to have more greatnefs and reality in them than Juftice and other Vertues. 

When we compare Vertue to Riches by the pure Eyes of the Mind, we prefer Vertue : but if we 
make ufe of our Corporeal Eyes and Imagination, and judge of thofe things by the "Motion of the 
Spirits, which they raife in us, we lhall doubtlefs chule Riches rather than Vertue. 

'Tis from the lame Principle that we imagine that fpiritual arid infenfible things are almoft no- 
thing h that the Ideas of our Mind are lefs noble than the Objecfs they reprefent ; that there is 
lels reality and fubftance in the Air than inMetalls, and in Water than in Ice •, that thofe vaft Spa- 
ces that reach from the Earth to the Firmament, are empty, or that the Bodies that fill them have 
not lb much reality and folidity, as the Sun and Stars. In fhort, our reafoning upon that falfe Prin- 
ciple induces us into an infinite number of Errours, concerning the Nature and Perfection of eve-- 
ry thing. 

A great Motion of Spirits, and by confequence a ftrong Paflion, always attending the fenfible 
Idea of Grandeur, and a fmall Motion, and confequently a weak Paflion, ftill accompanying the 
■fenfible Idea of Meannefs -, we are very attentive to, and beftow a great deal of our time on the ftu- 
dy of fuch things as raife die fenfible Idea of Grandeur-, whereas we neglecl thofe which afford 
but the ienfible Idea of Meannels. Thofe great Bodies, for inftance, which riiake their Circumvo- 
tions over our Heads, have ever made a great Impreffion upon Men, who at firft ador'd them, .be- 
caufe of theit Light and Brightnefs, or fenfible Idea of Grandeur-, fome bolder Wits prefum'd to 
examine their Motions ; fo that the Stars have been in all Ages the Objecl, either of the Study, or of 
tile Veneration of the greatelt part of Mankind. It may even be laid, that the fear of their Phan-. 

taftick 



Chap. VII. "1 he Search after truth., i % 

taftick Influences, which Ml fright Aftrologers and Weak Perfons, is a fort of Adoration, paid bv 
% Bruin-lick Imagination, to the Idea of Greatnefs that reprefents Celeftial Bodies. 

But the Body of Man, on the contrary, that is infinitely more admirable, and deferves more our 
Application, than whatever we can know of Saturn, Jupiter, and other Planets, has remained a 
long time almoft unknown. The fenfible Idea of dhTected parts of Flelh, having nothing great, but 
being rather diftaftful and noifome^ it is but a few years fince Men of Parts have looked upon A- 
natomy, as a Science that deferved their ftudy. There have been Princes and Kings that hoafted 
of being Aftronomers ; the height and magnitude of the Stars feem'd to fuit their Dignity and 
Grandeur : but I know not of any that were ever ambitious of knowing Anatomy, and skilfully 
•difTecting a Heart, or a Brain. The fame may be faid of feveral other Sciences. 

Rare and extraordinary things incite in Mens Minds greater and more fenfible Motions, than 
fuch as are feen every day •, we admire them, and by a natural Confequence we fix on them an Idea 
of Greatnefs, that is followed withPaflions of Efteem and Reverence. This perverts theReafon 
of feveral Perfons, who are fo very refpe&ful and curious of all the Remains of Antiquity, and 
whatever comes from far,, or is rare and extraordinary, that they are as Slaves to them ; becaufe 
the Mind dares not fit and pronounce upon the Objects of its Veneration. 

I grant Truth is in no great danger, becaufe fome Men are taken up with the Medals, Arms and 
Habits of the Ancients, Or with the Drefs of the Chincfe and Savages. It is not altogether un- 
ferviceable, to know the Map of Ancient Rome, nor the ways from Tomquin to Nanquin, though 
it be more ufeful to us to know thofe from London to Oxford, or from Paris to St. Germain or 
Versailles. In ffiort, we cannot find fault with thofe that will enquire into the Hiftory of the 
Wars betwixt the Greeks and Perfians, betwixt the Tartars and Chincfe-, let them have for 
'l'bucydides, Xcnophon, or any other whatfoever, as much Inclinations as they pleafe. But we can- 
not fuffer that Admiration of Antiquity fhould lord it over Reafon ; that it fhould be forbidden 
to make ufe of our Underftanding in examining the Opinions of the Ancients, and that the Dis- 
covery and Demonftration of their Errouis fhould pafs for a rafh and prefumptuous Attempt. 

Truth is of all Times and Ages. If Arijlotle did difcover it, it may ftill be found out: his Opi- 
nions are to be proved by ftrong Reafons ; for if they were folid in his time, they will be fo in 
ours. 'Tis to deceive our felves, to pretend to demonftrate natural Truths by humane Authorities. 
It may perhaps be proved, that Arijlotle has had fuch and fuch Thoughts, upon fuch and fuch Sub- 
jects ; but 'tis a very ilender improvement of Reafon, to read Arijlotle, or any other Author, 
with great Diligence and Trouble, that we may hiftorically learn his Opinions, and teach them 
to others. 

We cannot without Indignation look on fome Univerfities that were eftablifhed for the Enquiry 
and Defence of Truth, and are now turned into particular Sefts, and boaft of ftudying and main- 
taining the Opinions of fome Men. We are ready to fall into Paffion at the reading of thofe 
Philofophers and Phyficians, who ftore their Books with fo many Quotations, that one would 
rather take them for Commentaries of the Civil and Cannon Law, than for Tra&s of Natural 
Philofophy and Phyfick. For who can fuffer that Reafon and Experience fhould be deferted, and 
the Fancies of Plato, Arijlotle, Epi. urus, or any other Philofopher, blindly followed. 

Such ftrange methods would perhaps ftrike us dumb with Amazement, though we were not 
hurt by them ; I mean, though thefe Gentlemen did not impung the Truth, which alone we think 
our felves obliged to efpoufe : But their admiring the Dreams of the Ancients infpires them with 
a blind Zeal againft Truths newly difcovered ; they cry them down without knowing them •, they 
oppofe them without underftanding them., and by the ftrength of their Imagination infufe their 
Sentiments into the Minds and Hearts of their Auditors and Admirers. 

As they judge of thofe new Difcoveries by the Efteem they have for their Authors, and that their 
Contemporaries which they have feen and convers'd with, have not that big and extraordinary 
Appearance, which the Imagination attributes to Ancient Authdte^ fo they have no Confideration 
For the Modern. For the Idea of the Men of our Age raifes nothing but Contempt, becaufe it is 
not attended with violent and furprizing Motions. 

Limners and Statuaries never reprefent Ancient Philofophers as other Men, but give them a 
big Head, and a broad and high Fore-head, and a long and venerable Beard. That's a good Ar- 
gument to prove that the Vulgar Sort has fome fuch Idea of them -, for Painters pifture things' as 
they reprefent them to themfelves,, and follow the Natural Motions of the Imagination -, and fo 
for the moft part we look on the Ancients as Uncommon Men. Whereas Imagination reprefenting 
Men of our Age like to thofe with whom we daily converce, and producing no extraordinary Mo- 
tion in the Spirits, raifes nothing in the Soul but Contempt and Indifferency towards them. 

I have feen Des-Crates, faid one of thofe learned Admirers of Antiquity, I have known him, 
and converfed with him feveral times t, he was an honeft Man, and no Fool, but had nothing ex^ 
traordinary. He had fotm'd a contemptible. Idea of the Cartejian Philofophy, becaufe he had con- 
verfed with the Author fome minutes," and had not obferved in him thofe great and extraordinary 
Looks that overfway the Imagination. If he were puzzled with fome Arguments of that Philo- 
fopher, he proudly faid, meaning it a fufficient Anfwer, That he had known him formerly. I 
could wifh thofe Gentlemen might fee Arijlotle otherwife than in Pi&ure, and converfe an hour 
with him, provided he fhould fpeak French, or Englijh, and not Greek, and not make himfelf known, 
before they haddeclafd their Opinion of him. 

Such things as bear the Charatter of Novelty, whether they be new in themfelves, or appear in 
a new Order or Situation, agitate us very much^ ftriking the Brain in places that are moft fen- 
fible, 



24 F. Malebranche Concerning Boo'kV.' 

fihle, becaufe lealt expdfed to the Courfe of the Spirits. Such things as bear a fenfible Mark of 
Greatneis, do alio ftrangely move us, becaufe they ltir up a great Motion of the Spirits. But 
iuch as at once come attended with Characters of Novelty and Greatneis, do not limply move us : 
they overthrow, ravifh, Itupifie us by their violent Commotions. 

for Inltance, Thole who fpeak nothing but Paradoxes attract the Admiration of weak Minds, 
becaufe what they fay has the Character of Novelty : thofe that fpeak by Sentences, and ule high 
and lofty Flights;, infpire Veneration, becaufe they feem to fay fomething great. But thofe that 
joyn Loftinefs to Novelty, and Greatneis to Rarity, never fail ofravifhing and itupirying the Vul- 
gar Sort, though they ihould fpeak but Impertinences ; for that pompous and itately Nonfence, 
infani fulgores, thoie falfe Declamatory Glitterings for the molt part daZlethe Eyes of infirm 
Minds, and make fuch a lively and furprizing Impreffion upon their Imagination, that they know 
not where they are, that they venerate the Power that blinds 'em, and cait'em down, and admire, 
as fhining Truths, confufed and unexpreffible Senfations. 



C H A P. VIII. 

A Continuation of the fame SttbjeB \ What good ZJfe can be made of Admi- 
ration^ and other Pajpons. 

AL L Paffions have two very confiderable Effects, for they apply the Mind, and win the Heart : 
by the former they may, by a due ufe, be made ferviceable to the Knowledge of Truth -, becaufe 
Application produces that light by which it is dilcovered : but the latter Effect is always diftdvan- 
tageous :, becaufe Paffions cannot win the Heart, but by corrupting the Reafon, and reprefenting 
things, not as they are in themfelves, or according to Truth, but as they are related to us. 

Admiration is, of all Paffions, that which lealt affects the Heart * becaufe 'tis the Sight of things 
confider'd as Good or Evil, that agitates us, and that the Confideration of their Greatneis or Small- 
neis, without any other Relation to us, makes but little Impreffion upon us: fo that the Admirati- 
on that attends the Knowledge of the Greatnefs or Littlenefs of new things, we confider, corrupts the 
Reafon much lefs than any other Paffion •, and can even be of great ufe for the Knowledge of Truth, 
provided we be very careful to hinder its being followed by other Paffions, as it happens for the 
molt part. 

In Admiration the Animal Spirits are ftrongly driven to thofe places of the Brain, that reprefent 
the hew Objeft as it is in it felf-, which print thereon Traces of it, diftintt and deep enough to be 
long continued, and confequently afford to the Mind a clear Idea, and eafie to be remembred •, and 
therefore it cannot be denied, but Admiration may be very ufeful to Sciences, fince it applies and en- 
lightens the Mind •, whereas other Paffions apply the Mind, but enlighten it not. They apply it, 
becaufe they raife the Animal Spirits, but enlighten it not, of enlighten it with falfe and deceiving 
Glimpfes, becaufe they drive thole Spirits in fuch a manner, as that they reprefent Objects, only 
as they are related to us, and not as they are in themfelves. 

There is nothing harder, than to apply our felves a confiderable time to any thing which we ad- 
mire not : becaufe the Vital Spirits are not then eafily carried to places fitted to reprefent them. In 
vain we are exhorted to be attentive-, we can have no Attention, or none fufficiently long, though 
we may have an abitra£ted, but not moving Perfuafion, That the thing deierves our Application. 
We mult needs deceive our Imagination to quicken our Spirits, and reprefent to our felves in a 
new Manner, the Subje£t on which we will meditate, that we may raife in us fome Motion of 
Admiration. 

We meet every day with Men that relifh not Study, and find nothing fo painful as the Ap- 
plication of Mind : They are convinced that they ought to Itudy certain Matters, and to doe their 
utmolt endeavours for it ^ but their endeavours are, for the molt part, vain-, their progrefs is incon- 
fiderable, and quickly follow'd by wearinefs. True it is that the Animal Spirits obey the order of 
the Will, and make us attentive, when we defire it, but when the Commanding Will is the 
Will qf mere Reafon, that is not kept up by ibme Paffion, it is fo weak and languifhing, that" 
our Ideas are like wandering Phantaims, that afford us but a tranfient glimpfe, and vanifh in a 
moment. Our Animal Spirits receive fo many private Orders from the Paffions, and are become 
by nature and habit id prone to perform them, that they are eafily turn'd from thofe new and 
rough ways, through which the Will endeavours to lead them. So that it is eipecially in fuch 
Giles, that we need a particular Grace to know the Truth, fince we cannot any confiderable time 
bear up the Mind againit the incumbent weight of the Body -, or if we can, yet we never doe all 
we are able. 

But when fome Motion of Admiration quickens us, the animal Spirits naturally run to the Tracks 
of the Object which have railed it, reprelent it clearly to the Mind, and produce in the Brain what- 
ever ts requir'd to Perfpicuity and Evidence, without putting the will to the trouble of managing 
the rebellious Spirits. Hence it comes that thole that are prone to Admiration, are fitter to itudy 
than others* are qiick and ingenious, and others ilow and dull. 

In the mean while, when Admiration grows to Jiich ah Excefs, as to produce Amazement and 
Stupefaction, or when it does not excite to rational Curioiity, it may prove of very ill Conlequenc^ 

becaule 



Chap. VIII. The Search after Tmth: 

becaufe the animal Spines are then taken up with representing the admired Object by pne of its 
Faces, without fo much as thinking on the others, which ought no lefs tbbe.Coriiider.ed. Thofe 




Mind. . , 

It is not enough that Admiration mould make us attentive, unlefs it makes us curious • neither 
is it luficient for the full knowledge of an Object, to confider one of its Faces, unlefs we be lb far 
jnquifitive, as to examine them all; that we may judge of it upon lure grounds. And therefore 
when Admiration moves us not to examine things with the utmoft Accuracy, but inftead of that 
flops our Enquiry, it is very unprofitable to the Knowledge of Truth, becaufe it fills up the 
Mind with likelihoods and probabilities, and incites us to judge rafhly and precipitately of all 

things. ■•■.','. 

Admiration mull not center in its .telf, but its bufinefs is to facilitate Examination. The Ani- 
mal Spirits that are naturally excited in Admiration, offer themfelves to the Soul, that (lie may 
ufe them to reprelent the ObjecF more diftincFly to her telf, and to know it better. This is Na- 
ture's Inltitution, for Admiration ought to move us to Curiofity, and Curiofity to conducF us to 
the Knowledge of Truth : But the Soul knows not how to make an Advantage of her own Strength ; 
fhe prefers a certain fatisfa&ory Senfation, that ffie receives from the plenty of the Spirits that 
affect her, before the Knowledge of the Objecl that has railed them ; and (he chutes' rather to; 
. be confeious of her own Riches than to diihpate them by ufe ; not much unlike thofe Miters who 
chute rather to hoard up their Treasures, than to fupply their wants with them. 

Men are generally pleated with whatever raifes any kind of Pa (HI on. They not only fpend 
Money to be moved to Sorrow, by the Reprefentation of a Tragedy, but they alfo throw it away 
upon Legerdemains, that may ftir up their Admiration ; fince ir cannot be faid that they give 
it to be deceived. Therefore that inward and fatisfacFory Senfation, which we are confeious of in 
Admiration, is the principal caute why we dwell upon/'/, without putting it to the ufe which Na- 
ture and Reafon preteribe to us. For that deleft able Senfation fo powerfully holds the Admirers 
Bent to the admired ObjecF, that they will fall into a Paffion, if any fhew them its Vanity. A 
mourning Perfon relifhes fo well the fweetriefs of Sorrow, that he's angry with thofe that go about 
to make him merry; The cafe is the fame with Admirers ; who teem to be wounded by the En- 
deavours that are made to demonftrate the unreafonablenefs of their Admiration, becaufe they feel 
that the fecret Pleafure they receive from that Paffion, diminifhes proportionably as the Idea that 
caufed it vanimes from the Mind. .'....*■ 

The Paffions perpetually labour to juftifie themfelves, and infenfibly perfuade us we doe well 
to be led by them. The SatisfacFion and Pleafure, with which they affecF the Mind, that is to be 
their Judge, draws it over by degrees to their fide, infpiring it with fuch, and the like Reafons. 

* We are to judge of things but according to our Ideas.; but of all Ideas the molt tenfible are the 

* molt re&l, fince they acF upon us with the greateft force, and therefore 'tis by thofe Ideas that 
' I muff judge of them. Now the SubjecF I admire contains a tenfible Idea of Greatnefs, I muft 
4 then judge of it by that Idea, fori ought to efteem and love Greatnefs; and therefore I am in 
x the right when I infill: upon, and am taken up with that ObjecF. And indeed the Pleafure which 
\ the Contemplation of its Idea affords me is a natural proof that it is for my good to think upon 
' it; fince I teem to add to my growth by fuch thoughts, and fancy that my Mind is more en- 

* larged by embracing fo great an Idea •, whereas the Mind ceates to exjft when it thinks upon no- 
' thing. Should that Idea vanifh, my Mind, it teems, mould vanifh with it, or at teaft become 
c lmaller and narrower, if it mould fix upon a lefs considerable Idea ; fo that the pretervation of 
4 that great Idea, being the pretervation of my own Greatnefs, and the perfecFion of my Being, 
c I am in the right to admire ; nay others ought to admire me for it, mould they give me my due. 
' For I am really fomething great, by the Relation I have to great things, and I enjoy them in 

* fome manner by my Admiration, and that Foretaft which a fort of Hope affords me. Other 
1 Men would be Happy, as well as I am my telf, if, knowing my Greatnefs, they fliould fix them- 
' telves upon the Caute that produces it -, but they are blind and infenfible to great and fine things, 
£ and know not how to raife and make themfelves confiderable. 

It ri72v be faid, That the Mind naturally, and without Reflection, argues in fome fuch manner,' 
when it it fjffers it telf to be led away by the abufive Meteors of the Paffions : Thofe Reafonings 
have fome Likelihood, though their Weaknefs be fufficiently vifible ; however, that Probability, 
or rather the confuted Sente of the Probobility that attends natural and inconfiderate Arguments, 
is fo prevalent, that they never fail of {educing us, when we Hand not upon our guard. 

For Inftance' When Poetry, HilFory, Chymifhy, or any other Humane Science has ftruck the 
Imagination of a young Man with fome Motions of Admiration, if he do not carefully watch the 
Attempt thete Motions make upon his. Mind, if he examine not to the bottom the life of thofe 
Sciences, if he compare net the Trouble of learning them with the Benefits that may accrue to 
him ; in fiiort, if he be not as nice in his Judgment as he ought to be, he runs the hazard of be- 
ing teduced by his Admiration, (hewing him only the faireft Part of thofe Sciences; and 'tis even 
to be feared, left they Ihould fo far. corrupt his Fleart, as that he fhould never awake out of his 
Dream, even when he comes to know it to be but a Dream-, becaufe it is not poflible to blot out 
of the Brain deep Tracks, engraven and widened by a long-continued Admiration. And therefore 
we ought to take diligent care to keep our Imagination untainted ; that is to fay, to hinder the 
° ° g formation 



iS P. Malebranche Concerning BookV; 

formation of dangerous traces, that corrupt the Heart and Mind. I fhall here fet down a very 
ufeful Way to prevent not only the Excefs of Admiration, but alfo of all other Paffions in general. 

When the Motion of the Animal Spirits is fo violent, as to imprint on the Brain deep Traces; 
that corrupt the Imagination, it is always attended with fome Commotion of the Soul : And as 
the -Soul cannct be moved without being confcious of it, fhe is thereby fuffkiently warn'd to 
ftand upon her guard, and to examine whether it be for her good to fuffer thofe Traces to be en- 
larged and finifhed. But at the time of the Commotion, the Mind is not fo free, as rightly to' 
judge of the Ufefulnefs of thofe Traces, becaufe the fame Commotion deceives and inclines it to' 
indulge them : We mull therefore endeavour to ftop that Commotion, or to turn to fome other 
Place the Current of the Spirits that caufe it •, and in the mean while 'tis abfolutely neceffary to 
fufpend our Judgment. 

But we ought not to imagine that the Soul always can, by her bare Will, ftop the Courfe of 
the Spirits that hinder her from making ufe of her Reafon -, her ordinary Power being not fuffici* 
ent to quell Motions not railed by her ; fo that fhe muft dexteroufly endeavour to deceive an 
Enemy that attacks her unawares. 

As the Motions of the Spirits ftir up refpective Thoughts in the Soul, fo our Thoughts excite 
fuch and fuch Motions in the Brain ; fo that to ftop a rifing Motion of the Spirits, a bare Will 
is not fufficient, but Stratagem muft be us'd •, and we muft skilfully reprefent to our felves fuch 
Things as are contrary to thofe that ftir up and indulge that Motion, whence a Revuljion will 
arife : But if we would only determine another way the Motion of the Spirits already rifen, we 
muft not think of contrary but only different Things from thofe that have produced it, which will 
certainly make a Diver/ion. 

But becaufe the Diverfiori and Revuljion are great or little, as the new Thoughts are accompa- 
nied with a greater or lefs Motion of the Spirits ; we muft carefully obferve, what fort of 
Thoughts agitate us moft, that we may in urging Occafions reprefent them to our feducing Ima- 
gination, and ufe our felves fo much to that fort of Refiftance, that no furprizing Motion may 
affect our Soul. 

If we take care firmly to unite the Idea . of Eternity, or fome other folid Thought, to thole 

violent and extraordinary Motions, they will never be ftirr'd up for the future, without railing 

that Idea, and furnifhing us with Weapons to refill them. This appears from" Experience, and 

* Book 2. from the Reafon mention'd in the Chapter Of the Connexion of Ideas * ; fo that we muft not 

Parr 2. imagine it abfolutely impoffible, by a dexterous Managery, to conquer our Paffions, when we are 

Gha #'3' ftedfaftlyrefolv'duponit. 

However, by that Refiftance we ought not to pretend to Impeccability, nor to the avoiding of 
all Errours whatfoever. 

Firft, Becaufe 'tis very difficult to acquire and preferve fuch a Habit, as that our extraordinary- 
Motions fhall raife in us Ideas fit to oppofe them. 

Secondly, Though we mould have gotten that Habit, thofe Motions of the Spirits will directly 
excite the Ideas to be impugned, and but indirectly fupply us with the neceffary Weapons to a£ 
fault them : So that the Evil Ideas, being ftill the principal, will be ftronger than the Good, that 
are but acceffary •, and the latter ever ftand in need of the Help of the Will. 

Thirdly, Thofe Motions of the Spirits may be fo violent, as to take up the whole Capacity of 
the Soul -, fo that there will remain no room, if I may fo fpeak, for the reception of the acceflary 
Idea, that is proper to make a Revulfion in the Spirits -, or not at leaft for fuch a Reception as 
may incite us to an attentive Contemplation of it. 

Lafily, There are fo many particular Circumftances, that can make that Remedy ufelels, that 
though it ought not to be neglected, yet we muft not relie too much upon it. We muft have a 
perpetual Recourfe to Prayer, that we may receive from Heaven neceffary Helps in the time of 
Temptation •, and in the mean while endeavour to prefent to the Mind fome Truths fo folid and 
prevalent, as that they may overcome the moft violent Paffions. For I muft needs add by the 
way, That feveral pious Perlbns often return into the fame Faults, becaufe they fill their Mind 
with a great many Truths that are more glittering than folid, and fitter to weaken and diffolve, 
than to fortifie it againft Temptations ; whereas others, that are not endued with fo much Know- 
ledge, faithfully ftick to their Duty, becaufe of fome great and folid Truth, which they have 
rendred familiar, and which bears 'em up and ftrengthens them in all Occafions. 



CHAP. IX. 

Of Love and Averfion^ and their principal Species, 

LOve and Hatred are the Paffions that immediately fucceed Admiration •, for we dwell not long 
upon the Confideration of an Object, without difcovering the Relations it hath to us, or to 
fomething we love. The Objeft we love, and to which confequently we are united by that Paf 
fwn, being for the mofl part prefent, as well as that which we actually admire ; our Mind quick- 
ly, and without any confiderable Reflection, makes the neceffary Comparifons, to find out the Re- 
lations they have to each other, and to us ; or elfe is naturally aware of them, by a preventing 
Senfe of Pleafure and Pain. Then it is, that the Motion of Love we have for our felves, and 

for 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth, if 

for the beloved Object, extends to that which is admired •, if the Relation it has immediately to 
hs, or to fomerhing united to us, appear advantageous, either by Knowledge or Senlation. Now 
that new Motion of the Soul, (or rather that Motion of the Soul newly determin'd, join'd'to 
that of the Animal Spirits, and followed with the Senfation that attends the new Dilpoiition, that 
the fame, new Motion of the Spirits produces in the Brain) is the Paffion we call here Love. 

But when we feel by any Pain, or dilcover by a clear and evident Knowledge, that the Union 
or Relation of the admired Object would prove diiferviceable to us, or to fomething united to us, 
then the Motion of the Love we have for our felves, or for the Thing united to us, terminates 
in us, or cleaves to the united Object, without following the View of the Mind, or being car- 
ried to the admired Thing. But as the Motion towards Good in general, which the Author of 
Nature continually imprints on the Soul, carries her to whatever is known and felt, becaufe what 
is either intelligible or fenfible is Good in it felf j io it may be laid, that the Refiftance of the 
Soul againft that natural Motion which attracts it, is a kind of voluntary Motion, which termi- 
nates in Notbingnefs. Now that voluntary * Motion of the Soul being join'd to that of the Spi- * Left any 
rits and Blood, and followed by the Senfation that attends the new Dilpoiition, which that Mo-/*">«W mU 

tion of the Spirits produces in the Brain, is the Paffion we call here Averfion or Hatred. flake what 

r r . J call here 

voluntary Motion, Ideftre him to read the firft Illuftration on the firfl Chapter. It would intricate my Conceptions fliould I fay whatever 

relates to it, to fatiffie the Nicety of fome Perfonsi 

That Paffion is altogether contrary to Love, and yet 'tis never without Love : It is altogether 
contrary to it, becaufe Averfion feparates, and Love unites ; the former has moft commonly No- 
thingnefs for its Object ; and the latter has always a Being : The former refills the natural Mo- 
tion, and makes it of no effect -, whereas the latter yields to it, and makes it victorious* How- 
ever, Averfion is never feparated from Love, becaufe Evil, the Object of the former, is the Pri- 
vation of Good -, fo that to fly from Evil, is to fly from the Privation of Good ; that is to fay, 
to tend to Good : And therefore the Averfion of the Privation of Good, is the Love of Good. 
But if Evil be taken for Pain, the Averfion of Pain is not the Averfion of the Privation of Plea- 
fure 5 becaufe Pain is as real a Senlation as Pleafure, and therefore is not the Privation of it : But 
the Averfion of Pain, being the Averfion of fome internal Mifery, we mould not be affected with 
that Paffion, fhould we not love our felves. Laftly, If Evil be taken for what caufes Pain in us, 
or for Whatever 4eprives us of Good, then Averfion depends on Self-love, or on the Love of 
fomerhing to which we defire to be united : So that Love and Averfion are two Mother-Paffions, 
oppofite to each other ; but Love is the Firft, the Chief, and the moft Univerial. 

As at that great Diftance and Eftrangement we are from God fince the Fall, we look upon ouf 
Being as the Chief Part of the Things to which we are united -, fo it may be faid in fome fenfe, 
that our Motion of Love for any thing whatfoever, is an Effe£t of Self-love. We love Honours, 
becaufe they raife us •, our Riches, becaufe they maintain and preferve us ; our Relations, Prince, 
and Country, becaufe we are concern'd in their Prefervation. Our Motion of Self-love reaches 
to all the Tilings that relate to us, and to which we are united ; becaufe 'tis that Motion which 
unites us to them, and fpreads our Being, if I may fo fpeak, on thole that furround us, propor- 
tionably as we difcover by Reafon, or by Senfation, that it is our Intereft to be united to them. 

And therefore we ought not to think, that, fince the Fall, Self-Love is only the Caufe and Rule 
of all other Affections ^ but, that moft part of other Affections are Species of Self-love : For when 
we lay, that a Man loves any new Object, we muft not fuppofe that a new Motion of Love is 
produe'd in him 5 but rather, that knowing that Object to have fome Relation or Union with him, 
he loA^es himfelf in that Object, and that with a Motion of Love coeval to himfelf For in- 
deed without Grace there is nothing but Self-love in the Heart of Man : The Love of Truth, of 
Juftice, of God himfelf, and every other Love that is in us, by the firft Inftitution of Nature, 
have ever fince the Fall been a Sacrifice to Self-love. 

There is no doubt, however, but the moft wicked and barbarous Men, Idolaters and Atheifts 
themfelves, are united to God by a natural Love, of which confequently Self-love is not the 
Caufe 5 for they are united to him by their Love to Truth, Juftice, and Vertue •, they praife and 
efteem good Men, and do not love them becaufe they are Men, but becaufe they fee in them 
fuch Qualities as they cannot forbear to love, becaufe they cannot forbear to admire and judge 
them amiable. And therefore we love fomething befides our felves ; but Self-love over-rules all 
the reft, and Men foriake Truth and Juftice for the fmalleft Concerns : For when by their natu- 
ral Force they venture their Goods and Lives to defend opprefs'd Innocence, or on any other Oc- 
calion, their greateft Spur is mere Vanity, and the hopes of getting a Name by the feeming Pof 
feffion of a Vertue which is reverene'd by all the World. They love Truth and Juftice when on 
their fide, but never againft themfelves j becaufe without Grace they cannot obtain the leaft Vi- 
ctory over Self-love. 

There are many other forts of natural Love : We naturally love our Prince, Country, Relations, 
thofe that have any Conformity of Humour, Defigns, and Employments with us : But all thofe 
forts of Love are very weak, as well as the Love of Truth and Juftice ; and Self-love being the 
moft violent of all, conquers them fo eafily, as to find no other Refiftance but what it creates 
againft it felf. 

Bodies that ftrike againft others, lofe their Motion proportionably as they communicate it to 
the ftricken -, and, after having moved many other Bodies, may at laft entirely lofe their own 
Motion. It is not fo with Self-love : It determines every other Love by its Impreffions upon it, 

and 



-8 F. Malebranche Concerning BookV. 

and its own Motion diminifhes not-, on the contrary, it gets new Strength by its new Victories: 
For as that Motion never goes out of the t Heart, fo it cannot be loft, though it be continually 
communicated. 

, Sell-love is therefore the Ruling and Univerfal Love, fince it is to be found, and bears the fwav 
every where •, lb that ail the Paffions having no proper Motion of their own, it may be faid, that 
Selr-iove is the moft extenfive and powerful of all Paffions, or the Ruling and Univerlal Paffion. 
find as all Vertues are but Species of that firft Vertue we call Charity, according to St. An (I'm ; 
ib all Vices and Paffions are but as fo many Effects and Sorts of Self-love, or of that general 
V ice we call Qoncupifccnce. 

We often diftinguifh in Morals the Vertues or Species of Charity, by the Difference of Ob- 
jects - ? but that fometimes confounds the true Idea we ought to have of Vertue, which rather 
depends on its own Motive, than any thing elfe : And therefore we (hall' not follow that Me- 
thod in treating of the Paffions, nor diftinguiih them by the Objects ^ becaufe one and the fame 
Object may excite them all, and that ten thoufand Objects may raife but one. For though Ob-. 
jecls differ from each other, yet they differ not always in relation to us, nor do they ftir up in us 
different Paffions. The promis'd Staff of a Marefchal of France differs 1 from a Bifhop's Crofier, 
or Paitoral Staff promis'd -, yet thofe two Marks of Honour excite almoft the fame Paffion in the 
Ambitious, fince they raife in the Mind of both the fame Idea of Good. But the lame Mare- 
lchafs Staff, when promifed, granted, enjoyed, taken away, ftirs up Paffions altogether different, 
becaufe it raifes in the Mind different Ideas of Good. 

We muft not then multiply the Paffions by their different Objects that caufe them -, but only 
admit as many as there are accefTary Ideas that attend the chief Idea of Good or Evil, and confi- 
derably alter it in relation to us. For the general Idea of Good, or the Seniation of Plealure, 
which is good to him that enjoys it, agitating the Soul and Animal Spirits, produces the general 
Paffion of Love :, and the acceflary Ideas of that Good determine that general Agitation of Love, 
and Courfe of the Spirits in fuch a particular manner, as puts the Mind and Body in a conveni-' 
ent Difpofition in relation to the perceived Good: And thus they produce all the particular 
Paffions. 

And therefore the general Idea of Good' produces an indeterminate Love, which is but an Ex- 
teniion of Self-love. The Idea of Good, as polTefs'd, produces a Love of Joy : The Idea of 
GOod, not as polTefs'd, but hop'd for, that is, as judg'd poffible to be polTefs'd, produces a Love* 
of Defire : And lafily, The Idea of any Good, that is neither polTefs'd nor hop'd for -, or, which' 
is the fame, the Love of any Good which' we cannot hope to enjoy without lofing fome other, 
or which we cannot preferve when we are polTefs'd of it, produces a Love of Sorrow. Thofe 
are the Three fimple and primitive Paffions that have Good for their Object ; for the Hope that 
produces Joy, is not a Commotion of the Soul, but a fimple Judgment. 

However, we muft obferve, That Men confine not their own being within themfelves, but ex-" 
tend it to all Things and Perfons, to whom they believe it their Advantage to unite themfelves i 
So that We muft conceive that they are polTefs'd in fome manner of a Good, when enjoy'd by 
their Friends, though they do not poffefs it immediately themfelves : And therefore when Ifay, 
That the PofTeffion of Good produces Joy, I underftand it not only of an immediate PolTeffion or 
Union, but alfo of any other ; for we naturally feel a' Joy upon the Succefs or good Fortune of 
thofe we love, 

Evil, as I faid, can be taken Three ways ; for the Privation of Good, for Pain, and for the 
Thing that caufe s the Privation of Good, or produces Pain. 

In the firft fenfe, the Idea of Evil being the fame with the Idea of a Good not enjoy'd, it is 
plain that Idea produces Sorrow, or Defire, or even Joy ; for Joy is always excited from that we 
find our felves exempt of the Privation of Good, that is to fay, when we poffefs Good : So that 
thofe Paffions that refer to Evil, taken in that fenfe, are the fame as thofe that relate to Good, 
becaufe at the Bottom they have likewife Good for their Object. 

When Evil fignifies Pain, which alone is always a real Evil to him that fuffers it, whilft he 
fuffers it -, then the Senfe of that Evil produces thofe Paffions of Sorrow, Defire, and Joy, that 
are Species of Averfion, and not of Love ; becaufe their Motion is altogether oppofite to that 
which accompanies the Perception of Good, that Motion being but the Refiftance of the Soul 
againft the natural Impreffion. 

The Actual Senfe of Pain produces an Averfion of Sorrow. The Pain we fuffer not, but are 
afraid to fuffer, produces an Averfion of Defire. And laftly, the Pain we neither fuffer, nor are 
afiaid to fuffer ; or, What is the fame, the Pain that (hall be attended by a confiderable Re- 
ward, or the Pain from which we are freed, produces an Averfion of Joy. Thofe are the Three 
limple or primitive Paffions that have Evil for their Object -, for the Fear that produces Sorrow, 
is nor a Commotion of the Soul, but a bare Judgment. 

Laftly, If by Evil we underftand the Perfon or the Thing that deprives us of Good, or caufes 
us to endure Pain, the Idea of Evil produces a Motion of Love and Averfion together, or only 
a Motion of Averfion : The former, when the Evil is that which deprives us of Good -, for by 
the fame Motion We tend towards Good, and fiy from that which hinders its PolTeffion : And the 
latter, when 'tis the Idea of an Evil which caufes Pain in us^ for 'tis by the fame Motion of 
Averfion that we hate Pain, and whatever produces it. 

And therefore there arc Three limple or primitive Paffions that relate to Good, and as many 
that jelcrto Pain, or to that which caufes it, viz. Joy, Defire, and Sorrow.. For we are joyful 

when 



Chap. X. The Search after Truth. i$ 

when Good is prefent, and Evil is paft ; we are forrowful when Good is gone, and Pain is pre- 
lent ; and we are agitated with Defires when Good and Evil are to Come. 

Thofe Paffions than relate to Good are particular Determinations of that Motion God gives us 
for Good in general, and therefore have a real Objecf •, but others, who have not God for tise 
Caufe of their Morton, terminate only in Notb'mgnejs. 



CHAP. X. 

Of Fajfions in particular ; and in general of the way to explain them^ and 
to know the Errours they 'caufe. 

WHen we confider how Paffions are formed, it vifibly appears, that their Number is unde- 
terminable, or that there are more than we have Terms to exprefs them by. For Palhons 
differ not only by the various Complication of the Three flrft Primitive, which would not encreafe 
them to a great Number ; but alio differ by the different Perceptions and Judgments that caufe or 
accompany them. Thole different Judgments of the Soul, concerning Good or Evil , produce 
different Motions in the Animal Spirits, to difpofe the Body in relation to the Object, and confe- 
*quendy caufe in the Soul Senfations that are not altogether like : Whence it proceeds, that fome 
Paffions are obferv'd to differ from each other, though their Commotions be not different; 

In the mean while, the Commotion of the Soul being the chief Thing obfervable in every Paf- 
£on, 'tis better to refer them to the Three original Pafhons, in which thofe Commotions are very 
different, than to treat confufedly and diforderly of them, in reference to the different Percepti- 
ons we may have of the Good and Evil. that raifes them. For we may have fo many different 
Perceptions of Objects, in reference to Time, to our felves, to what belongs to us, to the Per- 
fons or Things to which we are united, either by Nature or Choice, that it is wholly impoffible 
to make an accurate Enumeration of therri. 

When the Soul perceives any Good which file cannot enjoy, it may perhaps be faid, that fhe 
hopes for it, though fhe defires it not : However, 'tis plain, that this her Hope is not a Paffion;, 
hut a fimple Judgment And therefore 'tis the Commotion that attends the Idea of any Good, 
of which we take the Enjoyment to be poffible, that adopts Hope into a true Paffion. It is the 
fame when Hope grows into Security : For the latter is a Paffion, only becaufe of the Commoti- 
on of Joy that mixes with that of Defire ; fince the Judgment of the Soul that confiders any Good 
as certain, is a Paflion but as much as it is a foregoing Tafte of the Good that affecfs us. Laft 
of all, When Hope diminifhes, and is fucceeded by Defpair, 'tis vifible again, that the latter is 
a Paffion but becaufe of the Commotion of Sorrow that mixes with that of Defire ; for the 
Judgment of the Soul, that confiders any Good as unattainable, would not be a Paflion, mould 
we not be aft uated by that Judgment. 

But becaufe the Soul never looks upon Good or Evil without any Commotion, and even with- 
out any Alteration in the Body, we often give the Name of Paflion to the Judgment that produ- 
ces it, confounding together whatever happens both to the Soul and Body at the fight of any- 
Good or Evil : For the Words, Hope, Fear, Boldneis, Shame, Impudence, Anger, Pity, Derifion, 
•Grief, and the Names of all other Paffions in common ufe, are fhort ExpreffiOns made up of fe- 
veral Terms, by which can be explain'd in particular whatever Paffions contain. 

We underftand by the Word Faffion the View of the Relation any thing has to us, the Com- 
motion and Senfation of the Soul, the Concuffion of the Brain, and'the Motion of the Spirits, a 
new Commotion and Senfation of the Soul -, and laftly, a Senfation of Pleafure that always at- 
tends the Paffions, and makes them grateful. All thefe we commonly underftand by the Name of 
Paffions i but fbmetimes it only fignifies either the Judgment that raifes it, or only the Commoti- 
on of the Soul, or the bare Motion of the Spirits and Blood, or laftly, fomething elfe that ac- 
companies the Commotion of the Soul. 

It is very ufeful, for the Knowledge of Truth, to abridge Ideas and Expleffions ^ but that of- 
ten caufes fome confiderable Errour^ efpecially when thofe Ideas are abridg'd by popular life •. 
For we ought never to abridge them, but when we have made them very clear and diltincf , by. a 
.great Application of Mind ; and not, as 'tis ordinarily done, as to Paffions and fenfible Things, 
when we have made them familiar to us by their Senfations, and the mere Acf ion of the Imagi- 
-nation, which eafily impofes on the Mind. 

There is a great difference betwixt the pure Ideas of the Mind, and the Senfations or Com- 
motions of the Soul. Pure Ideas are clear and diftincf , but 'tis a hard Task to make them fami- 
liar , whereas Senfations and Commotions are intimate with us, but can never plainly and di- 
ftinftly be known. Numbers, Extenfion, and their Properties, may be clearly known ; but un- 
lefs we make them fenfible by ibme expreffive Characters, 'tis very difficult to reprefent them to 
our Mind, becaufe whatever is abftrafted moves us not. On the contrary, the Commotions and 
Senfations of the Soul may eafily be reprefented to the Mind, though the Knowledge we have 
of them be but confufed and imperfect ^ for all the Words that raife them, lively ftrike the Soul, 
and make it attentive. Thence it proceeds, that we often imagine we rightly underftand fome 
X)ifcourJes that are altogether incomprehenfible •, and that reading fome Defcriptions of the Sen- 

H fations 



-> o F. Malebranche Conctmimi Book V - 

facioiis and Paflions of the Soul, we perfuade our felves that' we perfectly comprehend them s be- 
caufe they ttrongly move us, and that all the Words that reverberate upon our Eyes agitate our Soul . 
The hearing of tile very Names of Shame, Defpair, Impudence, &c. ftraightway excite in our Mind 
aconfafed Idea, and obfcure Senlation, that powerfully influences us •, and becaufe this Senfacion 
is very familiar to us, and prefents it felf without any Trouble or Endeavour of the Mind, we 
fancy it to be clear and diftinct: Thefe Words, however, are the Names of compounded Paffions, 
and "by confequence abridg'd Exprefhons, which popular Life has made up of many confuted and 
obfcure Ideas. 

Seeing we are oblig'd to employ fuch Terms as common life has approved of, the Reader mould 
not be iurprird to meet with Obfcurity, and fometimes with a fort of Contradiction in our 
Words. And if it wete but confidefd that the Sedations and Commotions of the Soul, that an- 
fwer to the Terms us'd in fuch Difcourfes, are not wholly the fame in all Men, becaufe of their 
different Difpofitions of Mind, they would not fo eafily condemn us ; when they could not enter in- 
to our Opinions. This I fay, not fo much to prevent Objections againft rny felf, as that we may un- 
defftand the Nature of the "Paflions, and what we are toth'ink of Books treating of fuch Matters. . 

After fo many Cautions, I (hall not flick to fay, that all the Paflions may be referr'd to the 
three Primitive, namely, Dejire, Joy 2xA_ Sorrow-^ and that it is fpecially by the different Judg- 
ments the Soul makes of Goods and Evils, that fuch as relate to the, fame Primitive Paflion dif- 
fer from each other. 

For Inflance, I may fay that Hope, Fear, and Irrefolution, that is the Mean betwixt them both, 
are Species of Defire : That Boldnefs, Courage and Emulation, £?V. have' a greater Relation to 
Hope, than to all others g and that Timidity, Cowardife, Jealoufie, &c. are Species- of Fear. 

I may fay, that Alacrity and Glory, Kindnefs and Gratefulnefs, are Species of Joy, caufed by 
the Sight of the Good that we know to be in us, or in thole to whom we are united ; as Derifion or 
Jeering is a fort of Joy, commonly arifing at the Sight of the Evil that befalls thole from whom 
we are feparated. Lattly, That Diftafte, Tedioufnefs, Regret, Pity, Indignation, are fo many 
kinds of Sorrow, caufed by the Confideration of fomething difpleafing. 

But befides thofe Paflions, and feveral others I pafs by, which particularly relate to fome of the 
Primitive Paflions, there are yet many others, whole Commotion is almoft equally compounded, 
either of Defire and Joy, as Impudence, Anger and Revenge ^ or of Defire and Sorrow, as Shame, 
Regret and Vexation -, or of all Three together, when Motives of Joy and Sorrow meet. And 
though thefe laft Paflions have no particular Names that I know of, they are however the molt 
common ^ becaufe in this Life we fcarce ever enjoy any Good without a Mixture of Evil, nor fuffer 
any Evil without Hopes of being freed of it, and enjoying Good. And though Joy be altogether 
contrary to Sorrow, yet it allows of its Company, and even admits it an equal Sharer in the Capa- 
city of the Soul as Volenti when the Sight of Good and Evil divide its Capacity as Intelligent. 

All the Paflions therefore are Species of Dejire^ Joy and Sorrow ; and the chief difference be- 
twixt thofe of the fame fort mult be taken from the different Perceptions or Judgments that 
caufe or accompany them. So that to become learned in the Nature of Paflions, and to make of 
them the molt accurate Enumeration poflible, it is requifite to enquire into the different Judgments 
that may be made of Good and Evil. But as we efpecially intend to find out the Caufe of out- 
Err ours, we need not fo much to infill upon the Judgments that precede or caufe the Paflions, as 
upon thofe that follow them, and which the Soul makes of Things when Ihe is agitated by fome 
Paflion, becaufe thofe laft Judgments are the moft liable to Errour. 

Such Judgments as precede and caufe the Paflions, are almoft ever falfe in fomething, becaufe 
they are, for the moft part, grounded upon fuch Perceptions of the Soul as confider Objects in rela- 
tion to her, and not as they are in themfelves. But the Judgments that follow the Paflions are falfe 
all manner of ways •, becaufe fuch Judgments being only made by the Paflions, are only grounded 
upon the Perceptions the Soul has of Objects as relating to her, or rather to her own Commotion. 

In the Judgments that precede the Paflions, Truth and Falfhood are join'd together •, but when 
the Soul is agitated, and judges by every Infpiration of the Paflion, Truth vanilhes, and Falfhood 
remains to be- the Principle of fo many more falfe Conclufions as the Paflion is greater. 

All Paflions juftifie themfelves, continually offering to the Soul the moving Object, in the fitteft 
way for preferving and increafing her Commotion. The Judgment, or the Perception that cauies 
it, gets lull new Forces from the Increafe of the Paflion, and the Paflion likewife augments pro- 
portionably as the Judgment that produces it, in its turn, is ftrengthen'd. 

Thus [falfe Judgments and Paflions join in Confederacy, for their mutual Prefervation. And 
fhould the Fleart never ceafe fending up Spirits for keeping open the Tracks of the Brain, and 
fupplying the Expences, which that violent Senfation or Commotion make of the fame Spirits, 
Paflions would perpetually increafe, and never allow us to be fenfible of our Errours. But as all 
our Paflions depend on the Fermentation and Circulation of the Blood, and that the Heart can ne- 
ver furnifh as many Spirits as are necelfary for their Prefervation, they muft needs expire when the 
Spirits diminilh, and the Blood grows ccol again. 

Though it be an eafie matter to difcover the ordinary Judgments of Paflions, yet 'tis not a thing 
to be neglected ^ there being few Subjects that defer ve more the Application of an Enquirer after 
Truth, who endeavours to free himfelf from the Dominion of the Body, and will judge of every 
thing by true Ideas. 

We may inftruct our felves in this Matter two ways, either by pure Reafbn, or by our inward 
Conicioulhds, when we are agitated by fome Paflion, For Inftance, Experience teaches us, 

That 



. ■ J, 

Chap. XL lbs Search after Trhth, ■;■■ 

That we are apt to judge of thofe we love not, to their Difklvantage, and' to fpit all the Venom 
of' our Hatred at the Object of our Paflion. We alfo know by Reafon, that as we cannot hate bur 
what is Evil; (o 'tis neceffary for the prefervation of Hatred, that the Mind mould .repreient to 
it felf the worft part of its Object. For 'tis fufficient to fuppole that all Paflions juitifie themfelve., 
and give inch a Dilpofition, firft to the Imagination, then to the Mind, as is fit to preferve their 
own Commotion, directly to conclude what are the Judgments which all the Paflions caufe us to 
make. - -. l i 

Thofe that are endued with a ftrong and lively Imagination, that are extremely fe rifible, and - 
much fubjeSt to the Motions of Pallions, may perfectly inform themfelves of thofe things by'their 
own inward fenfej and it often comes to pafs, that they fpeak of them in a more pleating and iri- 
ftrucling manner than others, whofe Reafon over-tops their Imagination: yet it follows not, that 
thofe that difcover beft the Springs of Self-love, that penetrate fartheli into Man's Heart, and 
more feniibly difcover its Recefies, are always the greatelt Underitandings. This only proves that 
they are livelier, quicker of Imagination, and fometimes more malicious than others. 

But thofe tiiat without confulting their inward Senfe, make ufe only of their Reafon to enquire 
into the Nature and Erfe&s of Paflions ^ though they be not always fo quick-lighted as others 
are always, more rational, and lefs obnoxious to Errour j becaufe they judge of things as they are 
in themlelves : They fee very near what Men polTeft with Paflions can doe, as they fuppole them 
more or lefs agitated-, but do not raflily judge of the Actions of others, by what they would doe 
themfelves in fuch Occafions • for they well know, that Men are not equally fenfible to the fame 
things, nor alike fufceptible of involuntary Commotions, and therefore 'tis not by confulting our 
Senfations which the Paflions create in us, but by liftening to Reafon, that we muft treat of the 
Judgments that accompany them ; left we f hould draw our own Pitture, inftead of difcovering the 
Nature of Paflions in general* 



CHAP. XL 

That all the Faflions juftifie themfelves. What Judgments they caufe us to 
mahg in their Vindication. 

"E need no long deduction of Arguments to demonftrate, That all Paflions juitifie them- 
felves; That Principle is Efficiently evident, both by our internal Confcioufhefs of our 
felves, and the Behaviour of thole we fee agitated by them ; and therefore we need only barely 
propound it, to confider it as we mould do. The Mind is fuch a Slave to the Imagination, that 
it always obeys when the Imagination is over-heated ^ and dares not anfwer when the fame is in- 
cenfed, becaufe it meets with Abufes when it refills, and is always rewarded with fome Pleafufe 
when it humours that imperious Faculty. Even thofe whofe unruly Imagination perfuades them 
they are tranifnuted into Beafts, find out Reafons to prove they muft live as Beafts do, walk 
Four-footed, eat Grafs, and imitate every Aclion that is purely Brutal. They find Pleafure in 
living by the Impreflions of their Paflion, and fuffer inward Pain in refilling it ^ which is fuffici- 
ent to make Reafon, that commonly defcends to be the Slave to Pleafure, to argue in fuch a man- 
ner as may beft defend the Caufe of it. 

If therefore it be true that all Paflions juftifie themfelves, 'tis evident that Deiire muft of it felf 
move us to judge favourably of its Object, if it be a Dejire of Love^ and unkindly if it be a Dejlre 
of Aver/ion. The Deiire of Love is a Motion of the Soul raifed by the Spirits, that provoke it 
to the Enjoyment or Ufe of fuch things as are not in its power ^ for we deiire even the Continuation 
of our Enjoyment, becaufe future things depend not on us. 'Tis then neceffary for the Juflifica- 
tion of that Deiire, that the ObjecV which produces it be efteemed good in itfelf^ or in reference 
to fbmething elfe : the contrary muft be faid of that Deiire, which is a kind of Averiiori. 

I grant, we cannot judge any thing to be good or bad, without fbme Reafon 5 but Paflions have 
no Object which is not good in fome fenfe. And if it may be faid there are fome, which contain 
no real Goodflefs, and therefore cannot be contemplated as Good by the Mind-, yet no one can fay 
but they may be enjoyed as Good, iince they are fuppofed to agitate us ^ and that Commotion, 
Enjoyment, or Senfe is more than fufficient to move the Soul to entertain a kind Opinion of the 
Objea 

If we fo eaiily judge that Fire contains in it felf the Heat we feel, and Bread the Savour we 
relifh, becaufe of the Senfation thofe Bodies excite in us .$ though that be never fo incompreniible 
to the Mind, which cannot conceive Heat and Savour as Modifications of a Body : thence it fol- 
lows, That there is no Object of our Paflions, how vile and contemptible foever it appears, but we 
may judge it good, when the Enjoyment of it affects us with pleafure. For as we imagine that 
Heat goes out of Fire when we feel it, fo we blindly believe, that the Objects of the Paflions caufe 
the pleafure which we receive in their Enjoyment, and that therefore they are good, iince they are 
able to doe us good. The like may be faid of 'the' Paflions that have Evil for their Object. 

But, as I faid juft before, there "is nothing but deferves either Love or Averfion, either by it felf, 
or by fbmething elfe to which it relates ^ and when we are agitated with fome Paflion, we quickly 
difcover in its Object the Good or Evil that may nourifh the fame. It is therefore eafieto know by 
Reafon the Judgments which our Paflions make, whilft agitating us. - ., . . 

For 



3,4 F. Malebranche Concerning BookY. 

For, if a fjefiie of Love move us, we may well conceive that it will not fail to juftifie it felf, by 
the favourable Judgments it (hall make of its Object We eafily perceive that thole Judgments Will 
have more Extent, as the Defire fhall be more violent •, and that they will be fomecimes abfblute 
and without exception, though but a very fmall part of the thing appears good. We may without 
difficulty underftand that thole favourable Judgments will reach all things, that fhall have, or icem 
to have, any Connection with the principal Object of the Paffion, proportionably to the ftrengtli 
of the Paffion, and the Extent of the Imagination. The contrary will happen if it be a Defire of J- 
verfwn, the Reafons of which are as eafily comprehended, and perfectly confirmed and made good 
by Experience. But let us make thefe Truths more fenfible and familiar by fdme Inftances. 
' Men naturally defire Knowledge, becaufe all Minds are created for Truth. But that Defire, how 
jutt and reafbnable foever it may be in it felf, often becomes a dangerous Vice, by the falfe Judg- 
ments that attend it •, Curiofity frequently offers to the Mind vain Obje£t s of its Study and Lucubra- 
. tions, afcilbes to them falfe Ideas of Greatnefs, ennobles them with the deceiving Luftre of Rari- 
ty, and dreffes them up with fuch gay and fplendid Apparel, that one Can hardly forbear to' Con- 
template them with too much Pleafure and Applicatibn. 

There* is no Trifle but will wholly take up fome Perfons, whofe fruitlefs Toil is Hill juftifled by 
the falfe Judgments that arife from their vain Curiofity. For ihftance, thofe that beftow their time 
in Learning Tongues, imagine that all the Sciences confift in the Knowledge of Terms, and find 
out a Thou land Reafons to juftifie themfelves \ and the Veneration thofe pay them whom an un- 
known Teim confounds, is none of the weakeft, though the leaft reafonable. 

Some Perfons employ their whole lives in learning to' fpeak, who ought perhaps to hold their 
Peace all the while j fince 'tis evident he Ought to be filent, who has nothing worth the hearing to fay. 
But 'tis not that which they propofe from their Learning. They mould know that he muft think well , 
ufe his Underftanding to exaftnefs, difcern Truth from Falfhood, clear Ideas from Obfciire, thofe of 
the Mind from thofe of the Imagination, that will fpeak accurately. They imagine themfelves fine 
and uncommon Wits, becaufe they know how to pleafe the Ear with an Elegant Harmony, how to 
flatter thePafhonsby Figures and taking Geftures-, how to rejoyce the Imagination by lively and fen- 
fible Expreffions •, whillt they leave the Mind empty of Ideas, void of Light and Underftanding. 

Some probable reafon may juftifie their Paffion, that fpend a great deal of time in the ftudy of their 
own Tongue, fince they make ufe of it all their Life ; but as to thofe who indifferently apply them- 
felves to all forts of Languages, I know not what to fay in their behalf The Paffion of thofe who. 
make a complete Library of all forts of Dictionaries, may be excufable, as well as the Curiofity of 
thofe, who make a collection of Coins and Medals of all Countries and Times ; that may be ufeful in 
fome occafions, and if it doe them not much good, at leaft it does them no harm ^ a Store-houfe of 
fuch Curiofities being not curriberfome, fince they carry not with them either their Books or Medals. 
But how may the Paffion of thofe be juftifiable, that make their Head a Library of Dictionaries, that 
neglect: their Affairs and Effential Duties for words of no ufe. They are fmatterers in their own 
Tongue, frequently mingling ftrange and unknown words in their Difcourfes, and never paying their 
Countreymen with Current Money. Their Reafon feems not to be better guided than their Tongue - y 
for all the Corners and Recedes of their Memory are fo full of Etymologies, that their Minds 
mult lie as ftifTd under the innumerable number of words that are perpetually flying about it. 

However, it muft be granted that Philologers and Linguifts will not flick for Reafons to juftifie 
their capricious Studies. Which to know, you need but to Men to the Judgments thofe preten- 
ders to Science make of Tongues ; or fuppofe fome Opinions, that are taken amongft them for un- 
doubted Axioms, together with the Inferences that may be deduc'd from them. For inftance, that 
thofe Perfons who fpeak feveral Tongues, are as many individual Men as they know different Langua- 
ges, fince Speech diftinguiihes us from Beafts -, that the Ignorance of Tongues deprives us of a mul- 
titude of things, fince Ancient Philofophers and Strangers are more Learned then we. Suppofe but 
thefe and the like Principles and Conclufions, and you'll quickly form fuch Judgments as are fit to 
beget the Paffion for Tongues, and confequently like thofe," wherewith the fame Paffion infpires 
the Linguifts to vindicate their Studies. 

There is not a Science fo abje£t and contemptible, but fome part of it will fhine very bright to 
the Imagination, and dazle the Mind, when Paffion heightens thofe falfe Glimpies. That Splen- 
dour, I own, A'anifhes when the Blood and Spirits cool, and the Light of Truth begins to fhine - y 
but that Light difappears alfo, when the Imagination grows warm again, and leaves but fome tran- 
fitory Shadows of thofe folid Reafons which pretended to condemn our Paffion. 

Farthermore, when the Paffion that agitates us finds it felf a dying, it repents not of its demea- 
nour, but on the contrary it difpofes all things, either to an honourable Funeral, or to be reviv'd fpe- 
dily again ; that is to fay, it always prepares the Mind to frame Judgments in its Vindication. 
In this condition it makes a fort of Alliance with fuch other Paffions as may keep it up in its 
weaknefs, fupply it with Spirits and Blood, in its neceffity ; raife it out of its Afhes, and give it 
a new Birth. For Paffions are not uneoncern'd for one another, and thofe that can live together, 
faithfully contribute to their mutual prefervation. So that all the Paffions that are not contrary 
to the Studies of Tongues, or of any thing elfe, do continually follicite and fully confirm thole 
judgments that are made to vindicate it. 

A Pretender to Learning imagines himfelf, now as furrounded- with refpe£tfull Hearers, then 

as Conquerour of thole whom he has amaz'd with his unintelligible words * and almoft always as 

. one rais'd far above the common fort of Men. He flatters himfelf with the Commendations he 

receives, with theHPrefenncnts that arc propofed to him. with the Courtfhip that is made to him. 

He's 



Chap. XI. The Search after Truth. 33 

He's of all Times and Countries : He is not limited, as vulgar Wits, to the prefent, nor connVd 
within the Walls of his Town -, but is continually communicating himfelf abroad, and his Com- 
munication makes his Delight. See how many Paflions combine together to manage the Caufe of 
pretended Learning, how hotly they profecute their Judgments, and bribe the Mind in its favour. 

Should every Paflion act feparately, without caring for the reft, they would vanih immediately 
after their Rife, not being able to make a fufficient number of falle Judgments to maintain them- 
iclves,and defend the Glimmerings of Imagination againft the Light of Reafon : But all Paflions 
concur admirably well to their mutual Preservation, afiifting and ftrengthning each other, though 
never fo remote, provided they be not declared Enemies, as though they were minded to follow 
the Rules of a well-order'd State. 

If the Paflion of Defire were alone, all the Judgments it might pafs would only amount to 
reprefent the Good as attainable : For the Defire of Love, confider 'd as fuch, is produced by the 
Judgments we make, that.it is poflible to enjoy fuch a Good : And fo this Defire could only form 
judgments about the Poflibility of enjoying it-, fince the Judgments which follow and preferVe 
the Paifions, are exactly like thofe which precede and produce them. But that Defire is animated 
by Love, fortified by Hope, increafed by Joy, renewed by Fear, attended by Courage, Emulation, 
Anger, Irrefblution, and feveral other Paflions, that form each in their turn a great variety of 
Judgments, which fucceed each other, and maintain the Defire that has produced them. °Tis not 
therefore ftrange that the defire of a mere Trifle, or of a Thing that is evidently hurtful or fruit- 
lefs, fhould however juftifie it felf againft Reafon for many Years, nay, during the whole Lif^ 
of a Man that is agitated with it, fince fo many other Paflions endeavour to vindicate it. I fhali 
here fet down in few Words how Paflions juftifie themfelves, that I may explain Things by diftincl: 
Ideas. 

Every Paflion agitates the Blood and Spirits, which, when agitated, are driven into the Brain 
by the fenfible Sight of the Obje£t, or the Strength of the Imagination, in fuch a manner as is 
fit to imprint deep Tracks reprefenting that Object. They bend, and even fometimes break by 
their impetuous Courfe the Fibres of the Brain, and thereby leave the. Imagination ibil'd and 
corrupted. For thefe Traces obey not the Commands of Reafon, nor will they be blotted put 
when it pleafes •, on the contrary, they put a Force upon it, and oblige it inceflantly to confider 
Objects in fuch a manner as moves and inclines it to favour the Paflions. Thus the Paflions act 
upon the, Imagination, and the corrupted Imagination makes an Effort againft Reafon, by conti- 
nually reprefenting Things not as they are in themfelves, that the Mind might pronounce a true 
Judgment •, but as they are in reference to the prefent Paflion, that it might pafs a favourable Sen^ 
-tence in its behalf. 

The Paflions not only bribe the Imagination and Mind in their favour,, but produce in other 
Parts of the Body fuch Difpofitions as are neceiFary to preferve them. The Spirits they move, 
Hop not in the Brain, but run, as I have elfewhere fhewn, to all other Parts of the Body, efpeci - 
ally to the Heart, the Liver, the Spleen, and the Nerves that furround the principal Arteries ^ 
and laflly, to all Parts whatsoever, that may fupply neceffary Spirits for the maintenance of the 
predominant Paflion. But while thefe Spirits difperfe themfelves into all the Parts of the Body, 
they deftroy all along, and by degrees, whatever might hinder their Courfe, and make their Paf- 
Tages fo flippery and fmooth, that a very inconfiderable Object exceedingly moves us, and confe- 
quently inclines us to make fuch Judgments as favour the Paflions : Thus if" comes to pafs, that 
they eftablifh and juftifie themfelves. 

If we confider how various the Conftitution of the Fibres of the Brain, and withal the Com- 
motion and Quantity of the Spirits and Blood may be, in the different Sexes and Ages, we fhall 
* eafily and nearly conjecture to what Paflions fome Perfons are molt fubject, and confequentfy, what 
Judgments they pafs upon Objecls. For inftance, we may make a very near Guefs, by the plenty 
or want of Spirits that is obfervable in fome People, the fame Thing being propofed and explain- 
ed to them in the fame manner, that fome of them will make Judgments of Hope and Joy, whilft 
others fhall pafs fuch Judgments as proceed from Fear and Sorrow. 

For thofe that abound with Blood and Spirits, as young Men, cholerick Perfons, and thofe that 
are of a Sanguine Complexion ufe to doe, being very fufceptible of Hope, becaufe of the ifceret 
Senfe of their Strength, will not believe that they mail meet with any Oppofition to their Qe- 
figns, which they may not overcome-, and fo will quickly feed themfelves with a borrowed Tafte of 
the Good they hope to enjoy, and will pafs fuch Judgments as are fit to juftifie their Hope and 
Joy. But thofe that want agitated Spirits, as Old Men, and thofe that are of a Phkgmatick and 
Melancholy Temper, being inclined to Fear and Sorrow, becaufe their Soul is confeious of her 
own Weaknefs, and deftitute of Spirits to perform her Orders, will make quite contrary Judg- 
ments, imagine infuperable Difficulties to juftifie their Fear, and give up themfelves to fcnvy, 
Sorrow, Ddpair, and other forts of Averfion, of which weak Perfons are moft fufceptible. 



CHAP, 



54 F. Ma1£branch£ Concerning BdokV. 



CHAP. XII. 

that fuch Pajpons as have Evil for their ObjeB, are the moji Dangerous and 
IJnjujl : And that thofe that have the leaf: Mixture of Knowledge^ are the 
moji lively and fenfrble. 

OF all the Paflions the feveral forts of Averfions make their Judgments the moll remote from 
Reafbn, and the molt dangerous ; there being no Paflion which corrupts and bribes Reafon 
fo much in its behalf, as Hatred and Fear •, Hatred chiefly in the Cholerick, or in thofe whofe 
Spirits are in a perpetual agitation ^ and Fear in the Melancholy, or thole whofe grofs and heavy 
Spirits are neither eafily moved, nor foon quieted. But when Hatred and Fear conlpire together 
to bribe Reafon, which is very frequently done, then there are no Judgments fb unjuft and capri- 
cious, but they will pals and defend them with an infuperable Obftinacy. 

The Reafon of this is, That as in this Life Evil ftrikes the Soul more to the quick, than Good -, 
fo the Senfe of Pain is livelier than that of Pleafure : Injuries and Scandals more lenfibly afFect 
us, than Commendations and Applaufe ; and though there are Men indifferent as to the enjoying 
fome Pleafures, and receiving certain Honours • yet there is fcarce one that can bear Pain and Con- 
tempt without Uneafinefs. 

And therefore Hatred, Fear, and other forts of Averfton, that have Evil for their Objeft, are 
moft violent Paflions, which lhake the Mind with fuch unexpected Commotions, as difcompofe 
and flupifie it, and quickly pierce into the bottom of the Heart, dethrone Reafon, and pals upon 
all forts of Subjects erroneous and unjuft Sentences, to favour their tyrannical Madnefs. 

Of all Paflions they are the moft cruel and diftruftful, contrary to Charity and Civil Society, 
and at the fame time the moft ridiculous and extravagant, fince they give fuch impertinent and 
frantick Judgments, as excite the Laughter and Indignation of all other Men. 
Joh.1147. Thofe Paflions infpired thePharifees with thefe abfirrd Difcourfes : What are we doing ? This 
Man works many Miracles : If we let him alone ; all Men will believe in him, and. the Romans will 
come and deftroy both our City and Nation. They agreed that our Saviour had wrought many Mi- 
racles ; for the Refurre&ion of Lazarus was undeniable : But what were the Judgments of their 
Paflions > To murther both JESUS and Lazarus whom he had raifed from the Dead ! Why 
JESUS? Becaufe, fay they, // we let him alone, all Men will believe in him, and the Romans 
]oh.t2.\i.ft>all .come and extirpate our Nation. And why Lazarus ? Btcaufe that, by reafon of him, many 
of the Jews zvent away, and believed on Jefut. Oh Judgments equally Cruel and Irrational ! 
Cruel, through Hatred -, and Irrational, through Fear : The Romans Jball come, and deflroy our 
City and Nation. 
The fame Paflions moved a great Aflembly, confifting of Annas the High Prieft, Caiaphat, John, 
Aft. 4. 16, Alexander, and as many as were of the Kindred of the High-Prieft, to fpeak thus : What /hall 
17. ' we doe with thefe Men ? For that, indeed, a notable Miracle hath been done by them, is manifefi to 
all them that dwell in Jerufalem, and we cannot deny it. hut left it jhould f pre ad farther, let us 
threaten to punijh them J eve rely, if they preach the Name of JESUS any more. 

All thofe great Men, agitated by their Paflions, and blinded by their falfe Zeal, pafs Judgment 
both impertinent and unjuft. They dare not punifh the Apoftles, becaufe of the People, and that 
the Matf who had been miraculoufly cured was above Forty Years of Age, and prefent in the Af- 
fembly k but threaten them, left they mould teach in the Name of Jefus ; fuppofing they ought 
Aft. 5. 28. t0 condemn the Dotf rine, becaufe they put the Author to death : Tou intend, fay they, to bring 
thh Man's Blood upon us. 

When falfe Zeal unites it felf to Hatred, it fhelters it from the Reproofs of Reafon, and jufti- 
fles it fo well, that we fcruple not to be led by its Motions. When ignorance and Weaknefs ac- 
company Fear, they extend it to innumerable Subjects, and drive on its Commotions to that 
heighth, that the leatt Suipicion difturbs and frightens Reafon. 

Falfe Zealots imagine they ferve God, when they obey their Paflions : They blindly follow the 
fecret Motions of their Hatred, as Infpirations from internal Truth ; and infilling with great fa- 
tisfa£tion on the Proofs of Senfe that juftifie that Excefs, their Errours become confirmed with 
an unconquerable Stubbornnefs. 

As to ignorant and weak Perfons, they create to themfelves Matter of ridiculous and fantaftick 
Fears ; like Children that walk in the dark without a Guide and Light, fanfie frightful Bugbears, 
aredillur'd and cry out as though they were undone. Knowledge retrieves them if they be igno- 
rant -, but if they be weak, their Imagination continues crazed, and the leatt thing that relates to 
xhat frightful Objecf, renews the Tracks, and opens the Current of the Spirits, which caufe the 
Symptoms of their Fear : So that it is altogether impoflible to cure or pacifie them for ever. 

But when falfe Zeal meets with Hatred and Fear in a weak Mind, it incelfantly produces fuch 
unjuft and violent Judgments, as cannot be thought upon without Honour: To change a Mind 
polfcft with thofe Paflions, requires a greater Miracle than that which converted St. Paul -, and 
his Cure would be abfblutely impoflible, could we let Bounds to the Power and Mercy of God. 
Thofe that walk in the Dark, rejbyce at the fight of Light -, but this Man cannot fiifier it, be- 
caufe 



Chap. XII. The Search after Truth. * & 

caule ir wounds him by oppofing his Paflion. His Fear is in fome fort voluntary, as being pro- 
duced by his Hatred ; and therefore he loves to feel its Commotions, becaufe we love to be agi 
rated even with the Paflions that have Evil for their Object, when the Evil is only imaginary, or 
rather when we know, as in Tragedies, that the Evil cannot hurt us. 

The Phantafms which thole that walk in the Dark frame in their Imagi nations, vanifh at the 
Approach of Light •, but the idle Dreams of this fort of Men will not di fappear at the Light of 
Truth, which inftead of difliparing the Darknefs of their Mind, incenfes their Imagination •, fo 
that the frultrated Light recoils, becaufe they are wholly taken up with the Obje&s of their Pai : 
lion 5 and it feems thole Apparitions have a teal Body, fince they reflect fome weak Rays of the 
Light that falls upon them. 

But though we Ihould fuppofe in thofe Men a fufficient Teachablenefs and Attention, to liffen 
to, and comprehend the Reafons that may diflipate their Errours ; yet their Imagination being dif- 
ordcf d by Fear, and their Heart corrupted by Hatred and falfe Zeal, thole Reaions, how folic! fo- 
ever they might be, could not long flop the impetuous Stream of thofe violent Paflions, nor hin- 
der them from fpeedily juftifying themfelves by fenfible and convincing Proofs. 

For we ought to obferve, that thete are tranfitory Paflions, which never return ; whereas there 
are others that are conftant and permanent. Thole that are not kept up by the fight of the Mind, 
but are only produced and fortified by the fenfible View of an Object, and the Fermentation of the 
Blood, are not lafting, but commonly die foon after theit Birth ; whereas thofe that are alTociated 
with the Contemplation of the Mind, are fteady, becaufe the Principle that produces them is not 
lubjett to change, as Blood and Humouts are. So that Hatred, Fear, and all other PaiTions that 
are excited or preferved by the Knowledge of the Mind, and not raifed by the fenfible View of 
Evil, mult needs be durable, and widial very violent and unjuft. However, thofe Paflions are not 
the molt lively and fenfible, as we (hall now fhew. 

The Perception of Good and Evil, which raifes the Paflions, is produced Three ways 5 by the 
Senfes, by the Imagination, and by the Mind. By way of the Senfes it produces very quick and 
fenfible Paflions ; -by way of the Imagination, much weaker i but thofe which proceed from the 
Perception of Good and Evil by the Mind alone, are true Paflions, on no other account than as 
that View of Good and Evil is always attended by fome Motion of the Animal Spirits. 

Paflions ate only given us for the good of the Body, and for uniting us by it to fenfible Things : 
For though fenfible Things ate neither good nor bad, in reference to the Mind ; yet they are fo in 
relation to the Body, to which the Mind is united : So that the Senfes and Imagination, difco- 
vering much better than the Mind the Relation of fenfible Objects to our Body, mult needs raife 
Paflions far livelier than a clear and evident Knowledge : But becaufe our Knowledge is always 
attended with fome Commotion of the Spirits, a clear and evident Knowledge of a great Good^ 
or a great Evil, not to be difcover'd by the Senfes, always raifes fome lecret Paflion. 

However, all clear and evident Knowledge of aay Good or Evil, is not always followed with 
a fenfible and perceptible Paflion •, as all our Paflions are not accompanied with an intellectual 
Knowledge. For, as we fometimes think upon Good or Evil, without being confeious of any 
Commotion ; fo we often feel our felves agitated with Paflion, without knowing or fometimes 
without being fenfible of the Caufe. A Man that fucks in a good Air is affected with Joy, and 
knows not why, nor what fort of Good he enjoys that produces it : And if fome invifible Cor- 
pufcle mixes with his Blood, and hinders its Fermentation, he is taken with Sotrow, and may 
even afcribe the Caufe of it to fomething vifible, that offers it felf to him in the time of his 
Paflion. 

Of all Paflions, none are more fenfible nor quick, and conlequently lefs mingled with Know- 
ledge, than Horrour and Antipathy, Agreeablenefs and Sympathy. A Man fleeping under the Sha- 
dow of a Tiee, often ftarts up, when a Fly flings him, or a Leaf tickles him, as though a Ser- 
pent had bitten him : The confuted Senfe of a Thing as terrible as Death it lef£ frightens him, 
and he finds himfelf furpriz'd with a very ftrong and violent Paflion, which is an Averfton of 
Dejire, before he bethinks himfelf On the contrary, a Man in want difcovers by chance fome 
imall Good, the Sweetneljs of which furprizes him ^ and he is inconfiderately taken up with that 
Trifle, as though it were the greateft Good in the World, without making any Reflection on it. 
The fame happens in the Motions of Sympathy and Antipathy. We fee in a Company a Perfon 
whofe Deportment and Manners have fome fecret Agreeablenefs to the prefent Difpofition of our 
Body • fo his Sight pierces and ftrikes us, and we are inclined, without Reflection, to love and 
wifh him well. Thus we are agitated by I don't know what, fince Reafon has no Share in it. 
Tlie contrary befals thofe whofe Afpect and Looks fhed, as it were, Difguft and Averfion : They 
have I know not what, that offends and puts us back : for the Mind underftands nothing in it,$ 
the Senfes only are competent Judges of fenfible Beauty and Uglinefs, which are the Objects of 
thofe kinds of Paflions, 



F. MALE- 



g^ F. MaLebranche Concerning Book VI. 





ft MALEBRANCHEs 

EATISE 

Concerning the 

SEARCH after TRUTH. 



BOOK VI. 

Concerning METHOD. 

• — ■ i ■ i ■- i ■— 1 1 . i . ..... . M -i in 

r 

C H A P. I. 

The Defegn of this Booh,. Two general Ways for the Preferring Evidence 
in the Search of Truth^ which Jhall be the SubjeB of this TraU. 

WE have feen in the foregoing Books, that the Mind of Ma? is very obnoxious to 
Errour $ that the Deceptions of his Senfes *, the Vijions of his Imagination % 
and the Abjlraftions ofnis Mini ||, lead him into frequent Miftakes •, that die 
Inclinations of his Will v, and the PaJJtons of his Heart *, almoft ever conceal 
* Lib.y.' tne Truth from him, and never fufFer it to appear without being tinged with thofe falfe Colours 
that flatter Concupifcency. In fhort, we have partly difcover'd the Errours of the Mind, with 
their Caufes : Now 'tis time we mould fhew the Way that leads to the Knowledge of Truth, and' 
give the Mind all the poflible Skill and Strength to walk therein, without ftraying or wearying, 
it felf in vain. 

But, to fpare the Readers an unprofitable Labour, we think fit to advife them, this Laft Book 
is only made for'fuch as earneftly defire to feek the Truth by themfelves, and to make ule of the 
Force of their own Mind for that purpofe. I require them to defpife for a while all probable 
Opinions, to wave the ftrongeft Conje&ures, to neglecf the Authority of all the Philofophers, 
to free themfelves, as far as pofhble, from all Prejudice, Intereft, and Pafiion ■, to enter into an ex- 
treme Miftruft of their Senfes and Imagination : In a word, well to remember the greateft part 
of the Things that have been faid in the former Books. 

I attempt, in this laft Book, to give the Mind all the Perfection it can naturally attain to, by 
fupplying it with the neceflaiy Helps to become more attentive and enlarg'd, and prefcribing it 
r thofe Rules that muft be obferved in the Inquiry after Truth, that it may never miftake,but learn 

in time whatever can be known. 

Could I carry this Defign to its utmoft Perfection, which I pretend not, this being but an Eflay 
rewards it, I might boaft to have found out an Univerfal Science, which would make thofe truly 
learned that knew how to make ufe of it -, fince they would have the Foundation of all the par- 
ticular Sciences, which they would acquire proportionably as they fhould make ufe of that llni- 
verial Science : For, by this Treatife we endeavour to render the Mind capable of paffing a true 
and certain Judgment upon all the Queftions that are not beyond its reach. 

As, to be a good Mathematician, 'tis not fufficient to learn by Heart all the Demonftrationr of 
Euclid, P.rpjwr, Archimedes, Apollonii/s, and others that have written of Geometry ■, i'o, to be a 
Learned Philofophcr, 'tis not enough to have read Plato,. Arijlotle, Des Cartes, and perfectly to 
know their Sentiments upon Philofophical Queftions. For the Knowledge of all the Opinions 
and Judgments of other Men, either Philofophers or Geometricians, is rather a Hiftory, than a 
Science ; tire true Science that perfects, as far as poflible, the Mind, confiding in a certain Ability 
of lolidly judging of all things proportioned to its Reach. But, not to lofe time, nor prepoflefs- 
the Header with precipitate Judgments, let us begin to treat of fuch an important Matter. 

i-iift of all, we ought to remember the Rule that has been eftablifhed, and proved at the begin- 
ning of thehh'Ji Book, becaule 'tis the Foundation and Principle of whatever we fhall fay hereafter. 

And 



Chap. Ii. The Search after Truth* %f 

And therefore I repeat it > H'c muft never give a full Confent, but to thofe Proportions that a$ 
pear fo evidently true,, that they cannot be denied K without feeling an immrdFain, and the je- 
er et Reproaches of our kcafon •, that Is to fay, without clearly knowing we Jlmdd fnMt a wrong 
I tie of our Liberty by zvitb-holding our Confent. For, as many times as we yield to Probabilities, 
we certainly venture to be miitaken ; and Vis but by good Chance, or a lucky Hit', if we be not 
really deceived. So that the confuted Sight of a great number of Probabilities, upon different 
Subjefts, makes not our Reafon more perfeft? nothing but the clear View of the Truth being ' 
able to afford it any real Perfection and Satisfaction. . r • 

Thence 'tis eafie to conclude, That fince, according to our firft Rule, nothing' but Evidence can < 
affure us that we are not deceived, we ought to take a fpeci'al care to preferve that Evidence in all 
our Perceptions i that we may pafs a found Judgment upoiv all the Things to which our Reafon 
can attain, and difcover as many Truths as we are capable of. t _ 

The Things that can produce and preferve that Evidence, are of, two forts • fome are within us, 
and in fome manner depending on us h others are out of Out Jurifdiclion.' For, as, to fee cK-- 
ftin&ly vilible Objects, 'tis required to have a good Sight, and to fix it iteadfaftly upon them,; 
which two Things are in us, or in fome manner depending on us : So 'tis requifite to have a found 
Underftanding, and a ftrong Application, in order to pierce into the bottom of intelligible Truths' * 
which two Things are in us, or in fome fort in our power. „ 

But as the Eyes ftand in need of Light to fee, which Light depends upon foreign Caufes ^ fo 
the Mind needs Ideas to conceive, which, as it has been proved elfeWhere, have no Dependency 
upon us, but are furnifhed to us by a foreign Caufe. So that fhould the Ideas of Things fuper- 
fede being prefent to our Minds, as often as we defire to fee them ; mould he that enlightens the 
World conceal them from us ; it would not be more poflible for us to redrefs it, or to know any- 
thing, than it is to fee vilible Objects when the Light is gone. But we have no reafon to fear it: 
For the Prefence of Ideas being natural to our Minds, and depending on the general Will of God, 
which is conftant and immutable, they can never difappear, nor fail u$ in theDifcovery of fuch 
Things as are attainable by Natural Reafon. For, the Sun that enlightens the Minds, is, not like 
that which illuminates Bodies ; it is never eclipfed, nor goes ever down, but penetrates' every 
thing without dividing its Light. 

The Ideas of all Things being then continually prefent to us, even when we do not attefi- 
tively confider them-, all that we need doe to make all our Perceptions evident, is only to look 
for fuch Means as can increafe the Attention and Extent of the Mind ; as nothing elfe is requi- 
red on our fide, to diftinguifh vilible and prefent Objects, but to have good Eyes, and to fix ' 
them thereupon. 

However, becaufe the Objects we confider have more Relations than we can difcover a'f once, 
by a fimple EfTay of Thought ^ we ftill need fome .Rules, skilfully to unfold the Difficulties -, 
by which Succours, the Mind, being grown more attentive and extended, may with a full Evidence 
difcover all the Relations of the Thing examined. 

We fhall divide this Sixth Book into Two Parts. We fliali treat in the Firft, of thofe 
Supplies that may afford the Mind more Attention and Extent ; and in the Second we fhall pre^ 
fcribe thofe Rules that it muft follow in the Inquiry after Truth, to pafs found and undecel- 
Table Judgments. ' 



CHAP. II. 

That Attention is neceffary io -preferve Evidence iti oiir Knowledge : That the 
Modifications of the Soul mahg her attentive^ but fbare and tahg up too 
much hen Capacity of Perceiving. 

WE have fhewn at the Beginning of this Work, that the Underftanding does nothing but 
perceive ; and- that, as to its Concern, there is no difference betwixt bare Perceptions, 
Judgments, and Reafonings, unlefs it be, that the fecohd and third are Perceptions more cbm- 
pofed than the firft; becaufe they not only reprefent many Things, but alio the Relations fhey 
have together. For naked Perceptions reprefent only Things to the Mind - 7 whereas Judgments 
reprefent the Relations that are betwixt Things and Reafonings, the Relations that are betwixt 
the Relations of Things, provided they be fimple Reafonings * for if they were Complex, they 
"would reprefent Relations of Relations, or compound Relations, which are between the Rela- 
tion of Things, and fo ad infinitum. For, proportionably as Relations multiply, fo the Reafon- 
ings, that reprefent them to the Mind, become more compofed. However, Judgments and fim- 
ple Reafonings, as well as thofe that are compofed, are but, as to the Underftanding, bare Per- 
ceptions, fince it does no more than limply perceive, as has been already obferved. 

Whence it appears, that the Underftanding never 'falls into Errour, fince there is none in Per- 
ceptions •, and, that Errour it feif is not of an intelligible nature : For, as we have already faid 
many times, it confifts in a too hafty Confent of the Will, which fuffers it felf to be dazzled by 
fome falfe Glimpfe, and, inftead of keeping its Liberty as loRg as poiiible, negligently relies upon 
the Appearance of Truth, 

K Notwithftanding, 



3& F. Malebranche Concerning BookVl. 

Notwithstanding, as it commonly happens that the Underftanding has but confufed and imper- 
fect Perceptions of Things h fo 'tis really a Caufe of our Errours, though only occafional. For, 
as the Corporeal Sight leads us into Miftake, when it reprefents outward Obje£rs confufedly and 
imperfectly j confufedly, when they are at too great a diftance, or for want of Light ^ and im- 
perfectly, when it only fhews fuch Faces of them as look towards us : So the Underftanding of- 
ten having but a confufed and imperfect Conception of Things, becaufe they are not fuffiriently 
prefent to it, and that it difcovers not all their Parts, caufesthe Will, that too eafily yields to 
thofe obicure and imperfect Conceptions, to fall into many Errours. 

We muft then look out for Means that may hinder our Perceptions from being confufed and 
' imperfect. And becaufe, as every one knows, nothing can make them more clear and diftinct, 
than Attention •, we muft find out Means to become more and more attentive. Thus we may hope 
to keep to Evidence in our Reafonings, and even to furvey all at once the neceffary Connexion be- 
twixt all the Parts of our lon'geft Inferences. 

To find out thofe Means, 'tis neceffary to perfuade our felves of what has been faid elfewhere, 
That the Mind gives not an equal Attention to all the Things it perceives : For it applies it felf 
infinitely more to fuch as affect, modifie, and penetrate it, than to thofe which, though they be 
prefent, yet do not concern or belong to it : In more, 'tis more taken up with its own Modifica- 
tions, than with the bare Ideas of Objects, which Ideas are Things different from it felf. 

Thence it comes, that we confider but with tedioufnefs, diflike, and remiffnefs, the abstracted 
Ideas of the pure Underftanding ^ that we apply our felves much more to Things that we ima- 
gine, efpecially when our Imagination is ftrong, and the Tracks of our Brain very deep: And 
lastly, that we are wholly taken up with fenfible Qualities, and even fo, that we can afford no 
Attention to the pure Ideas of the Mind, when we feel fomething very pleafant or painfuL For 
Pain, Pleafure, and other Senfations, being Modes ' of the Souls Exiftence , 'tis impoflible we 
fhould exift without perceiving them, and having the Capacity of the Mind taken up, fince our 
Senfations are nothing but Perceptions. 

But 'tis not fo with the pure Ideas of the Mind, fince they may be intimately united to it, 
without its taking the leaft notice of them. For, though God is moft intimately united with us, 
and comprehends the Ideas of whatever we fee •, yet thofe Ideas, though never fo prefent, and, as 
I may fay, in the middle of our felves, are concealed from us, when the Motions of the Spirits 
do not raife their Traces, or when our Will applies not the Mind to confider them •, that is to 
. fay, when it performs not thofe Acts to which the Author of Nature has joined the Reprefen- 
tation of thofe Ideas. This is the Foundation of whatever we fhall fay concerning the Means 
that can improve our Attention, which Means will be drawn from the very Nature of the Mind -, 
fo that 'tis to be hoped, that they will not prove fruitlefs and chimerical, as many others, that are 
more puzling than ferviceable- And though they fhould not be as ufeful as we could wiffi, yet 
the Time that fhall be beftowed upon their Reading will not be entirely loft, fince this will afford 
us a fuller Knowledge of the Nature of the Mind. 

The Modifications of the Soul have Three Caufes, the Senfes, the Imaginations^ and the TaJJt- 
ons .- For every one experimentally knows, that Pain and Pleafure, and all other ftrong Senfati- 
ons, lively Imaginations, and vehement PafTions, take up the Mind fo much as to make it inca- 
pable of Attention, at the time they too vigoroufly affect it ^ becaufe they fill, as I may fay, its 
whole Capacity, or Faculty of Perceiving. And even when thofe Modifications are moderate, 
they ftill divide its Capacity in fome fort ; fo that it cannot give up it felf wholly to the Con- 
fideration of abstracted Truths. 

Thence we muft draw this important Conclufion, That thofe that will earneftly apply them- 
felves to fearch after Truth, muft carefully, and as far as poflible, avoid all the Senfations that 
are too lively, as a great Noife, a bright Light, Pleafure, Pain, &c. That they muft inceflantly 
watch over the Purity of their Imagination, left deep Traces fhould be imprinted on their Brain, 
which would continually difturb, and, as it were, diffolve the Mind $ and that they muft above 
all flop the Motions of the Paflions, which make fo powerful an Impreflion on the Body and 
Soul, that it is for the moft part impoflible the Mind fhould think upon any thing elfe. For though 
the pure Ideas of Truth are always prefent, yet they cannot be attended to, while the whole 
Reach and Compafs of our Thoughts are charg d with thefe penetrating Modifications. 

However, as it is not pofhble that the Soul fhould be free of PafTion, Senfation, or any other 
particular Modification, we muft make a Vertue of Neceflity, and endeavour to draw, from thofe 
very Modifications, fuch Succours as can make us more attentive : But the Ufe of them requires 
great Skill and Circumfpettion, if we defire to make an Advantage of them h and we muft care- 
fully examine how far we have occafion for them, that we may ufe them only when the necef- 
lity of being attentive compels us to it. 



CHAP. 



Chap. III. The Search after Truth. £w 






CHAP. III. 

Of the Z)fe that can he made of the Pajpons and Senfes, to preferve the At- 
tention of the Mind. 

TH E Paffions that may fuccefsfully incite us to the Enquify after Truth, are thofe that afford 
Strength and Courage to overcome the trouble of rendring our felves attentive : There are 
fome good, and others bad ; the Good are fuch as the Defire of rinding out the Truth, of getting 
fo much Light as to conduct our felves, and be ufeful to our Neighbours, and the like ; the Bad 
or Dangerous are, the Defire of getting Fame, of making Eftabliihments, of riling above our Fel- 
lows, and others yet more corrupted, of which we need not fpeak. 

In our prefent unhappy State, it often happens, that the leaft rational Paffions are the rrioft inci- 
ting to the Enquiry after Truth, and are more pleafant Confolations in all the Troubles we are at 
to difcover it, than fuch as are jufter, and more reafonable : For Inftance, Vanity moves us much 
rnore than the Love of Truth ^ and we fee every day fuch Perfons as are extraordinarily given to 
itudy, as long as they find Men before whom they can boaft of their Learning -, whereas they en- 
tirely fbrfake it, when they meet with no body more to liften to them. The confufed Profpecl of 
the Glory that furrounds them when they vend their Opinions, bears up their Courage in the moft 
fruitlefs and tedious Studies : But if either by Chance, or the Neceffity of their Affairs, they come 
to be taken off from that little Flock of Applauders, their Heat prefently cools, the moft lolid Stu- 
dies are no longer alluring - y Diftafte, Tedioufneis and Morofenefs overtake them, and make them- 
fbrfake all. Vanity did triumph over their natural Lazinefs, but now Lazinefs triumphs over the 
Love of Truth -, for Vanity may fometimes refill Lazinefs, but Lazinefs commonly proves too 
ltrong and powerful for the Love of Truth. 

However, as the Paffion for Glory may be referr'd to a good End, as, to the Glory of God, the 
publick Ufe, the Prefervation of our good Name ; fome Perfons may perhaps be allow'd, in fome 
certain Cafes, to make ufe of that Paffion, as a powerful Help to make the Mind more attentive. 
But Care mtift be taken to, ufe it only when the reafonable Paffions, whereof mention has been made, 
are not fufficient, and that our Duty engages us to apply our felves to Subjefts that are very difguft- 
ing - r Firft, becaufe that Paffion is very dangerous to the Confcience -, Secondly, becaufe it infenfibly 
draws us into ill Studies, that have more Luftre than Ufe or Truth in them ; and Laftly, becaufe 
it is very difficult to moderate it, and that we often become its Fool and Property -, and inftead of 
enlightning the Mind, we only ftrengthen the Concupifcence of Pride, which both corrupts our 
Moral Powers, and darkens our Underftanding with an undhTolvable Obfcurity. 

For it mult be confider'd how That Paffion infenfibly increafes, fettles and fortifies it felf in the 
Heart of Man •, and when it is too violent, inftead of helping the Mind in the Search of Truth, 
it ftrangely blinds it, and even perfuades it that Things are juft as it defires they ifiould be. ■■ 

Sure it is, there would not be fo many falfe Inventions, nor imaginary Difcoveries, were not 
Men's Heads giddy'd by the ardent Defire of appearing Inventors. For the firm and obftinate 
Perfuafion wherein feveral Perfons have been to have found, for Inftance, the Perpetual Motion, 
the Quadrature of the Circle, the Duplication of the Cube by ordinary Geometry, in all likelihood 
proceeded from an extraordinary Defire of feeming to have perform'd what others have vainly at- 
tempted. \ 

And therefore 'tis fitter to excite in us fuch Paffions as are fo much more ufeful to our fearching 
out of Truth, as they are more ftrong, and wherein the Excels is not to be fear'd : Such are the 
Defires of making a good Ufe of our Mind •, of freeing our felves from Prejudices and Errours ; of 
getting a fufficient Light to behave our felves in our Condition •, and fuch others as neither engage 
lis into fruitlefs Studies, nor carry us on to rafti and inconfiderate Judgments. 

When we have begun to tafte the pleafure of making ufe of our Mind, to be fenfible of the Pro- 
fit that arifes from it, have freed our felves of violent Paffions, and have difrelifh'd fenfible Plea- 
fures, which always prove the Matters of, or rather the Tyrants over Reafon, in thofe that indif- 
ereetly give up themfelves to them •, we need not other Paffions, but fuch as we have lpoken of, 
to become attentive upon the Subjects on which we defire to meditate. 

But moft Men are not in that Condition ; they have neither Tafte, nor Underftanding, nor Cu- 
riofity for any thing but what affects the Senfes-, their Imagination is corrupted by an almoft infi- 
nite Number of deep Traces, which raife none but falfe Ideas •, and as they depend upon all the 
Obje&s that refort to the Senfes and Imagination, fo they always judge by the Impreffion they re- 
ceive from them •, that is, with reference to themfelves. Pride, Debauchery, the various Engage- 
ments, -the reftlefs Defires of Advancement, which are fo common amongft the Men of the World, 
darken the Sight of Truth, and ftifle in them the Senfe of Piety h becaufe they feparate them from 
God, who alone is able to enlighten, as he alone is able to govern us. For we cannot increafe our 
Union with fenfible Things, without diminifhing that which we have with intellectual Truth, 
iince we cannot be at the fame time ftriftly united with Things fo different and oppofite. 

Thofe whofe Imagination is pure and chafte, that is, whofe Brain is not fill'd up with deep 

Traces, that fallen them to vifible Things, may eafily unite themfelves to God, liften attentively to 

the Truth that fpeaks to them, and even forbear the Ufe of the moft juft and rational Paffions. 

r But 



£fi f. Maleb.ranche ConcMning Book VI. 

But as to thole that live amOngft the Great, who depend upon too many things, and whofe Ima- 
gination is foil'd by the falle and obfcure Ideas of fenfible Objefts, they cannot apply themfelves to 
the Truth, unlefs they be born up by fome PaiTion, ftrong enough to countervail the Weight of the 
Body, that carries them down -, and to imprint Traces on their Brain,^ that may make a Revulfion 
upon the Animal Spirits. However, as every Paffion can only by it felf perplex our Ideas, they 
ought to life that Help but fo far as Neceflity requires ; and all Men ought to ftudy themfelves, 
that they may proportionate their Paffions to their Weaknefs. 

It is no hard matter to find a Method of railing in us iuch Paflions as we defiie, fince the 
Knowledge we have given in the foregoing Books of the Union betwixt Soul and Body has fuf- 
fjciently open'd the way to it : In a word, no more is requir'd, than to think attentively upon 
thofe Obje&s, that by the Inftitution of Nature are able to raife the Paffions. Thus we may al- 
moft at any time excite in our Hearts whatever Paffion we have occafion for $ but becaufe we can 
eafier excite them at any time than fupprefs them, or remedy the Diforders they caufe in the Ima- 
gination, we muft be very lober and cautious in employing them. 

Above all, we muft take care not to judge of Things by Paffion, but only by the clear Sight of 
the Truth, which is almoft impoffible when the Paflions are fomewhat lively 5 they ought only to 
raife our Attention, but they nevet fail of ftirring up their proper Ideas, and violently driving the 
Will to judge of Things by thofe Ideas that affecf it, rather than by the pure and abftrafted Ideas 
of Truth, that make no Impreffion upon it : So that we often make Judgments which laft no lon- 
ger than the Paffion, becaule they are not produced by the clear Sight of the immutable Truth, 
but by the Circulation of the Blood. 

True it is that Men are wonderfully obftinate in fome Errours, which they maintain as long as 
they live ; but then thofe Errours have other Caufes than the Paffions, or at leaft depend on fuch as 
are permanent and Lifting, proceeding from the Conftitution of the Body, from Intereft, or from 
ibme other durable Caufe. For Inftance -, Intereft being a Motive of a continual ftanding, produ- 
ces a Paffion that never dies ; and the Judgments that arife from it are very long liv'd. But all the 
other Sentiments of Men, which depend upon particular Paffions, are as inconftant as the Fermen* 
ration of their Humours : They fay one while this, another while that •, and yet what they fay is 
commonly conformable to what they think : And as they run from one counterfeit Good to another, 
by the Motion of their Paffion, and are difgufted at it when that Motion ceafes ; fo they run from 
one falfe Syfiem into another, and ardently affert a falfe Opinion, when Paffion makes it probable y 
which, the Paffion ebbing, they afterwards forfake. By their Paffions they tafte of every Good, 
without finding any really fo -, and by the fame Paffions fee all Truths, without difcovering any 
thing abfolutely true •, though in the time of their Paffion, what they tafte feems to them the So- 
vereign God, and what they fee an undeniable Truth. 

The Senfes are the fecond Spring, whence we can draw Succours to make the Mini attentive. 
Sen/at ions are the very Modifications of the Soul, and differ from the pure Ideas of the Mind; the 
former railing a much ftronger Attention than the latter. So that 'tis plain, that to fupply the want 
of Application to infenfible Truths, it may be fit to exprefs them in a fenfible and moving manner. 

'Tis for that Reafon, that Geometricians exprefs by fenfible Lines, the Proportions that are be- 
twixt f everal Magnitudes -, for by drawing Lines upon Paper, they draw, as I may fay, anfwerable 
Ideas upon their Mind, and make them more familiar by Seeing them at the fame time that they 
Conceive them. Thus feveral very difficult Things may be taught to Children, though they be 
not fufceptible of abftrafted Truths, by reafon of the Nicety of the Fibres of their Brain : Their 
Eyes fee nothing but Colours, Pictures, Images ; but their Mind confiders the Ideas that anfwer 
thofe fenfible Objects. 

But we muft take a fpecial Care not to over-fhadow the Objeffs which we will confider or repre- 
fent to others, With fo much Senfibility, that the Mind mould be more taken up with it, than with 
the Truth it felf* which is a moft confiderable and common Fault $ for we meet every day with 
Men that apply themfelves only to what moves the Senfes, and exprefs themfelves in fuch a fen- 
fible manner, that Truth is as itifled under a vain and pompous Apparel of their falfe Eloquence $, 
fo that their Hearers, being more affecfed with the Meafure of their Periods, and the Motions of 
their Figures, than by the Reafons they alledge, give way to be perfuaded, without fo much as 
knowing what caufes their Perfuafion, or what they are perfuaded of. 

And therefore we muft fo carefully moderate the Senfibility of our Expreffions, as only juft to 
make the Mind attentive. There is nothing more beautiful than Truth ; neither can we pretend 
to make it handfomer, by daubing it with fenfible Colours, that have no Solidity in them, and are 
pleafing but a fhort time. We might perhaps make it more fine and delicate, but fhould enerve 
and emafculate it : So that we ought not to fet it off with fo much Luftre and Brightnefs, that 
the Mind be more taken up with the Ornaments, than with the Body it felf-, this being to deal 
with it as fome Perlbns do with themfelves, when loaded with fuch abundance of Gold and pre- 
cious Stones, they appear the leaft confiderable part of the whole which they make up with their 
Clothes. We muft drefs the Truth as are thofe Magiftrates of Venice, who are oblig'd to wear a 
plain Gown and a Cap, to diftinguifh them from the Commonalty-, that Men may look on their 
Faces With Reverence and Attention, without admiring their Apparel. Laftly, We muft take care 
not to furcharge it with too great a Retinue of delightful Things, that diffipate the Mind, and ob- 
ftruft its View, left we fhould give to any thing elfe the Honours due to it : As it often happens 
to Princes, who cannot be diftinguHh'd amonglt the great Number of their Courtiers and Atten- 
dants, who affume to themfelves that Air of Greamefs, and Majeftica.1 Countenance, which only 
becomes the Sovereign? themfelves. But 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. 

But to give a more confiderabk: Inftance, I fay, that Truth muft be propofed to others, as it 
manirefts it felf. The Sight of Men, fihce the Fait of their Fore-fathers, is too weak to look on 
Truth it felf, and therefore Sovereign Truth has made it felf fenfible by coming, inverted with our 
Humanity, that it might attraO: our Thoughts, enlighten our Mind, and appear lovely to our Eyes. 
So we may, according to that Pattern, adorn with fomething ienfible the Truths we endeavour to 
underftand our felves, and to teach others, that we may fix the Mind upon them, which loves what 
is ienfible, and is not eafily delighted by Things that flatter not the Senfes. The Eternal Wifdom 
has made it felf ienfible, but not glittering and pompous \ becoming fenfible, not to faften us to 
what is fenfible, but to raife us to what is intellectual, and to condemn and facrifice Senfibility in 
his own Perfon. So we muft make ufe, in the Knowledge of Truth, _ of fomething fenfible, but 
not too fplendid h that cannot indear too much the fenfible Obje£t, but only. keep .open the Eye of 
our Mind in the Contemplation of mere intellecFual Truths :. Such Senfibility mould be employ 'd, 
as we may dimpate, annihilate, and willingly facrifice upon the Sight of the Truth, to which it 
has conduced us. The Eternal Wifdom has offer'd it felf to us from without, in a fenfible man- 
ner, not to keep us abroad, but that we may retire within our felves, and that the Inner Mart 
might intellectually confider it: So we muff, in our Search of Truth, make ufe of fomething fen- 
fible, which may not keep us abroad gazing on its Luftre, but make u$ enter into our felves, and 
Ihengthen our Attention and Union to the Eternal Truth, Which only is able to rule the Mind, 
and enlighten it upon any Subject whatfoever. 



4* 



CHAP. IV. 

Of the Vfe of Imagination to wahg the Mind attentive, and efpecially of the 
ZJfefulnefs of Geometry. 

WE had need be very circumfpecVand cautious in the Choice and Ufe of thofe Helps that we 
may draw from our Senfes and Paflions, to become attentive to the Truth 5 , becaufe our Sen- 
fes and Paihons too vividly affe£t us, and fo much fill up the Capacity of the Mind, that it often 
lees nothing but its own Senfations, when it propofes to diicover Things in their own Nature. But 
as to thofe Succours which our Imagination may afford us, they make the Mind attentive, without 
fruitlefly dividing its Capacity, and wonderfully help us to a clear and diftinft Perception of Ob- 
jefts ; fo that they are for the moft part very ufeful, as will be made plain by fome Inftances. 

We know that a Body is moved by two or ieveral different Caufes, towards two or feveral dif- 
ferent Places, whereunto it is equally or unequally driven by thefe Forces j that the Force of the 
Motion perpetually increafes or decreafes, according to fome known Proportion. We are asked 
what way that Body goes, in what place it fhall be at fuch or fuch a Moment, with what degree 
of Celerity it fhall be> endued when 'tis come to fuch a place j and other like Queftions* 

i. From the point A, whence we fuppofe that it be- 
gins to move, draw the indefinite Lines AB, AC, that 
make the Angle BAC, if they cut each other •, for AB 
and AC are direct, and cut not each other when the 
Motions they exprefs are dire£lly oppofite. Thus we 
diftincTtly represent to the Imagination, or, if you pleafe, 
to the Senfes, the way that Body mould take when it is 
only moved by one of thefe Forces, either towards B, 
or C. ..< . 

2. But if the Force that moves it towards B be equal 
to that which moves it towards C, then divide the Lines 
AB and AC into the parts i, 2, 3, 4. 1, 11, in, iv, 
equally diftant from A : If the Force that moves it to- 
wards B be double of that which moves it towards C, 
take in the Line AB Parts that are double of thofe that 
you cut in AC : If that Force be fubduple, take them 
fubduple j if it be thrice greater or leffer, cut them like- 
wife thrice greater or leffer •, and fo proportionably. 
The Divifions of thofe Lines will represent to the Ima- 
gination the different Degrees of thofe moving Forces, 
and withal, the Space that they fhall caufe the Body 
to run over. 

3. Draw through thofe Divifions Parallels upon AB 
and AC, to have the Lines 1 X, 2X, 3 X, &c. equal to 
A 1, A 1 1, A 1 1 1, &c. and 1 X, 1 1 X, 1 1 1 X, equal to 
A 1, A 2, A 3, £?c. that reprefent the Spaces through 
which thofe Forces carry that Body. Through the In- 
terferons of thofe Parallels draw the Line AXYE, that 
reprefent to the Imagination, firft, the trueGreatnefs of 
the compofed Motion of that Body which is fuppofed 





wnr Hi ^- 


B 




v 


y 


¥~ 


I 
1 






5 




} 


X "■■■:. 




/ 


E 




c 




K M 



ALEBRANCHE ConC&Th 



ung 



Book VI. 




iv nr it i A 


A 


c 




to be driven at the fame time towards B and C, 
by two different Forces, according to fome certain 
Proportion : Secondly ', The Way that it is to pais 
through : And, /aftly, All the 'Places in which it mult 
be in a determinate Time. So that this Line lerves 
not only to bear up the Sight of the Mind in the In- 
quiry after all the Truths that are difcoverable in the 
Queftion propofed ; but alfo repreients the Solution 
of it in a fenfible and convincing manner. 

Firft, That Line A X Y E expreffes the true De- 
grees* of the compound Motion : For we fenfibly 
perceive, that if each of the Forces which produce 
it can promote the Body a Foot in a Minute, its 
compofed Motion will be of two Foot in a Minute, 
if both moving Forces do perfectly agree -, flnce in 
that Cafe it is enough to add A B to AC. But if 
thofe Forces are not altogether equal, the compofed 
Motion A E will be greater than one of the Com- 
poundings, AB or AC, by the Line YE : Where-*' 
as if thofe Motions be oppofite in any thing, the 
compofed will be lefler than either of the com-' 
pounding, by the Line YE ; and if they be entirely oppofite, it will come to nothing. 

Secondly, The Line A X Y E feprefents to the Imagination the Way which that Body mail go': 
For we fenfibly perceive in what Proportion it mall advance more to one than to the other fide. 
We likewife perceive, that all the compound Motions are direct, when each of the compounding 
is always the fame, though they be unequal betwixt themfelves •, or when the Compoundings are 
always equal betwixt themfelves, though they be not conftantly the fame. Laftly, It plainly 
appears, that the Lines defcribed by thofe Motions are crooked, when the Compounding are both 
unequal to each other, and not always the fame. 

Thirdly, Laft of all, That Line reprefents to the Imagination all the Places in which that Body, 
driven by two different Forces towards two different Places, mail be found 5 fo that we can pre- 
cifely mark the Point in which that Body (hall be in any Inftant whatfoever. For inftance, If you 
defire to know in what Place that Body mall be at the beginning of the fourth Minute, divide 
the Lines AB, or AC, in fuch Parts as exprefs the Space through which thofe known Forces 
might each of them carry that Body within a Minute •, take three of thole Parts in either of 
thefe Lines, then draw through the beginning of the fourth 3 X parallel to AB, or 111 X pa- 
rallel to A C^ for 'tis evident that the Point X, which either of thole Parallels determine in the 
Line AX YE, defigns the Place in which that Body fhall be at the beginning of the fourth Mi- 
nute of its Motion* Thus that Method of examining Queftions, not only keeps up the View of 

the Mind, but alfo affords the Solution of them, 
and withal a fufficient Light to difcover unknown 
Things by a few that are known. 

For Inftance : After what has been faid, it is e-" 
nough only to know, that a Body that was in A at 
fuch a time, is in E at fuch another •, and that the 
different Forces that drive it, defcribe Lines that 
make fuch an Angle as B A C, to difcover the Line 
of its compofed Motion, and the different Degrees 
of Celerity of the fimple Motions ; provided we 
know that thofe Motions are equal or uniform to 
each other. For when we have two Points of a 
Right Line, we have it entire, and we can compare 
the Right Line A E, or the compofed Motion that 
is known, with the Lines A B, and A C, that is, 
with the fimple Motions that are unknown. 

Now let us afreiri luppoie a Stone driven from A 
to B, by an uniform Motion, but defcending towards 
E with an unequal, like to that which ponderous 
Bodies are thought generally to tend to the Centre 
of the Earth, according to the common Opinion j 
that is to fay, let the Spaces which it pafles over 
be amongft themfelves as the Squares of the Times 
in which it pafles them over ; the Line which it fhall 
defcribe will be a Parabola, and the Point in which 
the Stone (hall be at every Moment of its Motion, 
may be determined with the utmoft Nicety and Ex- 
affnefs. 

^ For, if at the firft Moment that Body falls Two 
Foot from A towards C, in the fecond Six, in che 

third 




Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. 

third Ten, in the fourth Fourteen, and that it be driven by an uniform Ifaotion from A towards B, 
which is Sixteen Foot in length •, 'tis evident, that the Line which that Body defcribes is a Para- 
tola, whofe Parameter is Eight Foot long \ becaufe the Square of the Lines that are applied the 
Diameter, which Lines mark the Times, and the regular Motion of A towards B,is equal to the 
Retlangle of the Parameter, through the Lines that mark the unequal and accelerated Motions- 
lb that the Squares of the applied Lines, or^the Squares of the Times, will be amonglt them- 
lelves, as the Parts of the Diameter contained betwixt the Pole and the applied Lines. 

16 •. 64 : : 2 : 8 64 : 144 : : 8 : 18, &c. 

The bare looking on the fixth Figure is fufficient to perfuade us of all this •, for the Semicircles 
(hew that A 2 is to A 4, that is, to the applied Line 2 X, its equal, as 2 X is to A 8 ; That. A 1 8 
is to A 1 2, that is, to the applied Line 1 8 X, as 1 8 X is tcf A 8, 0c\ And therefore, that the 
Rectangles A 2 by A 8, and A 18 by A 8, are equal to the Squares of 2 X and 18 X, &c. andcon- 
iequently thofe Squares have the fame Proportion to each other, as thofe Reclangles. 

The Parallels upon A B and A C, which cut each other at the Points X X X, do alfo fenfibly 
mew the Way of that Body, and the Places in which it mull be at fuch a time. Lailly, They 
reprefent to the Eyes the true Degrees of the corripofed Motion, and of its Acceleration, in any 
determinate Time. 

. . Let's fuppofe again a Body moving from A towards B and C, but unequally on both fides. If 
that Inequality be always and every where alike, or if it either encreafes or diminifhes in the 
lame proportion, the Line which it fhall defcribe will be a Right. 

And though there fhould be an Inequality, either in the Augmentation or Diminution of the' 
fimple Motions, whatever that Inequality be, it will not be hard to find the Line that reprefents 
to the Imagination the Motion compofed of the fimple Motions, if you exprefs thofe Motions 
by Lines, and draw to thefe Lines Parallels cdtting each other : For, the Line that mail pafs 
through Jill the Interferons of thofe Parallels, will reprefent the Motion compofed of thofe 
Motions that are unequal, and unequally increafed or diminifhed. 

For example, If we fuppofe that a Body is moved by two equal or unequal Forces, whatever 
they be ; that one of thole Motions ftill encreafes, or diminifhes, in any given Geometrical, or 
Arithmetical Proportion •, and that the other Motion encreafes or diminifhes in fome other Arith- 
metical, or Geometrical Progreffion 5 to find out the Points through which the Line muft pafs 
that reprefents to the Eyes and Imagination the Motions compofed of thofe Motions, draw, as 
has been laid, the two Lines A B and A C, that 
exprefs the fimple Motions, and divide thofe 
Lines as thofe leveral Motions are fuppofed to 
accelerate, at the Points 1, 2, 5, 4, 5 : If the 
Motion reprefented by the Line A C encreafes 
or diminifhes in fuch an Arithmetical Progreffion 
as 1, 2, 3, 4, 5. And if the Motion reprefented 
by the Line A B increafes in this double Progref- . 
fi'on, 1, 2, 4, 8, 16, or diminifhes in the fubdu- 
ple Progreffion, 4, 2, 1, f, 4, i, divide it at the 
Points 1, 2, 4, 8, 16, or 4, 2, 1, i, i, i-, laftly, 
draw through thofe Divifions Parallels to A B 
and A C,and the Line AE, that pafles through 
all the Points of the Interie&ion of thofe Parallels, will be the Line reprefenting the compofed 
Motion, and the Way through which the Body moves. 

If we defire exacfly to know how long a Body has been in coming to fuch a Point, from its fet- 
ting out ; the Parallels drawn from the Point upon A B, or A Q will fhew it -, for the Divifions 
of A B, and A C, mark the Time. And likewife, if we defire to know the Place to which a 
Body fhall arrive within fome certain Time, the Parallels drawn from the Divifions of the Lines 
A B and A C, that reprefent the Time, will, by their Interfe£lion, fhew 11s the Point we feek 
for. As to its Diftance from the Term whence it has begun to move, it will always be eafie to 
know it, by drawing a Line from that Point towards A ; for the Length of that Line will be 
known, by comparing it either to A B or AC, which are known. But as to. the Length of the 
Way through which that Body has run, in advancing to this Point, it will ftiil be hard to disco- 
ver it ; becaufe A E, the Line of its Motion, being crooked, cannot be compared with either of 
thofe Right Lines. 

If you would determine the infinite Points through which that Body rriuft pafs, that is, nicely 
defcribe, and by a continual Motion, the Line AE, you had need make a Pair of CompafTes 
that fhould move according to all the Conditions exprefs'd in the Suppositions that have been 
mentioned ; which would be very difficult to invent, and impoffible to perform, and almoft ur> 
profitable, to difcover the Relations of Things betwixt themfelves •, fince commonly we need not 
all the Points of which a Line is compofed, but only fome, to help the Imagining Faculty, when 
it confiders thofe Motions* 

Thole Inftances are fufficient to fhew, that we may by Lines exprefs and reprefent to the Ima- 
gination moft of our Ideas ; and that Geometry, which teaches to compare thofe Lines, and 
thereby know their feveral Relations, is of a greater ufe and extent than is commonly fuppofed. 
For, Aftronomy, Mufick, Mechanicks, and generally all the Sciences, whofe Objects are fufceptible 
«f more or lefs, and may.be confidefd under the Notion of extended, that is to fay, all accurate 

Sciences, 



43 




44 £ M alee ran che Concerning Book YL 

Sciences, may be referfd to Geometry •, becaufe all Speculative Truths, cbiififtiag in the Relations 
of things, or in Relations betwixt their Relations, they may all be referr'd to Lines h Geometrical 
Conl'equences may be drawn, from them ; and when thofe Confequences are made fenfible by Lines, 
'tis almolt impoflible to miftake. Thus may Sciences be carried very far with great eafinels. 

For Inltance, The Jleafon why we diftinctly know, and precifely 'mark an Octave, a Fifth, a 
Fourth in Mufick, is that the Sounds are exprefled by Strings exactly divided ; and that we know 
that the String which founds an Ocfave is in double proportion with that from whence the O&ave 
riles-, that a Fifth is with it in a Sefquialter Proportion, or. as 3 to 2, and fo of the reft. For 
the Ear alone cannot judge of Sounds, with fb much nicety and accuracy as a Science requires. 
The molt skilful Practitioners, the moft delicate and nicelt Ears are not fenfible enough to ob- 
ferve the difference betwixt certain Sounds, and judging of things by the Seniation they have of 
them, fafly imagine that there's none at alh Some cannot diltinguilh betwixt an Octave and 3 
thirds, others fancy that the Major Tone differs not from the Minor-, fo that the Comma, which, 
is their Difference, is infenfible to thenv and much more the Schifma, which is but the half of 
the Comma. ari 

And therefore, 'tis Reafori alone that manifeftly fhews us, that the fpace of the String which 
makes the Difference betwixt certain Sounds, being divifible into feverai parts, there may ftill 
be a great number of different Sounds, very ufefuli for Mufick, which the Ear cannot diftinguifh. 
Whence it plainly appears, that without Arithmetick and Geometry, we fhould have no exacf and 
regular Knowledge of Mufick ; neither could we fucceed in that Science but by Chance and Ima- 
gination, and fo Mufick would ceafe from being a Science, grounded upon undeniable Demonftra- 
tions. In the mean while it muft be granted, that the Songs which owe their birth to the ftrength 
of Imagination, are, for the moft part, finer and more pleafant to the Senfes, than thofe that are 
cornpoled by Rule. 

• And like wife in Mechanicks, the Heavinefs of a Body, and the Diftance of the Centre of Hea- 
vinels from its Prop, being capable of more of lefs, both may be figured by Lines : So tnat Geo- 
metry is ufefull to difcover and demonftrate an infinite number of new Inventions, very convenient 
to this Life, andpleafing to the Mind, becaufe of their Evidence. 

For Inftance^ If a Weight of fix pounds is to be put in (equilibrium with one of three, let that 
Weight of fix pound hang on the Arm of a Balance, at two Foot diftance from the Prop : then, 
only knowing this general Principle of all Mechanicks, That Weights to jland in equilibrium, muft 
be in a reciprocal proportion with their Diftanees from the Prop ; ( that is, That one Weight muft 
be to the other, as the Diftance betwixt the laft Weight and the Prop is to the Diftance of the 
firft. Weight from the faid Prop ; ) it will be eafie to find out by Geometry, what muft be the Di- 
ftance of a Weight of Three pounds, that all may remain in aquilibrio; if you find by the Twelfth 
Proportion of the Sixth Book of Euclid, a fourth proportional Line, which here will be of four! 
Foot. So that you may plainly difcover all the Truths that depend 1 upon that fundamental Prin- 
ciple of Mechanicks, ( when once known, )\ by the ufe of Geometry j that is* by reprefenting withr 
Lines whatever can be considered in Mechanicks. 

Geometrical Lines and Figures are therefore moft proper to reprefent to the Imagination, the 
Relations betwixt Magnitudes, or betwixt things that differ in degree of more and leis, as Spaces, 1 
Times, Weights, &c. as well becaufe they- are moft fimple Objecls, as that they are imagin'ct 
with great eafinefs, It may even be laid, "to the Honour of Geometry, That Lines can repreleht 
to the Imagination more things than the Mind can know. Since Lines can exprels the Relations 
of incommenfurable Magnitudes, that is, fuch Relations as cannot be known, becaufe there is no 
common Meafure to compare them together. But that Advantage is not very confiderable, as to 
the Search after Truth ■, becaufe thofe fenfible Representations of incommenfurable Magnitudes, 
difcover nothing to the Mind. 

Geometry is therefore exceedingly ufeful, to make the Mind attentive to thofe things, whole 
Relations we defire to difcover : However it muft be granted, that it is fometimes an Occafion of 
Errour, becaafe the evident and pleafant Demonftrations of that Science, takes us up fo much, 
that we have not a fufficient Regard for the Confideration of Nature. Thence it comes, that the 
new-invented Engines do not all fucceed L; that thofe Mufical Compofures, in which the Propor- 
tions of Confonances are belt obferved, are not always the moft grateful ; and that the moft ac- 
curate Calculations of Aflronomy do not always beft foretell the Incidence and Duration of E- 
clipfes. Nature is not abftracf ed •, Levers and Wheels, in Mechanicks, are not Mathematical Lines 
and Circles : All Men are not pleafed with the fame Mufical Tunes, nor even the fame Man at 
different times -, for their Satisfaction proceeds from the Commotions of their Spirits, than which 
nothing can be more variable. And as to Aflronomy, the Courfe of the Planets is not perfectly 
regular, whilft floating in the valt Spaces they are irregularly carried by the fluid Matter that fur- 
rounds them: So that the Errours of AJlronomy, Mujick, Mechanicks, and all Sciences in which 
Geometry is ufed, are not to be afcribed to that undoubted Science, but to the falfe Application 
that is madtof it. 

For Inltance, we fuppofe that Planets, by their Motion, defcribe Circles and Ellipfes perfectly 
regular, And though that be not exa£tly true, yet w» doe well to fuppofe it fo, that we may- 
draw Inferences horn thence, and becaule it wants but little of being true; but we muft ftill re- 
member, that the Principle from which we argue is a Suppoftion. Likewife in .Mechanicks, we 
fuppofe Wheels and levers perfectly hard without gravity and rubbing, and like to Mathemati- 
cal Lines and Circles: or rather, we have not a futftcient confideration for the faid Gravity and 

rubbing, 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. 4.5 

rubbing, for the Nature of the Matter, and the Relation thofe things have betwixt them. We 
mind not that Hardnefs and Bulk increafe Heavinefsj Heavinefs fretting, whilft fretting diminifhes 
Force, and caufes the Engine to break, or wears it out very quickly : So that what often fucceeds 
upon a fmall portion of Matter, feldom takes effeft upon a great Body. 

No wonder therefore if we miftake, fince we argue from Principles not fully known -, nor yet 
becaufe it rids us not of all Errours, mult we imagine Geometry ufelefs; It makes us draw from 
our Suppofitions very true and coniequential Inferences ; and affords us an evident Knowledge of 
what we confider, by making us attentive.- We can even difcover by its means, the Failhood of 
our Suppofitions =, for being certain of the Truth of our Reafonings, which however do not agree 
with Experience, we difcover that our Principles are falfe. But without Geometry and Aritbme- 
tick we can difcover nothing, that is fomewhat difficult, in the molt accurate Sciences, though 
we argue from certain and undeniable Principles. 

We muft then look upon Geometry as a fort of univerfal Science, which opens and enlarges the 

• Mind, makes it attentive, and affords it fo much Skill as to regulate its Imagination, and to draw 

from it all the poffible Succours. For by the affiftance of Geometry, the Mind regulates the Mo-. 

tion of the Imagination, and the Imagination regulated keeps up the View and Application of 

the Mind. 

But that we may learn to make a good life of Geometry, we muft obferve that all the things 
that fall under the Imagination, are not as eafily imaginable one as the other ; fince all the .Ima- 
ges do not equally fill the Capacity of the Mind. Tis more difficult to imagine a Solid than a 
Plain, and this than a fimple Line •, becaufe the clear perception of a Solid requires a greater thought 
than that of a Plain, and a Line. Even Lines differ, as to this, amongft themfelves -, a Parobolick, 
Elliptick, or fome other very compofed Line, requires more thinking, that is, takes up the Mind, 
more than the Figure of a Circle, and this than a right Line ; becaufe 'tis harder to imagine Lines 
that are defcribed by very compofed Motions, and have feyeral different Relations, than thofe that 
are drawn by Motions very fimple, and have but a few Relations. For Relations cannot be clear- 
ly perceived without the Attention of the Mind to feveral things, and as their number is greater, 
id muft the thought or the perception be more extended. Hence it happens, that there are Fi- 
gures fo much compofed, that they extend beyond the reach of a diftincf Imagination -, whereas 
others may be imagin'd with great facility. 

Amongft the three forts of Right-lined Angles, viz. the acute, the right, and the obtufe, none 
but the Right raifes a very diftinct and determinate Idea. For as there are an Infinity of either 
acute or obtufe Angles, that differ all from one another ; fo we can imagine nothing nicely nor 
diftin£tly, when we imagine an acute or obtufe Angle. But we cannot be miftaken in imagining a 
right Angle ; the Idea of it is fo very diftincf, and its Image which it raifes in the Brain fo very 
heat and juft. . " ....,., 

True it is, that we may determine the general and indefinite Idea of an acute Angle to the par- 
ticular Idea of an Angle of 30 degrees, which Idea is as accurate as that of an Angle of 90, that is, 
of a right Angle ; but the Image of it, which we may endeavour to imprint on the Brain, will. ne- 
ver be fo very exaCt, as that of a right Angle •, being not ufed to defcribe that Image, we cannot 
draw it but by thinking on a Circle, or on the determinate Portion of a Circle divided into equal 
Parts. But to imagine a right Angle, we need not think on that divifion of a Circle ; the bare Idea 
of a Perpendicular is fufficient for the Imagination to draw the Image of that Angle ; and we can 
reprefent Perpendiculars without trouble, being ufed to fee all things Handing upright. 

Hence it is eafie to judge, That to have a fimple, diftincF, and well-determin'd Objeft, apt to 
be eafily imagin'd, and confequently to make the Mind attentive, and to promote its Evidence in 
the Truths it is in queft of-, we muft reduce all the Magnitudes we eonfider to plain Superficies, 
termin'd by Lines and right Angles, as are perfect Squares, and other right Angled Figures, or to 
bare right Lines ; for thefe are the Figures whofe nature is the moft eafily known. 

We pretend not however that all the Subjects of our Knowledge and Enquiry, may be repre- 
fented by Geometrical Lines and Figures. There are many, which neither can nor ought to be 
brought under that Rule. Forlnftance, the Knowledge of a God, Allmighty, All-juft, on whom 
all things depend all manner of ways, Who commands his Creatures to obey his Orders, that they 
may be capable of Happinefs ; that Knowledge, I fay, is the Principle of all Morality, and of an 
infinite number of certain and undoubted Confequences ; yet neither the Principle, nor the Confe- 
quences, can be reprefented by Geometrical Figures. Neither is it poffible to figure and reprefent 
by Lines many Notions of Natural Philofophy, which yet may evidently difcover to us feveral 
Truths. However, it may be truly laid, that an Infinity of things may be examin'd and learn'd 
by that Geometrical Method ; which is ever advantageouily imploy'd, fince it accuftoms the Mind 
to Attention, by caufing it to make a regular ufe of its Imagination ; and that things which are > 
learn'd that way, are more clearly demonftrated, and eafier retain'd than others. 

I might have afcribed to the Senfes, the Affiftances we derive from Geometry, to preferve the 
Attention of the Mind ; but though Lines be fomething fenfible, yet, I thought, Geometry be- 
longs rather to the Imagination, than to the Senfes. It would be unprofitable to fet down my 
Reafons for it^ which could only juftifie the order I have obferved in this Treatife: and that's 
a thing not very material to our purpofe. I have not yet fpoken of Arithmetic^ and Algebra, 
becaufe the Cyphers and Letters of the Alphabet, that are ufed in thofe Sciences, are not fb fer- 
viceable to ftrengrhen the Attention of the Mind as to encreafe its Extent, as we fhall explain it 
in the following Chapter. 

U ■ Thefe 



q.6 F. Male branch e Concerning BookVt. 

Thefe are the general Helps to improve the Attention of the Mind : I know of no other, be- 
fides a firm Refolution of being attentive •, of which we forbear to fpeak, becaufe we fuppofe 
it in thofe that give up themfelves to ftudy. 

There are, however, fome others particular to fome Perfons •, as, fome Meats, fbme Drinks^, 
Fome Places, fome Difpofitions of the Body, and the like ; which every one muft learn from Ex- 
perience, oblerving the State of his Imagination after the Meal, and what Things belt prelerve, or 
moil diffipate the Attention of the Mind. This only may be laid in general, That the moderate 
Life of fuch Aliments as make many Animal Spirits, is very fit to improve the Attention of the 
Mind, and the Strength of the Imagination, when 'tis weak and languifhing. 



CHAP. V. 

Of the Means to improve the Tixtent and Capacity of the Mind : That Arith- 
metick and Algebra are of abfolute NeceJJity to it. 

W' E ought not haftily to imagine, that the Extent and Capacity of the Mind can really be 
increafed. The Humane Soul is, if I may fo fpeak, a determined Quantity, or a Portion 
of Thought, contained within fome certain Bounds, which me cannot pafs : She cannot grow 
greater, or more capacious than (he is : She neither fwells up, nor dilates, as 'tis commonly be : 
lieved of Liquors and Metals 3 and perceives never more at one time, than another. 

This, 1 confefs, feems contrary to Experience ; fince fometimes we think upon many Objects, 
and fometimes but upon one ; and even we often fuppofe, that we think upon nothing. How- 
ever,, if it be confider'd, thatThonght is to the Soul, what Extenfion is to Matter •, it will plain- 
ly appear, that as a Body cannot truly be more extended at one time than another, fo, if we 
conceive it right, the Soul cannot think more at one time than another ; whether it be then that 
me perceives many Objects, or is taken up with one, or even when fhe is faid to think upon 
nothing. 

But the Reafon why we imagine that we think more at one time than another, is, that we do 
not fufficiently diftinguifh betwixt confufed and diftinct Perceptions. More Thought is doubtlefs 
required, or the Capacity of Thinking muft be more fill'd, diftin&ly to perceive feveral Objefts, 
than one alone •, but we need not more Thought, to perceive many Things confufedly, than one 
alone difiintfly. Thus the Degrees or Quantity of Thought is equal in the Soul, when ihe con- 
fiders many Things, and when fhe confiders only one : For, when (he is taken up with one 
Thing, fhe has always a clearer Idea of it, than when (lie applies her felf to many. 

For, 'tis fit to be obferved, That a fimple Perception fometimes contains as much Thought, or 
fills as much the Thinking Capacity of the Mind, as a Judgment, and even a compofed Reafon- 
ing •, fince Experience teaches us, that the fimple but lively, clear, and evident Perception of one 
Thing, engages our Application, and polTeiTes us as much, as a compofed Reafoning, or tjie ob- 
fcure and confufed Perception of feveral Relations betwixt many Things. 

For, as there is as much or more Senfation in the fenfible Sight of an Obje£t, which I hold near 
my Eyes, and curioufly examine 3 than in the Sight of a fpacious Field, on which I caft a negligent 
and carelefs Eye 3 becaufe the nearnefs of the Senfation of the Object near my Eyes, makes up 
for the Extent of that confufed Senlation of thole many Things which I flightly and unatten- 
tively look upon in a Field : So the fpiritual Sight the Mind hath of an Object, is often fo lively 
and diftinci, that it contains as much and more Thought, than the View of the Relations betwixt, 
many Things. 

True it is, that at fome certain times it feems to us as though we thought but upon one Thing, 
which yet we can hardly comprehend ^ whereas at other times we comprehend that Thing, and 
feveral others, with great eafinefs : Thence we imagine, that the Soul has more Extent, and a lar- 
ger Capacity of Thinking, at one time, than at another. But our Miftake is vifible ; for the Rea- 
fon why at fome certain times we can fcarce conceive the eafieft Things, proceeds not from the 
Capacity of the Soul's being ftraitned or impair'd 3 but from its being fill'd with fome lively 
Senfation of Pain or Pleafure, or with a great number of weak and dark Seniations, that caufe a 
fort of Giddinefs, which is commonly nothing elfe but the confufed Senfation of a great num- 
ber of Things. 

A Piece of Wax is fufceptible of a very diftinci: Figure ; but cannot admit two, without a 
Mixture of both-, fince it cannot be perfectly round and fquare at the fame time : and if one 
fhould pretend to give it a Million of Figures, none of them would be diftinci:. And in that 
Cafe, fuppofing that Piece of Wax capable of knowing its own Figures, yet it could not tell 
which it is that terminates it on all fides, the number would be fo great. It is even fo with our 
Soul, when a very great number of Modifications take up her Capacity ; (lie can perceive none 
diitinctly, becaufe fhe has not a feparate Senfation of them, and fo thinks file is fenfible of no- 
thing. She cannot fay that (he feels Pain, Pleafure, Light, Sound, Savour ; 'tis none of thofe 
Qualities, and yec 'tis them all together, fhe is fenfible of 

And though we fhould fuppofe that the Soul is not f lib] eft to the confufed and unruly Motion 
pi 1 he Animal Spirits, and fo five from the Contagion of 'her Body, as to have her Thoughts al- 
together 



Chap. V. The Search after Truth. 'a% 

together independent on what happens in it ; yet it might fall out that we fhould eafier under- 
ftand fome Things at one time than at another, without any Enlargement or Diminution in the 
Capacity of" our Soul ■, for then we might think upon particular Objects, or of Being indefinite 
and in general. 

The general Idea of Infinite is infeparable from the Mind, and wholly takes up its Capacity, 
whenever it thinks upon no particular Thing : For when we lay, that we think on nothing, it fig- 
nifies not that we think not upon that general Idea, but only that our Thoughts are not applied 
to any particular Objecf . 

And certainly, if that Idea did not fill our Mind, we could not think, as we do, upon all forts 
of Things ^ fince we cannot think upon Objefts of which we have no Knowledge. And if thai- 
Idea were not moreprefent to the Mind when we fuppofe we think upon nothing, than when we 
are bufie about fome particular Object, we could as eafily think upon whatever we pleafe, when 
we are mightily taken up with fome particular Truth, as when we are not" attentive unto any 
thing : Which is repugnant to Experience. For, to inftance, when we are ftrongly erigag'd in 
meditating on fome Geometrical Propofition, we find not lb much eafinefs to think upon other 
Things, as when we are diverted by no particular Thought. And therefore we think more on the 
General and Infinite Being, when we think lefs on the Particular and Finite -, and we think al- 
ways as much at one time as at another. 

We cannot then improve the Extent and Capacity of the Mind, by fwelling it up, as I may 
fay, and giving it more Reality than it has received from Nature : But only by a skilful and dex- 
terous managing thereof -, which is done to the bell advantage by Arithmetick and Algebra : For 
thofe Sciences afford Means of abridging Ideas fo methodically, and reducing them into fuch an 
Order, as that the Mind, with its little Extent, is capable, with their Afliltance, of difcovering 
very compofed Truths, and fuch as appear at nrft fight incomprehenfible. But we muff diaw 
thefe Things from their Principle, that we may explain them with more clearnefs and certainty. 

Truth is nothing elfe but a real Relation, either of Equality or Inequality : Whereas Falfehood 
is but the Negation of Truth, or a falfe and fantaftick Relation. Truth is that vohkh is, and Falfe- 
hood is not ; or, if you will, is that which is not. We never milfake when we fee Relations 
that are, fmce we cannot be deceived when we fee the Truth t But we always miftake, when we 
judge that we fee fome Relations that are not in being ; for then we fee a Falfehood, we fee what 
is not, or rather we fee not at all. Whoever fees a Relation of Equality betwixt two times Two, 
and Four, fees a Truth, becaufe there is fuch a Relation as he fees ; and whoever fees a Relation 
of Inequality betwixt twice Two, and Five, fees a Truth, becaufe he fees a Relation that really 
is : But whoever judges that he fees a Relation of Equality betwixt two times Two, and Five, 
miftakes, becaufe he fees, or rather fuppofes he fees, a Relation of Equality where there is none. 
Truths are but Relations, and the Knowledge of Truths is the Knowledge of Relations : But 
Falfehood is not, and the Knowledge of Falfehood, or a falfe Knowledge, is, if it may be fo 
laid, the Knowledge of what is not ; and what is not, cannot be known, but by Relation to what 
is : So Errour cannot be underftood, but by comparing it to Truth. 

There may be diftinguifhed as many Species of Falfehood, as of Truth ; and as there are Three 
forts of Relations, viz, of one Idea to another •, of an Objeft to its Idea, or of an Idea to its 
Objecf •, and laftly, of one Objecf to another : So there are Three kinds of Truth and Falfehood h 
namely, betwixt Ideas, betwixt Things and their Ideas, and betwixt Things themfelves. It is true, 
that 2 times 2 are 4 ; 'tis falfe, that twice 2 are 5 : That is a Truth and a Falfehood betwixt Ideas. 
3 Tis true, that there is one Sun ; 'tis falfe, that there are two 1 Here you have a Truth and a Falfe- 
hood betwixt Things and their Ideas. 'Tis true, that the Earth is bigger than the Moon -, and 'tis 
falfe, that rite Sun is fmaller than the Earth : There is a Truth and Falfehood betwixt Objefts 
themfelves. 

Of thofe Three forts of Truths, fuch as are betwixt Ideas are Eternal and Immutable, and upon 
that account are the Rule andMeafure of all others ^ becaufe every Rule and Meafure ought to be 
unchangeable. And as Arithmetick, Algebra, and Geometry, are general Sciences, that rule and 
contain all the particular ; fo they only confider thofe forts of Truths. All Truths or Relations 
betwixt Creatures, or betwixt Ideas and created Things, are obnoxious to thofe Changes whereof 
Creatures are fufceptible. Nothing but the Truth betwixt our Ideas and the Sovereign Being, or 
betwixt Ideas themfelves, is Immutable ; becaufe neither God, nor the Ideas he contains, are 
fubjeft. to Alteration. 

And therefore 'tis only that fort of Truths which are betwixt our Ideas, that we try to difco- 
ver by the Exercife of our Reafon 3 fince we, for the molf part, make ufe of our Senfes to difco- 
ver the others •, as,- we ufe our Eyes and Hands to afcertain us of the Exiftence of Things, and to 
know the Relations of Equality or Inequality betwixt them. There is nothing but Ideas of which * 
the Mind can Infallibly know the Relations by it felf, and without the ufe of Senfes. But there 
are not only Relations betwixt our Ideas, there are alfo Relations betwixt the Relations of 
our Ideas, betwixt the Relations of thofe Relations, betwixt the Collection of many Relations, 
and fo ad infinitum ; that is to fay, that there are Truths infinitely compounded and perplexed. 
In Geometrical Stile we call a fimple Truth, or the Relation of one Idea to another, (as the 
Relation of 4 to 2, or to 2 times 2) a Geometrical Reafon, or only a Reafon : For the Excels 
and Defect of an Idea, or, to ufe the common Terms, the Excefs or Defe£t of a Magnitude, is 
not properly a Reafon ; nor equal Exceffes and Defects, equal Reafons. When the Ideas or Mag- 
nitudes are equal, there is a Reafon of Equality, and one of Inequality when they are unequal. 

The 



48 F. Malebranche Concerning BdokVI. 

The Relation betwixt Relations of Magnitudes, that is to fay, between Reafons, is called Com- 
pounded Reafon , becaufe 'tis a compounded Relation ; as the Relation of 6 to 4, and 3 to 2. 
When the Compounding Reafons are equal, the Compounded bears the Name of Proportion, or 
Duplicate Reafon. The Relations of 8 to 4, and 6 to 3, are a Proportion ; becaufe thole two 
Relations are equal. 

It mult be obferved, That all the Relations or Reafons, as well fimple as compounded, are true 
Magnitudes, that very Name of Magnitude being a relative Term, and neceflarily importing a 
Relation : For, there is nothing Great by it felf, and without Relation to another, belides the 
Infinite or Unite. All entire Numbers are as true Relations as Fractions themfelves, or as Num- 
bers compared with, or divided by, others • though we do not confider this, becaufe entire Num- 
bers may be exprefs d by one Arithmetical Figure. So 4, for inftance, or 1, is as true a Relation as 
v, or s, though the finite to which 4 relates, be not expreffed, but underftood, 4 being equal to 
?, or -*- -,, and therefore every Magnitude being a Relation, or every Relation being a Magnitude, 
it is plain that we can exprefs all Magnitudes by Cyphers, and reprefent them by Signs to the 
Imagination. 

So that all Truths being but Relations, to know all Truths exactly, both fimple and compound- 
ed, it is fufficient to have an exact Knowledge of all forts of Relations, fimple and compound : 
We have already obferved, that there are two, viz. Relations of Equality, and Inequality. It is 
plain, thatnhoie of Equality are alike ; and that as foon as we know that a Thing is equal to 
another that is known, we have an accurate Knowledge of its Relation : But it goes not fo with 
Inequality-, fbrbecauie we know that a Tower is higher than a Fathom, and lower than a thou- 
fand, it follows not that we have a true Idea of its Heighth, or of its Relation with a Fathom. 

To compare things together, or rather critically to meafure the Relations of Inequality, there 
is required a very exact Meafure, a fimple and very intelligible Idea, an univerial Meafure, which 
may be adapted to all forts of Subjects. That Meafure is Unity, which ferves to meafure all 
Things, and without which 'tis impoflible to have an accurate Knowledge of any. But all Num- 
bers being made up of Unites, 'tis evident, that without the Ideas of Numbers, and a Method 
of comparing and m^afuring rhofe Ideas, that is, without Aritbmetick, 'tis not poflible to make 
any Progrefs in the Knowledge of Compound Truths. 

And as Ideas, and the Relations betwixt Ideas ; in fhoit, all lorts of Magnitudes can be great- 
er or lefs than others -, fo they cannot be made equal, but by more or lefs Unites join'd, or re- 
peated as often as 'tis neceffary : So that it is only by the Addition and Subtra£tion of Unity, 
or ot the Parts of the Unity (when 'tis conceived as divided) that we exactly meafure all forts 
of Magnitudes, and difcover all lorts of Truths. Now Aritbmetick and Algebra are, of all Sci- 
ences, thofe that afford us molt Skill and Light to effect thole Operations, and to manage the Ca- 
pacity of the Mind to the belt Advantage, fince they endue it with all the Perfe£tion and Extent 
that it is capable of, and teach it to dilcover all the Truths that can be exactly known. 

For ordinary Geometry does not fo perfe£t the Mind, as the Imagination ; and the Truths which 
that Science difcovers, are not always fo evident as the Matters of it fanfie. For inftance : They 
fuppofe they have exprefs'd the Value of fome Magnitudes, when they have proved them to be 
equal to lome Lines, that are the Subtendant of Right Angles, whofe Sides are perfectly known • 
or to others, that are determined by fome one of the Conick Sections. But their Miltake is vi- 
fible ; for thofe Subtendants are unknown themfelves. We know more exaftly the V 8, or the 
V 26, than a Line imagined or deferibed upon Paper, to be the Subtendant of a Right Angle, 
whofe Sides are 2, or one Side of which is 2, and the other 4 : At leaft we know, that the r 4 
is very near 3, and that the V 20 is about 4 \ -, and there are Rules to come infinitely nearer and 
nearer the true Magnitude ; and if we cannot attain to it, 'tis becaufe the Mind cannot compre-' 
hend Infinite. Whereas we have but a very confufed Idea of the Magnitude of Subtendant Lines, 
and are even obliged to have recourfe to the V 8, or the V 20, to exprefs them. So that the 
Geometrical Conftructions that are ufed to reprefent the Value of unknown Quantities, are not 
fo conducible to the Mind, to dilcover the Relations or Truths fought for, as to rule the Imagi- 
nation : But as we are more inclined to imploy our Imagination, than our Mind; fo Men of 
Learning have commonly more elteem for Geometry, than for Aritbmetick and Algebra. 

To underltand perfectly, that Aritbmetick and Algebra, join'd together, are a real Logick, or 
the Means to difcover the Truth, and afford the Mind as much Extent as it can acquire, it is fuffi* 
cient to make lome Reflections upon the Rules of thole Sciences. 

We have obferved, That all Truths are but Relations ; that the molt fimple, and belt known 

of all, is that of Equality -, that it is the initial Relation, from whence we mult begin to meafure 

• others, whereby to have an exact Idea of Inequality -, that the Meafure of Inequality is the Unite, 

which mult be repeated or fubtracted as often as the Excefs or Defect of unequal Magnitudes 

require it. 

Thence it is plain, that all the Operations that may be fubfervient to difcover the Relations of 
Equality, are only Additions and Subtractions •, Additions ot Magnitudes, to make Magnitudes 
even ; Additions of Relations, to make equal Relations, or to put Magnitudes in proportion 
with each other •, and laltly, Additions of the Relations of Relations, to equal Relations of Re- 
lations, or to put Magnitudes in a Compound Proportion. 

To equal 4 to 2, we need only add 2 to 2, or fubtract 2 from 4 ^ or laltly, to add the Unite 
to 2, and fubtract it from 4 •, that's plain. 
To even the Relation or Reafon oi' 8 to 2, to that of 6 to 3, we mult not add 3 to 2, or 

fubtract 



Chap. V. Ihe Search after Truth. ac? 

fubtraft 3 from 8, fo that the Excefs of one Number to the other ever mould be equal to ? 4 
-•which is the Excels of 6 above 3 -, that would be an Addition, and Evening of fimple Magni- 
tudes : But we mull conlider firlt, which is the Magnitude of the Relation of 8 to 2, or what 
is the Value of | •, and we fhall find, that dividing 8 by 2, the Quotient of that Reafon will be 
4, or that | is equal to 4. We mult likewife fee which is the Magnitude of the Relation of 6 
to 3 ; and rinding it equal to 2, we (hall difcover, that thole two Reafons, | equal to 4, and *- 
equal to 2, differ only by 2 : So to make them even, we. may either" add ~ to j-, equal to 2, 
which will make -~, that is, a Relation equal to 4 •■, or fubtract |, equal to 2, from |, which 
will make 4, that is, a Relation equal to 4 j or laftly, adding the Unite to - 3 , and fu trailing it 
from -*, we fhall have -* and 4, which are equal Relations ; for 9 is to 3, as 6 to 2. 

Laftly, To find out the Greatnefs of Inequality betwixt Relations, proceeding, one from a Com- 
pounded Reafon, or from the Relation of a Relation of 1 2 to 3, and 3 to 1 ; and the other from 
a Compounded Reafon, or from the Relation of a Relation, as of 8 to 2, and 2 to j ; we muft 
follow the fame Method. Fitft, The Magnitude of the Reafon of 12 to 3, is marked by 4 $ 4 
being the Quotient of the Reafon of 12 to 3, and 3 the Quotient of that of 3 to 1 ; and the 
Quotient of Reafon of the Quotients 4 and 3, is. 4- Secondly, The Quotient of 8 to 2, is 4 -, 
and that of 2 to 1, is 2 •, and the Quotient of the Quotients 4 and 2, is 2 : So that the Inequa- 
lity betwixt the Relations, that here refult from the Relations of the Relations, is the Difference 
betwixt 4 and 2, that is to fay, f : And therefore add 7 to the Relation of the Reafons 12 to 3, 
and no 1 5 or fubtraft them from the Relations of the other Reafons, 8 to 2, and 2 to i; and 
you'll make even thofe Relations of Relations, and produce a Compounded Proportion. Thus we 
may ufe Additions and Subtractions to equal Magnitudes, and their Relations both fimple and 
compounded -, and likewife to frame an accurate Idea of the Greatnefs of their Inequality. 

True it is, that we ufe alfo Multiplications and Divifions, both fimple and compounded ; but 
they are only Compound Additions and Subtractions. To multiply 4 by 3, is to make as many 
Additions of 4, as 3 contains Unites ; or to find a Number that has the fame Relation to 4, as 3 
with the Unite. To divide 12 by 4, is to fubtract 4 from 12 as often as poffible ; that is, to 
find a Relation to the Unite, that may be equal to that of 12 to 4 •, for 3, which is the Quoti- 
ent, has the fame Relation to 1, as 12 has to 4. The Extractions of the Square, Cubick, and 
other Roots, are but Divifions, to find out one, two, or three mean proportional Magnitudes. 

'Tis evident, that the Mind of Man is fo narrow, his Memory fo unfaithful, and his Imagination 
fo lhallow, that, without the ufe of Figures, and Writing, and the Skill of Arithmetick, it 
would be impomble to make the neceffary Operations, to know the Inequality of Magnitudes, 
and their Relations, elpecially where many Numbers muft be added or fiibtracted •, or, which is 
the fame thing, when thofe Numbers are very great, and can be added but by Parts : For fome of 
them would ftill be forgotten, t,here being no Imagination fb extended, as to add together very 
great Fractions, as 44* j] -1-7714444 ••> oi 4 to fubtract one from the other. 

Multiplication, Divifion, and the Extraction of Roots in entire Numbers, are infinitely more! 
puzling, than fimple Additions or Subtractions. The Mind alone, without the help of Arith- 
metick, is too fhallow and weak to make fuch Operations •, and it would be to no purpofe to 
infift upon the Proofs of it. 

Notwithstanding, Analyticks, or Algebra, is ftill more excellent than Arithmetick •, becaufe ic 
lefs divides the Capacity of the Mind, and abridges the Ideas in the molt fimple and eafie manned 
imaginable. What may be done in a long time by Arithmetick, is performed in a moment by 
Algebra, without puzling the Mind by the Change of Cyphers^ and the Tedioufnefs of Operati- 
ons. And laftly, There are knowable Things, and neceffary to be known, of which Arithmetick 
alone cannot afford the Knowledge ; but I believe not that there is any Thing ufeful, and which 
may be certainly and exactly known, but it may be found out by an Arithmetical and Algebraical 
Method. So that thofe two Sciences are the Foundation of all others, and help us to the true Means 
to acquire all thofe that are accurate, becaufe the Capacity of the Mind cannot be better managed 
titan it is by Arithmetick, and efpecially by Algebra. 



N T H F 



to F. Malebranche Concerning Book VI. 

, m n « 

THE 

S E C O N D PART 

O F T H E 

S I X T H B O O K, 

Concerning ME t H D. 

CH A P. I. . . ' 

Of 'the Rules that are to be obferved in the Search after 1 ruth. 

% 

TAving explain'd the means how to improve the Attention and Extenfion of the Mind, by 
whicji alone it may acquire a greater perfection, that is, become more enlightned, fagaci- 
ous and piercing •, it is time to fet down thofe Rules, the Oblervation whereof is abfo- 
lutely neceflary to refolve any Queftion whatfoever. I fhall infift long upon it, and en- 
deavour to explain them by feveral Inftances ; that their neceflity may be better known, and the 
Mind accuftomed to make ufe of them ; it being not fo difficult or neceflary, to know them theo- 
retically, as to put them in Practice. 

Let none expect here very extrordinary, furprizing and abftrule things : For on the contrary, 
that thofe Rules may be good, they muft be very fimple, natural and few, very plain and intel- 
ligible, and depending on each other •, in fhort, fuch as may lead our Mind, and rule our Atten- 
tion, without diftrafting either: For Experience mews that the Logick o?Ariftotle is of no great 
ufe, becaufe it takes up the Mind too much, and difturbs the Attention it ought to give to the 
Subjects of its Enquiry. Let then thofe Lovers of Myfteries and rare Inventions lay afide for a while 
that capricious humour, and confider, as attentively as they can, whether the Rules we (hall pre- 
fcribe are fufficient to preferve Evidence in the Preceptions of the Mind, and to difcover the moft 
hidden Truths. Unlefs they fufFer themfelves to be unjuftly prejudiced againft thofe Rules, by 
the fimplicity and eafinefs of the fame, I hope that the great ufe which may be made of them,' 
as we inall mew hereafter, will convince them, that the moft clear and fimple Principles are the 
moft pregnant and fecund, and that rare and difficult things are not always fo ufeful as our fruit- 
lefs Curiofity endeavours to perfuade us* 

The Principle of all thofe Rules is, that we muft always preferve Evidence in our Reafonings, 
to difcover Truth without Fear, and danger of being miftaken. From that Principle follows this 
general Rule, that reipe£ts the SubjecT: of our Studies : We ought only to Reafon upon fuch things^ 
whereof we have clear and diftinll Ideas ; and by a neceflary conlequence, we muft ft ill begin with 
the moft fimple and eafie Subjecls, and infift long upon them, before we undertake the Enquiry into 
fuch as are more compofed and difficult. 

The Rules that concern the Method to be taken in refolving Queftions, depend likewife on the 
fame Principle ; and the firft of thofe Rules is, that we muft very diftintfly conceive the State of the 
Queftion propofed to be refoMd : that is, have Ideas of the Terms fo diftinft, as that we may com- 
pare them together, and difcover the Relations which we look for. 

When thole Relations cannot be found out by an immediate comparifon of their Ideas, then 
the fecond Rule is, that we muft try by an Effay of Thought to difcover one, or feveral intermediate 
Ideas, that may be a means or common meafure to difcover the Relations that are betwixt thofe things. 
A fpecial care is to be taken that thofe Ideas be the more clear and diftinft, as the Relations we 
endeavour to difcover are more nicely exacl: and numerous. 

When the Queftions are very difficult, and require a long Examination, the third Rule is, that 
we muft carefully take off from the Subjetf to be confider 'd, all things zvhqfe Examination is not 
needful to the pif cove ry of the Truth we are in queft of. For the Capacity of the Mind muft not 
be vainly fliar'd and divided, but its ftrength muft only be employed in fueh things as may en- 
lighten it -, fo that all thole things which are to be laid afide, are fuch as concern not the Quefti- 
on, and which, when taken off, leave it whole and entire. 

When the Queftioii is thus brought within the leaft compafs, the fourth Rule is, to divide the' 
Subject of our Meditations into "Parts, and confider them one after the other in a natural order -, be- 
ginning with the moft fimple, or thofe that contain the leaft number of Relations, and never medling 
with the more compofed, before the moft fimple are diftintfly known, and become familiar. 

When 



Chap. II. The Search after Truth. 'k t 

When they are become familiar by Meditation, the filth Rule is, to abridge Ideas and diffojfc 
them in the Imagination, or write them upon Paper, that they may no longer clog and Jill up the 
Capacity of the Mind. Though that Rule be always ufetul, yet ris not of abfolute naceffity^ un- 
lets it be in very intricate Queitions, that require a great extent of Mind, ( lor the Mind is only 
enlarg'd by the abridgment of Ideas). But the tile of that Rule and the following, is belt known 
by Algebra. 

The Ideas of all the things that neceflafily require Examination, being clear, familiar, abridg'd, 
and difpoied and ranged in good order in the Imagination, or written upon Paper, the fixtlr Rule 
is, to compare them all by the Rules of Complications, one with the other alternately, either by the 
View oj the Mind alone, or by the Motion of the Imagination, attended with the View of the Mind, 
or by the Calculation of the Pen joined to the attentwn.of '.he Mind and Imagination. 

li amongit all the Relations that refult from thole Comparifons, you find not that which you 
'enquire alter; then take off again all the Relations that are not fubjervient to refolve the- ^lejiion, 
?ua/:c the others familiar, abridge them, pofiure and difpofe them in the Imagination, or write 
them- upon Paper, compare them together by the Rules of Complications, and then fee whether the 
co.iipojei Relation that is looked for, a one of the compofed Relations that refult from thofe new Corn- 
far ij ens. 

ir npne of thofe new difcover'd Relations contain the Solution of the Queftion, then take off 
again ihoje that are ufelefs, make the other familiar, &c. [_That is, doe the fame over and over, 
a..d 1 continuing thus, you mail difcover the Truth or Relation you enquire after, how compofed 
ioever it may be; provided you can extend the Capacity of your Mind to it, by abridging your 
Iaeas, and Hill in all your Operations having before your Eyes the Scope you aim at. For 'tis the 
continual aid. fteady view of the Queftion which mull regulate all the. advances of the Mind -, 
fiuce we mould always know whither we are going. 

We mult above all take care not to fatisfie our felves with fome glimpfe or likelyhood; but 
begin anew io often the Comparifons that are conducible to difcover the Truths enquired after, 

mat we may not withold our Affent to it, without feeling the fecret Lalhes and Reproofs of our 
internal Mailer that Aniw'ers bur Queitions, that is, the Application of our Mind, and the De- 
nies of our Heart. Then will that Truth ferve as an infallible Principle, to proceed in the Ac- 
quiikion of Sciences. 

:h.ii the Kules we have given are not neceflary in all forts of Queftions : for the firft Rule is fufc 
ficunt hi thole that are ealie : and we need but in fome others the firft and fecond. In (hort, fince 
we mult make uie of thole Rules, 'till we have diicover'd the Truth we feek for ; it follows, 
mat the more difficult the Queitions are^ the greater muft the number of thole Rules be which 
we mi -it put in -practice. 

Tiiou Rules are not very numerous, but very natural, as depending upon each other, and may 
be maae io familiar as to fall of themfelves into the Mind, as often as fhall be requifite. In ffiort, 
they can rule the Attention of the Mind without dividing it, which is in great part what we could 
defiie • but. they look io inconfiderable in themfelves, that to make them more recommendable, 
it s iieceiTary to (hew that the Philofophers are fallen into a great many Errours, and Extrava- 
ganc.es, by not obierving lb much as the two firft, which are the chief and eafieft of all; whereas 
Des v j.rte-s, by their uie, has difcover'd all thofe great and fruitful Truths, which are to be learn'd 
in nis Works. 



CHAP. II. 

Of the general Rule that concerns the SubjeB of our Studies : That School- 
Philojophers obferve it not y which is the Cauje of federal Errours in their 
Fhyfickg. 

THE firft of thefe Rules, and which refpeQs the Subject of our Studies, teaches, that we 
muft not argue, except from clear Ideas ; whence it follows, that to ftudy methodically, we 
rnuft begin with things moft fimple and ealie to be underftood, and infill long upon them, before 
We undertake to enquire after the more compofed and difficult. 

Every one will eafily grant the* neceflity of that general Rule ; plainly feeing, that he walks in 
the dark, who reafons upon obfeure Ideas, and uncertain Principles. But 'twill be matter of fur- 
prize to hear us affirm, that it is hardly ever obferved ; and that the greateft part of thofe Scien- 
ces, which ftill at this day flulTi the Pride of fome falfe Pretenders to Science, are only grounded 
upon fuch Ideas, as are either too confufed, or too general, to be conducible to the finding out 
bf Truth. 

Ariflotle, who fo juftly deferves the Quality of Prince of fuch Philofophers, (as being die Fa- 
ther of that Philofophy which they fo ftudioufly cultivate,) reafons very feldom upon other Ideas, 
than fach as are confufed and fenfible, and upon others that are general, undetermin'd, and repre- 
senting nothing particular to the Mind. For the ordinary Expreflions of that Philofopher are lb 
perplexed, as to reprefent only to the Senfes and Imagination, the confufed Sentiments we have 
of fenfible things h or to make his Difciples fpeak in iiich a rambling and indeterminate manner, 

as 



^2 K NIaleeranche' ConteTning Book VI. 

as hOl to underftand themfelves. Moll of his Works, but efpecially his Eight Books of Phyficks,, 
on which are as many different Commentators as there are ProfefTors of Philofophy, are a mere 
Logical Tattle, where hej talks much, and fays nothing : Not that his Stile is too copious and 
diftufed, but becaufe he has a particular Talent at being fuccincf, and laying nothing but Words. 
In his other Works he makes not luch frequent ufe of his loofe and general Terms ^ but thofe he 
employs raife only the confuted Ideas of the Senfes :, by which Ideas he pretends, in his Problems, 
and el'fewhere, to relblve in two Words -an infinite Number of Queftions, of which it may be de- 
monllrated that they are altogether infbluble. 

But that my Meaning may be better underftood, what I have proved in other Places mull here 
be remembred, viz. That all the Terms that excite nothing but fenfible Ideas, are equivocal ^ 
nay, and what's to be well obferv'd, Equivocal from Errour and Ignorance, which mult needs 
caufe an infinite number of Delufions. 

The Word Riim is equivocal, fignifying ah Animal that ruminates, and a Conftellation into 
which the Sun enters at Spring h but that feldom caufes any Miftake : For he muft be an Allrologer 
with a Witnefs, who fhould imagine any Relation betwixt thole two Things, and believe, for in- 
llance, that we are fubject at that time to vomit up the Medicines that we take, becaufe the Ram 
is a ruminating Beaft. But as to the Terms of fenfible Ideas, but few acknowledge them for 
Equivocal. Ariftoilc and the Ancient Thilofopheis did not fo much as dream on't ^ which will be 
agreed to by any one that has read any of their Books, and diftin£tly knows the Caufe why thole 
Words are liable to Equivocation* For nothing is more evident, than that the Philofophers Opi- 
nion, as to that Matter, was quite contrary to the Truth. 

For inftance : When they lay, that Fire is hot, Grafs green, Sugar fweet $ they underfland, juft 
as Children, and the vulgar of Men, that Fire contains in it what they feel when they warm them- 
felves ^ that Grafs has painted upon it the Colours they fee -, that Sugar is endued with that 
Sweetnefs they talle when they eat it ^ and fo as to all other vilible and fenfible Qualities -, 
which cannot be denied by thofe that have read their Writings. They talk of fenfible Qualities 
as of Senfations ; they take Heat for Motion. And thus, by the Equivocation of Terms, they 
confound the Modes of Exiftence peculiar to Bodies, with the Modifications of the Soul. 

'TLs no longer liner than Des Cartes's time, that to thofe confuted and indeterminate Quefti- 
ons, Whether Fire is hot, Grafs green, and Sugar fweet, Cfc. we ufe to anfwer by diftinguifh- 
ing the Equivocation of fenfible Terms that exprefs them. If by Heat, Colour, and Savour, you 
underltand fuch arid fuch Difpofitions of Parts, or Motion of infenfible Particles, then Fire is hot, 
Grais green, and Sugar fweet. But if by Heat, and other Qualities, you underftand what I feel 
when near the Fire, what I fee when I fee Grafs, &c. Fire is not hot, nor Grafs green, &c. 
For the Heat I feel, and the Colours I fee, are only in the Soul, as has been proved in the Firft 
Book. But as Men commonly fuppole, that what they feel is the fame with that which is in the 
Object i fo they believe they are in the right, when they judge of the Qualities of Objects by 
their own Senlations : And thus they hardly fay two Words without fpeaking a Falfehood, and 
never fay any thing upon that Matter, but what is obfeure and confufed j and that for the feveral 
following Reafons. 

Firft, Becaufe all Men have not the fame Senfations of the fame Objefts, nor even the fame 
Man in different Times, or when different Parts of his Body are affected by them. What i3 
fweet to one, is bitter to another ^ what is hot to one, is cold to another ; what feems hot to a 
Man when he is cold, feels cold to himfelf when he is hot, or when other Parts of his Body 
are affe&ed. Water, that feels warm to the Hands, will feem cold if we wafh with it any Part 
near the Heart. Salt, that is favoury to the Tongue, is pricking and fmarting to a Wound. Su- 
gar is fweet, and Aloes very bitter to t,he Tongue ; but nothing is either fweet or bitter to the 
other Senfes : So that when we fay, a Thing is cold, fweet, bitter, £>V . that fame has no certain 
Signification.' 

Secondly, Becaufe different Obje£ls can caufe the fame Senfation. Plaifter, Bread, Snow, Su- 
gar, Salt, &c. are of the fame Colour ; and yet their Whitenefs is different, if we judge of "erri 
otherwife than by the Senfes : And therefore when we fay, that Meal is white, we fay not any 
thing diltinctly fignificative. 

The third Realbn is, Becaufe fuch Qualities Of Bodies as occafion Senfations altogether diffe- 
rent, are however almolt the fame - } whereas fuch. as excite very near the fame Senfation, are often 
very different. The Qualities of Sweetnefs and Bitternefs differ but little in Objects i whereas 
the Senie of Sweet effentially differs from that of Bitter. The Motions that caufe Smart and 
Tickling, differ but in more or lefs ^ and yet the Senlations of Tickling and Smart are effentially 
different. On the contrary, the Sharpnefs of Fruit differs not fo much from Bitternefs, as Sweet* 
nels does 3 however, that fharp Quality is the fartheft from Bitternefs that poflibly can be : For, 
a Fruit that is fharp for being unripe, mult undergo a great many Changes, before it grows bitter 
horn Rottennefs, of too much Ripenefs. When Fruits are ripe, they talle fweet -, and bitter, 
when over-ripe : Bitternefs and Sweetnefs therefore in Fruits differ but in degree of more and 
.lefs ; which may lie the Realbn why they feem fweet to fome Perfons, whilft they tafte bitter to 
others : Nay, there are thofe to whom Aloes feem as fweet as Honey. The fame may be faid of 
all fenfible Ideas j fo that the Words Sweet, Bitter, Salt, Sovvre, Acid, &c. Red, Green, Yellow, Cfo 
of fuch and fuch a Smell, Savour, Colour, &c. are all equivocal, and raife no clear and diltin£l 
Idea in the Mind. However, School-Philofophers, and the vulgar part of Men, judge of all the 
fenfible Qualities of Bodies by the Senlations they receive from them. 

Nor 



Chap. II. The Search afier Truth. Jj 

Nor do the Philofophers only judge of thefe. fenfible Qualities by their own Senfjitibfis of 
them ; but alio iudge of the Things themielves, from the Judgments they have pafs'd about fen- 
fible Qualities/. For, from their having had Senfatious of certain Qualities^ eiTentially different, 
they judge that there is a Generation of new Forms, producing thofe fantaftick Differences^ 
Wheat appears yellow, hard, &c. Meal, white, foft, &c.. Thence, upon the Teftimony of their 
Eyes and Hands, they infer, That thofe Bodies are, eflentially different, unlefs they chance to. 
think on the Manner of the Tranfmutation of Wheat into. Flower: For Meal is nothing but 
bruifed and ground Corn ; as Fire is only divided and agitated Wood ■, as Allies are but the grolTeif 
Parts of the divided Wood without Agitation ; as Glafs is but Allies, whole Particles have been, 
polilhed and rounded by the Attrition caus'd by the Fire : And fo in other Tranfmutations of 
Bodies. • _ . 

Tis therefore evident, that fenfible Words and Ideas are altogether unserviceable to a juft lta- 
ting, and clear reiblving of ^ueftions -, that is, to the Difcoyery of Truth. Yet there are no Qffe- 
ftions, how intricate foever they may be, by the equivocal Terms of the Senfes, but Ariftotle, 
and molt part of other Philofophers, pretend to refolve them in their Books, without the forego- 
ing DiftincYions, and without confidering that they are. equivocal by Errour and Ignorance. 

If, for example, thofe Perfons who have employed the beft part of their Life in reading Anc ; H 
ent Philofophers and Phyficians, and have wholly imbib'd their Spirit and Opinions, are ask'd 
whether Water be wet, whether Fire be dry, Wine hot, the Blood of Fifties cold, Water 
rawer than Wine, Gold perfeSter than Mercury •, whether Plants and Beafts have Souls -, and a 
thoulaud like undetermin'd ^jicftions ; they raihly anfwer, by confulting only the Impreltions of 
Objects upon their Senfes, or the Tracks the 'reading of Authors has left upon their Memory. 
They never think thofe Terms are equivocal ; 'tis a Wonder to them they Ihould need a Defini- 
tion'^ and they cannot endure thofe that endeavour to let 'em underftand,- that their Procedure is 
too quick, and that they are feduced by their Senfes ; and though they are never at a lofs for 
Diftinciions to perplex the moil evident Things, yet in thefe ^iieftions, in which Equivocation 
• needs fo much to be removed, they find nothing to diftinguilh. 

If we coniider, that molt of the Qiceftions of Philofophers and Phyficians contain ibme equi- 
vocal Terms, like to thofe that have been fpoken of ^ we lhall not doubt, but that thofe Learned 
' Gentlemen, that could not define them, were unable to fay any Thing folid and real, in the bulky 
Volumes they have compos'd : Which is, in a manner, fufficient to overthrow molt of the Opi- 
nions of the Ancients. It is not fo with Des Cartes ; he perfectly knew how to diftinguilh thofe 
Things : He ne'er refolves any Queftion by fenfible Ideas -, and whoever lhall be at the pains to 
read him, lliall fee, that he clearly, evidently, and almbft ever demonftratively, explains the 
chief Operations of Nature by the fole and diftinct Ideas of Extenlion, Figures, and Motion. 

The fecond fort of equivocal Words, that is much in requeft amongft Philofophers, contains 
all thofe general Terms of Logick by which any Thing may be eafily explain'd, without fo much 
as knowing it. Ariftotle was the Man that made the moft of it ; his Books are full of nothing 
elle, and fome are but a mere Logick : He propofes and refolves all Things by the fpecious Words 
of Genus, Species, Att, Power, Nature, Form, Faculty, ^jia/ity^ Caufa per fe, Caufa per acci- 
dens : His Followers can hardly underftand that thofe Words fignifie Nothing,- and that one is not 
more learned than he was, when he has heard, that Fire diflolves Metals by its diflblving Faculty -, 
that a Man digefts not, becaufe his Stomach is weak, or becaufe his Concoffive Faculty does not 
operate as it Ihould do. 

I grant, that thofe who ufe fuch general Terms and Ideas for the Explication of all Things, 
commonly fall not into fo many Errours, as thofe that only employ fuch Words as raife the con- 
fuied Ideas of the Senfes. The School-Philofophers are not fo liable to be deceived, as fome 
opinionative and dogmatical Phyficians, who build Syftems upon Experiments, the Reafons of 
which are unknown to them -, becaufe the School-men talk fo generally, that they do not venture 
much out of their Depth. 

Fire heats, dries, hardens, and foftens, becaufe it has the Faculty of producing thofe Effects : 
Sena purges by its purgative Quality : Bread nourilhes by its nutritious Quality. Thefe Propofi- 
tions are not liable to miftake ; for a Quality is that which denominates a Thing by fuch a 
Name ; Mafter Ariftotle's Definition is undeniable : But he ipeaks true only becaufe he fays no- 
thing ■, and if his rambling, loofe, and indefinite Notions engage not into Errour, at leaft they 
are wholly unferviceable to the Difcovery of Truth. 

For, though we know that there is in Fire a fubftantial Form, attended with a Million of Fa- 
culties, like to that of heating, dilating, melting Gold, Silver, and other Metals, lightening, 
burning, roafting ; the Idea of that fubftantial Form, with all its Faculties of producing Heat, 
Fluidity, Rarefaction, will not help me to refolve this Queftion, Why Fire hardens Clay, and fof- 
tens Wax? There being no Connection betwixt the Ideas of Hardnefs in Clay and Softnefs in 
Wax, and thofe of a fubftantial Form in Fire, and its Faculties of Rarefaction, Fluidity, &c. The 
fame may be faid of all general Ideas ; which are utterly infufficient for reiblving any Queftion. 

But when I know that Fire is nothing elfe but divided Wood, whofe Parts are in a continual 
Agitation, by which alone it raifes in me the Senfation of Heat -, and that the Softnefs of Clay 
confifts in a Mixture of Water and Earth =, thofe Ideas being not general and confufed, but par- 
ticular and diftinct, it will not be difficult to perceive that the Heat of Fire muft harden Clay, 
nothing being ealier to conceive, than that one Body may move another, if it meet with it, being 
it felt' in Motion. We likewife eafily perceive, that fince the Heat we feel near the Fire is caufed 

O by' 



ej4 F. Malebranche Concerning Book VI: 

by the Motion of the invifible Particles of Wood ftriking againft our Hands, Face, &c. if we -ex- 
pofe Clay to the Heat of Fire, the Particles of Water, that are mixed with thole of Earth, be- 
ing more thin and difunited, and confequently more agitated by the A£tion and Impulfe of the 
fiery Corpufcles, than the grofs Particles of Earth, mult be feparated and expelled, and the other 
remain dry and hard. We (hall perceive with the fame Evidence, that Fire muft produce a quire 
contrary EffeO: upon Wax, if we know that it is compofed of Particles that are branched, and 
almoft of the fame Bulk. Thus may particular Ideas be fubfervient to the Enquiry after Truth, 
whilft loofe and undeterminate Notions are not only altogether unferviceable, but alfo infenfibly 
engage us into Errour. 

For, thefe Phil ofophers are not content to make ufe of thofe general Terms, and uncertain 
Ideas which anfwer to them ^ they moreover pretend,_that thofe Words fignifie fome particular 
Beings •, they give out, that there is a Subftance diftinguiihed from Matter, which is the Form of 
it ^ and withal, an infinite Number of little Beings, really dihinguiiTied from that Matter and 
Form, of which they fuppofe as many as they have different Senfations of Bodies, or as thofe 
Bodies are iuppofed to produce different Effetts. 

However, 'tis vifible to any attentive Perfon, that thofe little Beings, for inftance, that are 
faid to be diftinguifhed from Fire, and fuppos'd to be contained in it for the producing Heat, 
Light, Hardnefs, Fluidity, &c. are but the Contrivances of the Imagination, that rebells againft 
Reafon ; fince Reafon has no particular Idea that reprefents thofe little Beings. When the Philo- 
fophers are asked, What is the illuminating Faculty in Fire ? They only anfwer, That 'tis a Be- 
ing which is the Caufe that Fire is capable of producing Light. So that their Idea of that illu- 
minating Faculty differs not from the general Idea of Caufe, and the confufed Idea of the Effect, 
they fee ; and therefore they have no clear Idea of what they fay, when they admit thofe parti- 
cular Beings •, and fo fay what they not only underftand not, but what's impoflible to be under- 
ftood. 



CHAP. III. 

Of the mofl dangerous Errour in the Philofophy of the Ancients. 

)Hilofophers not only fpeak without underftanding themfelves, when they explain the EfFe&s 
of Nature by fome Beings of which they have no particular Idea ^ but alfo eftablifh a Prin- 
ciple whence very falfe and pernicious Confequences may direcf ly be drawn. 

For, fuppofing with them, that there are in Bodies certain Entities diftinguifhed from Matter, 
and having no diftincf Idea of thofe Entities •, 'tis eafie to imagine, that they are the real or prin- 
cipal Caufes of the Effecf s we fee. And this is the very Opinion of the vulgar Philofophers. 
The prime Reafon of their fuppofing thofe fubftantial Forms, real Qualities, and other fuch like 
Entities, is, to explain the EffecFs of Nature : But when we come attentively to confider the 
Idea we have of Caufe or Power of a£ting, we cannot doubt but that it reprefents fomething Di- 
vine : For, the Idea of a Sovereign Power is the Idea of a Sovereign Divinity ^ and the Idea of a 
fubordinate Power, the Idea of an inferiour Divinity, yet a true Divinity-, at leaft, according to 
the Opinion of the Heathens, fuppofing it to be the Idea of a true Power or Caufe. And there- 
fore we admit fomething Divine in all the Bodies that furround us, when we acknowledge Forms, 
Faculties, Qualities, Virtues, and real Beings that are capable of producing fome Effe£ts by the 
force of their Nature ^ and thus infenfibly approve of the Sentiments of the Heathens, by too 
great a Deference for their Philofophy. Faith indeed corrects us , but. it may perhaps be faid, 
that the Mind is a Pagan, whilft the Heart is a Chriftian. 

Moreover, it is a hard Matter to perfuade our felves, that we ought neither to fear nor love 
true Powers and Beings, that can aft upon us, punifh us with fome Pain, or reward us with 
fome Pleafure. And as Love and Fear are a true Adoration, it is hard again to imagine why they 
mult not be ador'd : For, whatever can acf upon us as a true and real Caufe, is neceffarily above 
us, according to Reafon and St. Auftw -, and, by the fame Reafon and Authority, 'tis likewife an 
immutable Law, That inferiour Beings fhouki be fubfervient to fuperiour : Whence that great Fa- 

* Ego emm ther concludes, That the Body cannot operate upon the Soul *, and that nothing can be above her 

nb anima \ m t God only. 

hoc. corpus 

ammari non puto, nifi intentions facientii : nee ab iflo quicquam ilium pati arbitror, fed facere de Mo, <fy in Mo, tanquam fubjelh divinitiu 

domination! fug. 1. 6. Mufc. c. 5. See alfo De quantit. Anim. c. 34. 

The chief Reafons that God Almighty ufes in the Holy Scriptures, to prove to the Ifraelitcs, 
that they ought to adore, that is, to love and fear him, are drawn from his Power to reward Or pu- 
nifh them •, reprefenting to them the Benefits they have received from him,thePunifhments he has 
inflicted upon them, and his Power that is always the fame. He forbids them to adore the Gods of 
the Heathens, as fuch as have no Power over them, and can doe them neither harm nor good. Fie 
commands them to honour him alone, as the only true Caufe of Good and Evil, Reward and Pu- 
Amos %. 6. nifhment:, none of which can befal a City, according to the Prophet, but what comes from him, 
by reafon that natural Caufes are not the true Caufes of the Hurt they feem to doe us ; and as it is 
( ioJ alone that ach in them, fo 'tis He alone that muft be fear'd and lov'd in them : Soli Deo Honor 
■ ' Gloria. ■ Laftlv, 



Chap. lit. 'I he Search after Trtith, eS 

Laltly, The Sehle Of fearing and Loving what may be the true Caufe. of Good and Evil, appears 
lb natural and juft, that it is not poflible to caft it off. So that in that falie Suppofition of the 
Philolbphers, which we are here endeavouring to deitroy, that the iurrounding Bodies are the 
true Caules of our Fain and Pleasure's Reafon feems to jultifie a Religion like the Pagan Idola- 
try, and approve the univerfal Depravation of Morals. 

Reafofl I grant, teaches not, to adore Onions and Leeks, for inftance, as the Sovereign Divi- 
nity ; becaufe they can never make us altogether happy when we have them, or unhappy when 
we want them : neither did the Heathens worfhip them with an equal Homage as their great 
Jupite>\ whom they fanfied to be the God of Gods :, or as the Sun, whom our Settles reprefent as 
the univetfal Caufe, that gives Life and Motion to all things, and which we can hardly forbear 
to look on as the Sovereign Divinity, if we fuppofe, as the Pagan Philolbphers, that he Compre- 
hends in his Being, the true Caules of what he feems .to produce, as well upon our Soul and Bo- 
dy, as upon all the Beings that furround us. 

But if we mult not pay a Sovereign Wbrftiip to Leeks and Onions, they deferve, at lea ft, fome 
particular Adoration h I mean they may be thought upon and loved in fome manner, if it be true, 
that they can in fome fort make us happy, and may be honour'd proportionably to the good they 
doe us. Surely Men that lilten to the Reports of Senfe, think Pulfe capable of doing them good\ 
other wile the Ifraelites would not have bewailed the lofs of them in the Wildernefs, or look'd 
on themfelves as unhappy, for being deprived thereof had they not fanfied to themfelves fome 
great Happinefs in the Enjoyment of them. See what an Abyfs of Corruption Reafon plunges 
us into, when it goes hand in; hand with the Principles of Pagan Philofophy, and follows the foot-- 
iteps of the Settles. 

But that the Falihood of that wretched Phylofophy, and the Certainty of our Principles, and 
Diftincfnefs of our Ideas may not be longer doubted ; it will be necelTary plainly to eftablifh the 
Truths that contradict the Errours of the Ancient Philofophers, or to prove in few words, that 
there is but one true Caufe, fince there is but one true God •, that the Nature and Force of every 
rhing is nothing but the Will of God ^ that all Natural things are not real, but only occafional 
Caules j and fome other Truths depending on them. 

It is evident, that all Bodies, great and little, have no force to move themfelves : a Mountain, 
a Houfe, a Stone, a Grain of Sand, the minuteft and bulkieft Bodies imaginable, are alike as to 
that. We have but two forts of Ideas, viz. of Spirits and Bodies 5 and as we ought not to fpeak 
what we conceive not, fo we muft only argue from thofe two Ideas. Since therefore our Idea 
of Bodies, convinces us that they cannot move themfelves, we muft conclude that they are mo- 
ved by Spirits. But conlidering our Idea of finite Spirits, we fee no necelTary Connexion betwixt 
their Will, and the Motion of any Body whatfoever •, on the contrary, we perceive that there is 
not nor can be any. Whence we muft infer, if we will follow Light and Reafon, That as no • 
Body can move it felf, fo no Created Spirit can be the true and principal Caufe of its Motion. 

But when we think on the Idea of God, or of a Being infinitely perfect, and confequently 
Almighty, we are aware that there is fuch a Connexion betwixt his Will and the Motion of all 
Bodies, that it is impoflible to conceive he mould will that a Body be moved, and if fliould not 
be moved. And therefore if we would fpeak according to our Conceptions, and not according to 
bur Senfations, we muft fay that nothing but his Will can move Bodies. The moving force of 
Bodies is not then in themielves, this force being nothing but the Will of God: Bodies then 
have no proper Acfion, and when a moving Ball meets with another, and moves it, the former 
communicates nothing of its own to the latter, as not having in it felf the Impreflion it com- 
municates ; though the former be the Natural Caufe of the latter's Motion ; and therefore a na- 
tural Caufe is not a true and real Caufe, but only an occafional -, which in fuch or fuch a Cafe de^ 
termines the Author of Nature to act in fuch or fuch a manner. 

'Tis certain that all things are produced by the Motion of vifible or invifible Bodies •, for Ex- 
perience teaches us, that thofe Bodies, whole parts are in greater Motion, are always the molt 
active, and thole that Caufe the greateft Alterations in the World : fo that all the Forces of Na- 
ture are but the Will of God, who Created the World •, becaufe he wilfd it, who /pake and it 
tons done * •, who moves all things, and produces all the Effecfs we fee, becaufe he has eftablilhed * pfal. 33, 
fome Laws, by which Bodies Communicate their Motion to each other when they meet toge- 9- 
ther •, and becaufe thofe Laws are efficacious, they and not the Bodies aeF. There is then no 
Force, Power, nor true Caufe in all the Material and fenfible World : Nor need we admit any 
Forms, Faculties, or real Qualities to produce Effects, which the Bodies bring not forth, or to di- 
vide with God his own ElTential force and Power. 

As Bodies cannot be the true Caules of any thing ^ fo likewife the molt Noble Spirits are fub- 
jecf to the fame impotency on that refpect : They cannot know any thing, unlefs God enlightens 
them , nor have the Senfation of any thing, unlefs he modifies them •, nor wz/Y, unlefs he moves 
them towards himfelf : They may indeed determine the Impreflion God has given them to him- 
felf, towards other Ob]ects •, but I doubt whether it can be calfd a Power. For if to be able to 
fin is a Power, it is fuch a one, as the Almighty wants, faith St. Aufiin fomewhere. If Men 
had of themfelves the Power of loving Good, it might be laid that; they .have fome Powers but 
they cannot fo much as love, but becaufe God Wills it, and that his Will is Efficacious. They 
love, becaufe God continually drives t-liefn towards Good in general, that is, towards himfelf, for 
whom alone they are Created and preferved. God moves them, and not themfelves, towards Good 
in general ; and they only follow that Impreflion by a free Choice, according to the Law of God, 

or 



cj6 F. Maleeranche Concerning Book VI. 

or determine it towards falfe and feeming Goods, according to the Law of the Flefh -, Bat 
they cannot determine it but by the fight of Good. For being able to doe nothing without an Im- 
preilion from above, they are incapable of loving any thing but Good. 

But though it mould be fuppofed, which is true in one fenfe, that Spirits have in themfelves 
the Power of knowing Truths, and loving Good ; mould their Thoughts and Will produce no- 



<: 



ems 



thing outwardly, it might itill be faid, that they were impotent and unoperative. Now it 
undeniable, that the Will of Spirits is not able to move the fmalleft Body in die World ; it being 
evident there is no necefTary Connexion betwixt the Will, we may have of moving our Arm, lor 
inftance, and the Motion of the fame Arm. It moves indeed whenever we will it, and we may 
becall'd, in that fenfe, the natural caufe of the Motion of our Arm ; yet natural Caufes are not 
true, but only occafional^ as acting by the mere force and efficacy of the Will of God, as we have 
already explain'd. 

For how is it poffible for us to move our Arm? To perform this, 'tis requifd we mould have 
Animal Spirits, and fend them through certain Nerves towards certain Mufcles, to fwcli up and 
contract them, for fo that Motion is perform'd, as fome pretend, though others deny it, and af- 
fert that the Myftery is not yet : difcover'd. However it be, molt Men know not fo much as that 
they have Spirits, Nerves and Mufcles, and yet move their Arms with as much and more dexte- 
rity than the molt skilful Anatomilts. Men therefore will the moving their Arm, but 'tis God 
that is able, and knows how to doe it. If a Man cannot overthrow a Tower, yet he knows what 
mult be done to effect it : but not one amongft them knows what the Animal Spirits muft doe to 
move one of his Fingers. How fhould they then move the whole Arm of themfelves? Thefe 
things appear very evident to me, and, I fuppofe, to all thinking Perfons ; though they may be 
incomprehenfible to others, fuch as are only ufed to the confufed voice of the Senfes. 

But Men are fo far from being the true Caufes of the Motions produc'd in their Body, that it 
feems to imply a Contradiction they mould be fo. For a true Caufe is that betwixt which and 
its Efreft, the Mind percieves a necefTary connexion ^ for fo I underftand it. But there is none be- 
fides the infinitely perfe£t Being, betwixt whofe Will and the Effects the Mind can perceive a 
necefTary Connexion , and therefore none but God is the true Caufe, or has a real Power of mo- 
ving Bodies. .Nay, it feems unconceivable, that God fhould communicate this Power, either to 
Angels or Men : And thofe that pretend that the Power we have of moving our Arm is a true 
Power, muft by Confequence grant that God can give Spirirs the Power of creating, annihilating, 
and doing all poffible things ^ in fhort, that he can make them Almighty, as I am going to pove. 

God needs not Inftruments to aft, 'tis enough he fhould Will the Exiftence of a thing, in or-: 
der to its Exifting ; becaufe it is contradictory that he fhould will a thing, and his Will fhould 
not be fulfilled. And theiefore his Power is his Will, and to communicate his Power is to com- 
municate his Will ^ fo that to communicate his Will to a Man or an Angel, can fignifie nothing 
elf*, but to Will that whenever that Man or Angel fhall defire that fuch or fuch a Body be moved, 
it may actually be moved. In which Cafe I fee two Wills concurring together, that of God, and 
that of the Angel, and to know which of them is the true Caufe of the Motion of that Body, I 
enquire which is the Efficacious. I fee a necefTary Connexion betwixt the Will of God, and the 
thing willed :, in this Cafe God wills that whenever the Angel fhall defire that fuch a Body be 
moved, it be really fo. There is then a necefTary Connexion betwixt the Will of God, and the 
Motion of that Body, and confequently God is the true Caufe of that Motion, and the Will of 
the Angel is only occafional. 

Again, to make it more evidently manifeft, let us fuppofe God wills it fhould happen quite 
contrary to the Defire of fome Spirits, as may be thought of the Devils, or fome other wicked 
Spirits in Punifhment of their Sins. In that Cafe it cannot be faid God communicates his Power 
to them ; fince nothing happens of what they wifli. However the Will of thofe Spirits fhall be 
the natural Caufe of the produced Effects : as fuch a Body fhall be removed to the Right, be- 
caufe they wifh it were moved to the Left -, and the Defires of thofe Spirits fhall determine the 
Will of God to act, as the Will of moving the Parts of our Body, determine the firft Caufe to 
move them ^ and therefore the Defires of all finite Spirits are but occafional Caufes. 

If, after all thefe Reafons, it be itill afTerted, that the Will of an Angel moving a Body is a 
true, and not a bare occafional Caufe •, 'tis evident, that the felf-fame Angel might be the true 
Caufe of the Creation and Annihilation of all things, fince God might as well communicate to him 
his Power of Creating, and annihilating Bodies, as that of moving them, if He fhould will that 
they fhould be created, and annihilated : in a word, if he will'd that all things fhould be per- 
formed according to the Angel's Defires, as he wills that Bodies be moved as the Angel pleafss^ 
if therefore it may be faid, that an Angel or Man are true Movers, becaufe God moves Bodies 
as they defire •, that Man or Angel might likewife be call'd true Creatours, fince God might cre- 
ate Beings on occafion of their Will: Nay, perhaps it might be faid, that the vileft of Animals, 
or even mere Matter, is the real Caufe of the Creation of ibme Subftance ^ if it be fuppofed with 
fome Philofophers, that God produces fubftantial Forms, whenever the Difpofition of Matter re- 
quires it. And laftly, fince God has refolved from all Eternity, to create fome certain things, at 
Lome certain times ; thofe Times might alfo be called the Caufes of the Creation of fuch Be- 
ings ; with as much right as 'tis pretended, that a Ball meeting with another is the true Caufe 
of the Motion that is communicated to it h becaufe God, by his general Will, that conftitutes the 
Order of Nature, has decreed, that fuch or fuch Communication of Motions fhould follow up- 
on the Concourfe of two Bodies. 

v There 






Chap. IV". 1 he Search after Truth. tj 

There is then but one true Caufe, as there is one true God : Neither mud we imagine, that what 
precedes an Effect does really produce it. God himfelf cannot communicate his rower to ( 4 fu- 
tures according to the Light of Reafon; He cannot make them true Caufes, and change them in- 
to Gods. But though he might doe it, we conceive not why he fhould will it. Bodies, Spirits, 
pure Intelligences, all can doe nothing. Tis he who has made Spirits, that enlightens and moves 
them; 'tis he who has created Heaven and Earth, that regulates all their Motions: In fine, 'tis 
the Authour of our Being that performs our Defires-, Semet jiijjit, few per punt .- He moves even 
our Arms, when we life them agairift his Orders-, for he complains hy his Prophets, That w r e 
make him fubfervient to our urijirft and* criminal Defires. 

All thofe little Divinities of the Heathens, all thole particular Caufes of Philofophers, areC/v- 
vicras, which the wicked Spirit endeavours to fet up, that he may deltroy the Worfhip of the 
true God. The Philofophy we have received from Adam^ teaches us no iuch things ; but that 
which has been propagated by the Serpent; for, ever fince the Fall, the Mind of Man is turned 
Heathen. That Philofophy, join'd to the Errours of the Senfes, has made Men pay their Wor- 
fhip to the Sun, and is itill the univerfal Caufe of the Diforders of their Mind, and the Corrup- 
tion of their Heart. Why, fay they, by their Actions, and fometimes by their Words, fhould vvc 
not love Bodies, fince they are able to afford us Pleafure? And why are the lfrjclhes blam'd for 
lamenting the Lofs of the Garlick and Onions of Egypt, fince the Privation of thofe things, which 
enjoyed, afforded them fome Happinefs, made tliem in fbme fort unhappy? But the Philofophy 
that is mif-call'd New, and reprefented as a Bugbear to frighten weak Minds ; that is defpifect 
and condemned without hearing: that New Philibfophy, I fay, (fince it muff, 'nave that name,) 
deitroys all the Pretences of the Libertines, by the eftablifhing its very firii Principle that per- 
fectly agrees with the firft Principle of the Chriltian Religion*, namely, That we mult love and * ffkc cjl 
fear none but God, fince none but He alone can make us happy. Religh 

ChrijHana, 
fratres met, qua pr&dkatur per univerfum mundurn horreniibm inimkis, & ubi vincuntur murmurantibm, ubi prevalent [avkntibw ; b&c ell 
Religh Chriftmna, mt COLATVR VNVS DEVS, NON MVLTI DII, QVIA NON FACIT ANIMAM BE- 
AT AM NISI VNVS DEVS. Aug. Tr. 23. in Joan. 

As Religion declares that-there is but one true God, fd this Philofophy mews that there is but 
one true Caufe. As Religion 'teaches that all the Heathen Divinities are but dead Metals, and 
immovable Scone; fo this Philofophy difcovers, that all the fecond Caufes, or Divinities of the 
Philofophers, are but una&ive Matter, and ineffeftive Wills. As Religion commands, not to bow 
to thofe Gods that are not Gods, fo this Philofophy teaches, not to proftrate our Minds and Ima^ 
gination before the phantaftick Grandeur and Power of pretended Caufes, which are not Caufes: 
which we ought neither to love, nor to fear, nor be taken up with ; but think upon God alone, fee 
and adore, love and fear him in all things. 

But that's not the Inclination of fome Philofophers ; they will neither fee God, nor think upon 
him ; for ever fince the Fall there is a fecret Oppofitiort betwixt God and Man. They delight in 
Gods of their own Invention; in loving and fearing the Contrivances of their Heart, as the Hea- 
thens did the Works of their Hands. They are like thofe Children, who tremble at the fight of 
their Play -Fellows, after they have dawb'd and blacken'd them. Or, if they defire a more noble 
Comparifon, though perhaps not fo juft, they referable thofe famous Romans, who reverenced the 
Fi&ions. of their Mind, and foolifhly adored their Emperours, after they themfelves had let loofe 
the Eagle at their Canonization. 



CHAP. IV. 

An Explication of the Second Part of the General Rule : That the Philo- 
fophers obfeirve it not y but that Des Cartes has exaBly followed it. 

WE have been (hewing to what Errours Men are liable, when they reafon upon the falie 
and confufed Ideas of the Senfes, and their rambling and undetermin'd N otions of Lo- 
gick ; whence it appears, that to keep to Evidence in our Perceptions, 'tis abfolutely necefTarv 
exact ly to obferve that Rule ive have prefcrib'd ; and to examine which are the clear and diftinct 
Ideas of things, that we may only argue by deduction from them. 

In that fame general Rule, concerning the Subject of our Studies, there is yet a remarkable 
Circumftance ; namely, That we mult ftill begin with the molt fimple and eafie things, and in- 
fill: long upon them, before we undertake the Enquiry after the more compofed and difficult. For 
if, to preferve Evidence in all our Perceptions, we mull only reafon upon diftinft Ideas, 'tis plain 
that w r e mull never meddle with the Enquiry of compound things, before the fimple, on xvhich 
they depend, have been carefully examin'd, and made familiar to us by a nice Scrutiny ; fince the 
Ideas of compound things, neither are, nor can be clear, as long as the molt fimple, of which 
they are compofed, are but confufedly and imperfectly known. 

We know things imperfectly, when we are not lure to have confidered all their Parts : and we 
know them confufedly, when they are not familiar enough to the Mind, though we may be cer- 
tain of having confider'd all their Parts. When we know them but imperfectly, our Argumen- 
tations are only probable : when we perceive them confufedly, there is neither Order not Light 

P in" 



£ 8 K Malebranche Conferring Book VI- 

in our Inferences ; and often we know not where we are, or whither we are going : But when 
we know them both imperfectly and confufedly, which is the commoneit of all, we know not io 
much as what we would look for, much lefs by what Means we are to find it : So that it is al- 
together necejfary to keep ftrictly to that Order in our Studies, Of JIM beginning by the mqft 
.fimple 'Things, examining all their Parts, and being we'll acquainted with then/, before we meddle 
with the more compqfed, that depend on the former. 

But that Rule agrees not with the Inclination of Man, who naturally defpifes whatever ap- 
pears eafie ; his Mind being made for an unlimited Object, and almoft incomprehenfible, cannto 
make a long Stay on the Consideration of thofe fimple Ideas, which want the Character of Infi- 
nite, for which he is created. On the contrary, and for the lame Reafon, he has much fenera- 
tion, and an eager Pailion, for great, obfcure, and myfterious Things, and fuch as .participate of 
Infinity : Not that he loves Darknefs \ but that he hopes to find in thofe deep ReceiTes a Good, 
and Truth capable of fatisfying his Defires. 

Vanity likeWife gives a great Commotion to the Spirits, flirting them to what is great and ex- 
traordinary, and encouraging them with a foolifh Hope of hitting right. Experience teaches, 
that the molt accurate Knowledge of ordinary Things gives no great Name in the World -, 
whereas to be acquainted with uncommon Things, though never fo confufedly and imperfectly, 
always procures the Efteem and Reverence of thofe who willingly conceive a great Idea of what- 
ever is out of their depth of Underftanding : And that Experience determines all thofe who are 
more fenfible to Vanity than to Truth, (which certainly make up the greateft Number) to a 
blind-fold Search of a fpecious, though chimerical, Knowledge of What is great, rate, and un- 
intelligible. 

How many are there that reject the Cartejian Philofophy, for that ridiculous Reafon, That its 
Principles are too fimple and eafie : There are in this Philofophy no obfcure and myfterious 
Terms; Women, and Perfons unskilfd in Greek and Latin, are capable of learning it. It mult 
then be, fay they, fomething very inconfiderable, and unworthy the Application of great Genius's. 
They imagine, that Principles fo clear and fimple are not fruitful enough to explain the Effects of 
Nature, which they fuppofed to be dark, intricate, and confufed : They fee not prefently the 
life of thofe Principles, that are too fimple and eafie to flop their Attention long enough to make 
them underftand their Ufe and Extent. They rather chufe to explain Effects whole Caufes are 
unknown to them, by unconceivable Principles, than by fuch as are Jboth fimple and intelligible. 
For the Principles thefe Philolbphers are wont to explain obfcure Things by, are not only obfcure 
themfelves, but utterly incomprehenfible. 

Thofe that pretend to explain Things extremely intricate, by Principles clear and generally re- 
ceiv'd, may eafily be refuted, if they fiicceed not -, fince to know whether what they fay be true, 
one needs only comprehend well what they fay. The falfely-learn'd are not pleafed with this, 
and obtain not the Admiration they purfue in ufing intelligible Principles ; for, as foon as one un- 
derftands their Notions, he plainly perceives that they fay nothing : But when they make ufe of 
unknown Principles, and fpeak of very complex^d Things as though they exactly knew all their 
Relations, they are admired by their Hearers, who underftand not what they fay ; becaufe we are 
naturally inclined to reverence whatever goes above the reach of our Underftanding. 

Now, as obfcure and incomprehenfible Things feem to hang better with each other, than with 
fuch as are clear and intelligible •, fo incomprehenfible Principles are much more made ufe of in 
Aery difficult and abftrufe Queftions, than fuch as are eafie and intelligible. There is nothing fb 
difficult, but, by the means of thefe Principles, Philofophers and Phyficians will folve it in few 
Words ; for their Principles being yet more incomprehenfible than any Queftions that can be pro- 1 
pofed them, thofe Principles being taken for granted, no Difficulty can afterwards put them to a 
Nonplus. 

Thus, for inftance, they boldly, and without boggling, make anfwer to thefe datk and unde- 
termin'd Queftions, viz. Why the Sun attracts Vapours ? Why the Peruvian Bark flops the Quar- 
tan Ague ? Why Rhubarb purges Choler, and the Polychreft-Salt Phlegm > and the like. Moft 
Men feem pretty well fatisfied with their Anfwers, becaufe obfcure and incomprehenfible Things 
ihake Hands together : But unintelligible Principles fuit not Queftions that may be clearly and 
eafily refblv'd, becaufe by that Solution it plainly appears, that they are altogether infignificanr. 
The Philofophers cannot explain, by their Principles, How Horfes draw a Coach ? Why Duft 
flops a Watch ? How the Trepoly-Stone cleanfes Metals, and a Brufh our Clothes > For, they 
would appear ridiculous to all the World, fhould they fuppofe a Motion of Attraction, and At- 
tractive Faculties, to explain why the Coach follows the Horfes ^ and a Deterfive Faculty in the 
Brufh, for clcanfing of Clothes, &c. So that their great Principles are only ferviceable in dark 
and intricate Queftions, by reafon of their Incomprehenfibility. 

We ought not therefore to infilt upon any Principle that appears not plain and evident, and of 
which it may be fuppofed, that fome Nations reject it : But we muft attentively confider the Ideas 
we have of Extenfion, Figure, and Local Motion, and the Relations they have between them ; 
If we conceive them diftinctly, and find them fo plain and clear, as to be perfuaded they were 
ever generally received by all Nations, we muft dwell upon them, and examine all their Relati- 
ons: But if they feem obfcure and dark to us, wc muft endeavour to find others. For, if to 
avoid the Fear of Miftakes and Errours, it is always requifite to preferve Evidence in our Percep- 
tions, it follows, that Ave mult argue only from clear Ideas, and from Relations diftindly 
known. 

To 



Chap. IV. The Search after Truth. jp 

Toconfider in order the Properties of Extenlion, we muft, as Des Cartes did, Begin with tHe 
molt fimple Relations, and thence proceed to the more compofed ; not only becaufe this Method 
is the molt natural, and bears up the Mind in its Operations ; but alio becaufe God ever acting 
with Order, and by the molt fimple Ways, that fort of Examination of our Ideas, and their Re- 
lations, will better manifelt to us his Works. And if we confider, that the molt fimple Relati- 
ons always offer themfelves firlt to the Imagination, when' 'tis not determin'd to think rather on 
one Thing than another, it will appear, that to find out that Order we prefcribe, and to difcover 
very compofed Truths, it is fufficient to look attentively, and without prejudice, upon Objects % 
provided always we skip not too haitily from one Subjecl to another. 

When we look attentively upon Matter, we eafily conceive that one Part may be feparated from 
another :, that is to fay, we eafily conceive a Local Motion, which Motion produces a Figure in 
each of the Bodies moved. The molt fimple of all Motions, which firlt occurs to the Imagina- 
tion, is a Motion in a Right Line. Suppofing then, that fome Part of Matter is moved in a 
Right Line, it will neceffarily difplace fome other Portion of Matter it mall find in its way, 
which latter (hall circularly move to take the Room which the former has left : Hence comes a 
Circular Motion. And if we conceive infinite Motions in a Right Line, in an infinite number of 
fimJiar Parts of that immenfe Extenfion we confider, it will again neceffarily follow, that all thefe 
Bodies mutually liindring each other, fliall all confpire by their reciprocal Aclion and Re-action, 
that is, by the mutual Communication of all their particular Motions, to produce one that is 
Circular. 

That firlt Confederation of the molt fimple Relations of our Ideas, already difcovers to us the 
neceffity of the Vortexes of Des Cartes, that their Number will be lo much greater, as the Mo- • 
tions in a Right Line of all the Parts of the Extenfion, having been more contrary to each other, 
fhall with more difficulty have been redue'd to the fame Motion ; and that amonglt thofe Vor- 
texes, the greatelt will be thole in which molt Parts fhall have concurred together to the lame 
Motion, or whofe Parts fhall have had more Strength to continue their Motion in a Right Line. 

In the mean while, care mult be taken not to diffipate nor weary our Mind, by vainly apply- 
ing it to the vaft Number and unrheafurable Greatnefs of thofe Vortexes ; We mult rather infift 
upon fome one of them for fome time, and orderly and attentively enquire after all the Moti- 
ons of the Matter it contains, and all the Figures wherewith the Parts of that Matter may be 
endued. 

As there is no fimple Motion but that in a Right Line, we muft firft confider it, as that in 
\vhich all Bodies cotinually tend to move themfelves ; fince God always a£ts by the molt fimple 
Ways : And if Bodies move Circularly, 'tis only becaufe meeting with conftant Oppofitions, 
they*are perpetually turn'd from their direct Motion. So that all Bodies being not of an equal 
Bulk, and the biggeft having more Strength than others to continue their Motion in a Right Line, 
we eafily conceive, that the fmalleft Bodies muft fink to the Centre of the Vortex, and the big- 
geft rife towards the Circumference ; fince the Lines which moving Bodies are fuppos'd to de- 
fcribe at the Circumference of a Circle, are nearer to a Right Line, than thofe which they de^ 
fcribe towards the Centre. 

If we conceive again, that every Part of that Matter could not at firft move, and meet with 
a perpetual Oppofition to its Motion, without being fmooth'd and rounded, and having its Angles 
broken off ; we fhall difcover, that all that Extenfion Will be compos'd of two forts of Bodies, 
viz. of round Globules, which perpetually turn upon their own Centre, and that in feveral diffe- 
rent Ways, and, befides that particular Motion, are carried about by the Motion common to all 
the Vortex-, and of a very, fluid and agitated Matter, produced from the Motion of the fore- 
faid Globules. Befides the Circular Motion common to all the Parts of the Vortex, that fubtle 
Matter muft yet have another particular, and almoft dire£t, from the Circle of the Vortex to the 
Circumference, through the Intervals of the Globules, that leave a PaiTage open : So that the 
Motion compofed of thofe Motions will reprefent a Spiral Line. That fluid Matter, call'd by 
Des Cartes, the jirji Element, being divided- into Parts that are much fmaller, and have not fb 
much ftrength to continue their direct Motion, as the Globules, or fecond Element -, 'tis evident, 
that the firlt Element muft take up the Centre of the Vortex,, and fill the empty Spaces which 
the Parts of the Second leave between them ; and that the reft of the Vortex muft be filled with 
tliofe Parts of the Second, and come nearer to the Circumference, proportionally to their Bulk, 
or to the Force they have of continuing their Motion in a Direct Line. As to the Figure of the 
whole Vortex, after what has been faid, it cannot be doubted^ but that the Diftance from one 
Pole to the other, will be fhorter than that of the Line which" cuts the Equator. And if we 
confider that the Vortexes furround and comprefs each other unequally, we fhall plainly fee that 

their Equator * is a crooked irregular Line, that comes near to an Ellipfis. * By Equa- 

tor I under- 
ftand the greateft Crooked Line which the Matter of the Vortex defcribes, 

Thefe are the Things that offer themfelves naturally to the Mind, -when we attentively con- 
fider what fhould happen to the Parts of Extenfion, perpetually tending to move in a Right Line, 
that is, in the moft fimple Motion. If we now fuppofe a Thing which feems molt worthy the 
Divine Power and Wifdom, namely, That God has formed the whofe Univerfe at once, in the 
fame State thofe Parts would have naturally fallen into and difpofed themfelves in time, by the 
molt fimple Ways ; and that he preferves them by the fame natural Laws : In a word, if we 
compare our Ideas with the vifible Objects, we (hall conclude, that the Sun is the Centre of 

the 



60 F. Malebrancme Conc^rnino Book .VI. 

xlicVorirx ; that the Corporeal Light, which it diffufes every where, is nothing but the continual 
Effort of the little Globules, tending to remove from the Centre of the Vortex ; which Light rriuft he 
communicated in an Inftant through thofe vaft Spaces, becaufe they being full of thole Globules, 
one cannot be prefs'd upon, without the Motion of all the others that are oppoiite to ir. 

Several other Confequences may be drawn, from what has been laid, becaufe the moil fimpie 
Principles are the moft fruitful to explain the Works of a Being which always acts by the moil 
fimpie Ways. But we Hill want to confider fome Things that will be incident to Matter. Let 
us then imagine, that there are feveral Vortexes, like to that we have defcribed in few Words ; 
that the Stars, which are fo many Suns, are the Centres of thofe Vortexes, which furround each 
other, and are difpofed in fuch a manner, as that they hinder one anothers Motion the leaft they 
can ; but that before Things came to that Perfection, the weakeft Vortexes were carried away, 
and as it were fwallowed up by the ftrongeft. 

To nnderftand this, we need but fuppofe that the firft Element, which is at the Centre, may ily i 
and perpetually flies out through the Intervals of the Globules, towards the Circumference of the 
Vortex -, and that at the fame time that this Centre or Star empties it felf through the Equator, 
other Matter of the firft Element comes into it through the Poles ; for neither the Star nor its 
Poles can empty themfelves at one fide, without being filFd at another, fince there is no Vacuity 
in Extenfion. But as an infinite number of Cauies may hinder a great Quantity of the firft Ele- 
ment from coming into that Star, the Parts of the firft Element that fhall be forced to remain hi 
it, will be necefhtated to adapt themfelves fo, as to move one and the fame way -, which cauies 
them to fallen and link themfelves together, and conftitutes them into Spots ; which condenfing 
and thickning into Quits, cover by degrees the Centre ; and out of the moil fubtil and agitated 
of all Bodies, are form'd into grofs and folid Matter. This courfe fort of Matter is called by 
Des Cartes, the third Element, and is endued with an infinite number of Shapes and Figures, as is 
the firft Element, from which it is generated and produced. 

, That Star being thus over-grown with Spots and Crufts, and become like the other Planets, 
has no longer a iufficient Strength to defend its Vortex againft the continual Struggle and Irrupti- 
ons of thole that furround it ; therefore it infenfibly diminifhes : The Matter that compofes it, is 
difperfed on all fides,' and the ftrongeft of the neighbouring Vortexes carries the greateft part 
away, and at laft involves the Planet that is the Centre of it. This Planet being wholly fur- 
rounded with the Matter of the great Vortex, fwims along in it, only keeping, together with 
fome of the Matter of its own Vortex, its former Circular Motion, and takes at laft fuch a Si- 
tuation, as puts it in JEquilibrio with an equal Quantity of the Matter in which it iwims. If it 
has but little Solidity and Magnitude, it defcends very near the Centre of the furrounding Vor- 
tex -, becaufe having no great Force to continue its Motion in a Right Line, it mull take fuch a 
Place in that Vortex, as that an equal Quantity of the fecond Element, endeavouring to remove' 
from the Centre, may be in .JEquilibrio with it ■, that being the only Place where it can be ex- 
actly balanc'd. If that Planet be of greater Bulk and Solidity, it muft feek its JEquilibrium in 
a Place more diftant from the Centre of the Vortex. And laftly, If there is no Place in the Vor- 
tex, in which an equal Quantity of its Matter hath as much Solidity as this Planet, and confe- 
quently as much Strength to continue its Motion in a Direct Line, perhaps becaufe the Planet 
fhall be very bulky, and over-grown with very folid and condens'd Crafts ; it fhall not flop in 
that Vortex, as finding no JEquilibrium in the Matter that compofes it ; but pafs from Vortex to 
Vortex, until it meets with a Place in which it may be equally balanced by a competent Quan- 
tity of Matter ; fo that it will fometimes be feen in its PaiTage, as the Comets are, when it 
fhall be in our Vortex, and at a convenient Diftance from us : But it will not be feen in a long 
time, when it fhall be in other Vortexes, or in the utmoft Boundary of ours. 

If we hereupon conclude, that a fingle Vortex may, by reafon of its Bulk, Strength, and ad- 
vantageous Situation, infenfibly undermine, involve, and carry away feveral Vortexes, and even 
fuch as fhall have conquer'd others -, it will neceflarily follow, that the .Planets that have been 
form'd in the Centre of the conquer'd Vortexes, being entered into the great and conquering Vor- 
tex, place themfelves in JEquilibrio with an equal Volume of the Matter in which they fwim : 
So that if thofe Planets are unequal in Solidity, they will float at unequal Diftances from the 
Centre of the Vortex in which they fwim. But if two Planets have very near the fame Force 
to continue that Direft Motion ; or if a Planet carries in its fmall Vortex one or feveral other 
imaller Planets, which it fhall have conquer'd, according to our Way of conceiving the Forma- 
tion of Things : Then the fmalleft Planets will turn about the greateft, whilft the greateft fhall 
turn upon its own Centre ; and all thefe Planets fhall be carried by the Motion of the great Vor- 
tex, at a Diftance very near equal from its Centre. 

We are obliged, by the Light of Reafon, to difpofe in that Order the Parts that compofe the 
whole Univerfe, which we imagine to have been formed by the moft fimpie Ways. For all that 
had been faid is only grounded on the Idea of Extenfion, the Parts of which are fuppofed to 
move in the moft fimpie Motion, which is that in a Right Line. And when we examine by the 
Effects, whether we are miftaken in the Explication of Things by their Cauies, we are furprized 
to fee the Phenomena of Celeftial Bodies fo perfectly agreeing with our Ratiocinations. For we 
perceive all the Planets that are in the middle of a fmall Vortex turning upon their own Centre, 
as the Sun does, and fvvimming in the Vortex of the Sun, and about the Sun 5 the fmalleft and 
Leaft folid neareft to ir, and the moft folid at a greater diftance. We likewiie obferve, that there 
are lc»ne : as die Com :• is. which cannot remain in the Vortex of the Sun: And laftly, that there 

are 



Chap. IV. fixe Search after Truth. 6t 

are feveral Planets, which have other fmaller turning about them, as the Moon does about the 
F.nrth: Jupiter has four of them, Mars has three, and perhaps Saturn has ib many, and ih 
lmall, that they refemblea continued Circle, of which the thicknefs cannot be perceived, bec-auie 
of their too vaft diftance. Thofe, ; Planets being the biggeft^we can obferve;, , it may be iirugin'd. 
that they have been produced from Vortexes which Had a fufficient lhength to conquer others, 
before they were involved in the Yprtex we live in. ., , 

All thefe Planets turn upon their own Centre, the Earth within 24. hours, Mars within 2^. or 
thereabouts, Jupiter within about 10, &c. They all turn about the Sun, Mercury the neareit in 
about 4. Months-, Saturn the remoteft in about 30. Years, and thofe that are betwixt them i . 1 
more or left time, which however keep not an exaft proportion with their diftance. For the mat- 
ter in which they fwim makes a fwifter Circumvolution when 'tis nearer to the Sun, becaufe the 
Line of its Motion is then mortem When Mars is oppolite to. the Sun, he is then near enough to 
the Earth, but is at a vaft diitance from it when he is in Conjunction with him. The like may 
be faid of the other fuperiour Planets, as Saturn and Jupiter -, for the inferiour, as Venm and. 
Mercury are, to fpeak properly, never oppolite to the Sun. The Lines, which all the Planets feem 
to defcribe about the Earth, are no Circles^ but are very like Ellipfes, which Ellipfes feem very 
much to differ, becaufe of the different Situation of the Planets in reference to us. Jri mo'rt, 
whatever may be obferved with any certainty in the Heavens, touching the Motion of the Planets 
perfectly agrees with what has been faid of their Formation by the molt fimple ways. 

As to the fixed Stars, Experience teaches us, that fome diminifh and entirely vanifli away, 
whilft others that are wholly new appear •, the luftre and bulk of which fenfibly increafe. They 
increafe or diminifh proportionably as the Vortexes, in whofe Centre they lye, admit more or 
left of the firft Element. We ceale to fee them when they are overfpread with Spots and Crufb, 
and begin to difcover them, when thofe Spots, which obftru£t their luftre, are entirely diffipated. 
All thefe Stars keep very near the fame diftance from each other, fince they are Centres of Vor- 
texes which are not conquer'd, and remain Stars as long as they can refill: the Invafion of others. 
They are all bright like as many little Suns, becaufe they are all, as he is, the Centers of uncon- 
quer'd Vortexes. They are all at an unequal diftance from the Earth, though they appear as if 
they were faftned to a Vault ; for if the rarallaxe of the neareft with the remoteft has not yet 
been obfervable, by the different fituation of the Earth from 6 to 6 Months ; it is becaufe that 
difference is too inconfiderable in reference to our diftance from the Stars, to make that Parallaxe 
fenfible. Perhaps by means of the Telefcopes, it will one day or other become fomewhat obfer- 
vable. " In fhort, whatever the Senfes and Experience may obferve in the Stars, differs not from 
what we have difccver'd by the Mind, whilft we examin'd the moft fimple and natural Relations 
that are betwixt the Parts and the Motions of Extenfion. 

To fearch after the Nature of Terreftrial Bodies •, we muft conceive that the firft Element be- 
ing made up of an infinite number of different Figures, the Bodies that refult from their Mixture 
muft be very different. So that there will be fome whole Parts fhall be branched, others long, 
others very near round, but all irregular, feveral ways. When their Parts are branched and groft, 
they are hard, but flexible, andnotelaftick, as Gold: If their Parts benotfo groft, they are fbft, 
and fluid, as Gums, Fats, Oyles ^ but if their branched Parts be extremely fine, they are like the 
Air. If the long Parts of Bodies are groft and inflexible, they are pungent, incorruptible, and.dif- 
folvible, as Salts ^ if thofe long Parts be flexible, they are inlipid like Water $ if the groft Parts 
be of very irregular and different Figures, they are like Earth and Stones. In fhort, thence muft 
needs arife Bodies of feveral different Natures, and two will hardly be found exa&ly alike, by rea- 
fon of the infinite number of Figures incident to the firft Element, which can never be complicated 
after the fame manner in two different Bodies. What Figure foever thofe Bodies may have, if their 
Pores be large enough to give way to the fecond Element's paffmg all manner of ways, they will be 
tranfparent like Air, Water, Glais, isfc. If the firft Element entirely furrounds fome of their Parts 
and affords them a fufficient force and commotion to repel the fecond Element on all fideSj they 
will appear Luminous like flame - y if they drive back all the fecond Element that falls upon them, 
they will be very white ; if they receive it without repelling it, they will be very black -, and laft- 
ly, if they repel it by feveral Concuflions and Vibrations, they will appear of different colours. 

As to their Situation, the heavieft, or thofe that have leaft force to continue their dire£t Motion, 
will be the neareft to the Centre, as are Metals : Earth, Water and Air, will be more remote, and 
all Bodies will keep the fame Situation in which we obferve them-, becaufe they will recede from 
ike Centre of the Earth, as far as their Motion will allow. 

It muft not feem ftrange that I now fay, that Metals have left force to continue their direct 
Motion, than Earth, Water, and other left folid Bodies, though I have formerly laid, that the 
moft folid Bodies have more ftrengh than others to continue their direct Motion. For the Rea- 
fon why Metals are not fo apt to continue to move, as Earth and Stones, is that Metals have left 
Motion in themfelves •, it being true however, that of two Bodies unequal in folidity, but mo- 
ved with an equal fwiftnefs, that the moft folid will have more force to purfue its Motion in a 
right Line •, becaufe the moft folid has then the greater Motion^ and that Motion is the Caufe of 
ftrength. 

But if we would underftand the Reafon why Bodies, groft and folid, are heavy towards the- 
Center of Vortexes, but light at a confiderable diftance from it 5 we muft know, that thefe Bodies 
receive their Motion from the fubtle matter that invirons them, and in which they fwim. Now 
that fubtle matter actually moving in a Circular Line, and only tending to move in a right Line y 

a fc 



6 2 F. Malebranche Concerning Book Yf . 

it only Communicates that Circular Motion to the grofs Bodies it carries along with it: and as 
to its tendency to remove from the Centre in a Right Line, it only communicates that 10 them 
as far as it is a neceflary fequel of the Circular communicated Motion. For it mult be obferved, 
that the Parts of the fubtle matter tending to different fides, can only compreis the grofs Body 
- they convey > fince that Body cannot go feveral different ways at the lame time. But beeauie the 
fubde Matter, that lies about the Centre of the Vortex, has a far greater Motion than that which 
itipends in circulating, and becaufe it communicates only its Motion Circular, and common to 
all its Parts, to the grofs Bodies which it carries-, and that if thefe Bodies mould chance to have 
more Motion than what is common to the Vortex, they would foon lofe that overplus, by communica- 
ting it to the little Bodies they meet with ; thence 'tis evident, that grofs Bodies, towards the Cer/re 
of the Vortex, have not fo much Motion as the Matter in which they iwim; each part of which 
has its own particular and various Motion, befides the Cicular and common. Now if grofs Bo- 
dies have lels Motion, they havelefs Tendency to move in a right Line, and if they have lefs Ten- 
dency, they aie fore'd to yield to thole that have rnCre, and confequently to approach the Centre 
of the Vortex, that is,, infhort they mu ft be heavyer, as they are more grofs and folid. 

But when folid Bodies are very remote from the Centre of the Vortex, as the Circular Mo- 
tion of the fubtle Matter is then very great, becaufe it fpends very near its whole Motion in 
wheeling about-, Bodies have then ib much more Motion as 'they have more Solidity ; becaufe 
they go as .iwift as the fubtle Matter in which they Iwim : and ib they have more force to con- 
tinue their direct Motion. Wherefore grofs Bodies at a certaine diitance from the Centre of the 
Vortex, are fo much lighter as they are more folid. 

This makes it apparent, that the Earth is metallick towards the Centre, and not fo folid a- 
bout.the Circumference -, that Water and Air muft remain in the Situation wherein we fee them} 
' * That is, but that all thofe Bodies are * ponderous -, the Air as well as Gold and Quick-filver ; becaufe 
we dnven t j ie y ale more fc^ . dn & g ro f s t j ian t h e £ r fl- and fecond Element. This fliews likewife that the 
thcTcen- Moon is. at too great a dillance from the Centre of the Vortex of the Earth to be heavy, though it 
tre of the be folid ; that Mercury, Venus, the Earth, Mars, Jupiter, and Saturn, cannot fall into the Sun, and 
jLarth. that they arc not folid enough to travel out of this Vortex, as the Comets do ; that they are in 
JEquilibrio with the Matter in which they iwim, and that if a Musket Ball, or a Cannon Bullet, 
could be (hot high enough, thofe two Bodies would become little Planets, or perhaps Comets, that 
would not ftay in any Vortex, as being endued with a competent Solidity. 
. I pretend not to have fufficiently explain'd all the things I have mention'd, or to have de- 
duced from the fimple Principles of Extenfion, Figure and Motion all the poflible Inferences, 
I only intended to mew the Method Des Cartes has ufed in the difcovery of Natural things, that 
this Method and his Ideas may be compared with thofe of other Philofophers ^ I defigifd here 
no more, and yet I may venture to afTert, that if one would fuperfede admiring the Virtue of 
the Loadftone, the regular Motion of the ebbing and flowing of the Sea, the noife of Thunder, 
the Generation of Meteors ; in more, if any defire to get a well-grounded Knowledge of Natu- 
ral Philofophy, as he can doe nothing better than to read and meditate his Books ■, fo he can doe 
nothing at all, unlefs he follows his Method , I mean unlefs he Reafon as he did, upon clear I- 
deas, (till beginning with the moil fimple and familiar. 

Neither do I pretend that this Author is Infallible-, for I think I can demonftrate that, he has 
been miftaken in feveral places of his works. But 'tis more advantageous for his Readers to be- 
lieve that he hath been deceived, than if they were perfuaded that whatever he faid was true: 
A Man that mould take him to be infalible would read him without Examination, believe him 
without underftanding what he fays, learn his Opinions as we learn Hiftory, and would never 
form and perfect his Mind. Hehimielf advertifes his Readers to obferve whether he be deceived, 
and to believe nothing of what he fays^ but what the Evidence compells them to. For he is 
not like thofe falfe pretenders to Science, who endeavouring to Lord it over the Minds, will be 
believed upon their own word ; and who initead of making Men the Difciples of the inward 
Truth, by propofing only clear and diftinft Ideas, labour what they can to iubmit them to the 
Authority of Heathens, and prefs upon Men incomprehenfible Opinions by unintelligible Reafons. 

The chief thing that is found fault with in Des Carte fs Syftem, is the manner in which he 
feigns that the Sun, Stars, Earth, and all the Bodies that furround us, have been produced-, for- 
aimuch as it feems contrary to what Holy Writ teaches us of the Creation of the World} fince, 
according to him, one would fay, that the whole Univerfe has been formed of its own accord, 
ib as Ave fee it now a-days^ to which feveral Anfwers may be made. 

- Firft, As to the pretended Contrarieties betwixt Mqfes and Des Cartes, thofe that aifert it, have 
not perhaps examin'd them both, with as much Attention as thofe who have fhewn, by pub- 
lick Writings, that the facred Hiftory of the Creation perfectly agrees with the opinion of that 
Philofopher. 

. But the chief Anfwer is, that Des Cartes never pretended that things mould ever have been 
made by degrees, and as he delcribes them. For at the firft Article of the Fourth Part of his 
Philofophical Principles, which runs thus : That the former Hypothefts is to be retained, notwith- 
standing its being falfe, to find out tl)c true Cajtfcs of natural Things -, he exprefly afferts the con- 
trary in theic words. 'Though [pretend not that the Bodies of this vifible World were ever produ- 
ced in the manner that Inn been dejenbed before, of which the Reader has been already fufficiently fore- 
warn d; yet I mujl fill keep to the fame liypothefis, to explain what appears upon Earth ; tor if I 
n/ay t ,n [ hope I can, plainly JJ.wic by thofe vieans the m f intelligible andcertui/l Caufes of all~Na- 

tural 



Chap. IV. The Search "affafi Trnih. jfjij 

turd! things, and they cannot be found out another zoay-, I may thence reafonably cc/uhidc, thrt fydngk 
the World was not Ut the Beginning J 'ravid in this manner, but created immediately by Cod, ye/ 
Nature of alt things it contains ceajes not to be the very fame, as though they had been produced ul 
that very method. 

Dcs Cartes knew that to underftand the Nature of things, they mufl' be confidefd in their Bit th 
and Original, and that beginning with thole that are molt iimple, we ought to drive them up to 
the Fountain head, and that the bufinefs is not to examine,- whether God working by the molt 
Iimple ways, formed the World by degrees, or ftruck it out at a fingle Blow ; but that, in 
what manner, foever God may have produced his Works, they ought to' be mil confidefd in their 
Principles, if we would understand them, and afterwards we mould obferve. how confiftent our 
thoughts are with the Operations of God, by comparing them together; He Knew that the Laws 
of Nature, by which God preferves all his Works in their prelent Order and Situation are the 
lame Laws, with thole by which he might have formed and difpofed them •, It being evident to 
all confidering Men, that if God had not dilpofed his Works in an inftant, in the lame manner- 
they would have ordefd and poftur'd themfelves in time ; the whole Oeconomy of Nature would 
be deitroy'd, fines the Laws of Prefervation would be contrary to 'thole of the full Creation. If 
the whole Univerfe remains in the Order in which, we fee it, 'tis becaufe the Laws of Motion 
which preferve it in that Order, were capable of producing it in it -, and if God had eftabliihed 
it in an Order different from that into which thofe Laws of Motion Ihould have put it, all things 
would be turned upfide down, and place themfelves by the force of thofe Laws, in the Order 
which they at prefent keep. 

• A Man deifies to difcover theNature.of a Chicken, to that end he opens every day Eggs taken 
from under a Brood-Hen ; he examines what part moves and grows firft, he quickly perceives 
that the Heart begins to beat, and to drive out Blood through imall Conduits on all fides, that 
ure the Arteries-, which Blood comes back to the Heart through the Veins, that the Brain like- 
wife appears at fall, and that the Bones are the laft formed. By that he frees himfelf fi;om ma- 
ny Errours, and even draws from thofe Oblervations leveral Confluences very ufeful for the 
Knowledge of living Creatures. What fault may be found with the conduct of fuch a Man, and 
how may it be given out, that he pretends to perfuade, that God formed the firft Chicken, by 
creating an Egg, and giving it a competent degree of heat to hatch it ? becaufe he tries to difco- 
ver the Nature of Chickens in their firft Formation > 

Why then Ihould Des Cartes be accufed of being oppofite to the Holy Scriptures, for that de- 
figning to difcover the Nature of vifible things, he examines the formation of them by the Laws 
of Motion, which are inviolably obferv'd on all occasions. He never * doubted but that the World* p r j nc> 
t cas created at firft with all its perfection ; that there were Sun, Earth, Moon and Stars ; that Part. 3. 
in the Earth there were not only the Seeds of Plants, but alfo the Plants themfelves ; and that §• 45* 
Adam and Eve were not born Infants, but made adult. The Chrijiian Faith teaches us that, and 
natural Reajon perfuades us the fame ; for when we confider the infinite Power of God, we can- 
not think he fhould ever have made any thing which was not altogether per f eft. But as we 
floould better under/land the nature of Adam and Eve, and the Trees of Paradife, by examining 
bozo Children are infenftbly formed in their Mothers Womb, and how Plants are derivd fro?n their 
Seeds, than by merely confidering how they were when Created by God at the Creation of the World; 
fo if we can find out Principles very Jimple and eafiie, out of which, as out of fome Seeds, we can ?na~ 
nifeftly fhew the Stars, the Earth, and all vifible things might have been produced ; though we ve- 
ry well know that it was never. fo, ( yet ) that will be more conducible to explain their Nature, 
than if we fhould only defer ibe them fo as they now are, or as we believe they were Created, and be- 
caufe I fuppofe I have found out fuch Principles, Ifihall indeavour briefly to Explain them. 

Des Cartes was perfuaded that God formed the World all at once-, but he alfo believed that 
God Created it in the fame State and Order, and with the fame Difpoiition of Parts, in which it 
would have been, had it been made gradually, and by the moft Iimple ways. And that thought 
is worthy both of the Power and W r ifdom of God -, of his Power, becaufe he has made in a Mo- 
ment all his Works in the higheft Perfection «, and of his Wifdom, becaufe he has fhewn that he 
perfectly fbrefaw whatever could befall Matter, if it were moved by the molt fimple ways : and 
likewife becaufe the Order of Nature could not fubfift, if the World had been produced by 
ways, that is, by Laws of Motion, contrary to the Laws by which it is preferv'd, as I have alrea- 
dy mention'd. 
' 'Tis ridiculous to fay, that Des Cartes believed the World might have been formed of it felf, 
fince he owns with all thofe that follow the light of Reafon, that Bodies cannot move them- 
felves by their own ftrength^ and that all the immutable Laws of the Communication of Moti- 
ons are but confequences of the immutable Will of God, who always a£ts in the fame manner. 
His proving that God alone gives Motion to Matter, and that Motion produces in Bodies all 
their different Forms, was fuffieient to hinder the Libertines from making an Advantage of his 
Syftem; On the contrary, if Arheifts fhould refieEt on the Principles of this Phiiofopher, they 
would quickly be forced to confefs their I Errours -, for if they can afTert, with the Heathens, that 
Matter is uncreated, they cannot alfo maintain that it can move it felf by its own Power : So 
that Atheifts would at leaft be obliged to acknowledge the true Mover, if they refuted to con- 
fefs the true Creatour. But the Ordinary Philofophy affords 'em fuffieient pretences to blind 
themfelves, and defend their Errours ; for" it fpeaks of fome imprefs'd Virtues, certain motive, 
Faculties, in a word, of a certain Nature which is the Principle of Motion in every thing-,. 

And 



&a .RMaleeranche Concerning Book VI; 

And though they have no diftinft Idea of it, yet by reafon of the Corruption of their Heart, 
they willingly put it in the room of the true God, imagining that it performs all the Wonders 
that they fee occur. 



CHAP. V. 

An Explication of the Principles of the Peripatetic!^ Philofophy, in which is 
fljewn, that Ariftotle never observed the Second Part of the General Rnle ; 
and his Four Elements, with the Elementary Qualities, are examined. 

THat the Reader may compare the Philofophy of Des Cartes-wixh that of Ariftot/e, it will be 
convenient to fet down in few words what the latter has" taught concerning Elements and 
Natural Bodies in general-, which the moll learned believe he has done in his Four Books Of the 
Heavens. For his_ Eight Books of Phyficks belong rather to Logick, or perhaps to Metaphyficks, 
than to Natural Philofophy ^ fince they confift of Nothing but loofe and. general terms, that of- 
fer no diftinft and particular Idea to the Mind. Thofe Four Books are enrituled Of the Heavens y 
becaufe the Heavens are the chief amongft the fimple Bodies which he treats of. 

That Philofopher begins his Work by proving that the World is perfecf , in the following man- 
- ner; All Bodies have three Dimenfions and cannot have more, becaufe the number three compre* 
hends all, according to the 'Pythagoreans. But the World is the Coacervation of all Bodies, and 
therefore the World is perfect. By that ridiculous Proof, it may alfo be demonftrated, that the 
World cannot be more imperfecl: than it is, fince it cannot be compofed of parts that have lefs 
than three Dimenfions. 

In the Second Chapter, he firft fuppofes fome Peripatetick Truths, as that all Natural Bodies 
have of themlelves the force of moving, which he proves neither here nor elfewhere^ but on the 
contrary afferts, in the Firft Chapter of his Second Book of Phyficks, that to endeavour to prove 
it is abfurd, becaufe 'tis evident of it felf, and that none but thofe who cannot diftinguifh what 
is known of it felf from what is not, infill upon proving plain by obicure things. But it has been 
(hewn eliewhere, that it is altogether falfe that natural Bodies fhould have of themfelves the 
force of moving, and it appears evident only to fuch as follow, with Ariftotle^ the Impreffions of 
their Senfes, and make no ufe of their Realbn. 

Secondly, He fays that all local Motion is made in a Line, either direcl: or circular, or com- 
pofed of both s but if he would not think upon what he fo raflily propofes, he ought at leaft 
to have open'd his Eyes that he might fee an Infinite number of different Motions, which are 
not made of either the right or circular : Or rather he ought to have thought that the Motions? 
compofed of the dire£l may be infinitely varied, when the compounding Motions increafe or di- 
miniffi their fwiftnefs in an infinite number of different ways, as may be obferved by what has] 
*s«/<.ch.4. been laid before *. There are, lays he, but two fimple Motions, the right and the Circular, and 
therefore all the others are compofed of them. But he miflakes, for the Circular Motion is not 
fimple, fince it cannot be conceived, without thinking upon a Point to which it relates, and what- 
ever includes a Relation is relative and not fimple. This is lb true that the Circular Motion may- 
be conceived as produced from two Motions in a right Line, whole Swiftneis is unequal, ac- 
cording to a certain Proportion. But a Motion compofed of two others, made in a right Line, 
and varioufly increafing or diminifhing in fwiftnefs, cannot be fimple. 

Thirdly, He fays that all the fimple Motions are of three lorts, one from the Centre, the other 
towards the Centre, and the third about it. But 'tis falle that the lail, viz. the Circular Moti- 
on mould be fimple, as has been already faid. And 'tis falfe again that there are no fimple Mo- 
tions befides upwards and downwards. For all the Motions in a right Line are fimple, whether 
they approach to, or remove from the Centre, the Poles, or any other Point. Every Body, lays 
he, is made up of three Dimenfions, and therefore the Motion of all Bodies mull have three fim- 
ple Motions. What Relation is there betwixt fimple Motions and Dimenfions ? Befides, every 
Body has three Dimenfions, and none has three fimple Motions. 

Fourthly, He fuppofes that Bodies are either fimple or compofed, and calls fimple Bodies, thofa 
that have the force of moving themlelves, as Fire, Earth, &e. adding, that the compounded re- 
ceive their Motion from the compounding. But in that fenfe there are no fimple Bodies, fince 
none have in themfelves any Principle of their Motion : there tfre alfo none compofed, fince 
there are no fimples of which they mould be made ; and fo there would be no Bodies at alL 
Wiiat Fancy is it, to define the fimplicity of Bodies by a Power of moving themfelves. What 
diftinft Ideas can be fixed to the Words of fimple and compofed Bodies, if the fimple are only- 
defined in Relation to an Imaginary moving force ? But let us fee what Confequences he draws 
from thofe Principles. The Circular Motion is fimple. The Heavens move Circularly, and. there- 
fore their Motion is fimple : But fimple Motion can be afcribed only to a fimple Body, that is to 
lay, to a Body that moves of it felf 5 And therefore the Heavens are a fimple Body diftinguifhed 
from the four Elements, rh:it move in right Lines. 'Tis plain enough that fuch Arguments con- 
tain nothing but falfe and abfurd Propofitions. Let us examine his other Proofs, for he alleadges 
a great manv fhamefuJ and nonfenfical ones, to prove a thing as ufelefs as it is falfe. 

His 



Chap. V: The Search after Truth* 6^ 

' His fecond Reafon to (hew that the Heavens are a fimple Body difiinguifiied from the Four E- 
lements, fuppolts that there are two forts of Motion, one natural, and the other violent or.againft 
Nature. But 'tis fufficiently plain to all thofe that judge of things by clear and diftihct Ideas, 
that Bodies having not in themlelves any fuch Principle of their Motion as Arijlotle pretends, 
there can be no Motion violent or againft Nature. 'Tis indifferent to all Bodies to be moved or 
iipt, either one way or another. But this Philofopher, who judges of things by the Irapreifions 
of the Senfes, imagines that thofe Bodies, which by the Laws of the Communications of Mo- 
tions, always place themfelves in fuch or fuch a Situation, in reference to others, doe it of their 
own accord, and becaule it is molt convenient for them, and belt agrees with their Nature. Here 
follows the Argument of Arijlotle. 

The Circular Motion of the Heavens is natural, or againft Nature. If natural, the Heavens 
are a fimple Body diltinguifhed from the Elements, fince the Elements never move circularly by a 
natural Motion. If the Circular Motion of the Heavens is againft their Nature, they will be fame 
one of the Elements, as Fire, Water, &c. or fomething elfe. But the Heavens can be none of 
the Elements: as for initance, if the Heavens were Fire, that Element tending naturally upwards, 
the Heavens would have two contrary Motions, viz. the circular and the afcending, which is im- 
poffible. If the Heavens be fome other Body, which moves not circularly by its own Nature, 
they will Have fome other natural Motion, which cannot likewife be •, for if that Motion be af 
cending, they will be Fire or Air^ and if defcending, Water or Earth: Therefore, &c. I fhall 
not infiit upon Ihewing the particular Abfurdities of thofe Reafonings, but only obferve in ge- 
neral, that all that which this Philofopher here fays, has no fignification, and that there is nei- 
thei truth nor Inference well drawn. His third Reafon is as follows. 

Tne firlf and molt perfecf of all fimple Motions muft be that of a fimple Body, and of the 
firit and molt pertecf among fimple Bodies. But the circular Motion is the firft and molt perfect 
amongit fimple Motions, becauie every circular Line is perfect, and that no right Line is lb. For if 
it be finite, fomething may be added to it-, if infinite, it is not yet perfect, fince it has no end*, *Tsa(£- 
and that things are not perfect but when they are finijhecl; and therefore the circular Motion is and -?'-- 
the firft and raoft perfect of all, and a Body moving circularly is fimple, and the firft and molt A -'P~ p 
Divine amongit fimple Bodies. Here you have his fourth Reafon. k Greek's" 

in Englifh Finis and finified. Thus that Philofopher proves, that an infinite Line is not perfeft, becaufe 'tis not fimfl.ed. 

Every Motion is either natural, or not ; but every Motion which is not natural to fome Bo- 
dies, is natural to fome others : For, we lee that the afcending and defcending Motions, which 
are not natural to fome Bodies, are fo to others $ for Fire naturally defcends not, but Earth does. 
Now the Circular Motion is not natural to any of the Four Elements - there muft then be a fim- 
ple Body to which that Motion is natural ^ and therefore the Heavens, which move Circularly, 
are a fimple Body, diltinguiihed from the Four Elements. 

Laitly, The Circular Motion is either natural or violent to fome Body or other : If it be na- 
tural, 'tis evident that Body muft be one of the moft fimple and perfect : But if it be againft 
Nature, 'tis ftrange how that Motion endures for ever ; fince we fee that all Motions againft 
Nature are of a fhort continuance. And therefore we muft believe, after all thofe Reafons, that 
there is fome Body feparated from all thofe that environ us, whofe Nature is the more perfect, 
as it lies at a greater diftance. Thus argues Arijlotle ^ but I defie the beft and moft intelligent 
of his Interpreters to fix diftinct Ideas to his Words, and to fhew that this Philofopher begins 
with the moft fimple Things, before he fpeaks of the more compofed -, which is however altoge- 
ther neceiTary to exact Reafonings, as I have already proved. 

If I were* not afraid of being tedious, I would be at the pains to tranflate fome Chapters of 
Arijlotle : But befides that none who can underftand him, care to read him in Eng/ijb, or in any 
other vulgar Tongue, I have fufficiently fhewn, by what I have related from him, that his Way 
of Philofophizing is wholly unferviceable to the Difcovery of Truth : For, he lays himfelf, in 
the Fifth Chapter of this Book, That thofe that miftake at firft in any thing, miftake ten thou- 
fand times more, if they proceed : So that it being apparent, that he knows not what he fays in 
the two firft Chapters of his Book, we may reafonably believe, that it is not fafe to yield to his 
Authority, without examining his Reafons. But that we may be the more perfuaded of ir, I 
proceed to fhew, that there is no Chapter in this Firft Book but has fome Impertinency. 

In the Third Chapter he fays, That the Heavens are incorruptible, and uncapable of Alteration h 
of which he alledges feveral Childifh Proofs, as, that they are the Habitation of the Immortal 
Gods, and that no Change was ever obferved in them. This laft Proof would be good enough, 
could he fay, that ever any Body was come back from thence, or that he had approached Celelti- 
al Bodies fufficiently near to obferve their Alterations. And yet I doubt whether at this time any 
one fhould yield to his Authority, fince Tele/copes affure us of the contrary. 

In the Fourth Chapter he pretends to prove, That the Circular Motion has no Oppofite ^ 
though it be plain, that the Motion from Eaft to Weft is contrary to that which is made from 
Weft to Eaft. 

In the Fifth Chapter he very weakly proves, That Bodies are not Infinite :, drawing his Argu- 
ments from the Motion of fimple Bodies : For what hinders, but there may be above his Yrimum 
mobile fome unmovable Extenfion. 

In the Sixth, he lofes time in fhewing, That the Elements are not Infinite : For, who can 
doubt of it, when he fuppofes, with him, that they are included within the furrounding Hea- 

R vens ? 



66 F. Malebranche Concerning Book VI, 

vens ? Bat he ridicules himfelf, by drawing his Proofs from their Gravity and Lightnefs. If Ele- 
ments, fays he, were Infinite, there would be an Infinite Heavinefs and Lightnefs •, which cannot 
be : Ergo, &c. Thole that defire to fee his Arguments at length, may read them in his Books \ 
for I reckon it a lofs of Time to relate them. 

He goes on in the Seventh Chapter to prove, That Bodies are not Infinite ; and hisfirlt Argu- 
ment iuppofes it neceflary for every Body to be in Motion, which he neither does nor can de- 
monftrate. 

in the Eighth he afTerts, That there are not many Worlds of the fame Nature, by this ridicu- 
lous Reafon, That if there were another Earth befides this we inhabit, the Earth being ponderous 
of its own nature, it would fall upon ours, which is the Centre of all ponderous Bodies. Whence 
has he learned this, but from his Senfes ? 

In the Ninth he proves, That it is not fo much as poffible that there mould be feveral Worlds, 
becaufe if there was any Body above the Heavens, it would be limple or compofed, in a natural 
or violent State ; which cannot be, for Reafons< which he draws from the Three forts of Motions 
already fpoken of. 

In the Tenth he afferts, That the World is Eternal, becaufe it cannot have had a Beginning, and 
yet lalt for ever •, becaufe we fee, that whatever is made, is corrupted in Time. He has learned 
this likewife from his Senfes : But who has taught him, that the World will always endure ? 

He' fpends the Eleventh Chapter in explaining what Incorruptible lignifies ; as though Equivoca- 
tion was here very dangerous, or that he was to make a great Ufe of his Explanation. However, 
that Word Incorruptible is fo clear of it fell!, that Arijiotle needed not have troubled himfelf 
with explaining in what Senfe it tfruit be taken, or in what Senfe he takes it. It had been more 
convenient to define an infinite Number of Terms, very ufual with him, which raife nothing but 
fenfible Ideas ; for fo perhaps we fhould have learned fomething by the reading of his Works. 

In the Lair Chapter df this firft Book of the Heavens, he endeavours to Ihew, That the World 
is incorruptible, becaufe 'tis impoffible it fhould have had a Beginning, and yet laft eternally. All 
Things, lays he, fabfift either for a finite or infinite Time-, but what is only infinite inonefenie, 
is neither finite nor infinite, and therefore nothing can fubfift in that Manner. 

This is the way of arguing with the Prince of Philofophers, and the Genim of Nature ; who, 
inftead of difcovering, by clear and diftin8: Ideas, the true Caufe Of natural Effe&s, lays the 
Foundation of a Pagan Philofophy upon the falfe and confufed Ideas of the Senfes, or upon fuch 
Ideas as are too general to be ufeful to the Search after Truth. 

I condemn not Arijiotle for not knowing that God has created the World in Time, to manifeft 
his Power, and the Dependency of Creatures ; and that he will never deftroy it, to (hew that 
he is immutable, and never repents of his Defigns : But I may find fault with him for proving, by 
trifling Reafons, that the World is of Eternal Duration. For, though he be fometimes excusa- 
ble as to the Opinions he maintains, yet he's for the moft part intolerable as to the Reafons he 
alledges, when he treats of Subjects that are fomewhat difficult. What I have already faid, may 
perhaps be fufficient to evince it ^ though I have not related all the Errours I have met with in 
the Book whence the former are extracted, and that I have endeavoufd to make him fpeak plainer 
than is cuftomary with him. 

But for an entire and full Conviction, that the Genim of Nature will never dilcover the fecret 
Springs and Contrivances of it, it will be convenient to mew, that his Principles, upon which he 
reafons for the Explication of natural Effe&s, have no Solidity in them. 

'Tis evident that nothing can be dilcover d in Phyficks, without beginning with the moft limple 
*De Carlo, Bodies -, that is, with the Elements ; into which all others are refolv'd, becaufe they are * con- 
1. 3. c. 3. tain'd in them either actually or potentially, to fpeak in a Peripatecick Stile. But no diltin£t. Ex- 
plication of thofe limple Bodies can be found in the Works of Arijiotle ■, whence follows,, that 
his Elements being not clearly known, 'tis impoffible to difcover the Nature of Bodies which are 
compos'd of them. 

He fays indeed, that there are four Elements, Fire, Air, Water and Earth ■, but he gives no- 
clear Manifeftation of their Nature, by any diftin6t Idea : He pretends not that thofe Elements are 
the Fire, Air, Water and Earth that we fee ; for if it were fo, our Senles at leaft would afford 
us fome Knowledge of them. I grant that in feveral places of his Works he endeavours 10 explain 
them by the Qualities of Heat and Cold, Moilture and Drynefs, Gravity and Levity. But that 
Method is fo impertinent and ridiculous, that it cannot be conceiv'd how fo many Learned Men 
could be fatisfied with it ; which I proceed to demonltrate. 

Arijiotle pretends in his Book of the Heavens, that the Earth is the Centre of the World, and 
that all Bodies which he is pleas'd to call limple, becaufe. he fuppofes that they are mov'd by their 
own Nature, mull move by limple Motions. He afferts, that befides the Circular Motion, which 
he pretends to be limple, and by which he proves that the Heavens, which he iuppoles to move 
circularly, are a limple Body, there are two other limple Motions ■, one downwards, from the Cir- 
cumference to the Centre -, and the other upwards, from the Centre to the Circumference : That 
thofe limple Motions are proper to limple Bodies, and conlequendy thatEatth and tire are fuch 
Bodies -, one of which is altogether heavy, and the other perfectly light. But becaufe Gravity and 
Levity may be proper to a Body, either wholly, or in part, he concludes that there are two other 
Elements, or limple Bodies, one of which is partly light, and the other partly ponderous, viz. 
Water and Air. Thus he proves that there are four Elements, and no. more. 

It 



Chap. V. The Search after Truth. 6f i 

It is plain to all thofe who examine the Opinions of Men by their own Reafon, that all thofe 
Propofitions arefalfe, or cannot atleaft betaken for clear and undeniable Principles, which may 
afford very plain and diftincl: Idea's, whereon to lay the Foundation of Natural Philofophy. "lis 
certain that nothing can be more abfurd, than to eftablifh the Number of Elements upon the ima- 
ginary Qualities of Heavinefs and Lightnefs ; faying, without any farther Proof" that fbnie Bodies 
are ponderous, and others light, of their own Nature : For if any thing may be af'ferted without. 
Proof, it may be faid that all Bodies are naturally heavy, and endeavour to approach the Centre of 
the World, as the place of their Reft. And the contrary may be alTerted too, viz. That all Bo- 
dies are light of their own Nature, and tend to rife to the Heavens, as to the place of their great- 
eft Perfection. For if you objeft to him who maintains the Gravity of Bodies, that Fire and 
Air are light ■, he needs but anlwer, that Fire and Air are not light -, but that being lefs ponderous 
than Earth and Water, they feem to us to be light : And that it goes with thofe Elements, as with, 
a piece of Wood that appears light upon the Water -, not by reafon of any natural Levity, fince it 
falls down when in the Air ; but becaufe Water being heavier, feizes the lower Place, and forces 
it to afcend. 

On the contrary, If you objeft to him that defends the natural Levity of Bodies, that Earth and 
Water are ponderous -, he will likewile anlwer, That thofe Bodies feem heavy, becaufe they are 
not fo light as thofe that furround them : That Wood, for inftance, appears to be ponderous when 
in the Air, not becaufe of its natural Gravity, fince it afcends when in the Water, but becaufe it 
is not fo light as Air. 

And therefore 'tis ridiculous to fuppofe, as an undenia^p Principle, that Bodies are either light 
or heavy of their own Nature ; it being, on, the contrary, evident, that none has the Force of mo- 
ving it felf, and that 'tis indiffetent to be moved either upwards or downwards, to the Eaft or to 
the Weft, to the South or to the North, or in any other pofrible manner. 

But let us grant to Ariftotle, That there are four Elements, fuch as he pretends •, two of which 
are heavy, viz. Earth and Water •, and the two other light of their own Nature, viz. Fire and 
Air ; what Confequence may be drawn from thence, for the Knowledge of the Univerfe > Thofe 
four Elements are not the vifible Fire, Air, Water*and Earth, but fomething quite different, which 
we know neither by the Senfes, nor by Reafon, having no diftin£t Idea of them. Let all natural 
Bodies be compos'd of them, fince Ariftotle has faid it : But the Nature of thofe Compounds is ftill 
unknown, and cannot be difcovered, but by knowing the four Elements, or the fimple Bodies of 
which they are made, fince the Compofed is known only by the Simple. 

Fire, fays Ariftotle, is light by its own Nature ; the afcending Motion is fimple : Fire is there- 
fore a fimple Body, fince Motion muft be proportion'd to the Moveable. Natural Bodies are 
compos'd of fimple, there is then Fire in all natural Bodies, but a Fire which is not like to that 
we fee • for Fire is often but in potentia in the Bodies that are made of it. What fignifie all thefe 
Peripatetick Difcourfes ? That there is Fire in all Bodies, either a£lual or potential, that is to fay, 
that all Bodies are compos'd of fomething we fee not, and the Nature of which is wholly un- 
known unto us. Now we have made a very fair Progrefs. 

But though Ariftotle fhews us not the Nature of Fire, and other Elements, of which all Bodies 
are made up ; yet one may imagine, that he will at leaft difcover their principal Qualities and 
Properties. Let us alfo examine what he fays upon that Account. 

He declares that there are four principal Qualities which belong to the Senfe of Touching, viz. l. 2. & ?» 
Heat, Cold, Humidity and Siccity ; or which all the other are compos'd. He diftributes thofe de Gene, 
primitive Qualities into the four Elements, afcribing Heat and Drynefs to Fire, Heat and Moifture ^ Corru P< 
to the Air, Cold and Moifture to Water, and Cold and Drynefs to Earth. He afTerts that Heat 
and Cold are aftive Qualities ; but that Drynefs and Moifture are paflive. He defines Heat, What 
congregates Things of the fame kind ; Cold, What congregates Things either of the fame, or of dif- 
ferent Species ; Moifture, What cannot eafily be contained in its own Limit s, but is eafily kept with- 
in foreign Bounds ; and Drynefs, What is eafily contained within its own Limits, but will hardly be 
adapted to the Bounds of furrounding Bodies. 

Thus, according to Ariftotle, Fire is a hot and dry Element, and therefore congregates Homoge- 
neous Things, is eafily contained within its own Limits, and hardly within others : Air is a hot and 
moift Element, and therefore congregates Homogeneous Things, can hardly be kept within its own 
Limits, but eafily within others : Water is a cold and moift Element, and therefore congregates both 
Homogeneous and Heterogeneous Things, is hardly contained within its own Lhnits, but eafily with- 
in others : And laftly, Earth is a cold and dry Element, or fuch an one as aggregates Things, both 
of the fame and different Natures^ is eafily contain 'd within its own Limits, but can hardly be adapt- 
ed to others. 

There you have the Elements explain'd, according to the Opinion of Ariftotle, or the Definitions 
he has given of their principal Qualities •, and becaufe, if we may believe him, the Elements are 
fimple Bodies, out of which others are conftituted •, and their Qualities are fimple Qualities, of 
which all others are compos'd, the Knowledge of thofe Elements and Qualities muft be very clear 
and diftinft, fince the whole Natural Philofophy, or the Knowledge of all fenfible Bodies, which 
are made of them, muft be deduc'd from thence. 

Let us then fee what may be wanting to thofe Principles. Firft, Ariftotle fixes no diftinft Idea 
to the Word Quality : It cannot be known whether by Quality he underftands a real Being diftin- 
guifh'd from Matter, or only a Modification of Matter ; he feems one while to take it in the for- 
mer, and at another time in the latter Senfe, I grant that in the 8th Chapter of his Categories, he 

defines 



68 F. Malebranche Concerning Book V h 

defines Qua/ity, that by which Things are denominated Jo or fo; but that is not plain and fatisfaSto- 
ry. Secondly, His Definitions of the four Primitive Qualities, viz. Heat, Cold, Moifture and 
Drynefs, are either falle, Or ufelefs. We will begin with his Definition of Heat ; Heat?-, fays he, 
is that which congregates Homogeneous Things. 

Firft, Though that Definition fhould be true, That Heat always congregates Homogeneous Bo- 
dies -, yet we cannot fee how it perfectly explains the Nature of Hear. 

Secondly, 'Tis falfe that Heat congregates Homogeneous Things •, for Heat diihpates the Par- 
ticles of Water into Vapour, inftead of heaping them together : It congregates not likewife the 
farts of Wine, or any Liquor or Fluid Body whatfoever, even to Quick-filver. On the contrary, 
it refolves and feparates both Solid and Fluid Bodies, whether of the fame or different Natures :, 
and if there be any, the Parts of which Fire cannot diffipate, it is not becauie.they are homoge- 
neous, but becaufe they are too grofs and folid to be carry'd away by the Motion of the fiery 
Particles. 

Thirdly, Heat, in reality, can neither congregate nor fegregate the Parts of any Body whatfo- 
ever •, for, that the Parts of Bodies may be congregated, feparated or diffipated, they muft be mo- 
ved : But Heat can move nothing, or at leaft, it appears not that it can move Bodies •, for though 
we confider Heat with all the poflible Attention, we cannot difcover that it may communicate to 
Bodies a Motion which it has not it lelf. We fee, indeed, that Fire moves and feparates the Parts 
of fuch Bodies as lie expos'd to its Aclion, but it is not perhaps by its Heat, it being hot evident 
whether it has any -, it is rather by the Action of its Parts, which we vifibly perceive to be in a con- 
tinual Motion •, for thefe fiery Particlejjfiriking againft a Body, muft needs impart to it fomewhat 
of their Motion, whether there is or^Riot any Heat in Fire. If the Parts of that Body be not 
very folid, Fire will diflipate them ; but if they be very grofs and fblid, Fire can but juft move" 
them, and make them flide one over the other. And Larfly, If there be a Mixture of fubtile and 
grofs Parts, Fire will only diihpate thofe which it can pufh lb far as to feparate them from the 
others. So that Fire can only feparate •, and if it congregate, 'tis only by Accident. But Ariftot/e 
be fcnw- aiTerts quite contrary : Separating, fays he, which fonie afcribe to Fire, is but congregating Homo- 
h 2,°'c."2;' & eneous Things -, for ''tis only by Accident that Fire carries off Things of different Nature. 

If this Philofopher had at firft diftinguifhed the Senfation of Heat, from the Motion of the fmali 
Particles, of which the Bodies called hot are compofed, and had afterwards defined Heat, taken 
from the Motion of Parts, by faying, that Heat is what agitates and feparates the invifible Parts, 
of which vifiole Bodies are made up -, he would have given a tolerable definition of Heat; though 
not full and fatisfa&ory : becaufe it would not accurately difcover the Nature of Motion in hot 
Bodies. 

Ariftot/e defines Cold, what congregates Bodies of the fame, or different Nature : but that De- 
finition is worth nothing, for Cold congregates not Bodies. To congregate them, it muft move 
them : but if we confult our Reafbn we fhall find, that Cold can move nothing -, for we under- 
ftand by that word, either what we feel when we are cold, or what caufes our Senfation. As to 
our Senfation, 'tis plain that it is merely Paffive, and can neither move nor drive any thing. And 
as to the Caufe of that Senfation, reafon tells us, if we examine things, that it is merely reft, or 
a CeiTation of Motion : So that Cold in Bodies being no more than the Ceilation of that fort of 
Motion which attends Heat, 'tis evident that if Heat feparate, Cold does not. And therefore 
Cold coacervates neither things of the fame, nor of different nature-, fince what cannot drive 
on Bodies cannot amafs them together. In a word, as it does nothing, it muft needs congregate 
nothing. 

Ariftot/e judging of things by his Senfes, imagin'd Cold to be as pofitive as Heat ; and becaufe 
the Senfations of Heat and Cold are both real and pofitive, he fuppofes them both likewife to be 
attive Qualities : and indeed, if we follow the Imprefiions of the Senfes, we fhall be apt to be- 
lieve that Cold is a very active Quality ; fince cold Water congeals,, accumulates, and hardens 
in a moment melted Gold and Lead, when they are pour'd upon it from a Crucible •, though the 
Heat of thofe Metals be yet ftrong enough to feparate the Parts of the Bodies which they touch. 

'Tis plain, by what has been laid in the Firft Book, concerning the Errours of the Senfes, That 
if we relye upon the Judgment the Senfes make of the Qualities of fenfible Bodies, 'tis impofTible 
to difcover any certain and undeniable Truth, that may ferve as a Principle to proceed in the 
Knowledge of Nature. For one cannot fo much as difcover that way, what things are hot, and 
what cold ; amongft feveral Perfons, who touch luke-warm Water, it feels cold to thofe that are 
See Book I. hot, and hot to thofe that are cold. And if we fuppofe Fifties fufceptible of Senfation, 'tis very 
to°X 15!' P r °b a ble that they feel it warm, when all or moft Men feel it cold. It is the fame with Air, that 
feems to be hot or cold, according to the different Difpofitions of the Bodies of thofe that are ex- 
pofed to it. Ariftot/e pretends that it is hot, but I fanfie that the Nothern Inhabitants are of ano- 
ther Opinion, fince feveral learned Men, whofe Climate is as hot as that of Greece, have affer- 
ted it to be cold. But that Queftion, which has made fo much noife in the Schools, will never 
be refolv'd, as long as no diftinft Idea fhall be affixed to the Word Heat. 

The Definitions Ariftot/e lays down of Heat and Cold cannot fettle that Idea. For Inftance, 
Air, and even Water, though never fo hot and* icalding, congregate the parts of melted Lead to- 
gether with thofe of any other Metal whatfoever. Air conglutinates all forts of Fat joyn'd with 
Gums, or any other folid Bodies. And he fhall be a very formal Pcripatetick, who fhould think 
of cxpofing Maftich, to the Air, to feparate the pitchy from the Earthy part, and other com- 
pound Bodies to uncompouml them, And therefore Air is not hot, according to the Definition 

which 



Chap. V. The Search after Truth. 6$ 

which Ariliotlc gives of Heat. Air fepa rates Liquors from the Bodies that are imbued with them, 
hardens Clay, dries ipread Linen, though Ariftotle makes it moift, and ib is hot and drying, ac- 
cording to the fame Definition 5 therefore it cannot, be determined by that Definition, whether 
or no Air is hot. It may indeed be alferted that Air is hot in reference to Clay, fince it feparates 
the Water from the Earthy Part. But mult we try all the various Eftecfs of Air upon all Bodies, 
before we can be allured, whether there is Heat in the Air we breath in? If it be fo, we fhall ne- 
ver be fare of it, and 'tis as good not to philofophize at all upon the Air we relpire, but upon 
iome certain pure and elementary Air, nor to be found here below, of which we can very dog- 
matically albert, with Ariftotle, that it is hot, without giving the leaff Proof of it, nor even 
diltincfly knowing what we underlfand either by that Air, or by the Heat afcribed to it. For thus 
we [hail lay down Principles fcarce to be deftroyed ; not becaufe of their Plainneft and Certainty, 
but by reafon of their Darknefs, and their being like to Apparitions, which cannot be wounded, 
became they have not a Body. 

I fhall not infill, upon Anftetle's Definitions of Moifture and Drynefs; it being evident^ that 
they explain not their Nature. For according to thole Definitions, Fire is not dry, fince it is 
not eafily contained within its own limits ; and Ice is not moift, fince it keeps within its proper 
L e-unds, and can difficultly be adapted to external Bounds. But if fluid be underltood by the 
Word !.\.'>>/id, or moift, it may again be laid, that Ice is not moift; and that Flame, melted Gold, 
and Lead, are veiy humid. If by humid 01 moift 'he underftood what eafily cleaves to anything, 
Ice is not humid, and Pitch, Fat, and Oil, are moiffer than Water, fince they cleave to Bodies 
more ftrongly than it does. Quick-lilver is moift in that fenfe, for it cleaves to Metals ; where- 
as Water is not perfectly moift, fince it cleaves not to molt of them. So that 'tis unferviceable to 
have recourle to the Teftimony of the Senfes, to defend the Opinions of Ariftotle. 

But without farther examining his wonderful Definitions of the four Elementary Qualities, let 
us fappoiethit whatever the Senfes reach us of thole Qualities is inccnteftable : let usmufter up 
ail our Faith, and believe all thole Definitions very accurate : Only let it be allowed us to en- 
quire whether all the Qualities of fenfible Bodies are made of thefe Elementary Qualities. Arifto- 
tle pretends ir, and he muft do fb indeed, iince he looks upon thole Four primitive Qualities, as 
the Principles of all the things which he intends to explain in his Books of Thy fie ks. 

He teaches us, that Colours are produced from the Mixture of thofe Four Elementary Quali- 
ties ; White is produced when Moifture exceeds Heat; as in old Men, when they grow gray ; 
Black when Moifture is exhaufted, as in the Walls of Cifterns ; and all other Colours by the like 
Mixtures : that Odours and Savours arife from different Degtees of Dtynels and Moifture, mix'd 
together by Heat and Cold ; and that even Gravity and Levity do depend thereon. In fhort, All 
fenlrbte Qualities muft needs be produced, according to Ariftotle, by Two attive Principles, viz. 
Heat and Cold : and compofed of Two pajfive, namely, Drynefs and Moifture; that there may 
be ibme probable Connexion betwixt his Principles, and the Confequences he draws from them. 

However 'tis yet a harder Task to perfuade us of fuch tilings, than any of thofe that have been 
hit':, rto related from Ariftotle. We can fcarce believe that the Earth, and other Elements, would 
r-r; be colour d, or vifible, if they were in their natural Purity, without Mixture of thole Ele- 
5 nentary Principles, though fome learned Commentators on that Philofopher afTert it. We under- 
itand not what Ariftotle means when he affures us, that gray Hair is produced by Moifture, becaule 
" in old Men Moifture exceeds Heat \ though to illuftrate his thought we put the definition inftead 
of the thing defined. For it looks like an incomprehenfible piece of Nonfence to fay that the 
Hair of old Men becomes gray, becaule what is not eafily contained within its own Li?nits, but may 
be within others, exceeds what congregates homogeneous things. 

And we are as hard put it to believe that Savour is well explain'd, by laying it confifts in a 
mixture of Drynefs, Moifture, and of Heat, efpecially when we put, inftead of thofe words, the 
Definitions given by that Philofopher ; as it would prove ufeful, if they were juft and good. 
And none perhaps could forbear laughing, if inftead of the Definitions which Ariftotle gives of 
Hunger and Thirft when he fays, that Hunger is the defire of what is - hot and dry, and Thirft the 
deiire. of what is cold and moift ; we fhould fubftitute the Definitions of thole words, calling 
Hunger the defire of that which coacervates things of the fame nature, and is eafily contained with- 
in its own Limit's, and difficultly loithin others ; and defining Thirft, the defire of that which con- 
gregates things of the fame and different natures, and which can hardly be contained within its own 
bounds, but is eafily kept within others. 

Suiely 'tis a very uleful Rule to know whether Terms have been well defined, and to avoid 
miftakes in reafoning, often to put the Definition inftead of the thing defined ; for that fhews whe- 
ther rhe words are equivocal, and the Meafures of the Relations falfe and imperfect, or whether 
we argue confequently. If it be fo, what Judgment can be made of Ariftotle' % Arguments, which 
become an impertinent and ridiculous Nonfence, when we make ufe of that Rule ? and what 
may aifo be faid of all thofe who argue upon the falfe and confufed Ideas of the Senfes, fince 
that Rule which preferves Light and Evidence, in all exact and folid Reafonings, brings nothing 
but confuiion in their Difcourles ? 

'Tts not poiiible to lay open the foolifh Capricioufnefs and Extravagance of Ariftotle's Expli- 
cations upon ail forts of matters. When he treats of fimple and ealie Subjects, his Errours are 
plain and obvious ro be difcover'd ; but when he pretends to explain very compoied things and 
depending on feveral Caules, his Errours aie as much compounded as the Subje&s he fpeaks of 5 
lo that it is impolhbie to unfold them all, and fet them before others, 

§ That 



yd F. Malebranche Concerning Book -Vi; 

That great Genius, who is faid to have fo well fucceeded in his Rules for defining well, knows 
not i'o much as which are the things that may be defined, becaufe he puts no Diitinftion betwixt 
a clear and diitincf, and a fenfible Knowledge, and pretends to know and explain other things of 
which he has not fo much as a diftinft: Idea. Definitions ought to explicate the Nature of things, 
and the words of which they confitt mult raife in the Mind diftin£l and particular Notions. But 
'tis impoffible to define in that manner fenfible Qualities, as Heat, Cold, Colour, Savour, &ct 
When you confound the Caufe with the Effecf, the Motion of Bodies With the Senfation that 
attends it ; becaufe Senfations being Modifications of the Soul, which are not to be known by 
clear Ideas, but only by internal Senfation as I have explain'd it in the third Book ; it is impof- 
fible to fix to thofe words, Ideas which we have not. 

As we have Diftincf Ideas of a Circle, a Square, a Triangle, and therefore know diftin£Hy their 
Nature, i'o we can give good Difinitions of them, and even deduce from our Ideas of thofe Figures 
all their Properties, and explain them to others by fuch words as are fixed to thofe Ideas. But 
we cannot define either Heat or Cold, in as much as they are fenfible Qualities, becaufe we know 
them not diftin£fly, and by Ideas ; but only by Confcience and inward Senfation. 

Neither muft we define the Heat that is without us by any of its Effecfs. For if we fubftitute 
fuch a Definition in its place, we mall find that it will only conduce to lead us into Errour. For In- 
Itance, if Heat be defined what congregates bomogeneom things, without adding any thing elle, we may 
« by that Definition miftake for Heat fuch things as have no Relation to it. For then it might be 
laid, that the Loadftone collects the Filings of Iron, and feparates them from thofe of Silver, be- 
caufe 'tis hot -, that a Dove eats Hempfeed when it leaves other Grain, becaufe that Bird is hot - y 
that a covetous Man feparates his Guineas from his Silver, becaufe he is hot. In fhort, there is 
no impertinency, but that Definition would induce one into it, were he dull enough to follow it. 
And therefore that Definition explains not the nature of Heat, nor can it be imploy'd to deduce 
all its properties from it : fince by literally infilling upon it, we fhould draw ridiculous Conclu- 
fions ; and by putting it inftead of the thing defined, tall into Nonfenfe. 

However, it we carefully diftinguifh Heat from its Caufe ; though it cannot be defined, in as 
much as it is a Modification of the Soul, whereof we have no Idea : yet its Caufe may be defi- 
ned, fince we have a diftincf Idea of Motion. But we mult obferve that Heat, taken for fuch a 
Motion, caufes not always in us the Senfe of Heat. For Inftance, Water is hot, fince its Parts 
are fluid, and in Motion, and moft probably it feels warm to Fifties, at leaft 'tis warmer than Ice, 
whofe Parts are more quiet ; but 'tis cold to us, becaufe it has lefs Motion than the Parts of our 
Body •, what has lefs Motion than another, being in fome manner quiet, in refpeft of that. And 
therefore 'tis not with reference to the Motion of the Fibres of our Body, that. the Caufe of Heat, 
or the Motion that excites it, ought to be defined. We muft, if poflible, define that Motion ab- 
folutely, and in it felf : for then our Definition will be fubfervient to know the Nature and Proper- 
ties of Heat. 

I hold not my felf oblig'd to examine farther the Philofophy of Ariftotle, and to extricate his fo 
much confus'd and puzling Errours. I have fhewn, methinks, that he proves not the Exiitence of 
his four Elements, and defines them wrong ; that his Elementary Qualities are not fuch as he pre- 
tends, that he knows not their Nature, and that all the Second Qualities are not made of them -, 
and laftly, that though we mould grant him that all Bodies are compos'd of the four Elements, 
and the Second Qualities of theFirlt, his whole Syitem would ftill prove ufelefs tor the finding out ' 
of Truth, fince his Ideas are not clear enough to preferve Evidence in all our Reafonings. " 

If any doubt whether I have propos'd the true Opinions of Arifiotle, he may fatisfie himfelf 
by eonlulting his Books of the Heavens, and of Generation and Corruption, whence I have ex- 
extrafted almoft all that I have faid of him. I would relate nothing out of his Eight Books of 
Pbyficks, becaufe fome learned Men pretend they are but a mere Logick -, which is very apparent, 
fince nothing but rambling and undetermin'd Words are to be found in them. 

As Arijiotle often contradict s himfelf j and that almoft all forts of Opinions may be defended by 
fome Paffages drawn out of him, I doubt not but fome Opinions, contrary to thofe I have alcrib'd 
to that Philofopher, may be prov'd out of himfelf: And I (hall not warrant for him •, but it is 
fufficient for me that I have the Books I have quoted, to juftifie what I have faid of him ; and I 
care little whether thofe Books are AriftotIe\ or not ; taking them for fuch, as I find them upon 
the publick Fame 5 for we ought not to trouble our felves with enquiring into the true Genealogy 
of Things, for which we have no great Efteem. 

■ I 11 1 . I I .. _ L_L. L-_ -L - - . I 

C H A P. VI. 

General and neceffary Directions to proceed orderly in the Search after Truth, 
and in the Choice of Sciences, 

LEST it fliould be faid, that we have only been deftroying the Reafonings of others, but 
eftablifh nothing certain and undeniable of our own-, it will be convenient to propoie, in 
few words, what Order we ought to obferve in our Studies, for the avoiding Errour: and 1 de- 
fign withal to fhew fome Truths and Sciences that are very neceffary, as bearing fuch a Chaiacfef 
of Evidence, as that we cannot withold our Content, without feeling the fecret Upbraidings of 

our 



Chap. VI. The Search after Truth. 7 1 

bur Reaibn. I fhall not explain at large thofe Truths and Sciences } that's already done, and I 
intend not to reprint the Works of others, but only to refer to them, and to Ihew what Order we 
mult keep in our Studies, to preferve Evidence in all our perceptions. 

The firlt Knowledge of all, is that of the Exiftence of our Soul ; all our Thoughts are fo many 
undeniable Demonftrations of it, for nothing is more evident, than that whatever actually thinks, 
is actually f bmething. But though it be eafie to know the Exiftence of our Soul, yet her Ef fence 
and Nature are not fo eafily difcovered. If we defire to know what fhe is, we muft take care 
above all, not to confound her with the things to which fhe is united. If we doubt, will, qrgtie\ 
we muft only believe, that the Soul is fomething that doubts, wills, argues, and nothing more' 
as long as we have not felt in her other Properties : for we know our Soul only by the inward 
Senianon we have of her. We muft not miitake her for our Body, for Blood, for Animal Spi- 
rits, for Fire, and many other things for which Philofophers have miftaken her. We muft be- 
lieve of the Soul no more than we are forced to believe of her, by a full conviction of our in- 
ward Senfe, for otherwiie we (hall be deceiv'd. Thus we mail know, by a fimple view, or by 
internal Senfation, whatever may be known of the Soul ; without being obliged to long reafon- 
ings that might lead us into Errour. For when we reafon, Memory operates ; and whereever 
Memory operates, there may be Errour ; fuppofing our Knowledge fhould depend on fome wicked 
Spirics that mould take delight in deceiving us. 

Though I fhculd fuppofe, for inftance, a God, who took delight in thus abufing me; yet I 
am perluaded that I could not be deceived in a Knowledge of Jimple 'Perception, as is that by 
which I know that I am, that I think, or that 2 and 2 are 4. For I am confeious to my felf, that 
in this extravagant Suppofition, fuch a deluding Spirit, though never fo potent, could not make 
me doubt that I am, or that 2 times 2 are 4 ^ becaufe I perceive thofe things with a fimple view 
or Perception, and without the ufe of Memory. But when I reafon, as I fee not evidently the 
Principles of my Reafonings, but only remember that I have evidently feen them. If that (edu- 
cing God mould join that Remembrance to.falfe Principles, as he might do if he pleas'd, I mould 
conclude nothing but what was falfe. Juft like thofe that make long Calculations -, fancying 
they remember that they have plainly feen that 9 times 9 are 72, or that 21 is a primitive Num- 
ber, or lome other Errour of that Nature, draw falfe Inferences from thence. 

And therefore 'tis neceflary to know God, and to be allured that he is no Deceiver ; if we de- 
fire to be fully convinced that the moft certain Sciences, as Arithmetick and Geometry are true 
Sciences ; for without that their Evidence is not full, and we can ftill with-hold our Confent. 
And 'els likewife neceflary to know by a fimple View, and not by Reafoning, that God is no De- 
ceiver ; fince reafoning may ltill be falfe, in the fuppofition of a deluding God. 

AU-the ordinary Proofs of the Exiftence and Perfections of God, drawn from the Exiftence and 
Perfections of his Creatures, are methinks liable to this Defect, that they convince not the Mind 
with a fimple Perception. All thofe Arguments are Reafonings convincing in themfelves ; but be- 
caufe they are Reafonings, they are not demonftrative in fuppofing a wicked and deceitful! Genius. 
They fufticiently fhew that there is a Power fuperiour to us, which is granted even by that foo- 
lifh Suppofition : but they do not fully perfuade us that there is a God, or a Being infinitely per- 
fect ■, fo that the Conclufion of thofe Arguments is more evident than the Principle. 

'Tis more evident that there is a Power fuperiour to us, than that there is a World, fince no 
Suppofition can obviate our demonftrating that fuperiour Power ^ whereas in fuppofing an evil 
and deceitfull Spirit, 'tis impoflible to prove the Exiftence of the World: becaufe it may ftill be 
conceived, that this wicked Genius gives us the Senfe of things that are not in being •, as Sleepy 
and fome Diftempers, make us perceive things that never were, and even feel an actual pain in 
imaginary Members, fuch as we have loft, or that we never had. 

But the Arguments of the Exiftence and Perfections of God, drawn from our Idea of infinite, 
are Proois of fimple fight. We fee there is a God, as foon as we perceive infinite ; becaufe ne- 
ceifary Exiftence is included in the Idea of infinite, and that nothing but infinite can furnifh to us 
the Idea of an infinite Being. We likewife fee that God is no Deceiver, becaufe knowing that 
he is infinitely perfect:, and that infinite cannot want any Perfection, we plainly perceive that he 
will not feduce us, and even that he cannot, becaufe he can but what he wills, and what he is 
able to will. And therefore there is a God, a true God, and a God that never deceives us ; though 
he does not always enlighten us, and that we are Obnoxious to Miftakes, when we want his 
Light. Attentive Minds perceive all thofe Truths, by a fimple intuitive Perception, though we 
leem to make Arguments, that we may demonftrate them to others ; fo that they may be fup- 
pofed as unquestionable Principles of our Reafonings $ for having known that God delights not 
in deceiving us, nothing hinders but we may proceed to Reafon. 

'Tis alfo plain that the certainty of Faith depends on that Principle, That there is a God un- 
capable of Deceipt. For the Exiftence of God, and the Infallibility of his Divine Authority, 
are rather a natural Knowledge and common Notions, as to Minds capable of ferious Attention, 
than Articles of Faith ; though to have a Mind fufceptible of a fufficient Attention rightly to 
conceive thofe Truths, and willingly to apply our felves to the underftanding them, be a parti- 
cular Gift or God. • 

From that Principle, That God is no Deceiver, we might likewife infer,. that we have a real 
Body, to which we are united in a particular manner, and that we are furrounded with feveral 
ooiers*. For we are inwardly convinced of their Exiftence by the continual Senfations, which ^ * % 
God produces in us, and which we cannot correct by Reafon, without offending Faith-, though ^eoo\l 

* we 



yi F. Maleeranche Concerning Book VI. 

we can correct by Reafon the Senfations that reprefent them, as endud with fome Qualities 
arid Perfections that are not in them : So that we ought not to believe that they are fuch as we 
ice or imagine them, but only that they exift, and that they are fuch as we conceive them by 
Reafon. 

But tliat we may proceed orderly, we mull not yet examine whether we have a Body, whether 
there are others about us, or whether we have only bare Senfations of Things which exift not. 
Thofe Queftions include too great Difficulties, and are not perhaps fo neceffary as may be irna- 
gffi'd to perfeQ: our Mind, and to have an accurate Knowledge of Natural and Moral Philofo- 
phv, and fome other Sciences. 

We have within us the Ideas of Numbers and Extention, whofe Exiftence is undeniable, and 
their Nature immutable ; and which would eternally fupply us with Objects to think on, if we de- 
file to know all their Relations : It is neceffary to begin to make ufe of our Minds upon thofe Ideas, 
for fome Reafons, which it will not be amifs to explain, whereof the principal are Three. 

The Firft is, That thofe Ideas are the moft clear and evident of all : For if, to avoid Errour, 
We niuft rtill keep to Evidence in cur Reafonings, 'tis plain that we muft rather argue from the 
Ideas of Numbers and Extenfion, than from the confus'd or compos'd Ideas of Phyficks^ Morals, 
Mechanicks, Chymifiry, and other Sciences. 

Secondly, Thofe Ideas are the moft diftincf and exact of all, efpecially thofe of Numbers : So 
that the Habit ( which proceeds from the Exercife of Arithmetic!?, and Geometry ) of not being- 
content till we precifely know the Relations of Things, endues the Mind with fuch an Exactnefs 
of Thought, as is not to be found in thofe that are fatisfied with the Probabilities fo obvious to 
be met with in other Sciences. 

The Third and chief Reafon is, That thofe Ideas are the immutable Rules and common Meafure 
of all the Objects of our Knowledge : For thofe that perfectly know the Relations of Numbers 
and Figures, or rather the Art of making fuch Comparifons as are requifite to know them, have a 
kind of Universal Knowledge, and a very fure Means evidently and certainly to dilcover whatever 1 
goes not beyond the ordinary Limits of the Mind. But thofe that are not skilful in this Art, can- 
not with Certainty dilcover fuch Truths as are ibmewhat intricate, though they have very clear 
Ideas of Things, and endeavour to know their Compound Relations. 

Thefe, or the like Realons, mov'd fome of the Antients to apply their Youth to the Study of 
Arithmetick, Algebra and Geometry. Undoubtedly they well knew that Arithmetic/? and Algebra 
endue the Mind with fuch an Infight and Penetration, as was not to be gotten by other Studies j 
and that Geometry manages the Imagination fo well, as that it is not eafily puzzl'd or confounded ; 
for that Faculty of the Soul, fo neceflary to Sciences, acquires by the Ufe of Geometry, fuch an 
univerfal Nicety as promotes and preferves the clear View of the Mind, even in the moft intricate 
Difficulties. 

And therefore, he that defires always to preferve Evidence in his Perceptions, and difcover na- 
ked Truths, without Mixture of Darknefs and Errour, muft begin with the Study of Arithmetic/^ 
Algebra and Geometry, after he has obtain'd fome Knowledge, at leaft of himfelf, and the Sove- 
reign Being. As for Books that make the Way to thofe Sciences eafie, I may refer to the Medi- 
tations of des Cartes, as to the Knowledge of God, and our felves •, to the Elements of Mathe ma- 
ticks, newly printed, as to Arithmetick and Algebra ; to the Neva Elements of Geometry, printed 
in 1667, or to the Elements of Father Taquet, Jefuit, printed ax. Antwerp in \66% as to ordi j 
nary Geometry ; and as to Conick Setlions, and the Solution of Geometrical Problemes, to the Trea- 
tifes of Monfieur de la Hire, intituled, Of Conick Setlions, Of Geometrical Places, and Of the Con- 
ftruffion of Equations ; to which may be added, the Geometry of des Cartes. 

I would not have advis'd to the Elements of Mathematicks, as to Arithmetick and Algebra, if I 
knew any Author who had clearly demonftrated thofe Sciences ; but Truth obliges me to a thing, 
for which I may be blam'd by fome People ; for Algebra and Analyticks being altogether requifite 
for the Difcovery of compos'd Truths, I muft needs mew my Efteem for a Book which carries 
thofe Sciences very far, and which, in the Opinion of many Learned, explains them more clearly 
than they had been hitherto. 

By the careful Srudy of thofe general Sciences, we mall evidently know a great Number of 
Truths, very ferviceable in all accurate and particular Sciences. We may. afterwards ftudy Natu- 
ral and Moral Philofophy, as being very ufeful, though not very fit to make the Mind nice and 
quick-fighted. And if we defire to preferve Evidence in all our Perceptions, we muft take a fpe- 
cial Care not to be opinionated of any Principle that is not evident, and to which the Chmcfc, tor 
inftance, would not be fuppos'd to diffent, after having throughly weigh'd and confidefd it. 

And therefore we mult only admit in Phyficks thofe Notions which are common to all Men-, 
fuch as Axioms of Geometry, and the clear Ideas of Extenfion, Figure, Motion, Reft, and others of 
that nature, if there be any. Perhaps it will be laid, that Extenfion is not the Eflence of Matter : 
But what is that to the purpofe ? 'Tis fufficient that the World, which we conceive to confift'of 
Extenfion, appears like to that we fee, though it be not made of fuch a Matter, which is good 
for nothing, and altogether unknown, whilft ib much Noife is made about it. 

It is not abfolutely neceflary to examine whether there are actually External Beings, corre- 
fponding to thofe Ideas-, for. we argue not from thofe Beings, but from their Ideas. We muft 
only take care that our Keafonings which we make upon the Properties of Things, agree with 
our inward Coulcioufnets ; that is, that our Thoughts perfectly agree with Experience ■, te- 
caufe in Phyfks we endeavour to difcover the Order and Connexion of Ffiects with tlu r 
. r Cauks, 



Chap. VI. The Search after Truth. yi 

Caufes, either in Bodies if they exift, or in the Senfe we have of them if they are not in being; 

I fay not, however, that we can doubt whether Bodies are actually exiftirjg, when w-Vonfidtx 
that God is not a Deceiver $ and that the Order he has conftituted in our Sentiments of Thin;:-, 
both as to natural Occurrences, and fuch as are wrought to create our Belief of what Reafon is ac 
a Lofs to comprehend, is very regular. But I obferve this, becaufe 'tis not neceflary to infill at Hilt 
very long upon a thing which no body doubts of, and is not extremely conducible to the Know b by. 
of Pbyficks, confider'd as a true Science. 

Neither muft we puzzle our Heads with enquiring whether there are in the Bodies about us 
fome other Qualities, befides thofe of which we have clear Ideas j for we mull only reafon up- 
on our Ideas 5 and if there be any thing of which we have no clear, diflinct and particular Idea, 
We fhall never know it, nor argue from it with any Certainty : Whereas, perhaps, by reafoning 
upon our Ideas, we may follow Nature, and perhaps difcover that fire is not fo hidden as is com- 
monly imagined. 

As thofe who have not ftudy'd the Properties of Numbers, often imagine that it is not pomble 
to refolve fome Problemes, which are however fimple and eafie :, fo thofe that have not meditated 
upon the Properties of Exrenfion, Figures and Motions, are very apt to believe, and even to affert, 
tfrat moft part of the PhyficalQjteftions are inexplicable. But we mufl not be deterfd by the Opi- 
nion of thofe who have examin'd nothing, or nothing at leafl with due Application : For though 
f;w Truths concerning Natural Things have been fully demonflrated, yet 'tis certain that theie 
are fome that are general which cannot be doubted of, though it be very polTible not to think up- 
on them, to know nothing of them, and to deny them. 

If we meditate orderly, and with due Time and all neceflary Application, we fhall difcover fe- 
veral of thofe certain Truths I fpeak of: But for more Conveniency, it will be requifite carefully to 
read des Cartes % Principles of Fbilqfopliy, without approving of any thing he lays, till the Strength 
and Plainnefs of his Reafons fhall fuffer us to doubt no longer. 

As Moral Philofophy is the moft neceflary of all Sciences, fo it mufl be ftudy'd with the great- 
eft Application ; it being very dangerous to follow in this the Opinions of Men. But to the 
avoiding Errour, and keeping to Evidence in our Perceptions, we mufl only meditate upon fuch 
Principles as are confefs'd by all thofe whofe Hearts are not corrupted by Debauchery, and their 
Minds blinded with Pride : For there is no MoralPrinciple undeniable to Minds of Flejb ami Bloody 
who afpire to the Quality of Bold Wits. Such People conceive not the moft fimple Truths ; or if 
they do, they conftantly deny them through a Spirit of Contradict ion, and to keep up the Repu- 
tation of great Wits. 

Some of the molt general Principles of Morality are, That God having made all things for him- 
felf, has made our Underftanding to know, and our Will to love him : That being fo juft and 
powerful as he is, we cannot be happy but by obeying his Commands, nor be unhappy in follow- 
ing them : That our Nature is corrupted, our Mind depending on our Body, our Reafon on our 
Senfes, and our Will on our PafTions : That we are uncapable of performing what we plainly fee' 
to be our Duty, and that we have need of a Redeemer. There are yet many other Moral Prin- 
ciples ; as, That Retirement and Penitency are neceflary to diminifh our Union with fenfible Ob- 
jects, and to increafe that which we have with intelligible Goods, true Goods, and the Goods of 
the Mind : That we cannot enjoy vehement Pleafures, without becoming Slaves to them : That 
nothing muft be undertaken by Paffion : That we muft not long for Settlements in this Life, &c. 
But becaufe thefe laft Principles depend on the former, and on the Knowledge of Man, it behoves 
us not to take them at firft for granted. If we orderly meditate upon thofe Principles, with as 
much Care and Application as fo great a Subject deferves, and admit no Conclufion for true but 
fuch as follows from thofe Principles, we fhall compofe a very certain Syftem of Morals, and per- 
fectly agreeable with that of the Gofpel, though not fo large and compleat. 

I grant that in Moral Reafonings it is not lb eafie to preferve Evidence aftd Exactnefs, as in 
fome other Sciences -, and that the Knowledge of Man being abfolutely neceflary to thole that 
will proceed far, many Learners make no confiderable Progrefles therein : They will not confult 
themfelves, to be fenfible of the Weaknefs of their Nature : They are foon weary of interroga- 
ting the Mailer, who inwardly teaches them his Will ; that is, the Immutable and Eternal Laws, 
and the true Principles of Morality : They cannot Men with Pleafure to him that fpeaks not to 
their Senfes, who anfwers not according to their Defires, and flatters not their fecret Pride : They 
have no Veneration for fuch Words, the Luflre of which dazles not their Imagination, which are 
lowly pronoune'd, and never diftinctly heard but when the Creatures are filent : But they confult 
tvith Pleafure and Reverence Ariftotle, Seneca, or fome new Philofophers, who feduce them by 
the Obfcurity of their Words, by the Elegancy of their Exprefhons, or the Probability of their 
Reafons. 

Since the Fall of our firft Parents we efteem nothing but what refers to the Prefervation of the . 
Body, and the Conveniencies of Life •, and as we difcover that fort of Good by means of the 
Senfes, fo we endeavour to ufe them on all Occafions. The Eternal Wifdom, which is our true 
Lite, and the only Light that can illuminate us, often fhines but upon the Blind, and fpeaks but to 
the Deaf when it fpeaks within the RecefTes of our Soul, becaufe we are for the moft -part exer- 
cis'd abroad. And as we are continually putting Queftions to the Creatures, to learn any News- 
from them of the Good we are in fearch of, it was requifite, as I have faid elfewhere, that this 
Wifdom fhould offer it felf to our Senfes, yet without going out of our felves, that we might 
learn by fenfible Words and convincing Examples, the way to eternal Happinefs. God perpetuai- 

T 1% 



** F. Malebranche Concerning Book VI. 

ly imprints on us a natural Love for him, that toe may always love him ; yet by that fame Mo- 
tion of Love we inceflantly recede from him, funning toith all the ftrength he gives us to the 
finfible Good which he forbids us to lbvej and therefore as he defires we mould love him, fo he 
mult make himfelf fenfible and offer himfelf before us, to ft op by the dele&ation of his Grace all 
our reftlefs Agitations, and begin our Cure by Senfations or Satisfactions, like to the preventing 
Pleafures that had been the Original of our Difeafe. 

For thefe reafons I pretend not that Men may eafily difcover, by the ftrength of their Mind, all 
the Rules of Morality necelTary to Salvation, and much lefs that they mould be able to a£t accor- 
ding to their Light • for their Heart isftill more corrupted than their Mind. I only fay, that if they 
admit nothing but evident Principles, and argue confequently from them, they fhall difcover the 
lame Truths that are taught us in the Gofpel : becaufe it is the fame Wifdom, which fpeaks imme- 
diately, and by it felf, to thofe that difcover the Truth in evident Reafonings, and which fpeaks 
in the Holy Scriptures to thofe that underftand them in their right fenfe. 

We mult therefore ftudy Morality in the Gofpel, to fpare our felves the trouble of Meditation, 
and to learn toith certainty the Laws and Rules of our Life and Manners; As to thofe who are 
not fatisfied with a bare Certainty, becaufe it only convinces the Mind, toithout enlightening it, 
they mult meditate upon thofe Laws, and deduce them from their natural Principles ; that they 
may know evidently by Realbn what Faith has already taught them, with an abfolute Certainty; 
Thus they will convince themfelves, that the Gofpel is the molt folid Book in the World, that 
Chrift perfectly knew the Diforders and Diftempers of Nature, that he has reftified and cured 
them in a manner the molt ufeful to us, and molt worthy of himfelf, that can be conceived. 
But that the Light of Philofophers is nothing but a dark Night, and their molt fplendid Ver- 
mes, an intolerable Pride : In fhort, that Ariftot/e, Seneca, and all the reft are but Men, to fay 
nothing worfft 



CHAP. VII. 

Of the Vfe of the Firfl Rule concerning particular Quefiions. 

WE have fufficiently infifted upon the general Rule of Method, more efpecially regarding 
the Subject of our Studies, and fhewn, that Des Cartes has exactly followed it in his Sy- 
ftem of the World ; whereas Arifiotle and his Difciples have not obferved it. We proceed now to 
the particular Rules that are neceffary to refolve all forts of Queftions. 

The Queftions that may be formed upon all forts of Subjects are of fo many Kinds, as that it 
is not eafie to enumerate them. However I fhall fet down the principal. Sometimes we fearch 
after the unknown Caufes of fome Effe£ts that are known, and fbmetimes after unknown Effects 
by known Caufes. Fire burns and diflipates Wood, we enquire after the Caufe of it. Fire con- 
fifts in a violent Motion of the fiery Particles ; we defire to know what Effe£ts that Motion is 
able to produce, whether it may harden Clay, melt Iron, &c. ■ 

Sometimes we feek the Nature of a thing by its Properties, and fometimes its Properties by 
its Nature, that is known to us. We know, or fuppofe, that Light is tranfmitted in a mo- 
ment ^ and however, that it is reflected and collected by a concave Mirrour, fo as to confume 
and melt the molt folid Bodies ; and we deiign to make ufe of thofe Properties to difcover its 
Nature. On the contrary we know, that all the fpace that reaches from the Earth to the Hea- 
vens, is full of little Spherical and molt movable Bodies, tohich continually endeavour their re- 
moval from the Sun : We defire to difcover whether the endeavour of thofe fmall Bodies may 
be tranfmitted in an inftant •, tohether being reflected by a concave Glafs, they mult unite them- 
felves, and diflipate or melt the folideft Bodies. 

Sometimes toe enquire after all the Parts of the Whole, and fbmetimes after the Whole by its 
Parts. We fearch after all the unknoton Parts of a Whole that is known, tohen we feek all the 
Aliquot Parts of a Number, all the Roots of an Equation, all the Right Angles of a Figure, £?r. 
And we enquire after an unknoton Whole, all the Parts of which are known, tohen toe feek the 
Summ of feveral Numbers, the Area of many Figures, the Dimenfions of different VelTels. Or we 
feek a Whole, one Part of which is known, and whole other Parts, though unknown, include fome 
known Relation with that which is unknown •, as when we feek what is that Number, one Part of 
which, as 15, being known, makes with the other part the half, Or the third of an unknown 
Number ^ or when we feek an unknown Number equal to 1 j, and to the double of the Root of 
that unknown Number. 

Laftly, We often enquire whether fome things are equal, or like to others ^ and how much they 
are unequal or different : As tohen we defire to know whether Saturn is greater than Jupiter, and 
how much the former furpalTes the latter : Whether the Air of Rome is hotter than that of London, 
and how many degrees. 

What is general in all Queftions is, that they are formed for the Knowledge of fome Truths-, 
and becaufe all Truths are Relations, it may generally be faid, that in all Queftions, we fearch but 
after the Knowledge of fome Relations, either betwixt things, or betwixt Ideas, or betwixt things 
and their Ideas. 

There are Relations of feveral forts, as betwixt the Nature of things, betwixt their Magnitudes, 
their Parts, their Attributes, their Qualities, Effects, Caufes, 0V. but they may all be reduced to 

two, 



Ghap. VII. ' The Search after Truth. 

two, viz. to Relations of Magnitude and ofQiiaHty-, comprehending under the former, all thofe 
in which things are confider'd as fiiceptible of more and lefs ; and all the others under the latter. 
So that it may he faid, that all Queftions tend to difcover fbffie Relation, either o£ Magnitude or 
of Quality. 

The firft and chief Rule is, That we mull very diftin&ly know the fiate of the Queftion to be 
refolv'd ; and have fuch diftinft Ideas of its Terms, that we may compare them together, and 
difcover their unknown Relations. 

We mult then firft very clearly perceive the unknown Relation enquired after ; for 'tis plain, 
that if we have no certain Mark to diftinguifh it, when '-Ms fought for, or when ? tis found, our 
labour will be fruitlels. , 

Secondly, We muft, as far as poffible, make tlie Ideas which anfwer to the Terms of the Qjte- 
ftion, diftin£t, by taking off their Equivocation ; and make them clear, by confidering them with 
all the pbffible Attention : for if thofe Ideas are fo confufed and obfcure, as that we cannot make 
the neceffary Cbmparifons, to difcover' the Relations we look for, we are not yet in a ftate of re- 
folving the Queftion. 

Thirdly, We muft cbnfider with all poffible Attention, the Conditions exprefFed in the Queftion, 
if any there he; fince without that we can but confufedly underftand the ftate of that Queftion: 
befides that the Conditions commonly trace out the way to refolve it. So that when the ftate of 
a Queftion, and its Conditions are rightly underftood, we not only know what we enquire •after, 
but alfo fometimes by what means it may be difcovered. 

I grant that Conditions are not exprefs'd in all Queftions, but theri 'thofe Queftions are unde- 
terminate, and may refolved feveral ways •, as when 'tis required to rind out a Square Number, a- 
Triangle, &c without fpecifying any other particulars : Or it may be that the Querift knows not 
how to refolve, or that he conceals them, in order to puzzle the Refblver -, as when 'tis required 
to find out Two mean Proportionals betwixt Two Lines, without adding by the Interferon of the 
Circle and Parabo/a, or of the Circle and Ellipfis, &c. 

And therefore 'tis altogether neceflary, that the diftinguifhing Character of what is fearcHed 
after; be very diftinft, and not equivocal, or that it be Only proper to the thing enquired -, other- 
wife we could nbt be certain whether the Queftion prbpofed is refolved. We muft likewife care- 
fully fepa'rate from the Queftion all the Conditons that friake it intricate, and without which it 
fubfifts entire-, becaufe they ftuitlefsly divide the capacity of the Mind. Befides that we have 
not a diftinft perception of the ftate of the Queftion, as long as the Conditions that attend it are 
ufelefs. , 

Suppofe, for inftarice, a Queftion were propbfed in thefe Words ; to eaufe that a Man be- 
fprinkled with fome Liquors, and crowned with a Garland of Flowers, be not able to reft, though 
he fees nothing that is capable of rrioving him. We muft enquire whether the word Man is Meta- 
phorical ; whether the word Reft is" equivocal i whether it relates to local Motions, or to Paflions, as 
the iaft words, though he fees nothing that is capable of moving him, feem to hint : Laftly, We 
muft enquire whether the Conditions^ befprinkled with fome Liquors, and crowned with a Gar- 
land of Flowers are effential: Laftly, The ftate of that ridiculous and undeterminate Queftion be- 
ing thus plainly known, 'twill bfe eafie tb refolve it, by faying that we need but put a Man hi a 
Ship, with the Conditions exprefFed in the Queftion, - 

The Skill of thofe that propbfe fucH Queftions, is tb join fome Conditions to them, that feem 
neceflary though they be hot fo? that the Mind of the Refolver may be' diverted to things that 
are unferviceable, as to the Solution of it. As in ihii Queftion, which Servant-Maids often put 
to Children-, I have feen, fay they, Hunters, or rather Fifhers, which carried with them what 
they cbuld not catch, and threw into the Water what they catch d -, the Mind being prepoflefled 
with the Ideas of Fifhers that takeFifh, cannot underftand the ftate of that Foolifh Queftion-, the 
Whole Difficulty of which comes from hence, that we think not that Hunters and Fifhers, as 
well as other Men, often feek in theit Cloaths fome little Animals, which they throw away if 
they catch, and carry with them if they find them not. 

Sometimes all the Conditions that are neceffary to refolve a Queftion are nbt mentibn'd, which 
makes them as hard as the ex'prefftng of unferviceable Characters, as in the following-, to make 
a Man unmbvable, without binding or wounding him ; or rather, by putting his little Finger in- 
to his Ear ; fo that he mail not be able to ftir, until he takes his little Finger out of his Ear 5 that 
at firft appears impoffible, and 'tis really To : for any one may walk having his little Finger in his 
Ear -, but there wants a Condition, which, if it were exprefs'd, would remove the whole Diffi- 
culty : for you need but make a Man embrace a Bed-poft, or fomething like, and put his little 
Finger into his Ear, fo that the Poft be included between his Arm and Ear, it being plain he can- 
not ftir without taking out his Finger. It is not mentioned that there is yet fomething to be 
done, on purpofe that the Mind fhOuld not feek for, nor difcover it. But thofe that undertake 
the refolving of filch Queftions, muft make all the Queries that are requifite, to underftand the 
point wherein lies the Strefs of the Difficulty. 

Thofe arbitrary Queftions appear to be foolifh, and are indeed fo in one Senfe, as far as no- 
thing is learn 1 d by their Solution. However they ate not fo different from natural Queftions as 
may be imagined -, for both are refolved by a Method that is very near the fame. And as the Skill 
or Malicioufnefs of Men, makes arbitrary Queftions intricate and difficult -, fo natural Effects are 
of themfelves furrounded with Obfcurity and Darknefs, that muft be diffipated by the Attention 
of die Mind, and by Experiments, which are a fort of Queries put to the Author of Nature ; 

even 



75 



j 4 F. Malebrancae Concerning Book VI. 

e'vehaS Equivocations, and ufelefs Circumftances are taken ofF from arbitrary £>j(cfiions, by the 
skilful Queries that are made ro the Propofers. Let us explain thefe things methodically, and in 
a more lerious and inftrucfing Manner. 

There are many fguejuofts which appear very difficult, becaufe they are not underftood, which 
mould, rather be" taken for Axioms, that need Tome Explication, than for true ^jtejiions ; for fome 
* Propoiirions which are undeniable, when the Terms that compoie them are rightly undeiitood, 
mutt not methinks be ranked in the Number of §>iieftions. 

For Inlfance, Ir is propofed as a very difficult ^jte'fiion, Whether the Soul be ivwwrtal; becaufe 
fhey whopiopqfe, or pretend to refolve it, do not diltinctly apprehend the Senie of the Terms, 
for as the Words Soul and immortal fignirie different things, and that they know not how to uh- 
deritand them, io they cannot tell whether the Soul is immortal, having no diftinct. Idea, either 
of what they ask, or enquire after. . 

By the Word- Soul may be underftood a Subftance that thinks, wills, feels, fstc. or it may be 
taken for the Motion or Circulation of the Blood, and the Configuration of the parts of the 
Body : and laitly, for the Biood it felf, and the Animal Spirits. Likewife' by the Word immortal, 
we underftand what cannot periih by the ordinary Force of Nature, or what cannot be changed =, 
or laitly, what cannot be corrupted or diifipated, as a Vapour or Smoke.- The Words 5Wand 
immortal, being fuppos'd thus diftinguithed into their feveral Significations, a very mean Atten- 
tion of the Mind will be able to judge whether fire is immortal or not. , ; 

Firit, 'tis plain that the Soul taken in the firit Senfe, or, for a thinking Subftance, is immortal, 
if you explain immortal in the fifft Senfe, what cannot perijh by the ordinary Force of Nature ; 
iince 'tis not conceivable, that any Subftance mould be annihilated, but that to conceive the 
Poffibility of it, we muft have Recourfe to the Omnipotence of God. 

Secondly, The Soul is immortal, taking immortal in the third Senfe, for what cannot be cor- 
rupted, nor refolved into Vapour, or Smoke ; fince 'tis evident, that what cannot be divided into 
feveral Parts, cannot be corrupted, nor refolved into Vapours. 

Thirdly, The Soul is not immortal, taking it in the fecond Senfe, for what is unchangeable ; for 
we have convincing Proofs enow of the Alterations of our Soul, which feels one while Pain and 
another Pieafure, which often defires fome things which fhe afterwards ceafes to defire -, which 
is united to a Body from which me may be feparated, CV. 

•If the Word Soul be taken in fome other Senfe,- it will be as eafie to perceive, whether me is 
immortal, fixing a determin'd Senfe to that Epithet. And therefore what makes fuch Qiteftions 
difficult, is, that they are not diftinctly underftood, or that the Words, in. which they are exprefs'd 
are equivocal g fo that they rather need Explication than Proof. 

There are fome People lb dull, and others fo fanciful, as that they always take the Soul for 
fome Configuration of the Parts of the Brain, and for the Motion of the Spirits. 'Tis indeed 
impoflible to prove that the Soul is immortal, and unperifhable in that Senfe, the contrary being. 
evident : fo that this is not a Qiieflioh difficult to be refolved, but a Proportion which 'tis not 
eafie to make fome people apprehend ; becaufe they have not the fame ideas as we, and that 
they labour all they can not to have them, and to blind themfelves. 

When we are asked, whether the Soul is immortal, or any other ^uefiion whatfoever ', we muft 
firit rake off the Equivocation of Words, and know in what Senfe they are underftood, that we 
may diltinctly conceive the State of the Quejlion. If thofe that propofe it are ignorant of the 
Signification, we muft put Queries to them, in order to illuminate and determine them. If by thefe 
Queries we difcover, that their Ideas are not agreeable with ours, 'tis in vain to anfwer them ; 
for to anfwer one who imagines that a Defire, for inftance, is nothing but the Motion of fome 
imall Parricles calfd Spirits ; that a Thought is but*a Trace or an Image, which the Objects or 
thole Spirits have left in the Brain •, and that all the Reafonings of Men confift but in the various 
Situation of fome little Corpufcles, which difpofe themfelves differently in the Head ; to anfwer 
him, I lay, that the Soul taken in his Senfe is immortal, is to deceive him, or to appear ridicu- 
lous to him ; but to tell him that Ihe is mortal, is, in fome Senfe, to confirm him in a very 
dangerous Errour : we muft then reply nothing at all, but only endeavour to make him retire 
into himfelf, that he may receive the lame Ideas that we have from him who is only able to 
enlighten him. 

'lis likewiie a guefiion which feems pretty difficult, To know whether Beafts have a Soul j how- 
• ever die Equivocation being taken off, it is fo far from being hard, that thofe who fuppofe they have 
one, and thofe that think they have none, are ignorantly at bottom of the fame Opinion. 

The Soul may be taken for fomething Corporeal, difperfed through all the Body, which gives 
it Lite and Motion ; or elfe for fomething Spiritual. Thofe that pretend Beafts have no Soul, 
undeiltand it in the fecond Senfe;, for never any Man denied that there is in Animals fomething 
Corporeal, which is the Principle of their Lite or Motion ; lince it cannot be denied even of 
Watches. On the contrary, Thofe who aflert that Beafts have Souls, underftand it in die firit 
Send- lor lew believe them endued with a Spiritual m& Indivifible Soul: 16 that both Peripate- 
tic/a and Cartcjians believe that Beafts have a Soul, or ^Corporeal Principle of their Motion, and 
both think they have none, or rhat there's nothing in them Spiritual,- and Indwijible. 
^ And there-love the Difference betwixt, the Panpateticks and Cartcjians confifts not in that the 
former believe Beafts have a Soul, and the latter deny it ■, but only in that the Arifotelians chink 
that Jkyfls are capable of Pain and Pieafure, of perceiving Colours, hearing Sounds, and of all 
the other Sedations and Paiiions of Men; whereas the Cartcdans are of a contrary Opinion. 

The 



Chap. VII. The Search after Truth. yy 

The latter diftinguifh the Word Scnfation, to take off the Equivocation. For inftanee, Thfjr 
lay that when one is too near the Fire, the Parts Of Wood ftrike againft his Hand, vibrate the 
Fibres ; which Vibration is communicated to the Brain, and determines the Animal Spirits con- 
tained in it to difperfe through the outward Parts of the Body, in fuch a manner as is fit to 
make them fhrinkii?, or withdraw. They agree that all thofe tilings, or the like, may poflibly 
be found in Animals, and that they actually are, as being Properties of Bodies : And the Peripa- 
teticks diffent not from it. 

The Cartefians add, that the Percuflion or Vibration of the Fibres of the Brain in Men, \k 
attended with a Sedation of Heat, and that the courfe of the Animal Spirits to the Heart, and 
other Vifccra, is accompanied with a Paflion of Hatred, or Averfion • which Senfe and Paflion 
of the Soul they deny to be in Beafts, whereas the Peripateticks afTert, that Brute Animals feel 
thar Heat as well as we do ; that they have, as we, an Averfion to what is uneafie to them ; and ge- 
nerally, that they are capable of all our Senfations and Paflions. The Cartefians do not think 
that Beafts are fenfible of Pleafure or Pain, nor that they love or hate any thing •, becaufe they 
admit nothing in them but what is material, and believe not that Senfations and Paflions may be 
Properties of any Matter whatfoever. On the contrary fome Peripateticks efteem Matter capable 
of Seniation and Paflion, when 'tis extremely fubtle and refined ; that Beafts may feel, "by means 
of the Animal Spirits, that is to fay, of a very fubtle and fine Matter •, and that our Soul is fuf- 
ceptible of Seniation and Paflion, only becaufe fhe is united to fuch a Matter. 

And therefore to refolve that Queftion, Whether Beafts have a Soul, we rhuft retire within out 
felves, and confider with all poflible Attention our Idea of Matter: if we can conceive that Mat- 
ter fo and fo figut'd, as fquare, round, oval, &V. is- fome Pain, Pleafure, Heat, Colour, Odour, 
Sound, {ffc. then we may afTert that the Soul of Beafts, though never fo material, is however 
capable of Senfe •, but if we cannot conceive it, we muft not alTert it ; for we muft afTure no 
farther than we can conceive. And likewile if we conceive that Matter tofs'd and extremely agi- 
tated upwards, downwards, in a Circular, Spiral, Parabolical, Elliptick Line, &c. is any thing 
of Love, Hatred, Joy, Sorrow, &c. We may fay that Beafts have the fame Paflions as we, but if 
we apprehend it not, we muft not fay it, unlefs we will fpeak without underftanding our felves. 
But I am lure no Motion of Matter will ever be miftaken for Love, or Joy, by him that mail 
earneftly think upon it : So that to refolve that Queftion, Whether Beafts have Senfe, we need 
only take off Equivocation, as thofe that are called Cartefians ufe to do ; for then that Queftion 
will be made fo fimple and eafie, as to be refolved with a little Attention. 

'Tis true that St. An ft m fuppofing, according to the common prejudice of Mankind, that Lib. 4. a 
Beafts have a Soul ; which he never doubted of, as far as I can perceive, becaufe he never feriouf ly Mma. & 
examin'd it in his Works : this great Man, I fay, perceiving that it is contradictory to fay, that ® m 0y '£'~ 
a Soul, or a Subftance which thinks, feels defires, 0V. is material, believed that the Soul of Beafts ^amnti-' 
was really fpiritual and indivifible. He proves by very evident Reafons, that a Soul, or whatever tote Amrna 
has Senfe, Imagination, Fear, Defire, tfc. muft needs be Spiritual j but I never obferved that he & alias. 
produe'd any Reafon to maintain that Beafts have Souls. He even cares not to prove it, becaufe 
5 trs likely that fcarce any body doubted of it in his time. 

There being now Men, who endeavour wholly to free themfelves of their Prejudices, and 
call in Queftion all Opinions that are not grounded upon clear demonftrative Reafonings : it has 
}>een call'd into doubt, whether Animals have a Soul fufeeptible of the fame Senfations and 
Paflions as ours -, however there are ftill feveral Defenders of the ancient Prejudices, who pre- 
tend to prove that Beafts feel, will, think, and argue, even as we do, though in a more im- 
perfect- manner. 

Dogs, fay they, know their Matters, love them, and patiently bear the Blows they receive from 
them, as judging it their belt intereft not to forfake them ; but as to Strangers, they hate them 
fo much as not to away with their Flatterings. All Animals love their Young -, Birds, which build 
their Nefts in the extremities of the Branches, fufficiently lfiew, that they are afraid left fome 
Creature mould devour them : They judge thofe Branches too weak to bear their Enemies, though 
itrong enough to fupport both their Young and their Nefts. Even Spiders, and the vileft Infers, 
give fome Intimations of an Intelligence that animates them : For one cannot but wonder at the 
conduft of a little Beaft, which though it be blind, yet finds means to trapan in its Nets, others 
that have Eyes and Wings, and are fo bold as to attack the biggeft Animals we fee. 

I giant that all the actions that Beafts perform are certain indications of an Intelligence ; for 
whatever is regular demonftrates it. A Watch mews the fame -, fot 'tis impoflible Chance fhould 
have compofed its Wheels, but an underftanding Agent muft have ordered its Motions. We 
plant a Seed inverted, the Roots that were upward fink down into the Ground of themfelves, 
and the Seminal Nib that. was turn'd downwards endeavours to alter its Pofition, to break out: 
That intimates an Intelligence. That Plant produces Knots at certain Diftances, to ftrenghen it 
felf * it covers its Seed with a Skin that preferves it, and furrounds it with Prickles to defend it : 
This ftill denotes an Intelligence. In ftiort, whatever we fee done, either by Plants or by Animals, 
undoubtedly denotes an underftanding Agent. All the true Cartefians agree to it, but they make 
Diftincfions, to take away as much as poflible, the Equivocation of Words. 

The Motions of Beafts and Plants intimate an Intelligence, but that Intelligence is not Matter, 
and is much diftinguifhed from Beafts, as that which difpofes the Wheels of a Watch is diftinguifh- 
ed from the Watch it felf For that Intelligent Being feems infinitely Wife, Powerful, and infinitely 
the fame who has famed us in our Mother's Womb, and affords us a growth to which all the 

U . attempts 



?8- 



F. Malebranche Qonmning Book VI. 

attempts of our Mind and Will cannot add fo much as a Span. And therefore there is in Beafts 
neither Underftanding nor Soul, in the fenfe thofe Words are commonly taken- They eat with- 
out pleafure, they cry without Pain, they grow without being confcious of it, they neither deiire, 
nor fear, nor know any thing •, and if they aft in fuch a manner as intimates an Intelligence, it is 
becaufe God having made them for a certain time, he has framed their Body in fuch a manner 
as that they machinally, and without Fear, (hun whatever is able to deftroy them. ..Orherwiie 
it muft be faid, that there is more Underftanding in the fmalleft Infect, or even in a little Seed, 
than in the moft Ingenious Man; it being certain that there are in them more different Pares, 
and regular Motions, than we are able to know. 

But as Men are ufed to confound all things, and imagine that their Soul produces in their Bo- 
dies moft or all the Motions and Changes which befal it, they fix to the Word Soul the wrong Idea 
of Former and Preferver of the Body. So that thinking that their Soul produces in them whatever 
is abfolutely requilite to the Prefervation of their Life, though (he knows not fo ^much as the Con- 
texture of the Body which me animates, they judge that there mull needs be a Soul in Beaiis, to 
produce all theMotions and Changes which befall them, becaufe they are fo like thole which oc- 
cur in us. For Beafts are begot, fed, ftrengthened, as our Body : they eat, drink, fleep, as we do -, 
becaufe we are altogether like them, as to our Body : the only Difference betwixt us and them con- 
fiding in this, that we have a Soul, and they have none. But our Soul frames not our Body, di- 
gefts not our Aliments, and gives no Motion and Heat to our Blood. She feels, wills, argues, 
and animates the Body, as to the Senfations and Pamons that relate to it : but not by difperiing- 
her felf through our Members, to communicate Senfe and Life to them ; for our Body can receive 
nothing of what belongs to the Mind. Thence 'tis plain, that the Reafon why we cannot refolve 
feveral Queftions, proceeds from our not diftinguifhing, and even from our not thinking to diftin- 
guifh the different fignifications of a Word. 

'Tis true,' that we diftinguifti fometimes, but we do it fo ill, that inftead of taking off the Equi- 
vocation of Words by our Diftin£tions, we make them more perpkxed and dark. For inlhnce, 
when we are asked, whether the Body lives, how it lives, and in what manner the Rational Soul 
animates it. Whether the Animal Spirits, the Blood, and other Humours live ; whether the Teeth,' 
the Hair, and the Nails are animated, &c. we diftinguifh the Words, live and be animated, in 
living or being animated with a Rational, with a Senfitive, or with a Vegetative Soul. But that 
Diftincf ion is only fit to perplex the Qneftion •, for thofe Words want an Explanation themfelves 5 
and perhaps the two laft, Vegetative and Senfitive, are inexplicable and inconceivable in the Senfe? 
they are commonly underftood. 

If we deiire to fix a clear and diftinft Idea to the Word life, we may fay, That the Life of the 
Soul is the Knowledge of Truth, and the love of Good ; or rather, that her Thoughts are her Life •; 
and that the Life of the Body confifts in the Circulation of the Blood, and the juft Proportion 
and Mixture of Humours •, or rather, that the Life of the Body is fuch a Motion of its parts as is 
fit for its Prefervation. The Ideas fix'd to the Word Life being thus made plain, it will evident-/ 
ly appear, Firjl, That the Soul cannot communicate her Life to the Body, flnce me cannot make 
it think. Secondly, That (he cannot give it the Life by which it is fed, grows, &c. fince fhe knows- 
not fo much as what is requifite to digeft our Aliments. Thirdly, That (he cannot make it feel, 
fince Matter is incapable of Senfation, fie. Thus all other Queftions concerning that Subjecf,- 
may be refolved without Trouble ; provided the Words, in which they are exprefs'd, excite clear 
Ideas ; for if they raife confufed and. dark, it is impoffible to folve them. 

In the mean while, 'tis not always abfolutely neceflary to have Ideas that perfectly reprefenr 
thole things, the Relations of which we deiire to examine. It is often' fufficient to have but an 
initial or imperfecf Knowledge of them, becaufe we feek not always exacfly to know their Re- 
lations. I (hall explain this more at large. 

There are Truths or Relations of two Sorts ; fome are exactly known, and others but imper- 
fectly. We exacfly know the Relation betwixt fuch a Square, and fuch a Triangle, but have only 
an imperfecl: Knowledge of the Relation betwixt London and Tor/i. We know that fuch a Square 
is equal to fuch a Triangle, double or treble of it, &c. but we only know that London is big- 
ger than Jork, without knowing precifely how much. 

Moreover there are infinite Degrees of lmperfecHon in Knowledge ; and no Knowledge is imper- 
fecl, but in reference to a more perfecb. For Inftance, We know that London is bigger than Lin- 
coln fs Inn fields, and that Knowledge is only imperfecl:, in Relation to another more exac>, by 
which we might accurately know, how much London is larger than that open place contained in it,' 

'There are therefore feveral forts of Queftions. Firjl, There are fome in which we feek a per- 1 
fecf Knowledge of all the exacb Relations of two or feveral things betwixt each other. 

Secondly, There are fome in which we fearch after the perfect. Knowledge of fome exact Re- 
lation betwixt two or feveral things. 

Lhirdly, There are (bme in which we enquire after the perfeel Knowledge of fome Relation 
nearly approaching to the exacf Relation, that is betwixt two or more feveral rhings. 

Fourthly, There are ibmc in which we are content to find a general and indefinite Relation. 

Tis evident, Firlt, That to refolve the Queftions of the Fitft (bit, and perieftly to know all 
the exacf Relations of Magnitude and Quality betwixt two or more things ; we mult have diftincl; 
Ideas perfectly reprelenting them, and compare rhem together in all the poflible manners. We 
may, ior Inftance, refolve all the Queftions that tend to difcover the exact Relations betwixt 2' 
and 8, becaufe both Numbers being accurately known may be compared together, as much as is< 

necef- 



Chap. V'ili. The Search after Truth. -y 

neceffary to know the exact Relations of their Magnitude and Quality. We may know that 8 is 
4 times 2, and that 8 and 2 are even, but not fquare Numbers. 

Tis plain. Secondly, That to reiblve §>yejlipns of the fecond fort, and accurately to know fome 
Relation of Magnitude or ^uality^ which, is betwixt two or more things ; 'tis neceiTary and fuffici 
ent'diftinttly to know thofe Faces by which they mult be compared, to diicover the enquired 
Relation. For Inftance, to refolve fuch ^tcftions as tend to diicover fome exact Relations be- 
twixt 4 and 16, as that 4 and 16 are even and fquare Numbers, it's fufficient exactly to know 
that 4 and 16 can be divided into equal parts without Fractions, and that both are the product of 
a Number multiplied by it felf ; and 'tis to no purpofeto examine what is their true Magnitude : 
It being plain, that to know the exa£t Relations of Quality betwixt things, adiltinct Idea of their 
Quality is fufficient, without thinking on their Magnitude ; and that to know the exaft Relations 
of Magnitude, we need not fearch after the true Quality, an accurate Knowledge of their Mag- 
nitude being all that is required. 

', Thirdly, It clearly appears that to refolve the Queftions of the third fort, or to know fome 
Relation very near approaching the exa£t Relation that is betwixt two or feveral things - it is 
enough nearly to know the Faces by which they muft be compared, to difcover the Relation re- 
quired, whether it be of Magnitude or Quality. For Inftance, I may evidently know that the V 8 
is greater than 2, becaufe I may very near know the true Magnitude of the V 8'j but I cannot dif- 
cover how much the V 8 is greater than 2, becaufe I cannot exactly find out the true Magnitude 
of the V 8. 

Laftly, 'Tis evident that to refolve the Queftions of the fourth fort, or to difcover general and un- 
definite Relations, it is enough to know things in a manner propotion'd to the need we ftand in of 
comparing them together, to find out the required Relation. So that 'tis not neceiTary to the Solu- 
tion of all forts of Queftions, to have very diftinct Ideas of their Terms, or perfectly to know the 
things exprefled by thofe words. But our knowledge muft be the more exa£t, as the Relations 
we fearch after are more accurate and numerous : For as we have faid in imperfect Queftions, im* 
perfect Ideas of the things conlider'd are fufficient to refolve them perfectly, that is, as far as they 
reach. And many Queftions may be refolved even without any diftincl: Idea of their Terms 5 as 
when we are ask'd whether Fire is capable of melting Salt, hardning Clay, refolving Lead into Va- 
pours, and the like, we underftand perfectly thofe Queftions, and may very well folve them, though 
we have no diftincl: Idea of Fire, Salt, Clay, &c. Becaufe the Querifts only defire to know, whe- 
ther we are afcertained by fenfibie Experiments that Fire produces thofe Effects. And therefore 
may receive a fatisfactory Anfwer, by a knowledge drawn from the Senfes. 



CHAP. VIII. 

An Application of the other Rules to particular Queftions. 

QUeftions are of two forts, fome are fimple and others compound. The former may be folved 
_by the bare Attention of the Mind to the Ideas of the words, in which they are exprefled : 
buc The Solution of the latter muft be perform'd by comparing them to a third or to many other 
Ideas. We cannot find out the unknown Relations that are exprefs'd in the Terms of a Queftion, 
by immediately comparing the Ideas of thofe Terms, fince they can neither be joined nor compa- 
red. We muft then have one or feveral mean- Ideas, that we may make fuch Comparifons, as are 
neceffary to difcover thofe Relations $ taking a fpecial Care that thole mean Ideas be the more clear 
and diftinft, as the Relations enquired after are more exact and numerous. 

That Rule is but a Confequence of the firft, but of an equal importance with it. For if ex- 
actly to know the Relation of the things compared, it is neceffary to have clear and diftin£t Ideas 
of them : It plainly follows from the fame Reafon, that we muft have an accurate knowledge 
of the mean Ideas, by which we intend to make our Comparifons; fince we muft diftindtly know 
the Relation of meafure with each of the things meafured, to find out their Relations. I fhall 
give fome Inftances of it. 

When we put a piece of Cork, or other fmall and light Veflel, in the Water, with a Load- 
ftone in it, and offer to the North Pole of that Stone the fame Pole of another Magnet which we 
keep in our Hands, we prefently perceive that the former Load-ftone flies back, as though it were 
driven by a violent Wind.. 'Tis requir'd to difcover the Caufe of that Effect. 

'Tis plain that to render a Reafon of the Motion of that Load-ftone, it is not fufficient to know 
the Relations it has to the other ; for we might perfectly know them all, and yet not underftand 
how two Bodies could repel each other without meeting. 

We muft therefore examine what are the Things which we diftin£tly conceive capable, accord- 
ing to the Courfe of Nature, of moving Bodies ; for 'tis requir'd to find out the natural Caufe of 
the Motion of a Load-ftone, which is certainly a Body. And therefore we muft not have re- 
courfe to any Quality, Form, or Being, which by a clear Knowledge we cannot conceive capable of 
moving Bodies ; neither muft we afcribe their Effect: to an underltanding Agent, fince we are not 
affur'd that Intelligences are the ordinary Caufes of the-natural Motions of Bodies, and know not 
fo much as whether they can produce Motion. 

We plainly know that it is a natural Law, that Bodies fhould move each other when they 
meet : We muft then endeavour to explain the Motion of the Load-ftone, by the Means of fome 

concurrent 



Bo F. Male-branche Concerning Book VI. 

concurrent Body. 'Tis true that fomething befides a Body may move it •, but as long as we have 
no diftinct Idea of that Thing, we muft not admit it as a proper Means to difcover what is fearch- 
ed after, nor to explain it to others •, for to contrive a Caufe which none clearly conceives, is not 
to give account of an Effect. We muft not then trouble our felves to enquire whether there is, or 
is not any other natural Caufe of the Motion of Bodies, belides the mutual Impulfe ; but rather 
fuppofe that there is none, and attentively confider what Bodies may meet with, and move that 
Load-ltone. 

We prefently fee that it is not mov'd by the Magnet we keep in our Hands, fince it touches it 
not -, but becaufe 'tis mov'd only when that Magnet is brought near it, and that it moves not of it 
felf, we muft infer that it is mov'd by fome fmall Effluviums, of little Bodies, that proceed from 
that Magnet, and are driven to the other Load-ftone; 

To difcover thofe Corpufcles, we muft not open our Eyes, nor nearly confider that Magnet £ 
for our Senfes might impofe upon our Realbn, and make us judge that nothing proceeds out of it," 
becaufe we perceive it nOt. ' Perhaps we mould not reflect that we fee not the molt impetuous 
Winds, nor feveral other Bodies that produce very furprizing Effects : We muft then keep dole to 
that clear and intelligible Means, and carefully examine all the Effects of a Load-ftone, to difco- 
ver liow that Magnet may continually vent fo many little Bodies, without diminifhing •, for the 
Experiments we fhall make will difcover, that the fmall Particles that evaporate at one fide, im- 
mediately re-enter through another ^ and will ferve to explain all the Difficulties that may be ob- 
• jetted againft the Method of folving this Queftion. But it muft be obfetv'd, that this Medium 
muft not be fbrfaken, though we fhould not be able to anfwer fome Objections proceeding from 
our Ignorance in feveral things. 

If we defire not to examine why Load-ftones remove from each other when their Poles of the' 
fame Name are in Oppoiition to each other, but rather why they approach and endeavour to unite 
together when the North Pole of one is oppofite to the South Pole of the other, the Queftion will 
be more difficult, and one Medium alone will not be fufflcient to refolve it -, for it is not enough 
exactly to know the Relations betwixt the Poles of thofe two Load-ftones, nor to have recourfe 
to the Medium propos'd in the fore-going Queftion ; for that Means feems only fit to hinder the Ef- 
fect, whereof the Caufe is fought for : Neither muft we propofe any of thofe Things that are not 
clearly known to be the natural and ordinary Caufes of Corporeal Motion ;. nor evade the Diffi- 
culty of the Queftion, by the rambling and uncertain Notion of an Occult Vitality in Load-ftones, 
by which they attract each other -, for the Mind cannot conceive any fuch Attraction in Bodies." 

The Impenetrability of Bodies plainly convinces us, that Motion may be communicated by In>" 
pulfion •, and Experience evidently proves, that it is communicated that way : But there is no Rear 
fon, nor Experiment, that clearly demonftrates the Motion of Attraction ^ for when the true and 
certain Caufe of the Experiments, which are alledg'd to prove that fort of Motion, is found out, 
it is vifible that what appear'd to be done by Attraction, is produc'd by Jmpulfwn. We muft not 
therefore iniift upon any other Communication of Motion but that effected by Impulfwn, fince this 
Way is fure, and undeniable ; whereas all the others imaginable have at leaft fome Obfcurity in 
them. But though it might be demonftrated, that mere Corporeal Things have fome other Prin- 
ciples of Motion befides the Concourfe of Bodies, this might not however be reafonably rejected, 
but muft rather be infifted upon preferably to all others, it being the moft clear, and molt evident - y 
and appearing fo undeniable, that we may confidently affert, that it has always been receiv'd by- 
all Nations and Ages in the World. 

Experience fhews, that a Load-ftone, freely fwimming upon the Water, draws towards that 
which we keep in our Hands when their different Poles are oppofite to each other ; we muft then 
conclude, that the Load-ftone upon the Water is driven to it. But as the Magnet we hold cannot 
drive the other, feeing this other approaches it, and that the free Load-ftone only moves at the Pre- 
• fence of the other Magnet, 'tis plain that to refolve this Queftion by the receiv'd Principle of the 
Communication of Motions, we muft have recourfe to two Means at leaft. 

The Load-ftone c approaches the Magnet C, and 
therefore the furrounding Air drives it, fince no 
other Body can do it -, that's the firft Means. The 
Load-ftone c moves not, except at the Pretence of 
the Magnet C ; and therefore the Magnet C muft 
needs determine the Air, to drive the Load-ftone c-, 
that's the fecond Means. 'Tis evident thefe two 
Means are abfolutely neceflary : So that now the 
whole Difficulty confifts in joining thofe two Means 
together •, which may be done two feveral Ways ; 
either beginning' by fomething known in the Air, 
that encompafles the Load-ftone c ; or by fome- 
thing known in the Magnet C 

If we know that the Parts of the Air are in per- 
petual Agitation, as thofe of all fluid Bodies ufe 
to be, we fhall not doubt but they continually 
ftrike againft the Load-ftone c, which they fur- 
round •, but becaufe they ftrike it equally on all 
fides, they impel it one way no more than another, • 

as 





>^ 



t ■ :■ > 

Chap. VIII. The, Search after Truth. 8 

as long as there is an equal Quantity of Air on all fides. It being fo, 'tis eafie to judge that the 
Magnet C hinders, left there fhould be as much Air towards a as towards /;, which cannot be done 
but by its difFufing fome other Corpufcles betwixt C and c, and therefore there exhale fuch Particles 
out of both Load-ftones, which filling up that Space, and carrying away the Air about a, make 
the Load-itone c lefs prefs'd on that fide than on the other ; and it mult by cohfequence approach 
the Magnet C, fince all Bodies move towards the fide on which there is the leaft Pfeffure or Re- 
filtance. . 

But if in the Load-ftone c, about the Pole a, there were not many Pores fit to receive the fmall 
Particles ftreamtng out of the Pole B of the Magnet C, and too fmall to admit tliofe of the Air, 
'tis plain that thole fmall Particles being more agitated than the Air, fince they are to chafe it 
from betwixt the Load-ftones, they would drive the Load-ftone c, and remove it from the Mag- 
net C : Therefore, fince the Load-ftone c approaches to, or removes from the Magnet C, accord- 
ing as they are oppos'd by different or the fame Poles, we muft needs infer that the Poles a and b 
of the Load-ftone c are full of different Pores ; otherwife, the fmall Particles iffuirig out of the 
Magnet C could not have a free PafTage, without impelling the Load-ftone c at the fide a, nor 
would they repel it at the fide b. What I fay of one of thefe Load-ftones, muft be underftood of 
the other. 

Tis plain that we always learn fomething by that Method of Arguing from clear Ideas, and un- 
deniable Principles : For we have difcover'd that the Aif which environs the Load-ftone c, was 
driven from thence by Corpufcles perpetually flowing out of the Pores of both Load-ftones ; which 
Corpufcles find a free PafTage at one fide, but are fhut out at the other. If We defir'd nearly to 
diicover the Bignefs and Figure of the Pores of the Load-ftone through which thofe Particles pafs, 
we ought to make other Experiments ; but that would lead us to Subjects which we intend not to 
treat of The Curious may confult des Cartels Principles of Philofopby : I only obferve, as an 
Anfiver to an Objection which will prefently be made againft this Hypothec's -, that is, Wby tbofe 
fmall Particles cannot re-enter tbrougb tbe Pores from whence they came ? That befides that the 
Pores of the Load-ftones may be fuppos'd to be wrought like the Channelling of a Screw, which 
may pruduce the propos'd ErrecF ; it may be faid likewife, that the fmall Branches, of which thofe 
Pores are made, bend one way to obey and yield to the Motion of the entring Particles ; whereas 
they ftand on end, and fhut them out another way : So that we muft not be furprrz'd at tliis Dif- 
ference betwixt the Pores of the Load-ftone, for it may be explain'd in feveral manners, and the 
only Difficulty confifts in chufing the beft. 

If we had endeavour'd to refolve the fore-mention'd Queftion, beginning witli the Corpufcles 
that are fuppos'd to ftream out of the Magnet C, we mould have found the fame ; and likewife 
difcover'd that Air is compos'd of an infinite Number of Parts that are in a perpetual Motion, with- 
out which it would be impoflible that the Load-ftone c could approach the Magnet C. I infill not 
'on the Explication of this, becaufe there is no Difficulty in it. '..■'. 

Here follows a Queftion more compound and complicate than the fore-going •, for the Solution 
of which, 'tis neceffary to make ufe of many Rules. 'Tis ask'd, Which may be tbe Natural and 
Mecbanical Caufe of tbe Motion of our Members. 

The Idea of Natural Caufe is clear and diftincF when underftood, as I have explain'd it in the 
former Queftion : But the Words, Motion of our Members, are equivocal and confiis'd, becaufe 
there are feveral fuch Motions •, fome being Voluntary, others Natural, and others Convulfive. 
There are alfo different Members in the Humane Body -, and therefore, according to the firft Rule, 
I muft ask, Of which of thefe Motions the Caufe is requir'd from me ? But if the Queftion be 
left undetermined, and to my Difcretion, I examine it after this manner. 

I attentively confider the Properties of thofe Motions ; and difcovering at firft that Voluntary 
Motions are fooner perform'd than Convulfive, I infer that their Caufe is different, and therefore 
that I may and muft examine the Queftion by Parts, for it feems to require a long Difcuflion. 

I reftrain then my felf to confider only Voluntary Motions ; and becaufe feveral of our Members 
are employ 'd about them, I content my fclf for the prefent with the Confidefation of the Arm. 
I obferve that it is compos'd of feVeral Mufcles, which are moft or all in Acfion when we raife 
fo'.nething from the Ground, or remove it from one place to the other : But I only infift upon one, 
being willing to fuppofe that the others are very near fafhion'd after the fame manner. I inform 
my felf of its Texture and Shape by fome Book of Anatomy, or rather by the fehfible Sight of its 
Fibres and Tendons, which I caufe to be differed in my prefence, by fome skilful Anatbmift, to 
whom I put all the Queries which, in the fequel, may exhibit to my Mind a Medium tdfind out 
what I feek for. 

After fuch a ferious Confideration, I cannot doubt but the Principle of the Motion of my Arm 
depends on the Contraction of its Mufcles which compofe it. I am likewife content, left I fhould 
puzzle my felf with too many Difficulties, to fuppofe, according to the common Opinion, that 
this Contraction is perform'd by the Animal Spirits, which filling up the Ventricle of thofe Muf- 
cles, may caufe their Extremities to come nearer. Now the whole Queftion concerning Voluntary 
Motion is reduc'd to this Pointy Hozb tbe fmall Quantity of Animal Spirits which are contained in 
our Arm, may at tbe Command of tbe Will, fo fuddenly /well the MuJ "dies, di to afford afufficient 
Strength to lift up an Hundred Weight, or more. 

Upon an attentive Reflexion thereupon, the firft Means that offers it felf to the Imagination, 
is commonly that of a quick and violent Fermentation, like to that of Gun-pOwder, or of fome • 
Liquors fill'd with Volatile Salt, when they are mix'd with others that are Acid, or full of a 

X fixed 



%i F. Malebranche Concerning BookVt' 

fixed Salt. A final! quantity of Gun-powder is able, when kindled, to raife not only an Hun- 
dred Weight, but even a Tower,, and a Mountain. Earthquakes, that overthrow Cities, and 
lhake whole Countries, proceed from Spirits kindling under the Ground, almoft as Gun-powde: , 
So that iuppofing in the Arm fuch a Caufe of the Fermentation and Dilatation of the Spirits, ir. 
may be look'd upon as the Principle of that Force, by which Men perform fo fudden and violent 
Motions. 

But as we ought to miftruft thofe Means that are offefd to the Mind by the Senfes, and of 
which we have no clear and evident Knowledge, fo we mult not eafily admit this ; for it is not 
fufficient to give an Account of the Strength and Quicknefs of our Motions, by a Comparifon : ; 
For this is both a confused, and imperfeS Account h becaufe we are here to explain a volunta- 
ry Motion, and Fermentation is not fo. The Blood is exceedingly fermented in Fevers, and we 
cannot hinder it : The Spirits are infiam'd and agitated in the Brain, but we cannot rule their 
Agitation, nor leffen it by our Defire. When a Man moves the Arm feveral Ways, a Thouland 
Fermentations, great and fmall, fwift and flow, ought to begin, and (what is harder to ex- 
plain) to end likewife in a Moment, as often and as foon as it is defir'd, if this Hypothefis 
were true. Befides, Thofe Fermentations ought not to diflipate all their Matter, but need al- 
ways be ready to take Fire. When a Man has walk'd Twenty Miles, how many Thoufand times 
muff the Mufcles, employ'd in walking, have been fill'd and empty'd h and what a vaft quantity 
of Spirits would be requir'd, if Fermentation mould diffipate and deaden them fo often ? And 
therefore this Suppofition is infuiflcient to explain fuch Motions of our Body as entirely depend 
upon our Will. 

3 Tis plain that the prefent Queftion may be reduc'd to this Problem of Mechanicks, To find 
out by Fneumatick Engines a Means to overcome fuch a Force of an Hundred Weight by another 
Force, though never fo fmall \ a* that of an Ounce Weight : And that the Application of that fmall 
Force may produce the defied Effetl, at the Difcretion of the Will. The Solution of that Problem 
is eafie, and the Demonftration of it clear. 

It may be folv'd by a VeiTel which hath two Orifices, one of which is a little more than 1600 
times larger than the other, in which the Pipes of two equal Bellows are inferted ; and let a Force 
precifely 1600 times ftronger than the other be apply'd to the Bellows of the larger Mouth, for 
then the Force 1600 times weaker fhall overcome the ftronger. The Demonftration of which is 
clear in Mechanicks, fince the Forces are not exaftly in a reciprocal Proportion with their Mouths ; 
and that the Relation of the weaker Force to the fmaller Mouth, is greater than the Relation of the 
ftronger Force to the larger Mouth. 

But to folve this Problem by an Engine which fets better before the Eyes the Effecl of the Muf- 
cles, than the Former : We muft blow a little in a Foot-ball, and hinder the Air from going out 
with a Sucker ; then put upon that Foot-ball, half full of Wind, a Stone of 5 or 600 weight -, 
or having fet it on a Table, lay on it a Board, and on that Board a huge Stone, or caufe a heavy 
Man to fit upon the Board, allowing him to hold by fomething, that he may fit the fafter upon 
the riling Foot-ball -, for if you blow again into it only with the Mouth, it will raife the Stone 
that compreffes it, or the Man that fits upon it. The Reafon of this is, that the Mouth of the 
Foot-ball is fo fmall, or at leaft muft be fuppos'd fo, in comparifon to the Capacioufnefs of the 
Foot-ball that withftands the Weight of the Stone, that by fuch means a very fmall, is able to over- 
come a very great Force. 

If we alio confider that Breath alone is capable of violently driving a Leaden Ball through a 
long and ftrait Trunk, becaufe the Strength of the Breath is not diffipated, but continually re- 
newed, it will vifibly appear, that the neceffary Proportion betwixt the Mouth and the largenefs 
of the Foot-ball being fuppos'd, Breath alone may overcome a very confiderable Force. 

If we therefore conceive that the whole Mufcles, or each of the Fibres of which they are made, 
have, as this Foot-ball, a competent Capacity to admit Animal Spirits, that the Pores through 
which thofe Spirits flow are yet proportionably ftraiter than the Neck of a Bladder, or the Aper- 
ture of the Foot-ball ; that the Spirits are detain'd in, or driven through the Nerves, almoft as the 
Breath through a Trunk ; that the Spirits are more agitated than the Air of the Lungs, and dri- 
ven with a greater Violence to the Mufcles than it is in a Bladder - y we fhall perceive that the Mo- 
tion of the Spirits which are difpers'd through the Mufcles, can conquer the Force of the heavieft 
Weight we carry ^ and that if we cannot move other more ponderous, this Want of Strength pro- 
ceeds not fo much from the Spirits, as from the Fibres and Membranes of which the Mufcles are 
compos'd, which would burtt fhould we make too great an Effort. Befides, If we obferve that , 
by the Laws of the Union betwixt Soul and Body, the Motion of thofe Spirits, as to their Deter- 
mination, depends on the Will of Man, we fhall fee that the Motion of the Ann muft needs be vo- 
luntary. 

Tis true that we move our Arm fo readily, that it feems, at firft fight, incredible that the 
CourTe of the Spirits into the Mufcles fhould be fo fwift as to effecl; that Motion. But we 
ought to confider that thole Spirits are extremely agitated, always ready to pafs from one Mufcle 
into another ; and that a fmall quantity of that Spirituous Liquor may fuificiently fwell them up, 
fo as to move them, or to lift up from the Ground fomething very light : For we cannot raife 
great Weights very readily, becaufe that Effort requires a great ftretching and fwelling of the 
Mufcles, which cannot be perfbrm'd by the Spirits that are in the neighbouring 01 Ant agon i ft 
Mufcles -, and therefore lotrie Time is requifd to call in more Spirits to their help, and in fuch a 
Quantity, as that they may be able to with Hand the Heavineis of the Weight, Thus we fee that 

thofe 



fchap. VIII. the Search after Truth. 83 

thofe that are loadeii cannot run, and that a ponderous thing is not lifted up from the Ground fb 
readily as a Straw. 

If we coniider that thofe that are of a fiery Temper, or heated with Wine, are quicker than 
§therss that amongft living Creatures, thofe whofe Spirirs are more agitated, as Birds, move 
fwifter than thofe in which Blood is colder, as it is in Frogs ^ and that in fome of them, as the 
Chamelion, theTortoife, and fome Infecls, the Spirits are fo little agitated, that their Mufcles are 
not fooner fill'd than a Foot-ball would be by the Brearh of a Man. AH thefe things being well ob- 
ferv'd, may probably make our Explication acceptable. • ^ 

But though that part of the Queftion propos'd which concerns Voluntary Motions be fufficient- 
ly refolv'd, yet we rauft not alTert that it is fully and perfectly, or that nothing elfe in our Body 
contributes to thofe Motions beiides what has been mention'd -, for moft probably there are a Thou- 
fan.l Springs that facilitate them, which will for ever be unknown, even to thofe who give a better 
Guels upon the Works of God. 

The fecond Part of the Queftion to be examin'd concerns the Natural Motions, or thofe that 
have nothing extraordinary in them, as Convulfions have •, but are abfolutely neceiTary to the Pre- 
fervation of our Machine, and confequently altogether independent on our Will. 

I firft confider with all the poffible Attention, what Motions have thofe Conditions, and whe- 
ther they are perfectly alike : And as I quickly perceive that they are for the moft part different 
from each orher, left I fliould perplex my felf with too many things, I fliall only infill upon the 
Motion of the Heart •, which, of all the inward Parts, is the belt known, and its Motions the 
raoit fenfible. Whilft I examine its Conftru&ion, I obferve two Things, amongft many others : 
Firft, That it is compos'd of Fibres, as the other Mufcles : And Secondly, That there are two re- 
markable Cavities in it : And therefore I judge that its Motion may be perform'd by means of the 
Animal Spirirs, fince ir is a Mufcle^ and that the Blood ferments and dilates in it, fince it has 
Cavities. The firft of thefe Judgments is founded upon what I have faid before : The fecond, 
upon the Heart's being much hotter than any other Parts of the Body ^ and that it difTufes Heat, 
together with Blood, into all our Members ^ and that thofe two Ventricles could neither be 
form'd, nor preferv'd, but by the Dilatation of the Blood : So that they are fubiervient to the 
Caufe that has produc'd them. I can then give a fufficient Reafon of the Motion of the Heart, 
by the Spirits that agitate, and the Blood that dilates it, during the Fermentation : For though 
the Caufe I alledge of its Motion fhould not be true, yet I plainly fee that it is fufficient to pro- 
duce it. 

Tt may be, that the Principle of Fermentation or Dilatation of Liquors is not fo well known to 
all Readers, as that I may pretend to have explain'd an EfFeft:, by generally mewing that it pro- 
ceeds from Fermentation : But all particular Queftions are not to be refolv'd by afcending to the 
firft Caufe, though that may be done too, and a true Syftem on which all particular Effects depend, 
difcovef d, provided we only infift upon clear Ideas. But that Way of Philofophizing is neither 
the exaO:eft, nor yet the fhorteft. 

To comprehend this, it muft be obferv'd that there are Queftions of two forts ; in the firft, it 
is requir'd to difcover the Nature and Properties of fome Thing •, in the others, we only defire to 
know whether a Thing has fuch or fuch Properties j or if we know it has, we defire only to di£ 
cover what is the Caufe of them. 

To folve the Queftions of the firft fort, we muft confider Things in their Birth and Original, 
and conceive that they are always produc'd by the moft fimple and natural Ways : But the Solu- 
tion of the others requires a very different Method, for they muft be refolv'd by Suppofitions •, 
and then we muft examine whether thofe Suppofitions induce into any Abfurdity, or whether they 
lead to any Truth plainly and clearly known. 

For inftance, We defire to difcover the Properties of the Rou/et, or fome one of the Coniek 
Seffions : We muft confider thofe Lines in their Generation, and form them by the moft fimple 
and leaft perplexing Ways ; for that is the belt and fhorteft Means to difcover their Nature and 
Properties. We eafily fee that the Subtendent of the Roulet is equal to the Circle whence it is 
form'd : And if we difcover not many of its Properties that way, 'tis becaufe the Circular Line 
that produces it is not fufficiently known. But as to Lines merely Mathematical, the Relations 
of which may be more clearly known, fuch as are Coniek Settions •, 'tis fufficient for the difcover- 
ing a vaft Number of their Properties, to confider them in their Generation : Only we muft ob- 
ferve, that as they may be produc'd by a Regular Motion feveral Ways, fb all forts of Generation 
are not equally proper to enlighten the Mind •, that the moft fimple are the belt ^ and that it of- 
ten happens, notwithftanding that fome particular Methods are fitter than others, to demonftrate 
fome particular Properties. 

But when it is not requir'd to difcover in general the Properties of a Thing, but to know whe- 
ther fuch a Thing has fuch a Property ^ then we muft fuppole that it actually enjoys it, and care- 
fully examine the Confequences of that Suppofition, whether it induces into a manifeft Abfurdi- 
ty<, or leads to an undeniable Truth, that may ferve as a Means to find out what is fought for. 
That is the Method which Geometricians ufe to folve their Problems : They fuppofe what they 
feek, and examine what will follow of it •, they attentively confider the Relations that refult from 
the Suppofition •, they reprefent all thofe Relations that contain the Conditions of the Problem, 
by Equations, and then reduce thofe Equations, according to the ufual Rule's ; fb that what is 
unknown, is found equal to one or feveral Things perfectly known, 

I fay 



^. F. Malebranche Concerning Book VI. 

I fay therefore, that when 'tis requir'd to difcover in general the Nature of Fire, and of the dif- 
ferent Fermentations, which are the moft univerfal Cauies of^iatural Effecfs, the fhorteft and ih- 
reft Way is to examine them in their Principle. We mull confider the Formation of the molt agi- 
tated Bodies, the Motion of which is diffus'd into thofe that ferment. We muft by clear Ideas, 
and by the moft fimple Ways, examine what Mot,ion may produce in Matter. And becaufe Fire 
and the various Fermentations are very general Things, and coniequently depending upon few 
Cauies, there will be no need of confidering very long what Matter is able to perform when ani- 
mated by Motion, to find out the Nature of Fermentation in its very Principle ; and we fhall 
learn withall feveral ot^r Things, altogether requifite to the Knowledge of Phyficks : Whereas 
he that would in fuch a'Queftion argue from Sitppafitions, fo as to afcend to the firft Cauies, even 
to the Laws of Nature, by which all things are form'd, would make a great many of them that 
fhould prove falfe and unprofitable. 

Fie might perhaps difcover that the Caufe of the Fermentation is the Motion of an invifible 
Matter, communicated to the agitated Parts of Matter : For 'tis fufficiently known, that Fire and 
the various Fermentations of Bodies, confift in their Agitation •, and that by the Laws of Nature, 
Bodies receive their immediate Motion only from their meeting with others that are more agita- 
ted : So that he might difcover that there is an invifible Matter, the Motion of which is commu- 
nicated to vifible Bodies by Fermentation. But 'tis morally impoffible that he mould ever, by his 
Siippofitions find out how all that is perform'd •, which however is not fo hard to do, when we 
examine the Formation of Elements, or of Bodies, of which there is a greater Number of the fame 
Nature ^, as is to be feen in Monfieur des Cartes's Syftem. 

The Third Part of the Queftidn concerning Convulfive Motions, will not be very difficult to 
folve, if we fuppofe that there are in our Bodies Animal Spirits fufceptible of Fermentation • 
and withall, Humours fo piercing, as to infinuate themfelves into the Pores of the Nerves, 
through which the Spirits are diftus'd into the Mufcles ; provided always that we pretend not 
to determine the true Texture and Difpofition of thofe invifible Parts that contribute to thefe 
Convulfions. 

When we have feparated a Mufele from the reft of the Body, and hold it by the two Ends, we 
fenfibly. perceive that it endeavours to contract it felf when prick"d in the Middle. 'Tis likely 
that this depends on the Conftru&ion of the imperceptible Parts, of which it is made ^ which 
are as fo many Springs determin'd to fome certain Motions, by that of Compuncfion. But who can 
be fare he has found out the true Difpofition of the Parts employ'd in the Producfion of that Mo- 
tion ^ and who can give an uncontroverted Demonftration of it > Certainly that appears altogether 
impofhble, though perhaps by long thinking we might imagine fuch a Conftruclion of Mufcles, 
as would be fit to perform all the Motions we know them to be capable of ^ we muft not therefore 
pretend to determine the true Conftruftion of the Mufcles. However, becaufe it cannot be rea- 
fonably doubted, but that there are Spirits fufceptible of fome Fermentation, by the Mixture of 
a very fubtile heterogeneous Matter •, and that acriminious and pungent Humours may creep into 
the Nerves, that Hypothecs may be fuppos'd. 

Now to proceed to the Solution of the Queftion propos'd : We muft firft examine how many 
forts of Convulfive Motions there are -, and becaufe their Number is indefinite, we muft infift on 
the Principal, the Caufes of which feem to be different : We muft confider in what Parts they are 
made, what Difeafes precede and follow them ; whether they are attended with Pain, or free 
from it •, and above all, what are the Degrees of their Swiftnefs and Violence ; for fome are ve- 
ry fwift and violent -, others are very fwift, but not violent •, a third fort are violent, and not fwift j 
and others again are free from both thefe Symptoms : Some finifh and begin afrefh perpetually, 
others keep the Parts rigid and unmoveable for fome time ; and others deprive us of their life, 
and altogether deform them. 

All this being well weigh'd, it will be no hard matter to explain in general, after what has been 
laid concerning Natural and Voluntary Motions, how the Convulfive are perform'd: For if we 
conceive that fome Matter, capable of fermenting the Spirits, mixes with thofe contain'd in a 
Mulcle, it muft needs fweli up, and produce in that part a Convulfive Motion. 

If that Motion may eafily be refifted, 'tis a fign that the Nerves are not yet obftru£ted by any 
Humour, fince we may empty the Mufele of the Spirits that have enter'd into it, and determine 
them to fwell up the oppofite Mufele. But if we cannot do it, we muft conclude that pungent 
and piercing Humours have fome p^art atleaft in that Motion : Even it may often happen that thofe 
Humours are the only Caufe of Convulfions, fince they may determine the Courfe of the Spirits 
to fome certain Mufcles, by opening fome Paffages that convey them, and fhutting others : Be- 
fides, that they may contract the Tendons and Fibres, by penetrating their Pores. 

When a very ponderous Weight hangs at the end of a Rope, it may confiderably be rais'd by 
only wetting that Cord ; becaufe the Particles of Water penetrating as fo many little Wedges be- 
twixt the Threads of the Rope, fhorten it by dilating it : So the piercing and pungent Humours, 
infinuating into the Pores of the Nerves, contracf them, ftretch the Parts to which they are tied, 
and produce in the Body Convulfive Motions, that are extremely flow, violent and painful, and 
and often leave the Part fadly diftorted for a long time. 

As to the Convulfive Motions that are very fwift, they are caus'd by the Spirits ; but it is not 
neceftliry that thole Spirits fhould receive any Fermentation •, 'tis enough that the Conduits, through 
which they pals, be more open at one fide than at the other. 

When 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. ' %* 

When all the Parts of the Body are in their natural Situation, the Animal Spirits diffufe them- 
felves equally and readily through them, according to the Neceffities of the Machine, and faith- 
fully perform the Orders of the Will. But when Humours difturb the Difpofition of the Brain 
alter or varioully move the Apertures of the Nerves, or penetrate into the Mufcles, they agitate 
Their Springs ; and the Spirits diffuhng into thofe Parts after a new and unufual manner, produce 
extraordinary Motions, without the Confent of the Will. 

However, we may often, by a ftrong Refiftance, hinder fome of thofe Motions, and infenfi- 
bly diminifh the Traces that produce them, even when the Habit is wholly form'd. Thofe that 
look carefully to themfelves, find little Difficulty in preventing Grimaces, unbecoming Geltures, 
and a fourifh Countenance, though their Body have a Difpofition to them j and may even con- 
quer them when itrengthen'd by Habit, but with a great deal more Difficulty • for fuch Difpofi- 
tions mould always be oppos'd in their Birth, and before the Spirits have traced out a Way not 
eafie to be ftopp'd up. 

The Caufe of thofe Motions is often in the agitated Mufcle, and proceeds from fome pungent 
Humour, or fermenting Spirits ; but we mull judge that it is in the Brain, efpecially when the 
Convulfions agitate not one or two parts of the Body, but moft or all ; and withall, in ieveral 
Difeafes which alter the natural Conftitution of the Blood and Spirits. 

'Tis true, that one Nerve often having different Branches, which difperfe through Parts of the 
Body very remote, as into the Face and Bowels, it fometimes happens that a Convulfion, the 
Caufe of which lies in a Part to which fome one of thofe Branches reforts, may have Communi- 
cation with thofe to which -other Branches reach, without proceeding from the Brain, and with- 
out a Corruption of the Spirits. 

But when the Convulfive Motions are common to moft Parts of the Body, we muft needs fay, 
either that the Spirits ferment in a very extraordinary manner, or that the Order and Difpofition 
of the Parts of the Brain is difturb'd, or that it proceeds from both Caufes together. I (hall not 
irifift any longer upon this Queftion, becaufe it grows fo compound, and depending on fo many 
things, when we enter into Particulars, that it cannot eafily be made ferviceable to a clear Expli- 
cation of the Rules we have given. 

There is no Science which may fupply us with more Examples, to fhew the Ufefulnefs of thofe 
Rules, than Geometry., and efpecially Algebra, fince thefe two Sciences make a perpetual life of 
them. Geometry plainly difcovers the Neceffity always to begin with the moft fimple Things, 
and which include the leaft Number of Relations : It always examines thofe Relations by Meafures 
that are clearly known •, it takes off whatever is unferviceable to difcover them -, it divides into 
Parts Compound Queftions, dilpofes thofe Parts, and examines them in order. In fhort, The on- 
ly Fault to be found in this Science is, as I have obferv'd elfewhere, that it affords no conve- 
nient Means to abridge Ideas, and difcovefd Relations : So that though it regulates the Imagina- 
tion, and makes the Mind exacl ; yet it increales not its Extent very much, neither does it give a 
Capacity to difcover very compound Truths. 

But Algebra, continually teaching to abridge, and in the fhorteft Way imaginable, Ideas" and 
their Relations, extremely improves the Capacity of the Mind ; for nothing fo compound can be 
conceiv'd in the Relations of Magnitudes, but the Mind may difcover it in time by the Means it 
affords, when we know the Way that ought to be taken. 

The fifth Rule, and the following, which fpeak of the Method of abridging Ideas, concern on- 
ly that Science, for none elfe has a convenient Way of abridging them ; fo that I (hall not infift 
upon their Explication. Thofe who have a great Inclination for TVlathematicks, and defire to give 
their Mind all the Force and Extent it is capable of, and to put themfelves into a State of difco- 
vering, without a Tutor, an infinite Number of new Truths, will perceive, if they earneftly ap- 
ply themfelves to Algebra, that the Ufefulnefs of that Science, as to the Enquiry after Truth, 
proceeds from its obferving the Rules we have prefcrib'd. But I muft advertife, that by Algebra^ 
I efpecially underftand that which des Cartes and fome others have made ufe of 

Before the Conclufion of this Book, I mail fet down an Example fomewhat at large, to fhew 
the Ufefulnefs of the whole Treatife : I mail reprefent by it the Advances of a Man who, in the 
Difcuffion of an important Queftion, endeavours to free himfelf from Prejudices -, I mall at firft 
make him fall into fome Faults, that they may excite the Remembrance of what has been faid elfe- 
where : But at laft, his Attention leading him to the Truth enquifd after, I induce him fpeaking 
pofitively, and as one who pretends to have folv'd the Queftion he examin'd. 



CHAP. IX. 

The laji Inflance to fherv the 'Ufefulnefs of thk Treatife, wherein the Caufe of 
the c Vnioti of Tarts in Bodies y and withall^ the Rules of the Communica- 
tion of Motion ^ are exam in d. 

BOdies are united together three different Ways, by Continuity, Contiguity, and in a third man- 
ner, that has no particular Name ; becaufe" it feldom happens, I mall call it by the general 
Term of Union, 

Y By 



S6 F. Male-bran che Concerning -. BookVL 

Bv Continuity, or by the Caufes of it, I underftand fomewhat or other which caufes the Parts 
©f a Body to hold fo ftrongly together, that we mult ufe violence to feparate thern ; for which 
Reafon they are look'd upon as a Whole. 

3y. Contiguity I underftand that, whatever it is, which makes me judge that two" Bodies touch 
one another immediately, fo as that there is nothing-betwixt them •, though I judge not that they 
are ltrittly united, becaufe Imay eafily feparate them. 

By the 'third Word, Union, I underftand fomething or other which makes two GlalTes, or two 1 
Marble-Scones, whofe furfaces are well tub'd and poliihed upon each other, to adhere together, lb 
as that though they can eafily be feparated, by making them glide over one another, yet we rind 
fome refittance when we endeavour to do it in another manner.' 

Now thefe two united Glaffes, or Marble-ftones, cannot be faid to be continuous, becaufe they 
are not conceived as a Whole, fince they may eafily be feparated fome certain way. Neither, is 
this a Contiguity, though it be fomething very like it, becaufe thofe two pieces of Glafs, or Mar- 
ble, are ltrittly enough united, and even more than the Parts of foft and liquid Bodies, as'thoier 
of Butter and Water. 

Thefe Words being thus explained, we mult now enquire after the Caufe that unites Bodies, 
and the difference betwixt Continuity, Contiguity, and the Union of Bodies, taken in this particu-" 
lar Senfe : I iliall .firft feek the caufe of Continuity, or that, I don't know what, which unites the 
Parts of a Body, and links them fo ltrittly together, that violence mult be ufed to feparate them, 
and that they are look'd upon as making together but one Whole. I hope that this Caufe being 
found out,, it will prove no hard task to difcover the reft. 

It feems now.neceffary to me, that this, I don't know what, which binds even the fmalleft 
Parrs ot that piece of Iron I hold in my Hands, fhould be fomething very powerful, fince I mult 
nfe a very great Force to break off a fmall Part of it. But am not I extremely miltaken, for may 
not thai difficulty I find in breaking the leaft piece of this Iron, come from my Weaknefs, and 
not from the Reiiftance of the Iron > And indeed, I remember, I have formerly ufed a greater vio- 
lence than I now do, to break a piece of Iron like this ; and if I fell lick, it might happen that 
my utmoft endeavours could not perform it. I fee therefore that I mult not judge abfolutely of 
the firrnneis with which the Parts of Iron are joyned together, by the endeavours I make to 
dif-unite' them , but only judge that they flick very ltrittly to each other in relation to my 
little Strength, or that they hang more firmly together than the Parts of my Flelh ; lince the Senfe 
of Pain I feel in ufing too much Force advertifes me, I lhall looner difunite the Parts of my Bo- 
dy, than thofe of the Iron. 

Thence i conclude, That as I am not abfolutely ftrong nor weak, fo Iron and other Bodies are 
not abiolucely hard or flexible ; but only in reference to the Caufe that atts upon them. And that • 
my Endeavours cannot be a Rule to meafure the Degrees of Force, that mult be ufed to overcome 
the Reliftance and Hardnels of Iron ; fince Rules mult be unvariable ; whereas thofe Endeavours 
vary, according to the Time, the plenty of Animal Spirits, and the Hardnefs of Flelh-, for, af- 
ter ail, I cannot always produce the fame EfFetts by the fame Endeavours. 

This Coniideration frees me from a Prejudice, that made me imagine ftrong Bands to unite the 
Parts ot Bodies, which Bands perhaps are not in being, and I hope it will not be unprofitable 
hereafter : for I am wonderfully apt to judge of all things with relation to my felf, and to follow 
the Imprelhons of my Senles, of which I lhall more carefully beware. But let us proceed. 

Having thought fome Time, and fearch'd with fome Application, the Caufe of this ftritt Union, 
without being able to dilcover it h I find my felf inelin'd. by my own natural Lazinels, to judge, 
as feveral others do, that it is the Form of Bodies that preferves the Unron betwixt their Parts, 
or the Friendlhip and Inclination they have for fuch as are alike to them : And to form other judge- 
ments of like nature ; nothing being more convenient than fometimes to fuffer our felves to be le- 
due'd, and to become Learned on a fudden, with little Expence. 

But I intend lo believe nothing but what I know, nor to fufter my felf to be call down by my 
own Laziijcis, nor to yield to bare Glimpfes. Let us therefore lay alide thofe Forms and Incli- 
nations, ol which we have no diftintt and particular, but only confufed and general Ideas, which 
rncthinks we only frame with reference to our Nature, and the Exiftence of which feveral Per- 
fons, and perhaps whole Nations, do not own. But methinks I fee the Caufe of this ftritt Union 
of the Parts which make up hard Bodies, without admitting any thing in it, but what all the 
World grants h or at leaft, what all the World diftinttly conceives to be poflible. For every one 
diftitittly conceives, that all Bodies are compofed, or may be compofed of fmall Parts : It may 
then be that ibrneihailbe crooked and branched, and be able,' as many little Fetters, ftrongly to 
hold others -, or that they lhall be fo iutricated amonglt each others Branches, that it will not be 
eafie to difuuite them. 

Bodies, hold 
Im predion 
r the Reafon, 
. every one of 
thefe little Bands, hang together : For they cannot be united by other fmaller Bands •, fince I tup- 
le them to be lolid. Or if I lay they are united in that Manner, it will rcaibnably be ask'd, 
What unites thele others together? and ib in infinitum. 




Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. . 87 

So that the Difficulty of the Queftion now is, s^**** 3 ******^ 

how the Parrs of thole little Fetters, or of thole -r f S^ ) A 

branched Parts, can be fo {briefly united as they \^ ^^Vto.^«^ 

are -, A, for initance, with 5, which I fuppofe to 
be Parts of a little Band : Or, which is the fame 
thing, (Bodies being fo much the more hard, as 
they are the more folid and lels porous,) the Que- 
ftion at prefent is, to know how the. Parts of a Co- 
lumn being made of Matter without Pores, can be • A , ,..,-,■„ _\ 
lb ftrongly joined together, and compole a very ~"~~*yC~ 
hard Body $ fince it cannot be laid that ■ the Parts y 
of this Column hang together by fmall Fetters ; g j. ^V».<'i . - <2 
for being without Pores, they have no particular 
Figure. 

1 am again extremely apt to fay, that this Column is hard by its Nature ^ or that the fmall 
Fetters, of which hard Bodies are made up, are Attorns, the Parts of which cannot be divided •, 
as being the Eflential and laft Parts of Bodies, and eifentially crooked, branched, or of a perplex'd 
figure. But I freely own this is not folving the Difficulty, and that laying afide my Prejudices, and 
th illufions or my Senfes, I fhould be in the wrong, to have Recourfe to an abftracled form, and to 
lace a Phantafm of Logick, for the Caufe I enquire after. I mean, I fhould be in the wrong 
to onceive, as fome thing real and diftincf, the rambling or indefinite Idea of Nature or ElTence-, 
whi< h expre$es nothing but what is known to us 5 and fo to take an abftracfed univerfal Form 
foi the Phyficai Caule of a real Efrett: for there are Two things which I cannot too much mi- 
ftruft. Vatfu-Jl is, The Impreffion of my Senfes ^ and the other, My Readinefs to take abftracf- 
«f Natures, and general Ideas of Logtck, for real and particular, by which two Principles of Er- 
rour I remember to have been often feduc'd. 

For to return to the Difficulty in hand j 'tis not poffible to conceive how thofe little Fetters 
fhould be indivifible by their own ElTence and Nature, nor confequently how they ihould be in- 
flexible-, lince, on the contrary, I conceive them moft divilible, nay, neceflarily divilible by their 
own ElTence and Nature. For the Part A is moft certainly a Subftance as well as B h and confe- 
quently 'tis plain that A may exift without £, fince Subftances may exift without one another j 
otherwife they would be no Subftances. 

It cannot be faid that A is no Subftance-, for 'tis plain that that is not a bare Mode, whereas 
every Being is either a Subftance, or the Mode of a Subftance. And therefore fince A is not a 
Mode, it is a Subftance, and may exift without B -, and much more the Part A exifts feparately 
fieri? £ ; fo that this fetter is divilible into A and B. 

Moreover, if this Fetter were indivifible or crooked by its own Nature and Eilence, there would 
happen a thing quite contrary to what we fee by Experience ; for not one Body could be broken. 
Let us fuppofe, as before, a Piece of Iron compofed of many Fetters perplexed within one ano- 
ther, and A a Bb to be two of them-, I fay it will not be poflible to difintangle them, and con- 
fequently to break the Iron. For to break it, the Fetters that make it up mult be bent, which 
however are fuppofed inflexible by their own Nature and EiTer ce. 

If they be not fuppofed inflexible, but only indivifible by their own Nature, the Supposition 
would be unferviceable for folving the Queftion. For then the Difficulty will be, Why thofe 
little Fetters obey not the Force that is ufed to bend a Bar of Iron? Neither mult they be fup- 
pofed indivifible, if they be not fuppofed inflexible : For if the Parts of thofe Fetters could change 
their fituation in reference to one another, 'tis vifible that they might be feparated ; fince there is no 
Reafon why, if one part may be fomewhat removed from the other, it could not be entirely re- 
moved. And therefore whether thefe little Fetters are fuppofed indivifible or inflexible, the Que- 
ftion cannot be folved by that means : for if they be only fuppofed indivifible, a Piece of Iron 
mult be broken without trouble ; and if they be fuppofed inflexible, it will be impoffible to break 
it i fince the little Fetters that make up the Iron, being intricated within one another, it will be 
irapoTible to difintangle them. Let us therefore folve the Difficulty by clear and undeniable 
Principles, and find the Reafon why that little Band has two Parts A B fo firmly united to one 
another. 

Tis needful, I perceive, to divide the Subject of my Meditation into Parts, that I may examine 
it the, more exactly, and with lefs Intention of Thought ; fince I could not at firft, at a fingle view, 
and with the whole Attention I am capable of, difcover what I enquired after. This I might have 
done at the beginning ; for when the Subjects of our Meditation ate fomewhat abftrufe,. 'tis al- 
ways the belt way to confider them by parts, and not fruitlefsly weary our felves with the vain 
Hopes of meeting happily with the Truth. 

Wliat I enquire after is,. The Caufe of the ftrict. Union betwixt the minute Parts, that make 
uo the little fetter A B. Now I conceive only diltin£tly three Things that can be the Caufe fought 
for, viz. The very Pans of that little Fetter, or the Will of the Author of Nature, or laftly invifi- 
bie Bodies funonnding fuch little Bands. I might yet ailedge,. as the Caufe of thefe things, the 
form of Bodies, the Qualities of Hardnefs, or ibme occult Quality, the Sympathy betwixt Parts 
of the lame Species, &c. but fince I have no diftinct Idea of thofe 'fine things, I neither mult nor 
can ground my Keaionings thereupon : fo that if I find not the Caufe I fearch after, in thole things - • 
of wiilcti I have diitinct Ideas, I will not fruitlefsly trouble my felf with the Contemplation of 

fuch 



F: Maleb-ranche Concerning BookVL 

fuch rambling and general Notions of Logick^ and fhall forbear fpeaking of what I urrderftand not. 
But let us examine xhzfirft of thefe tilings, that may be the Caufe, why the Parts of that ifnall 
Band are fo firmly joined -, viz. the very Parts of which it is made up. 

When I only confider the Parts of which hard Bodies are compofed, I am inclined to believe, 
*M. Des "\hcit no ^ Cement, which unites the Farts of that Fetter, can be imagind befides themfclves and 
^y es --i their own Reft : for of what Nature could it be? It cannot be a thing fubfi fling of it- J elf fince all 
Art. /<i ' thofe minute Farts being Subftances, for what Reafon fhould they be united by other Subftances but 
Part. II. the mf elves ? Neither can it be a Vitality different from Reft $ becaufe there is no Quality more con- 
trary to Motion, that mayfeparatc thoje Parts, but their own Reft : but befides Subftances and their 
^■unities, we know not any other forts of things'. 

'Tis'true, that the Parts of hard Bodies remain united, as long as they are inReft one by another -, 
and that when they are once in Reft, they remain of themfelves in the fame ftate, as long as they can ; 
but this is not what I enquire after, and I know not how too I came to miftake the Subject. I en- 
deavour here to difcover, why the, Parts of hard Bodies have lb great a ftrength, to remain in Reft 
One by another, that they withftand the Force that is ufed to move them. 
*Jitt. 43. * I might however anfwer my felf, that every Body has truly Force of continuing fix'd in its pre- 
ibid. f en t ftate, and that this Force is equal whether in Motion- or Reft: But that the Reafon why the 

-\-/ri. 63; parts of hard Bodies remain in Reft by one another, and that we can t difficultly move and fepa- 
rate them, is our not imploying fufficient Motion to overpower the Reft. This is probable, but I 
am feeking Certainty, if it be to be found, and not bare Probability. And how can I know with 
Certainty, and Evidence, that each Body has this Force to continue in the ftate it's in, and that 
this Force is equal both as to Motion and Reft, fince Matter on the contrary, feems indifferently 
pailive to either, and altogether deftitute of Force. Let us have recouife then with M. des Cartes 
to the Will of the Creatour, which is, it may be, that Force which Bodies feem to have in them- 
felves, which is the fecond thing above mention'd, fuppos'd capable of preierving the Parts of this 
little Fetter we fpeak of, fo clofely link'd to one another. 

Certainly, 'tis poiTible that God may will every Body fhould remain in its prefent ftate, and that 
his Will mould be the Force which unites their Parts to one another, as I otherwife know his Will 
to be the Moving Force which puts Bodies in Motion: For fince Matter is incapable of moving 
it felf, I have Reafon, methinks, to conclude it is a Spirit, and even the Author of Nature, which 
puts it and preferves it in Motion, by preferving it fuccefhvely in different places by his bare Will -, 
in as much as an Almighty Being aas not with Initruments, and his Will is necelTarily folio w'd 
by Effefts. 
* A\ t. 33. - * I acknowledge then, it's poffible that God may will that every thing remain in its prefent ftate, 
Part. 11. whether it be Motion or Reft, and that his Will may be the natural Power, which Bodies have of 
rem:.i ii:ng in the ftate they once have obtain'd. And if fo, we muft like M. des Cartes, meafure that 
Power, conclude what ought to be the Effects of it, and give Rules for the Force and Communica- 
tion of Motions upon the Collifion of different Bodies, in proportion to their Magnitude ; fince we 
have no other way of coming to the knowledge of that general and immutable Will of God, who 
makes the different Power thefe Bodies have of afting upon, and refilling one another, confift in 
their different Magnitude and Swiftnefs. 

But however, I have no infallible proof that God wills by a pofitive Will, that Bodies remain 
in Reft, and one would think it fufficient for God to will the Exiftence of Matter, not only tor 
caufe it to exift, but to exift in Reft. 

The cafe is not the lame with Motion, fince the Idea of a Matter mov'd, certainly includes two 
Powers to which it is related, viz. that which created, and alfo that which mov'd it. But the I- 
dea of a Matter in Reft, includes only the Idea of a Power which has created it, whilft there is no 
neceffity of any other Power to put it in Reft, fince if we barely conceive Matter, without think- 
ing on any Power, we fhall necelTarily conceive it in Reft. Thus it is I conceive things : fori am 
" to judge by my Ideas • and my Ideas tell me, Reft is but the privation of Motion. For God need- 
but ceafe to will the Motion of a Body -, to make its Motion ceafe, and to caufe it to Reft. 

But I remember I have heard from many very ingenious Perfons, that Motion feem'd to them 
as much the privation of Reft, as Reft the privation of Motion. And fome will not doubt to af- 
firm, lor Reafons I cant comprehend, that Mot/on feems rather a privation than reft. I do not 
diitin&ly call, to Mind the Reafons they alledge: however this ought to make me fufpicious, left 
iry ideas fhould be falfe. For though moft Men fay what they pleafe upon Subjefts that feem 
or little moment, yet I have Reafon to believe the Perfons I fpeak of, were pleas'd to fpeak what 
they thbilght': wherefore I muft ftill examine my Ideas more carefully. 
. inc To me it feems a thing of undoubted Certainty, and the Gentlemen before mention'd wont deny 
here <*i!j is tnat '" s tne Will of God which moves Bodies. The Force then which that Bowl I fee in Mo- 
, , my tipn has, is the Will of God that moves it ; what now is God requir'd to do to ftop it? Muft he 
felt; and Will, by a pofitive Will, that it fhould Reft? or is it fufficient to ceafe to will its Motion? 'Tijr 
BowI ' plain, that if God but ceafe to will the Motion of this Bowl, the celfation of its Motion, and 
con'feq.ue'ntly Reft will fiicceed the cefiation of the Will of God. For the Will of God, which was 
tin. Force that moved the Bowl, debiting, that Force defifts, and the Bowl will be no longer mov 1 d. 
Therefore the celiation of the moving Force produces Reft: Reft then has no Force to caufe it} 
but is a bare privation that fuppoies no pofithe Will in God. Thus we fhould admit in God 4, 
pofitive Will without any Reafon or Neceflity, if we alcriUed to Bodies any Force to remain 
in Reft. 

But 



<l|)L' 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. * $9 

.- But to overthrow this Argument if poflible, Let us now fuppofea Bowl at Reft, as before we 
iuppos'd it in Motion, what muit God do in order to agitate it? Is it enough that he ceafes to 
will its repofe ? if lb, I have hitherto made no advance; for that Motion will be equally the 
privation of Reft, as Reft of Motion. I fuppofe then that God defiits to will the Reft of this 
Bowl; tut fuppofing it, I fee it not put in Motion ; and if any others do, I defire. them to inform 
me with what degree of Motion it is carried. Certainly 'tis impoflible it fhould be mov'd, or have 
any degree of Motion: and 'tis impoflible to conceive any degree of Motion in if, barely irorn bur 
conceiving that God ceafes to will it fhould be at Reft; becaufe it goes not with Motion as it dees 
with Rett. Motions are infinitely various, and are iufceptible oi' more and fejb; but Reft being na- 
'thing, one cannot differ from another. One and the lame Bowl which moves twice as fait at one 
time as at another, has twice as much Force, or Motion, at one time as at another. But it can- 
not be laid that the fame Bowl has Reft double at one time to its Reft at another. 

There mult therefore be a pofitive Will in God, to put a Bowl in Motion, or to give it fuch a 
Force as it may move it felf with: But lie need only ceafe to will it Ihould be mov'd, to caufe 
its Motion to defift ; that is, to make it Reft. Jult as to the creating a World, it is not enough 
that God ceafe to will its non-exiftence, unlefs he likewiie pofitively will the manner it 'fhall exiil 
in. But in order to annihilate it, there is no need of God's willing it fhould notexift, fince God 
cannot will Nothingnefs by a pofitive Will, but barely, that he ceafe to will its Being. 

I confider not here Motion and Reft, according to their relative Capacity ; ( for 'tis manifeft that 
retting Bodies have as real Relations to thole about them, as Bodies in Motion ) I only conceive 
that Bodies mov'd have a moving Force, and that others at Reft have no Force at all to perfevere 
in it; becaufe the Relations of mov'd to the circumambient Bodies, perpetually changing, they 
need a continual Force to produce thefe Changes; it being indeed nothing but thefe Changes, that 
caufe all that Novelty we obferve in Nature ; but there is no need of Force to do nothing. When 
the Relation of a Body to thofe furrounding it is conftantly the fame, there is nothing done ; and 
the Continuance of that Relation, I mean the A£tion of the Will of God, which preferves it, is 
not different from that which preferves the Body it felf 

Ifitbetrue, as I conceive, That Reft is but the Privation of Motion, the leaft Motion, or that 
of the leaft Body mov'd, will include a greater Force or power than the Reft of the greateft 
Body; and fo the leaft Force, and the leaft Body, fuppos'd to be mov'd * in a Vacuum, againft *E vaEo _ 
another never fo great and bulky, will be capable of moving it ; fince the largeft Body at Reft will dy hi a Va- 
have no power of refitting the leaft Body that fhall ftrike againft it. Therefore the Refiftance which w, i«n- 
is made by the Parts of hard Bodies, to hinder their Separation, neceffarily proceeds from fome- derfl ? n '! 
thing elfe than their Repofe. ™ le " 

from othere, whether hard or liquid, as that there is none either to aid or hinder the Communication of Motions. 

But 'tis neceflary to demonftrate by fenfible Experiments, what we have been proving by abftra£t- 
ed Reafonings, to lee whether our Ideas comport with the Senfations we receive from Effects. For 
it often happens that fuch Reafonings deceive us, at leaft will not convince others, and efpecially fuch 
as are prejudiced to the contrary. M. Des Cartes's Authority has fuch an influence upon fome Mens 
Reafon, that unlefs we prove all imaginable ways, that great Man in an Errour, we cannot difabufe 
them. What I have faid will be readily admitted by fuch as are not prepoflefs'd with a contrary 
Opinion ; and I perceive that I fhall even be blam'd by them, for proving things which feem to 
them indifputable : However, the Cartefians well deierve our endeavours to content them. The 
others may pals over this Diicourfe, if they think it tedious. 

Here then are fome Experiments which fenfibly demonftrate that Reft has no power to refill 
Motion, and which confequently evince, that the Will of the Author of Nature, which conftitutes 
the Power and Force every Body has to continue in its prefent ftate, refpe&s not Reft, but Mo- 
tion only ; fince Bodies confider'd in themfelves have no Force at all. 

We daily fee great Ships, whilft floating in the Water, mov'd with little Bodies ftriking againft 
them. From which Experience I conclude, notwithftanding all the fubterfuges of Monfieur des 
Cartes and the Cartefians, that if thefe great Bodies were in a Vacuum, they might be moved 
with much greater facility, fince the Realbn of a Veffel's being mov'd in the Water with fome 
difficulty, is the refiftance the Water makes to the imparted Motion ; which in a void fpace will 
not be found. Now that which manifeftly fhews that Water refills the Motion imprefTed on 
the VefTel, is the cefTation of its Motion fome time after the Impulfion, which certainly would 
not happen, did not the VefTel lofe its Motion, by communicating it to the Water ; or if the 
Water yielded to its paffage without any oppofition ; or laftly, imparted to it fome of its 
own Motion. Therefore fince a VefTel agitated in the Water, ceafes by degrees to move, 'tis an 
infallible fign that the Water, initead of forwarding, as Monfieur des Cartes pretends, withftands 
its Motion ; and confequently it would be infinitely eafier to move a great Body in a Vacuum than 
in Water, fince there would be no refiftance on the part of furrounding Bodies. 'Tis evident 
therefore, that Reft has no Force to refill Motion, and that the leaft Motion contains more Power 
and Force then the greateft Reft ; or at leaft, that we ought not to meafure the Force of Motion 
and Reft, by the Proportion we find between the Magnitude of Bodies in thofe two States, as 
Monfieur des Cartes has done. 

'Tis true, there is fome reafon to believe that the VefTel is mov'd, whilft in the Water, by rea- 
fon of the continual change which happen in the watery parts about it, though to us it feems 
not to change its place : And this has been an inducement to M. Des Cartes and fome Pcrfons ro 
° Z believe 



oo F. Malebranche Concerning Bdo k VIl 

believe, that 'tis not the bate Force of the impelling Agent which makes it advance in Water 5 
but that having before received a great deal of Motion Irom the little parts of the furrounding 
Liquid, which prefs it equally on all fides, this Motion, is only determined by the adventitious . 
Motion of the impelling Body •, fo that what moves a Body in Water, could not do it in a Va- 
cuum. ' And thus it is that M. Des Cartes and his Followers defend the Rules' of Motion they 
have given us. 

Let usfuppofe, for Example, a Piece of Wood of a Foot fquare, plac'd in a liquid Body, all 
the little parts whereof aft and move againft it •, and becaufe they prefs it equally on all fides, as"* 
well towards A as B, the piece of Wood ftirs. neither one way nor another : Now if I drive ano- 
ther Piece of Wood of half a Foot againft the former, on the fide A, I lee it advance forward h 
hence I conclude, that it might be mov'd in a Vacuum with lefs Foice than that of the Piece that 
drives it, for the foregoing Reafons. But the Perfons L-fpeak of deny it, and anfwer, that therea- 
* Art. 5. fon of the greater Piece's advancing, when urg'd by the little one, is, that the * latter unable to move 
■ it fingly, being joyn'd with the parts of the agitated Liquid, determines them to drive it by im- 
parting fome of their Motion to it. But 'tis manifeft that by this Anfwer, the Piece of Wood, 
when Once mov'd, could never diminifh its Motion •, but muft, on the contrary, perpetually increafe 
it. For according to this Anfwer, the Piece of Wood is more driven by the Water to the fide of A 
than B, therefore it mull: perpetually proceed-, and becaufe this Impuliion is continual, its Mo- 
tion muft conftantly increafe. But, as I have faid, the Water is fo far from facilitating its Mo- 
tion, that it continually refills it ; which refiftance ftill leffening it more and more, at laft makes 
it altogether infenfible. 

But I am now to prove that the Piece of Wood which is equally pnfti'd by the little parts of the 
encompaffing Water, has no Motion or Force at all, capable of moving it, though it continually 
changes its immediate place ; and the Surface of the Water round it is different at different times. 
For if it be fo that a Body equally prefs'd on all fides, as a Piece of Wood, be deftitute of Motion, . 
undoubtedly that foreign Force that ftrikes againft it, muft communicate it, fince at the time of 
this Force's urging it on, the Water refifts, and infenfibly diflipates the imprefs'd Motion, cauf- 
ing it, by little and little, at laft to ceafe. 

it is certain, at leaft to thofe I fpeak to, that there is no more Motion in Nature at one time 
than another ; and. that Bodies at reft cannot be put in Motion, but by the Collifion of fome agi- 
tated Bodies, which communicate their Motion to them. Whence I conclude, that a Body, 
which I iuppofe created perfectly at Reft in the midft of Water, will never receive any degree 
of Motion, from the little parts of the Water which furround it, and which ftrike continually 
againft it, provided *heir Force be equal on all fides-, becaufe all thefe little parts which daifi e- 
qually againft it on all fides, rebounding again with their whole Motion, communicate none of it} 
and coniequently this Body ought to be confider'd as at Reft, and without any moving Force, 
though it continually changes its Situation. 

Now the proof I have for the rebounding of thefe little parts, together with their whole Mo-' 
tion, is this -, That otherwife the Water which touches this Body, muft grow very cold, or even 
congeal'd, and become almoft as hard as the Wood upon its Surface, fince the Motion of the watry 
parts ought to be equally diffus'd into the little parts of the Body they encompafs. 

But that I may accommodate my lelf to the Patrons of M. Des Cartes's Opinion, I am willing 
to grant that we ought not to confider a VefTel on the Water as at Reft. I grant likewife, that 
all the parts of the environing Water are fubfervient to the new Motion imprinted by the Wa- 
terman, though it be but too vifible by the decreafe of the Boat's Motion, that they refift it 
more on the fide where it makes, than on the other whence it is driven : Notwithftanding which 
fuppofition, I fay, that of all the Parts of Water in the River, according to M. Des Cartes, 
there are none which can promote the Motion of the VefTel, except thofe which immediately 
*Arf. 62,. touch it on the fide it is driven on. For * according to that Philofopher, The Water being fluid, 
all the parts that go to its Compofition, aft not conjointly againft the Body we would move ; but only 
iboje which touching it, conjointly bear upon it. But thofe which conjointly bear upon the VefTel, 
and the BoatVman together, are twenty times more inconfiderable than the Boat. 'Tis plain 
therefore, from the Explication given by M. Des Cartes in this Article, concerning the difficulty 
we find to break a Nail between our Fingers, that a little Body is capable of moving one much 
bigger than it felf For in ftiort, our Hands are not ib fluid as Water -, and when we would break 
a Nail, there are more parts that aft jointly in our hands, than in the Water which putties a- 
gainft a VefTel. 

But here's a more fenfible Experiment. Take a Plank well fmooth'd, or any other very hard 
Plain, drive in it a Nail half way, and let this Plain in a fomewhat inclining pofture -, then place 
a Bar of Iron an hundred times thicker than the Nail, an Inch or two above it, and letting it 
ilide down, it will not break it. Mean time it is obfervable, that, according to Des Cartes, all the 
parts of the Bar, as being hard and folid, act jointly upon the Nail. It therefore there were no 
other Cement than Reft to unite the parts of the Nail, the Bar of Iron being an hundred times big- 
ger, ought by the Fifth Rule of M. Des Carles, and according to Reafon, communicate fomewhat 
of its Motion to the part of the Nail it fell upon ; that is, to break it, and pais on, even though 
this Bar ihould Hide with a very gentle Motion. Therefore we muft feek fome other Caule than 
the Reft of Bodies, that makes them hard, and capable of refilling the violence that is offer'd to 
break them, fince Reft has no Force to withftand Motion : And I am perfuaded thefe Experien- 
ce are lutticient to evince, that the abftracled Proofs we have given are not talfe. 

We 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. pi 

We rauft then examine the third Thing we fuppofed before might be the caufe of the fferi£t 
Union found between the Parts of hard Bodies ^ namely, an invisible Matter which furrounds 
them ; and which being rapidly mov'd, pulhes moll violently the external and internal Parts of 
thefe Bodies, and conllringes them in fuch a manner as requires greater ftrength to feparate therri, 
than has that invifible and extremely agitated Matter. 

Methinks I might reasonably conclude, that the Union of the conftituent Parts of hard Bo- 
dies depends on an invifible Matter which furrounds and comprelTes them, fince the two other 
things, fuppoled poflible Caufes of this union^ have been difcover'd not to be truly lb. For fince 
I meet with Refiftance in breaking a Piece of Iron, which Refiftance proceeds not from the Iron, 
nor the Will of God, as I think I have proved, it rauft necelTarily proceed from fome invifible 
Matter, which can be no other than that which immediately furrounds and comprelTes ir. Ne- 
verthelefs, I fhall give fome pofitive Proofs of this Opinion, after I have more largely explain'd 
it by fome Inflance. 

Take a Globe of any hard Metal, which is hollow within, and divided in two Halfs, join them 
together with a little Bond of Wax at the place of their Union, and then extract the Air: thefe 
two half Globes will be fo nimby join'd to one another, that two Teams of Horfes fallned to 
the Rings on the oppofite fides of the Globe, fhall not feparate them, provided they be large 
in proportion to the Number of Horfes ; when yet if the Air be fuffer'd to enter, one Man fhall 
feparate them with a great deal of Eafe. From this Experiment 'tis eafie to conclude, that what 
united the two iicmifpheres to one another, was the PrefTure of the furrounding Air Upon their 
outward and convex Surface, whilft there was no Compreflion in their concave and inward parts j 
fo that the A£lion of the Horfes which drew the two He?nifpheres on either fide, could not con- 
quer the Refiftance made by innumerable little Parts of Air, by their preffing thefe two Halfs : 
But the leaft Force is capable of dividing them when the Air entring in the Copper Globe, drives 
againft the Concave and inward Surfaces, as much as the external Air preffes againft the outward 
and convex. 

Take, on the contrary, the Bladder of a Carp, and put it in a VefTel from which the Air is 
pump'd : this Bladder being full of Air, will crack and burft, becaufe then there is no exteriour 
Air to refill that within the Bladder. 'Tis likewiie for the fame'Reafon I have given of the firfl 
Experiment, that two Glafs or Marble Plains, ground and polifh'd upon one another, fo cling toge- 
ther, that Violence mufl be us'd to feparate them one way ; becaufe the two parts of the Marble are 
preis'd and conftring'd by the external Air that furrounds them, and are not fo llrongly prefs'd 
by that between. I might produce infinite other Experiments to prove that the grofs Air which 
furrounds Bodies ftrongly unites their Parts : But what I have faid is enough to give a diftinO: 
Explication of my Thoughts upon the prefent Queftion. . 

I fay then, that what caufes the Parts of hard Bodies and the little Fetters before-mentioned 
to hang fo clofely united to each other, is, there being other little Bodies infinitely more agitated 
than the courfe Air we breath, which bear againft them, and comprefs them h and that which 
makes it fo hard to feparate them, is not their Reft, but the Agitation of thefe little furround- 
ing Bodies. So that that which refills Motion' is not Reft, ( this being but the Frivation of it, and 
has no Force at alL,) but fome contrary Motion. 

This fimple Expofition of my Opinion perhaps feems reafonable-, yet 1 forefee, that many 
Perfons will not eafily be indue'd to yield to it. Hard Bodies make fo great Impreflion on the 
Senfes when they ftrike us, or when we ufe Violence to break them, that we are inclin'd to be- 
lieve their Parts more ftriftly united than they really are. And on the contrary, the little Bodies 
which I have faid encompafs them, and to which I have alcribed the Force of caufing this Union, 
making no Impreflion on our Senfes, feem too weak to produce fo fenfible an Effect. 

But to take away this Prejudice, which bottoms on the Impreffions of our Senfes, and on the 
Difficulty we find to imagine Bodies more little and agitated than thofe we daily fee j 'tis to be 
confider'd, that the Hardnefs of Bodies is not to be meafur'd with relation to our Hands, or the 
Endeavours we are able to make, which are different at different times. For indeed, if the great- 
ell Force of Men be nothing in comparifon with that of the fubtle Matter, we mould be much 
to blame to believe, that Diamonds., and the hardeft Stones, cannot derive their Hardnefs from ' 
the Compreffion of thofe little rapid Bodies which environ them. Now we may vifibly difcover 
how inconfiderably weak is Humane Force, if it be confider'd that Man's Power of moving his 
Body in fo many manners, proceeds from a very moderate Fermentation of the Blood, which fome- 
what agitates the fmaller Parts of it, and fo produces the Animal Spirits. For 'tis the Agitation 
of thefe Spirits, which makes the Strength of the Body, and gives us the Power of making thofe 
Endeavours "which we groundlefly regard, as fomething great and mighty. 

But it muft be obferv'd, that this fermentation of our Blood, is but a fmall Communication 
of that fubtle Matter's Motion we have been fpeaking of. For all the Fermentations of vifible 
Bodies are nothing but Communications of Motion from the Invifible, fince every Body receives 
its Agitation from fome other. 'Tis not therefore to be wonder'd if our Force be not fb great 
as that of the fame fubtle Matter we receive it from. But if our Blood fermented as much in our 
Heart as Gun-Powder ferments, and is agitated when Fire is put to it •, that is, if our Blood re- 
ceived as great a Communication of Motion from the fubtle Matter, as Gun-Powder receives, we 
might do extraordinary things with a great deal of Eafe •, as break a Bar of Iron, overturn an 
Houfe, &c. provided we fuppofe a competent proportion between our Members and our Blood fb 
violently agitated. We mult therefore rid our felves of our Prejudice, and not, following the 

Impreflion 



<p2 F. Malebranche Concerning Book VI. 

Impreffion of our Senfes, imagine that the Parts of hard Bodies are fo ftrongly united to one ano- 
• ther, becaufe of the Difficulty we find to break them. 

But if moreover, we confider the Effects of Fire in Mines, the Gravity of Bodies, and feve- 
ral other natural Effefts, which have no other Caufe then the Commotion of thefe irifenfible 
Corpiifcles, as is prov'd by M. Des Cartes in many places of his Works, we fhall manifeftlv dii- 
cover, that it does not exceed their Force, to unite and bind together the Parts of hard Bodies 
ib powerfully as we find them. For in fhort, I fear not to affirm, that a Cannon-Bullet, whole 
Motion feems fo extraordinary, receives not the thoufandth part of the Motion of the fubtle 
Matter which furrounds it. 

My AiTertion will not be doubted of, if it be confider'd, Tirft, That the Gun-Powder is not all 
inflam'd, nor at the fame inftant: Secondly, That though it were all on Fire in the f elf-lame Mo- 
ment, yet it floats a very fhort time, in the fubtle Matter ; and Bodies fwimming but a little 
while in others, can receive no great Motion from them ; as may be feen in Boats when riding in 
a Scream, which receive their Motion by degrees. Thirdly, and principally, That each part of the 
Powder can receive but a collateral Motion, which the fubtle Matter yields to. For Water only 
communicates to the VelTel the direQ: Motion which is common to all the parts of it, which Mo- 
tion is generally very inconfiderable in refpeft of the others. 

I might ftill prove to M. Des Cartcs's Followers, the Geatnefs of the fubtle Matter's Motion, 
by the Motion of the Earth, and the Heavinefs of Bodies ; from whence might be drawn verv 
certain and exacf Proofs, if that were neceifary to my Subject But in order to have one i'uf- 
ficient Proof of the violent Agitation of the fubtle Matter, to which I afcribe the Hardnefs of 
Bodies, it fufjkes (without feeing Des Cartes's Works) to read attentively what I have written 
in the J'econd Chapter of the fourth Book, towards the End. 

Being now deliver' d from our Prejudices, which induc'd .us to believe our Efforts very potent, 
and thole of the fubtle Matter which furrounds and conftringes hard Bodies, very feeble •, being, 
likewife fitisfied of the vehement Commotion of this Matter, by what has been faid of Gun- 
Powder •, 'twill be no hard Marter to difcover, that 'tis abfolutely neceifary that this Matter, act- 
ing infinitely more on the Surface, than the Infide of the hard Bodies it encompaffes and com- 
prelfes, ihould be the Caufe of their Hardnels, or of the Refiftance we feel when we endeavour 
to break them. 

But fince there are always many Parts of this invifible Matter pairing through the P6res»of 
hard Bodies, they not only render them hard, as I have before explain'd ; hut are alfo the Caufes 
that fome are fpringing, and elaftical, that others ftand bent, and others ftill are fluid and liquid < 
and in fhort are the Caufe not only of the Force which the Parts of hard Bodies have to remain 
dole by one another -, but of that likewife which the parts of fluid Bodies have to feparate ; or 
which is the fame thing, are the Caufe of the Hardnefs of fome Bodies, and the Fluidity of 
others. 

But whereas 'tis abfolutely neceffary to know diftin&ly the Phyficks of M. Des Cartes, the Fi- 
gure of his Elements, and of the parts which conftitute particular Bodies, to account for the 
ftiffnefs of fome and the flexibility of others,. I lliall not infift upon explaining it. Such as have 
read the Works of that Philofopher, will eafily imagine what may be the caufe of thefe things y 
whereas it would be a difficult task for me to explain it ; and thofe who are unaquainted with 
that Author would have a very confus'd Notion of the Reafons I might offer. 

Nor fhall I ftand to refolve a vaft number of Difficulties which I forefee will be urg'd againft 
what I have been eftablifhing, becaufe if thofe who propofe them have no knowledge of true na- 
tural Phiiofophy, I mould but tire and confound them inftead of fatisfying them. But if they 
were Men of Science, I could not anfwer them. without a long train of diagrams and reafon- 
ing. Wherefore I think it belt to intreat thofe who (hall find any Difficulty in what I have faid, 
to give this Difcourie a more careful perufal ; not doubting but if they read it and confider it as 
they ought, all their Objections will fall to the Ground. But after all, if they think my Requelt 
inconvenient, let them fit ftill, there being no great danger in the Ignorance of the Caufe of the 
Hardnels of Bodies. 

I ipeak not here of contiguity : for 'tis manifeft that contiguous things touch fo little, that 
there's always a good quantity of fubtle Matter palling between them, which endeavouring to 
continue its Motion in a right Line hinders them from uniting. 

As to the union found between two Marbles that have been polifh't one upon another, I have 
already explain'd it -, and 'tis eafie to fee, that though the fubtle Matter paffes conftantly between 
the two parts, as dole as they are yet the Air cannot get in ; and therefore 'tis that which 
compreffes and conftringes the two parts together, and makes them fo difficult to be difunited, 
unleis we glide them over one another. 

1 or all this it is manifeft that the Continuity, Contiguity and Union of two Marbles would 
be one and the fame thing in a vacuum t for neither have we different Ideas of them, fo that it 
would be to talk without underftanding our felves to make them differ abfolutely, and without any 
regard to the lurrounding Bodies. 

i now come to make fome Reflexions upon M. Des Cartes's Opinion, and the Original of his 
Eirour : I call his Opinion an Errour, becaufe I can find no fincere way of defending what he has 
faid upon die Rules of Motion, and the Caufe of the Hardnefs of Bodies towards the end of the 
fecond Part of his Principles in leveral places •, and that he feems to have evidently prov'd the 
•Truth of the contrary Opinion. 

This 



Chap. IX. The Search after Truth. 90 

This great Man moft diftinctly conceiving that Matter could not naturally move it felf, but that 
the moving Force or" all Bodies was nothing but the general Will of the Author of Nature ; and 
that therelore the Communications of their Motion upon their mutual Collilion, mult come 
from the fame Will, yielded to be carry 'd away with this Notion, That the Rules of the different 
Communication of Motions mult be ietch'd from the Proportion found between the different Mag- 
nitudes of Colliding Bodies •, it being impoflible to penetrate into the Defigns and Will of God. 
And whereas he concluded that every thing had theJForce to perfevere in its preterit State, whether 
it were in Motion, or Reft, becaufe God, whole Will conltituted this Force, a£ts always in the 
lame manner ; he inferr'd that Reft had an equal Force with Motion. Thus he meafur'd the Ef- 
fects of the Power of Reft by the Greatnefs of the Body it refided in, as well as thole of Motion : 
And hence he gave the Rules of the Communication of Motion which are ken in his Principles, 
and the Caufe of the Hardnefs of Bodies, which I have endeavour'd to refute. 

Tis a hard matter not to fubmit to the Opinion of Monfieur des Carles, when we contemplate 
it on the fame fide : For, once more, fince the Communication of Motions proceeds only from the 
Will of the Author of Nature, and rhat we fee all Bodies continue in the State they have once been 
put in, whether it be Motion or Reft, it feems that we ought to feek for the Rules of the different 
Communications of Motion upon the Concourfe of Bodies -, not in the Will of God, which is un- 
known to us •, but in the Proportion that is found between the Magnitudes of thefe fame Bodies. 

I do not therefore admire that Monfieur des Cartes ftiould light upon this Notion ; but i only 
wonder he did not correct it, when having pufh'd on his Difcoveries, he found out the Exiitence, 
and fome Effects of the fubtile Matter which furrounds all Bodies. 

I am furpriz'd to find him, in the 13 2d Article of the Fourth Part, attribute the El aft ick Force 
of certain Bodies to the fubtile Matter, and yet not afcribe to it their Hardnefs, and the Refiltance 
they make to our Endeavours to bend and break them :, but only to the Reft of their Parts. For Art. 55. & 
I think it evident, that the Caufe of the Elaflicity and Stiffnefs of fome Bodies, is the fame with 4?- of the 
that which impowers them to refift the Violence that is us'd to break them : For indeed, the Force ^nd^dfe-' 
. which is employ'd in breaking a piece of Steel, has but an infenfible Difference from that which where. 
is us'd to bend it. 

I mean not to multiply Reafons here, which one might give for the proving thefe things •, nor to 
aniwer fome Difficulties poffible to be urg'd about Bodies which are not fenfibly [fringing, and yet 
are difficultly bent ; For all thefe Difficulties vanifti, if we confider that the fubtile Matter cannot 
eafily make new Tracks in Bodies which break in bending, as in Glafs and temper'd Steel ; which 
it can eafier do in fuch Bodies as are compos'd of branchy Parts, and that are not brittle, as in Gold 
and Lead : And Laft/y, that there is no hard Body, but has fome kind of Elaterium. 

'Tis a hard matter to perfuade one's felf that Monfieur des Cartes did pofitively believe the Cauie 
of Hardnefs to be different from that which makes the Elaflicity •, and what looks moft likely, is, 
that he made not fufficient Reflexion on that matter. When a Man has for a long time medita- 
ted on any Subject, and is well fatisfied about that of his preient Enquiry, he commonly thinks 
no farther on it -, he believes that the Conceptions he had of it are undeniable Truths, and rhat it 
is needlels to examine them any more. But a Man has fo many Things in him which difrelifh his 
Application, provoke him to precipitate Judgments^ and fubje£t him to Errour, that though his 
Mind remains apparently fatisfied, yet it is not always well inftrucf ed in the Truth. Monfieur des 
Cartes was a Man, like us : No greater Solidity, Accuracy, Extent, and Penetration of Thought is 
any where to be met with, than in his Works, I confefs ; but yet he was not infallible : There- 
fore 'tis very probable he remain'd fo fettl'd in his Opinion, from his not fufficiently reflecting that 
he aiTerted fomething in the Confequence of his Principles, contrary to it. He grounded it on ve- 
ry fpecious and probable Reafons-, but fuch notwithftanding, as being not capable of themfelves 
to force his Confent, he might ftili have fufpended his Judgment •, and confequently, as a Philo- 
fopher, he ought to have done it. It was not enough to examine in a hard Body, what was in it 
that might make it fo -, but he ought likewife to have thought on the invifible Bodies, which 
might give it Hardnefs ; as he did at the End of his Pbilofopbical Principles, when he afcrib'd ro 
them the Caufe of their Elafticity : He ought to have made an exa£t Divifion, and comprehenure 
of whatever might contribute to the Hardnefs of Bodies. It was not enough to have fought the 
Caufes of it in the Will of God ^ he ought alfo to have thought on the fubtile Matter, which fur- 
rounds thefe Bodies : For though the Exiftence of that violently agitated Matter was not yet pro- . 
ved in the place of his Principles where he fpeaks of Hardnefs :, it was not however rejected ; he 
ought therefore to have fufpended his Judgment, and have well remember'd that what he had 
written concerning the Caufe of Hardnefs, and of the Rules of ^Motion, was fit to be revis'd ; 
which I believe was neglected by him •, or at leaft, he has not fufficiently confider'd the true Rea- 
fon of a thing very eafie to be difcover'd, and which yet is of greateft Confequence in Natural Phi-' 
lofophy. I thus explain my felf: 

Monfieur des Cartes well knew that to the Support of his Syftem, ( the Truth of which he could 
not reafonably fuf pe£t, ) it was abfolutely necellary that great Bodies ftiould always communicate 
fome of their Motion to the leiTer which they met with •, and that the latter fhould rebound at the 
Encounter of the former, without the like Lois of their own : For otherwife, the firft Element 
would not have all the Motion that is neceflary above the fecond, nor the fecond above the third 5 
and fo all his Syftem would be abfolutely falfe, as is manifeft to thofe who have a little confider'd 
it. But in fuppofing that Reft has Force to refift Motion, and that a great Body in Reft cannot be 
mov'd by another lefs than it felf, though moft violently ftriking againft it, 'tis plain that great 

A a Bodies 



a a F. Malebranche Concerning Book VL 

Bodies muft have much lefs Motion than an equal Mafs of little ones, fince they may always by 
that Suppofition communicate their own Motion, but cannot always receive any from the lefTer, 
Thus this Suppofition being not contrary to all that Monfieur des Cartes had laid down in his Prin- 
ciples, from the beginning, to the Eftablifrimeht of his Rules of Motion, and according very well 
with theConfequence of thefe fame Principles, he thought the Rules of Motion, which he believ'd 
he had demonitrated in their Caufe, were fufficiently confirm'd by their Effects. 

I agree with Monfieur des Cartes in the Bottom of the Thing, that great Bodies communicate 
"their Motion much eafier than the lefTer h and that therefore his firft Element is more agitated than 
the fecond, and the fecond than the third •, but the Caufe is manifeft without recourfe to his Sup- 
pofition. Little and fluid Bodies, as Water, Air, tftc. can but communicate to any great ones art 
uniform Motion, which is common to all their Parts. The Water of a River can only communi- 
cate to a Boat a defcending Motion, which is common to all the little Parts the Water is compo- 
led of-, each of which Particles, befides its common Motion, has infinite others, which are par- 
ticular. Which Reafon makes it evident that a Boat, for inltance, cannot have fo much Motion 
as an equal Volume of Water, fince the Boat can only receive from the Water a direcl Motion, and 
common to all the Parts of it. If twenty Parts of a fluid Body drive againft any other Body on 
one fide whilft there are as many urging it on the other, it remains immoveable ; and all the Par- 
ticks of the furrounding Fluid it fwims in, rebound without lofing any thing of their Motion. 
Therefore grols Bodies, whofe Parts are united one to the other, can receive only a circular and 
uniform Motion from the Vortex of the encompafling fubtile Matter. 

This Reafon feems fufficient to give us to underftand why grofs Bodies are not fo much agita- 
ted as little ones ^ and that it is not neceffary to the explaining thefe things, to fuppole any Force 
in Reft to refill Motion. The Certainty of Monfieur des Cartes's Philofophical Principles cannot 
therefore be of Ufe in proving or defending his Rules of Motion. And we have Reafon to be- 
lieve that if Monfieur des Cartes himfelf had, without PrepoiTeflion, examin'd his Principles afrefh, 
at the fame time weighing fuch Reafons as I have alledg'd, he would not have believ'd the Effe£ts 
of Nature had corroborated his Rules ; nor have fallen into a Contradiction, in attributing the 
Hardnefs of hard Bodies only to the Reft of their Parts, and their Elafticity to the Effort of the 
fubtile Matter. 

I now come to give the Rules of the Communication of Motion in a Vacuum, which follow up- 
on what I have before eftablifh'd concerning the Nature of Reft. Bodies being not hard in a Va- 
cuum, fince they are only fo by the preffiire of the fubtile Matter that furrounds them, if two Bo- 
dies meet together, they would flatten without rebounding : We muft therefore fuppofe them hard 
by their own Nature, and not by the preffure of the fubtile Matter, to give thefe Rules. 

Reft having no Force to refill Motion, and many Bodies being to be confider'd but as one at the 
Inftant of their Collifion, 'tis plain they ought not to rebound, lave when they are equal in their 
Bulk and Swiftnefs, or that their Swiftnefs compenfates for the Want of Bulk, or their Bulk the 
Want of Swiftnefs. And 'tis eafie from hence to conclude, that they ought in all other Cafes fo 
to communicate their Motion, as afterwards to proceed along together, with an equal Pace. 
* General * Wherefore, to know what ought to happen in all the different Suppofitions of the Magnitude 
Ruiesof the and Celerity of Colliding Bodies, we need only add together all the Degrees of Motion of two or 
Commiu- more5 which ought to be confider'd but as one in the Moment of their Concourfe, and afterwards 
Motions! divide the Summ of the whole Motion proportionably to the Bulk of each refpeftive Body, 
f Semjes Hence I conclude, that of the t feven Rules of Motion, Monfieur des Cartes has given, the 
cartes's three firft are good. 

f uIe5 ' nthe That the Fourth is falfe, and that B ought to communicate its Motion to C, in proportion to 
of hisPrfn- ^ e bignefs of the fame C, and after go along in Company ; fo as if Cbe double to £, and B have 
cipks. three Degrees of Motion, it muft give away two of them : For I have fufficiently prov'd, that 
Monfieur des Cartes ought not to have fuppos'd in Reft, a Force to refill Motion. 
That the Fifth is true. 

That the Sixth is falfe, and that B ought to communicate half of its Motion to C. 
And that the Seventh is falfe, and that B ought ever to communicate its Motion to C, in propor- 
tion to the Magnitude and Motion of both B and C But that if, according to the Suppofition, 
C be double to j9, and have three Degrees of Motion, whilft C has but two, they muft proceed 
together in Company, Cand B being but one Body at the time of their Collifion -, and therefore 
we muft add together the Degrees of Swiftnefs, which are five, and afterwards divide them in 
proportion to their bignefs, and fo diftribute i » to B, and 34 to C, which is double to B. But 
thefe Rules, though certain, from what I have laid, are yet contrary to Experience, fince we are 
not in a Vacuum. 

■ The chief of thole Experiences, which are contrary to what I have faid about the Rules of Mo- 
tion, is, the conftant rebounding of hard Bodies, when they meet, one one way, and another an- 
other ; or at leaft, their not going in Company after their Encounter. 

In Anfwer to which, we muft call to mind what we have formerly faid of the Caufe of Elaftici- 
ty •, namely, That there is a Matter, of a ftrangely-violent Motion, which continually paffes into 
the Parts of hard Bodies, and makes them fo by its compreffing both their outward and inward 
Parts : For it will be eafie from hence to fee, that at the time of Percuffion two encountring Bo- 
dies drive and turn off the Current of this Matter from the places neareft to the ftricken h which 
Matter refitting with great Violence, repclls the two Bodies, which llrike againft each other, and 
rdtores its Paflagc, which the Percuffion had ftopp'd up. 

That 





Chap. IX. The Search after Truth* cjl 

That which more clearly ftill proves my Opinion is this, That if two Bowls of Lead, or of any 
other lels Elaitick Matter, meet, they rebound not after their Collifion, but proceed almolt ac- 
cording to the Rules before eftablifh'd, which they keep to fo much more exactly as they are Lis 
ipringing. Bodies therefore rebound after their Percuffion, becaufe they are hard ^ that is, as I 
have explained, becaufe there is an extremely agitated Matter, which compreffes them, and which 
paifing through their Pores with an extreme Violence, repel the Bodies which ftfike againft them. 
But it ought to be fuppos'd that the Percutient Bodies break not thofe which they da(h againit by 
a Motion over-powering the Refiftance the little Parts of the fubtile Matter are capable of making 5 
as when we discharge a Musket againft a piece of Wood. 

'Tis true, the i'ubtile Matter compreiTes loft Bodies, and paffes with a rapid Courfe through their 
Pores, no lefs than through thofe of hard • and yet thefe foft Bodies have no Elafticity : The Rea- 
fon whereof is this \ that the Matter palling through foft Bodies, can with a great deal of Eafe 
open it lelf new Pallages, by reafon of the Minutenefs of the Parts compofing them, or of fome 
other particular Configuration, proper for that Effetf ; which hard Bodies will not admit, by rea- 
fon of the Largenefs and Situation of their Parts, which are contrary to the fame. 

Thus when a hard Body ftrikes another that is foft, it alters all the Roads the fubtile Matter us'd 
to pals through, which is commonly vifible ^ as in a Musket-Bullet, which flattens when it is frnit- 
ten. But when a hard Body ftrikes againft another like it, it either makes none, or very few new 
Paths ; and the fubtile Matter in its Pores is oblig'd to return upon the fame Ground, Or elfe mull 
repel the Body which blocks up its little Avenues. 
• Let A be a hard Body, B a foft one, C the Chanel 
of the fubtile Matter -, I fay, that if A ftrike B in the 
Point <r, the Chanel Cc is (hut up, and the fubtile Mat- 
ter finds out new Ways in the foft Body ■ and fo ha- 
ving an open Road, it repels not the ftriking Body, 
but the Body ftricken changes its Figure, and batters 
it felf a little : And it mult be fuppos'd, that in the 
leaft Body there are infinite PafTages like Cc. But if 
the Bodies A and a are both of them hard, the Paf- 
iage Cc is ftraiten'd , and the fubtile Matter included 
in it continuing its Motion in a Right Line, for want 
of new Paths, repels the Body ftriking it fo much more 
violently as it finds greater Difficulty in making a new 

Way i or elfe the Parts of the Body A break, and fe- /^ ^\^ \ ^ 

parate from one another, and are reduc'd to-Duft, or 
Pieces. 

Laftly, It feems evident, that every mov'd Body, 
continually endeavouring to tend in a Right Line, and 
declining from it as little as is pOflible when it meets 

Refiftance, ought never to rebound, fince by that Motion it extremely deviates from a Right. 5 Tis 
necelTary therefore, either that Bodies fhould grow flat, or that the ftronger fhould conquer the 
weaker, and make it bear it company : But becaufe Bodies are fpringing, and hard, they cannot go 
in company, fince if A pufhes #, a repels A; and fo they mult recede from one another. 

Notwithstanding, if two Bodies were in a Vacuum, though never fb hard, they would go in 
company, becaufe having no Body to furround them, they could have no Elaftick Force, the Striker 
making no Refiftance to the Striking ; but Air, Gravitation, &c. refilling the great Motion which 
the ftriking Body gives the ftricken, the ftricken refills the ftriking, and hinders it from follow- 
ing : For Experience teaches, us, that Air and Gravity refill Motion •, and that this Refiftance is fo 
much greater, as the Motion is more violent. 'Tis eafie to difcover from what I have been fay- 
ing, how it comes to pafs, that in the Percuffion of different Bodies, encompafs'd with Air or 
Water, CV. fometimes the Smiting rebounds, fometimes communicates all its Motion, and re- 
mains as it were unmoveable ; and fometimes it follows the Smitten, but always with lefs De- 
grees of Swiftnels, if one or' other of them he not perfectly foft : For all this depends on the Pro- 
portion that is found between the Magnitude, the Hardnefs, and the Weight of one and the other, 
fuppofing them mov'd with an equal Swiftnels : If they are very hard, the Smiting rebounds more, 
becaufe the Elaterium is ftronger. If the Smiting is very little, the Smitten very large and weigh- 
ty, the Smiting rebounds ftill much, becaufe of the Weight and the great Mais of Air furround- 
ing the Smitten, which withftands the Motion. Laft of all. If the Force of the Hardnefs is, as 
it were, abated by the little Volume of Air anfwering the Littlenefs of the ftricken Body, or the 
contrary h it may happen that the Smiting may remain as immoveable after the Percuffion. We 
need therefore but compare the Hardnefs of percutient Bodies, and the Air, which the Percuis'd 
ought to agitate anew at the time of Percuffion, whereby to move, to give a pretty exact - Con- 
jecture concerning what muft happen in the Percuffion of different Bodies. I ftill fuppofe an equal 
Swiftnefs ill the ftriking, for the Air more refills a great Motion than a little one •, and there is as 
much Motion in a Body twice as little, as in another, when proceeding twice as fall as that other. 
Thus the Smitten being driven as fall again, may be confider'd as having a Volume of Air twice 
as big, to repel, in order to its moving. 

But it ought itill to be obferv'd, that at the Moment of one Body's ftriking another, the Parts 
of this fame Body have two contrary Motions j for thofe on the Fore-fide have a backward Ten- 
dency, 





$6 F. Malebranche Concerning 

dency by reafoli of the Collifion, when at the fame time thofe behind tend forwards on the Ac- 
count of the firft Motion 5 and 'tis that Counter-motion which flattens foft Bodies, and is the 
Caule that fome hard Bodies break in pieces •, but when Bodies are very hard, this Counter-iiroke, 
which vibrates fome of the Parts, and makes a fort of Trepidation in them, as appears from the 
Sound they give, always produces fome Changes in the Communication of Motion, which are 
very difficult to be known, for many Reafons ; and 'tis, in my Mind, to little purpofe to examine 
them in particular. 

Would a Man meditate on all thefe things, I believe he would eafily anfwer fome Difficulties 
which might ftill be rais'd upon the Subjeft -, but if I thought that what I have faid were infuffl- 
eient to f hew that Rcfl has no Force to refill Motion, and that the Rules of the Communication of 
Motions, given by Monfieur dcs Cartes are in part falfe, I would here make Out that it is impof 
fible by his Suppoiition to move our felves in the Air : And that which makes the Circulation of 
Motion in Fluid Bodies poflible, without recurring to a Vacuum, is, that the firft Element eafily 
divides it felf in feveral different manners, the Repofe of its Parts having no Force to refill Motion. 



The CONCLUSION of the Three laft BOOKS. 

I Have, if I miftake not, fufficiently fhewn in the Fourth and Fifth Booh, that Men's natural In- 
clinations and Pailions frequently occafion their falling into Errour :, becaufe they induce them 
more to a precipitate Judgment, than a careful Examination of Things. 
. I have fhewn in the Fourth 'Book, that our Inclination for Good in general, is the Caufe of the 
Reftlefnefs of the Will ; that this Reftlefnefs of the Will puts the Mind in continual Agitation -, 
and that a Mind continually agitated, is utterly unfit for the Discovery of any the leaft intricate 
and hidden Truths : That the Love of new and extraordinary Things frequently prepoiTeffes us in 
their behalf. ^ and that whatever bears the Character of Infinite, is capable of confounding out Ima- 
gination, and mifleading us. I have explain'd how our Inclination for Greatnefs, Elevation and 
Independency infenfibly engage us in a falfly-pretended Learning, or in the Study of all vain and 
ulelefs Sciences, which flatter the fecret Pride of our Heart ; becaufe this is what recommends us 
to the Admiration of the Vulgar. I have fhewn, that the Inclination for Pleafures conftantly 
throws off the View of the Mind from the Confideration of abftra&ed Truths, which are the molt 
fimple and exuberant-, and permits it not to confider any thing, with a competent Attention and 
Impartiality, to judge well of it : That Pleafures Wing the Modes of our Souls Exiftence, they 
neceflarily divide the Capacity of the Mind -, and that a Mind thus divided, cannot fully compre- 
hend a Subject of any great Extent. Laft of all, I have made appear, that the Relation and Natu- 
ral Union we have to all thofe with whom we live and converie, is the Occafion of many Errours 
we fall into, and of our communicating them to others, as others communicate to us the fame 
they were engaged in. 

In the Fifth, where I have endeavour'd to give fome Idea of our Paflions, I have, I think, made 
it fufficiently evident, that they were ordain'd to unite us to all things fenfible •, and to give us, 
as we are among them, a due and necelTary Difpofition for their Prefervation and our own : That 
as our Senfes unite us to our Body, and expand our Soul into all the compofing Parts of it ; fo 
our Commotions carry us, as it were, out of our felves, and diffufe us upon all things round about 
us : That, Laft/y, they inceffantly reprefent things, not as they are in themfelves, whereby we 
may form true Judgments ; but according to the Relation they have to us, whereby to form Judg- 
ments ufeful to the Prefervation of our Being, and of thofe to whom we are either naturally or 
voluntarily united. 

After having attempted the Difcovery of Errours in their Caufes, and the Deliverance of the 
Mind from the Prejudices it is fubjeft to, I thought it was time at laft to prepare it for the Search 
of Truth. Wherefore, in the Sixth Book, I have explain'd the Means which I thought moft na- 
tural for the increafing the Attention, and enlarging the Capacity of the Mind, by fhewing the 
life that might be made of its Senfes, its Fajfons, and Imagination, to the giving it all the Force 
and Penetration it is capable of After which, I have eftablifh'd certain Rules, which muft of ne- 
ceffity be obferv'd for the Difcovery of any Truth whatever : I have explain'd them by many Ex- 
amples, that I might make them more fenfible ; and have chofen thole which I thought molt ufe- 
ful, or that included more fecund and general Truths ; that they might be read with greater Ap- 
plication, and be made more fenfible and familiar. 

Poflibly it may be acknowledg'd, by this Ejfay of Method which I have given, how necelTary it 
is to reafon only about clear and evident Ideas, and in which we are inwardly convine'd that all 
Nations do a"gree •, and never to proceed to Compound Things, till having fufficiently examin'd 
the Simple, whereon they depend. 

And if it be confider'd that Arijlotle and his Followers have not obferv'd the Rules I have ex- 
plain'd, as we ought to be affur'd by the Reafons I have alledg'd, and by the Correfpondence that 
may be had with the moft zealous Defenders of that Philofopner, it may be we fhall deipife his 
Do'f trine, in fpight of all the Impreflions which petfuade fuch as give way to be amuz'd by Words 
they do not underftand. 

Bui 



The Search after Truth. <pj 

But if we take notice of the manner of Monfieur des Cartes's Philofophizing, we cannot doubt 
of the Solidity of his Philofophy : For I have fufficiently fhewn that he reafons but upon diftincl 
and evident Ideas ; beginning with molt Simple Things, and afterwards palling on to the more 
Compound, which depend on them. Thole who mall read the Works of that Learned Man, will 
have plenary Conviction of what I fay of him, provided they read them with all the Application 
that is necelfary to underftand them : And they will feel a Secret Joy, for being born in an Age 
and Country lb fortunate, as to free them from the Trouble of Seeking a Matter to teach therh 
Truth, among the paft Ages of the Heathens ^ and in the Extremities of the Earth, among Bar- 
barians and Strangers. 

But as we ought not to be very follicitous to know the Opinions of Men, even though we were 
otherwile afliir'd they had found out Truth ; fo I mould be very forry if the Efteem I manifeft for 
Monfieur des Cartes lhould prepoiTefs any Man in his behalf, and make him lit down latisfy'd with 
reading and retaining his Opinions, without caring to be enlightened with the Light of Truth. 
This would be preferring Man before GOD, and confulting him in God's Steady and acquiefcing 
in the obfeure Anfwers of a Philofopher, which do not enlighten us, to avoid the Trouble of In- 
terrogating by our Meditation Him who anfwers and enlightens us both together. 

'Tis a mean and unworthy thing to become the Partizan of any Seel:, and to look upon the Au- 
thors of it as infallible. And thus Monfieur des Cartes, chufing rather to make Men Difciples of 
Truth, than Opinionated Followers of his Sentiments, exprefsly forewarns them. Not to take any 
thing he ivrites upon Tritji, and to embrace nothing but what the Force and Evidence of Reafon Jhould 
con f rain them to believe. Fie delires not, like fome Philofophers, to be credited upon his Word : 
He ever remembers that he is a Man j and that diffeminating his Light but by Reflexion, he ought 
to direct: the Minds of thofe who would be illuminated by him, towards Him alone who can 
make them more perfect by the Gift of Underltanding. 

The principal Advantage that can be made of Application to Study, is, the rendring the Mind 
more accurate, more illuminated, more penetrating, and fit for the DiScovery of all the Truths we 
defire to know. But fuch as read the Philofophers, with Defign of remembring their Opinions, 
and factoring them to others, approach not Him who is the Lite and Nourishment of the Soul : 
Their Mind grows blind and enervate, by their Commerce with fuch as can neither Strengthen nor 
enlighten them : They are fwell'd up with a fpurious fort of Learning, the Weight whereof over- 
whelms, and the Glittering blinds them ; and fancying to themfelves they are hugely learn'd when 
their Heads are cramm'd with the Opinions of the Antients, they forget that they become their 
Difciples who, St. Paul fays, became Fools by ufurping the Name of Wife. Dicentes fe efe Sa- 
pientes, fiulti fatli funt. 

The Method I have given will, if I miftake not, be highly advantageous to thofe who defire to 
make ufe of their Reafon, or to receive of God the Anfwers he gives all thofe who can faithful- ■ 
ly confult Him r For I think I have faid what is chiefly requir'd to corroborate and conduct the 
Attention of the Mind ^ which is, the natural Prayer we make to the true Matter of all Men, 
in order to be instructed. 

But becaufe this Natural Way of Searching out Truth is very painful, and commonly impracti- 
cable, except in the Refolution of Quettions of little Ufe, the Knowledge whereof commonly 
more gratifies our Pride, than perfects our Underltanding ^ I think it my Duty to fay, (that I may 
profitably conclude this Work,) that the molt expeditious and certain Method of difcovering Truth, 
and uniting our felves to God in the purelt and perfecteft manner poffible, is, to live as becomes 
true Chnfians h to follow exactly the Precepts of Eternal Truth, which unites it felf with us, only 
to re-unite us with it : 'Tis to liften rather to the Dictates of our Faith, than Reafon ; and to tend 
to God, not fo much by our natural Forces, which, fince the Sin, are altogether languid and in- 
active •, as by the Affiitance of Faith, by which alone God purposes to lead us into that immenie 
Light of Truth which will diffolve and diffipate all our Darknefs : For, in brief, 'tis much better, 
as good Men, to fpend fome Years in Ignorance of certain Things, and find our felves enlighten'd 
in a Moment, for ever •, than by Natural Means, and abundance of Trouble and Application, pur= 
chafe a very imperfect Science, that Shall leave us in Darknefs to all Eternity. 



B b ILLUSTRA- 



p8 F. Malebranche Concerning 



ILLUSTRATI ON S 

FOREGO "iNG BOOKS. 



The PREFACE: 

Wherein is (hewn what pjould be our Opinion of the federal Judgments com- 
monly pafs'd on Books , that encounter Prejudices . 

WHen a B OK is firft to appear in the World, one knows not whom to confult to learn its 
Deltiny : The Stars prefide not over its Nativity, their Influences have no Operation on 
it; and the molt confident Aftrologers dare not foretell the diverfe Risks of Fortune it muft run: 
Truth not being of this World, Celeftial Bodies have no power over her; and whereas (he is of a 
moft fpiritual Nature, the feveral Pofitions or Combinations of Matter can contribute noth'ng ei- 
ther to her Eftablifhment or Ruine. Befides, the Judgments of Men are fo different in refpe£t of the 
fame things, that we can never more hazardoufly and imprudently play the "Prophet, than in pre- 
faging the happy or unfortunate Succefs of a BOOK. So that every Man who ventures to be an Au- 
thor, at the fame time throws himfelf at the Reader's Mercy, to make him or eft eem him what he 
pleales: But of all Authors, thofe who encounter Prejudices ought moft infallibly to reckon upon 
their Condemnation ; their Works fit too uneafie on moft Mens Minds, and if they eicape the Pafc 
fions of their Enemies, they are obliged to the almighty Force of Truth for their Protection. 

: Tis a common Mifcarriage with all Mankind, to be too precipitate in judging ; for all Men are 
obnoxious to Errour, and only obnoxious upon this account : But all hafty and raffi Judgments 
are ever confonant to Prejudices •, and therefore Authors who oppugn them, cannot poffibly eicape 
8ente?ice from all their Judges, who appeal to Ancient Opinions, as the Laws whereby they ought 
to pronounce. For indeed moft Readers are both Judge and Party, in refpeft of thefe Authors. 
Their Judges they are, that Quality is inconteftable ; but they are a Party likewife, being difturb'd 
by thefe Authors in the poiTeffion of their ancient Prejudices, for which they have the plea of Pre- 
fcription, and to which they have been accuftom'd many Years. 

I confefs there's Abundance of Equity, Sincerity, and good Senfe in a great many Readers; and 
that they fometimes are Judges rational enough to fuperfede common Opinions, as not being the 
infallible Rule's of Truth. Many there are who retire into themfelves, and confult that Inward 
Truth, which ought to be their Rule to judge of all things ; but very Few that confult it upon all 
Occafions, and IS! one at all who do it with all that Faithfulnefs and Attention, that is necenary to 
judge infallibly at all times. And thus, though we might fuppofe there were nothing blameable 
in a Treatife, which yet it would be Vanity to pretend to, I am perfuaded it would be impoff.ble 
to find one fingle Man to approve it in every refpe£t; efpecially if his Prejudices were attacked by 
it; fince it is not naturally poiTible, that a Judge conftantly provok'd, affronted and outraged by a 
Party, fhould do him entire Juftice; or that he fhould give himfelf the trouble of a ftrenuous Ap- 
plication to thofe Reafons, which at firft fight appear to him as extravagant Paradoxes, or ridicu- 
lous Parologifms. 

But though a Man be pleafed with many things in a BOOK, if he fortunes to meet with fome that 
are offenfive, he (hall feldom be wanting to /peak ill of it, but moft commonly forgetfull to give it 
any good Charathr. Self love has a thoufand Motives to induce us to condemn what we diilike; 
andReafon in.this Inftance fully juftifies thefe Motives: fince Men fanfie they condemn Errours, 
and defend Truth, when they defend their Prejudices, and cenfure thofe that affault them. So that 
the moft equitable Judges of Books that fight againft Prejudices, pafs commonly fuch a general 
Sentenfe as is no way favourable on their behalf. Perhaps they will fay, there is fomething good 
in fuch a Work, and that the Author juftly oppofes certain Prejudices ; but yet they fliall be lure to 
condemn him 5 and as his Judges give an authoritative and grave decifion upon the point, main- 
taining that he carries things too far on fuch or fuch an occafion. For when an Author is ruining 
Prejudices which the Reader is not prepoffefs'd with, whatever he (hall fay will feem reafonable 
enough : But the fame Author ever itretches things too fir, when he engages the Prejudices where- 
with the Reader is too deeply ting'd. 

But whereas the Prejudices of different Perfons are not conftantly the fame, fhould one carefully ga- 
ther the leveral Judgments that are made upon the lame things, it would commonly appear, that ac- 
cording to thefe Judgments there is nothing Good; and at the fame time nothing Bad, in fuch kind 
of Books : There would be nothing good, becauie there is no Prejudices, but one or other eipoufes ; 
and there would be nothing bad, becauie there is no Prejudice whatever but fome or other condemn. 
in which judgments there is ib much Equity, that fhould a Man pretend to make ufe of them to 
correct his Piece ■, he muft neceffarily ftrikc- it iil out for fear of leaving any thing that was Condemn'd, 
or not to touch it for fear of expunging lomething that was approvd. So that a' poor Author that 
ltudies to be inoffeniive, finds himielf perplex'd on all hands, by all the various Judgments which 

arc 



Ihe, Search after Truth. c?e; 

are pronounc'd both for and againft hixfe 5 and unlefs he refolve to Hand his ground, and ro be 
reckon'd obftinate in his Opinions 5 he mult inevitably contradict himfelf at every turn, and appeal 
in as many different Forms as there are different Heads in a whole Nation. 

However, Time will do every Man Juftice, and Truth which at firlt feems a Chimerical and ri- 
diculous Phantailn, by degrees grows fenfible and manifeft : Men open their Eyes and contemplate 
her, they difcover her Charms, and fall in love with her. This Man who condemns ah Author 
for an Opinion that he dillikes, by chance meets with another that approves it, but condemns other 
Opinions which the former receives as undeniable 5 each of them talk fuitably to his Notion, and 
each of them contradicts the other. Hence they come to examine both their own and others Reafons 
affelhj theydifpute, and confider, andhefitate, and are not fo ready ro determine upon what they 
have not examined $ and if they are brought to change their Opinion, and to acknowledge that an 
Author is more reasonable than was believ'd •, thete rifes a fecret inclination in their Brea'ft, which 
prompts them to fpeak as well of him for the future as they have formerly fpoken to his d if ho- 
nour. Thus the Man who flicks refolutely to the Truth, though at fhft he move their Spleen of 
Laughter, need not defpair one day to fee Truth, which he defends, triumph over the Prepoffef- 
iion of Men. For there's that difference between Good and 111 Books, between thofe which en- 
lighten the Mind, and thofe which gratitie the Senfes and Imagination, that the latter look charm- 
ing and delightful at firft, but they fade and wither in time ; whilft the former, on the contrary, 
have fomething of a ftrange and difcouraging nature, which troubles and lets the Mind agaft - ; but 
in time they are relifh'd, and fo much the better as they are more read and digefted, for 'tis Time 
generally that regulates the Price of Things. 

The Books that encounter Prejudices leading to Truths through unbeaten Roads, require much 
longer time than others, to obtain the Reputation their Authors expect from them. For becaule 
Men are frequently baulk'd in the hopes that fuch fort of Performances had rais'd in them :, but Few 
there are that read them -, Fewer ftill that approve them ; almoft All condemn them, whether they 
read them or read them not: and though we be well aifufd that the trite and common Roads 
lead not where we defign to go, yet the fear of venturing upon fuch as have no Footfteps of for- 
mer Travellers, difheartens us from entring on them. So that Men caft not fo much as their Eye 
about them to conduct themlclves, but blindly tread in the fteps of their Fredeceffors •'.- Company 
is diverting and encouraging ; they think not what they are doing, they perceive not where they 
go, and often forget the place where they defign to arrive. 

Men are made for a fociable Life, which to preferve, it is not enough to ufe the fame Tongue • 
we muft moreover keep to the fame way of ' Expreffion, and the fame road of Thinking, as other 
Men. We muff live by Opinion, as we act by Imitation. We then cOnfult advantageoufly, agree- 
ably, and farely for the Good of the Body, and the Eftablifhment of our Fortune, when we fubmit 
to the Opinions of others, and give way to be perfuaded by the Air, or fenfible Impreffion of ths 
Imagination of thofe we hear fpeak. But we undergo much Pains, and run the extreme hazard of 
our Fortune, when we will only hearken to internal Truth, and reject with Scorn and Abhorrence 
all the Prejudices of the Senfes, and all the Opinions we have receiv'd without Examination. 

Thus all thofe Writers who combat with Prejudices, are much miftaken if they think by that 
means to recommend themfelves to the Favour and Efteem of others : Poffibly if they have fuc- 
ceeded in their Studies, fome few of the Learned will fpeak honourably of their Works when they 
are dead -, but while they live, they muft expeft to be neglected by molf People, and to be defpis'd, 
revil'd, and perfecuted, even by thole that go for the wifeft and moft moderate fort of Men. 

And indeed there are fo many Reafons, and thofe fo ftrong and convincing, which oblige us 
to do the fame as thofe we live with, that we have commonly right to condemn, as Men of fan- 
taftical and capricious Spirits, fuch as aft contrary to others. And becaufe Men do not fufficiently 
diftinguifh between Ailing and Thinking, they commonly are highly offended that any one mould 
fall upon their Prejudices. They fuppoie it not fufficient to the prefervation of the Rules of Civil 
Society, externally to comport with the receiv'd Opinions and Cuftoms of our Country. They 
pretend it is Rafhnefs to examine common Sentiments, and a breach of Charity to enquire after 
Truths becaufe Truth is not fo much the Bond of Civil Societies, as Cuftoms and Opinion. 

Arifiotle is receiv'd in the Vniverfities as the Rule of Truth : he is cited as infallible ; and 'tis a 
Philofophical Herefie to deny what he maintains : in a word, he is reverenc'd as the Genius of 
Nature: and after all, Thofe that ate belt acquainted with his Fhyficks, cannot account for, nor 
perhaps are convinc'd of any thing : and the Scholars, when they have finifti'd their Courfe oi'Phi- 
lofophy, dare not declare before Men of Senfe, what they have learn'd of their Majters. Which, 
it may be, is enough with Men of Reflexion, to teach them what to think of fuch fort cf Stu- 
dies : for that Erudition which a 'Man muft unlearn to become Reafonable, cannot feem very folid. 
Yet a Man would be thought raffi^, and prefumptuous, who would attempt to fhew the Falfity of the 
Reafons that Authorize lb ftrange and. unacountable a Conduct : and he would neceflarily make 
himfelf work with thofe, who reap advantage by it, though he were of competent Ability to dif- 
abufe the Publick. 

Is it not evident, that we muft make ufe of things that are known, to learn what is not known ? 
and that it would be impofing on a French-man, to give him a Grammar in German Vcrfe to teach him 
the German Tongue? and yet we put into the hands of Children Dejpauterius's Latin Verfcs, to 
teach them Latin: Verfes intricate on all accounts ; to Children that with difficulty comprehend 
things that are moft eafie. Reafon and alio Experience are viiibly againft this Cuftom : for they 
fpend a great deal of time to learn Latin but by halves ; yet it would be temerity to find fault with 

it. 



ioo F. Malebranche Concerning 

it; kChinefe who knew this Cuftom, could not help laughing at it ; whilft in this part of the 
World, which we inhabit, the wifeft and moll learn'd cannot forbear approving it. 

If Prejudices thus falfe and palpable, and Cuftoms fo irrational, and of fo great Confequence, 
find fo many Patrons and Defenders •, how fhall they fubmit to Reafons that oppofe the Prejudices 
of a purely Speculative Nature? There needs but a very little Attention to dilcover that the way 
taken to inftrutt. Children is not the beft ; and yet it is not acknowledg'd Opinion and Cuftom carry 
it againft Reafon and Experience. How then can we imagine that the Books which deftroy an in- 
finite number of Prejudices, will not in many things be condemn'd by thofe who pais for the molt 
learn'd and wifeft Part of Men ? 

It mult be obferv'd that thofe who go for the moft underftanding and ingenious in the World, are 
Men that have read moft Books, both good and bad : Men of a molt happy Memory, and of a 
moft lively and comprehenlive Imagination. Now this fort of Perfons, commonly judge readily 
on all things, without Examination. They confult their Memory, and therein immediately find the 
• Law, or Prejudice by which they pronounce, without much reflexion. As they think their Parts 
better than orher Men's, they afford little Attention to what they read : Hence it comes, that Wo- 
men and Children eafily dilcover the Falfity of fome Prejudices which they fee attacked, becaufe 
they dare not judge without examining j and that they bring all the Attention they are capable of; 
to what they read : whilft Scholars, on the contrary, ftick refolutely to their Opinions, becaufe 
they will not be at the Trouble of examining thofe of others, when quite contrary to their pre- 
conceiv'd Notions. 

As to the Attendants on the Great Men of the World, they have fo many external Adherencies, 
that they cannot eafily retire into themfelves •, nor bring a competent attention to dift inguifh Truth 
from Probability. Neverthelefs they are not extremely addicled to any kinds of Prejudices : For 
Itrongly to profecute a Wordly intereft, neither Truth nor Probability muft be rely'd on. As a 
feeming Humility, or Civility, and external fhew of Temper, are Qualities which all Men admire, 
and are abfolutely necelTary to keep up Society amongft Proud and ambitious Spirits : Men of* 
Worldly Defigns, make their Vertue and Defert to coniift in aliening nothing, and believing nc- 
thing, as certain and indifputable. It has ever been, and will ever be the Fafhion, to look upon 
all things as Problematical, and with a Gentleman-like Freedom to Treat the moft holy Truths, left 
they mould feem bigotted to any thing. For whereas the Gentlemen I mention, are neither appli- 
cative nor attentive to any thing but their Fortune-, there can be no Difpofition more Advantageous, 
or' that feems more reafbnable to them, than that which the Fafhion juftifies. Thus the Invaders of 
Prejudices, whilft they flatter on one hand, the Pride and Remifnefs of thefe Worldly Men, are 
well accepted by them ; but if they pretend to affert any thing as Undeniable, and to manifeft the 
Truth of Religion and Chriftian Morality, they are look'd upon as Opinionated, and as Men who 
avoid One Precipice to run upon another. 

What I have faid, is, meihinks, fufficient to conclude, what ihould be anlwer'd to the different 
Judgments divers Perfons have pronouod againft The Treatife concerning the Search after Truth*, 
and I fhall make no Application, which every Man may do himfelf to good purpofe without any 
trouble. I know indeed that every Man do will not do it^ but perhaps I might feem to be the 
Judge in my own Cafe, if I mould defend my felf as far as I was able. I therefore refign up my - 
Right to the Attentive Readers, who are the natural Judges of Books, and I conjure them to call 
to Mind, the requeft I made in the Preface of the foregoing Treatife, and elfewhere, Not to judge 
of my Opinions but by the clear and. diflintt Anfwers they jhall receive from the only Teacher of all 
Men, afier having confult ed him by aferious attention. For if they confult their Prejudices, as 
the decifive Laws to judge of the Book, Concerning the fear ch after Truth; I acknowledge it to be 
a very ill Book, fince purpofely written to deteft the Faliity and Injuftice of thefe Laws. 



w j 



ADVERTISEMENT. 

'Hereas the following Illuftrations were composed to fatiffie fome particular Perfons, who de- 
fied a more fpecial Explication of fome important Truths ; I think ft to premife, that 
deary to apprehend what I Jhall fay, it will be requifite to have fome Knowledge of the Principles I 
have offered in the Treatife concerning the Search after Truth. Therefore it will be the beji way not 
to meddle with thefe Obfervations, till after having carefully read the whole Work for zvhich they were 
made-, and only to examine them at a fecond reading, as they fhall be found referred to by the Margin. 
This Caution however is not abfolutely neccfjary to be obferv'd by under funding Perjons, bccatifc I 
have endeavoured fo to write thefe Elucidations, as that they might be read without referring to the 
Book they were composed for ; I know that Truth isof all things in the World that which gives leaf trou- 
ble to acquire it. Men life not willingly to collate thofe Puff ages in a Book, which have Reference to 
one another-, but commonly read things as they fall in their way, and underfand of them as much as they 
can : wherefore to accommodate my felf to this Temper of Men, I have tried to make thefe Remarks 
intelligible, even to thofe who have forgotten the Places of the foregoing Treatife, whereunto they 
refer. Neverthelefs 1 defire thofe who will not be at the trouble of carefully examining thefe Illullra- 
tions, not to condemn them oj jalfe and extravagant Confequences, which may be deduced from want 
of under fanding them. 1 have fome Reafon to make this Requeft, not only becaufe 1 have right to 
demand of the Readers, who are my Judges, not to condemn without underfanding me, but on fe- 
deral other Accounts, which it is not nccejjary for me to declare in this Place. 

ILLUSTRA- 



The Search after Truth. 



ioi 



ILLUSTRATIONS 



T 



UPON THE 




EAT I 





Concerning the 

SEARCH after TRUTH. 



THE 

FIRST ILLUSTRATION 

UPON THE 

Firft CHAPTER of the Firft BOOK. 

Cod worlds whatever is real in the Motions of the Mind, and in the Deter- 
minations of them *, notwithjianding which »* he is not the Author of Sin. 
He works whatever is real in the Sensations of Concnpifcence, and yet is not 

the Author of it. 

SOME Perfons pretend that I relinquifh the Comparifon of the Mind and Matter too 
foon ; and fanfie the one has no more Power than the other to determine the Impreflion 
which God gives it ; and therefore wifh me to explain ( if I can ) what it is that God 
works in us, and what vie do our f elves, when we fin ; fince in their Opinion, I fhall be 
oblig'd by my Explication, either to grant that Man is capable of giving himfelf fome new Mo- 
dification, or to acknowledge that God is actually the Author of Sin. 

I anfwer, That Faith, Reafon, and my own inward Confcioufnefs, oblige me to quit the Com- 
parifon where I do ; being every way convinc'd, that I have in my f elf a. Principle of my own De- 
terminations, and having Reafons to perfuade, that Matter has no fuch Principle ; which (hall 
be prov'd hereafter : Mean while here is what God operates in us, and what We do our felves, 
when we fin. 

. Firft, God continually drives us, by an invincible Impreflion, towards Good in general. Second- 
ly, He reprefents to us the Idea of a particular Good, or gives us the Serif ation of it. Laftly^ He 
inclines us to this particular Good. 

Firft, God drives us continually towards Good in general. For God has made us, and Rill pre- 
ferves us for Himfelf. He wills that we fhall love all Good, and is the firft, or rather only 
Mover. In brief, this is evident from innumerable things that I have laid elfewhere, and thofe I 
ipeak to will not difpute it. 

Secondly, God reprefents to us the Idea of a particular Good, or gives us the Sen] 'ation of it : 
For 'tis he alone that enlightens us, and the furrounding Bodies cannot aft upon our Mind. In 
a word, we are neither our own Light, nor our own Felicity, as I have proved at large in the 
Third Book, and elfewhere. 

Laftly, God inclines w to this particular Good : For God inducing US to all that's Good, by a 
neceffary Confequence, inclines us to particular Goods, by producing the Idea or Senfation of 
them in our Mind. This therefore is all that God effects in us when we fin. 

But whereas a particular Good includes not in it all Good •, and the Mind, considering it with 
a clear and diftinft View, cannot imagine it concludes all ; God does not neceffarily and invinfibly 
incline us to the love of it. We are confeious of the Liberty we have to ftay this Love, and of 
our Tendency to proceed farther : In a word, we feel the Impreflion we have for Good Univer- 
fal : or, to ipeak as others do, we aizfenjible that our Willis not under any conftraint or neceffity 
to fix upon this particular Good. 

So then this is what the Sinner does ; Ueftops, he refts, he follows not the Impreflion of Go.i, 
he does nothing : For Sin is Nothing. He knows that the grand Rule he is to obferve is to em- 
ploy his Liberty fbfar as it will, go ; and that he is not to fatten upon any Good, unlefs he be in- 
wardly convinc'd it would be offending againft ORDER, to refufe to ftay upon it. If he dis- 
covers not this Rule. 1 v the light of his Reaibn, he learns it at leaft from the fecret Reproaches of 

C c his 



1 2 ■ • F. Ki. a xebrahche Concerning 

his Conferences He is obliged then to follow the Impreffion he receives for the tlhiverial Good.; 
and to think of other Goods befides what he enjoys, and what he is only to make trie of: For 
'tiS by thinking on other Goods befides what he enjoys, that he can produce in himfelf new De- 
terminations of his Love, and make ufe of his Liberty. Now I prove that by the Impreffion" 
God gives. him for Good in general, he may think of other Goods, befides that of his prefent 
Enjoyment, it being precifely in this that the Difficulty confifts. 
See the dth 5 Tis a Law of Nature, that the Ideas- of Objects fhould offer themfelves to our Mind when we 
chap, of defire to think of them, provided our Capacity of Thought be not fill'd up by the lively and con- 
E °?H 3* fns'd Senfations we receive occafionally from the Motions in our Body. Now we can Will the 
Mradoni thinking on all things - ? becaufe the natural Impreffion which carries us towards Good, reaches to 
all pofhble Objecls of our Thought : And we can at all times think on all things ^ becaufe we are 
united to Him who comprehends the Ideas of all things, as I have* formerly proved. 

If it be true then that we can Will the confidering nearly, what we already fee as afar off, 
fince we are united with the Univerfal Being ; and if it be certain that, by virtue of the Laws of 
Nature, Ideas approach us when we defire it ; we ought thence to infer: 

Firft, That we have a Principle of our Determinations. For 'tis the actual Prefence of parti- 
cular Ideas, that pofitively 'determines, towards particular Goods, the Motion we have towards 
Good in general •, and fo changes our Natural Love, into Free and deliberate Loves : Our Confenr, 
or Acquiefcence in the preception of a Particular Good, has nothing real or pofitive in it on our 
Part •, as I (hall explain by and by. 

Secondly, That the Principle of our Determinations is always free in regard to particular Goods-. 
For we are not invincibly inclin'd to love them; fince we can examine them in themfelves, and 
compare them with the Idea which we have of the Sovereign Good, or with other particular 
Goods. Thus the Principle of our Liberty confifts in this, that being made for God, and united 
to him, we can always think on the true Good, or on other Goods befides thofe which out Thoughts 
are actually engag'd on. 

But this, on fuppofition that our Senfations do not take up. the Capacity of our Mind. . For 
to the end we may he free with -the Liberty foremention'd, it is neeeflary not only that God 
mould not pulh us, invincibly, to particular Goods ; but alfo that we fhould be able to employ 
our Impreffion for Good in general, to the loving other Objects than thole we love at prefent. 
But as thofe only can be the a£tnal Objects of our hove, which can be of our Thoughts; and that 
we cannot actually think, except on thofe which Occafion very lively Senfations, whilft they Oc- 
cafion them •, it is plain, that the dependance we have upon our Body weakens our Liberty, and 
in many Junctures, quite deftroys the ufe of it. So that our Senfations obliterating our Ideas ; 
and the Union we have with our Body, whereby we dilcern only our felves, enfeebling that we have 
With God, whereby all things are prefent to us ; the Mind ought not to give way to be fhar'd by 
confus'd Senfations, if it would preferve entire the free Principle of its Determinations. 

From all which it is evident, that God is not the Author of Sin, and that Man endues not him- 
felf with any new Modifications : God is not the Author of Sin ; becaufe he continually imprefles 
on the Sinner, who flops at a particular Good, a Motion to go farther-, gives him a Power of 
thinking on other things, and tending to other Goods, than thofe which actually engage his 
Thoughts and Affetfions -, and commands him not to love whatever he can refufe to love without 
inward Difquiet and Remorfe : withal continually recalling him to his God, by the fecret Reproaches 
of his Reafon. 

'Tis true that in one fenie God inclines the Sinner to Love the Obje£t of his Sin ; if this Ob- 
ject appears Good to a Sinner : for as moft Divines fay, whatever there is of a pofitive nature 
of Alt, or Motion in the Sin, proceeds from God. But 'tis only by a falfe Judgment of our 
Mind that the Creatures feem good to us ; I mean capable of a&ing in us, and making us happy. 
But the Sin of a Man confifts not in his loving a particular Good ; for every Good, as fuch, is 
amiable ; but in his loving only this Good, or loving it as much or more than another that is 
^ . jj greater -, or in his loving a Good which God forbids him to enjoy ; for that the Mind being fub- 
ltration j e & t0 tne Body, purfuant to the Fall, the Love, or rather the Enjoyment of this Good, would en- 
upon ch. create his Concupifcence, and alienate him from the love of the Jupreme Good. In a word, the Sin 
gi Part 2. of Man confifts in his not referring all particular Goods to the fupreme : or rather in his not con- 
wherel'ex- ^ er ' n § an ^ loving the fupreme Good in all the particular •, and ib not regulating his Love by the 
plain my WILL of GOD, or according to eflential and neeeflary ORDER, of which all Men have a 
meaning more or lefs perfect Knowledge, as they are ftri&er or loofer united to God •, or are more or lefs 
mere di- Scnfible to the Impreffions of their Senfes and Paffions. For our Senfes import am Soul into our 
flinttly. whole }} 0( jy h an j our Yaffwns, as it were, export it to circumambient Objects •, and fo remove us 
from the Divine Light, which would penetrate and illuminate us. 

Nor does Man give himfelf new Modifications: For the Motion of Love which God cOn-» 
ftantly imprints on us, is neither augmented nor diminifh'd-, whether we do or do not actually 
love:, I mean, whether this natural Motion of Love be, or be not determin'd by fome Idea of 
our Mind. Nor does this Motion ceafe by its Acquiefcence in the Pofleffion of Good, as Mo- 
tion of Bodies ceafes by their Reft. There is great likelihood that God pufhes us at all times 
alike with an even Force towards him •, for he pufhes us on towards Good in general, as faft as 
we are .capable; and we are at all times equally capable, becaufe our Will, or our natural Ca- 
pacity of Willing, -is always equal to it feif. Thus, I fay, the Impreffion, or natural Motion, 
which carries us towards Good, never encreaies or.diminUhes*- 

■'■■■" I con- 



The Search after truth. < 163 

X confefs we have no clear Idea, nor indeed inward Senfation of the Evehnefs of that Impref- 
fion, or natural Motion towards Good : But this comes from our not knowing it by Idea, (which 
I have formerly *prov'd, ) and from our not being confeious of our Faculties, whilft they do hot *see rl-.e 
actually operate. We feel not what is natural and common, and always the fame in us ;. as the 7 1 ' 1 clla r' 
Heat and Beating of the Heart. We are even infenfible of our Habits, and whether we are deferving ? f C J X 3 d , 
of the Love, or Wrath of Godt. We have perhaps infinite Faculties, which are perfectly un- t |^jfi„!f 
known to us : For we are not inwardly confeious of all that we are, but only of all that we feci. ft ra tiort 
Had we never felt Pain, nor defir'd particular Goods, we could not by our Self-Confcioufnefs, upon it. 
have told whether we are capable oi jeeling Pain, or of vail ling thofe Goods : It being our Me-$; hcm0 f c,t 
mory,- and not our internal Scnfe, which teaches us we are capable of feeling what We do not J' f '""/ X 
feel •, or of being mov'd by fuch Pafiions, as do not actually agitate us. There is nothing there- iigmt frit. 
fore that can hinder our believing, that God draws us towards him with an equal Force, though Eccl.4. i. 
in a very different manner •, and that he preferves in our Soul an equal Capacity of witling, ot 
one and the fame Will, as he preferves in Matter, collectively taken, an equal quantity of Motidni 
But though this fhould not be certain, yet I can't fee how it can be laid, that the Augmentation 
or Diminution of the Natural Motion of our Soul depends on us, fince we cannot be the Caufe 
of the Extent of our own Will. . 

It is moreover certain, from what I faid before, That God produces and preferves in us all 
that's real and pofitive in the particular Determinations of the Motion of our Soul •, namely, 
our Ideas and Senfat'wns : For this it is which determines our Motion towards Good in general, 
to particular Goods, but not in an irrefiftible manner, becaufe we have a tendency to go farther. 
Hence all that is done on our part when we fin, is our not doing all we yet have the power to do, 
by means of our impreflion towards Him who comprehends all Goods •, for all our Power is de- 
riv'd from our Union with Him who works all in us. Now the principal caufe of our finning 
is, that preferring Enjoyment to Examination, by reafon of the Pleafure accruing to our Enjoy- 
ing, and the Pain attending our Examining ; we defift to employ the Motion which is given us 
for the purfuit and difquifition of Good -, and we dwell upon the enjoyment of things, which 
we mould no more than make ufe of But if we obferve the Matter nearly, we fhall lee that in 
this there is nothing real on our part, but only an intermijjion and ceffation of Enquiry, Which 
corrupts, as I may fay, the A£tion of God in us, but yet can. never deftroy it. So then, when 
we do not fin, What is it we do? We do all that God does in us; for we. do not confine to a 
particular Good, or rather a Falfe one, the Love which God impreiTes on us for the True. And 
when we fin, What do we do then ? 'Nothing. For we love a falfe Good, to which God does 
not carry us by an irrefiftible impreflion •, we ceafe to perfue the true Good, and ffuftrace the 
Motion God gives us towards it*. Now whilft we love a particular good only, or againft OR- WJ ,. 
DE R, we receive as great an impreflion of Love from God, as if we did not fix upon it. More- Editions it 
over this particular Determination, which is neither neceflary nor invincible, is given us of God •, utbw: But 

and therefore in finning, we produce no new Modification in our felves. we love a 

particular 
Good : True^ but Sin confilts not precifely in that : For all Good is amiable, and ought to be loved. Our Love is in it felf good-, 
and even in our loving that particular Good, we follow the Impreflion which God gives us. Our Sin precifely confifts in our fatten- 
ing upon that particular Good the Impreflion which God gives us to love all Gocd, or univerfal Good, at the time when we both 
might, and ought to love it. Therefore Sin is nothing-, and though God does all, he dees it not. Now whilft, <(jc. 

However, I own that when we fin not, but refill: Temptation, we may be faid in one fenfe to 
give our felves a new Modification ; becaufe we chufe to think on other things than the feeming . 
Goods wherewith we are tempted. But all that we then do, is produe'd by the Aft ion which 
God puts in us-, that is, either by our Motion towards Good in general, or by our JF/Y/affifted by 
Grace -, I mean, enlightned by Knowledge, and forwarded by a preventing delegation. For in fine, 
If the willing different things be fuppos'd to be giving different Modifications, I deny not but in 
this.Senfe, the Mind may diverfly modifie it felf by the Action it receives from God. 

But 'tis always to be obferv'd, that this Action deriv'd into us from God depends upon our 
felves, and is not irrefiftible, with relpecl: to particular Goods. For upon the prefentation of a . 
particular Good, we are inwardly confeious of our Liberty on its behalf, as we are of our Plea- 
fure and Fain, when they fenfibly afTecl: us : And the fame Reafon convinces us we are Free, that > 
convinces us we Ex iff •, for 'tis the inward confeioufnefs or feeling of our own Thoughts, that give 
us to know we have a Being. And, if at the lame time that we are fenfible of our Liberty, with 
f efpeCt to a particular Good, we ought to doubt of it, for want of having a clear Idea thereof -, 
We ought no lefs to doubt of our Pain, -and our Exiftence at the time of our Milery, fince we 
have no clear Idea either of our Soul or Pain. . - 

It goes quite otherwife with our inward Senfation or Confcience, than with our outward Sen- 
■fes. The latter always deceive us in fomething, when we follow their reports : but the former 
never deceives, us. Tis by the outward Senfes I fee Colours on the furface of Bodies, that I hear 
Sound in the Air, thatT feel Pain in my Hand-, and their Teftimony deceives me, if I rely upon 
it : But 'tis by my inward Senfation that I fee Colour, that I hear Sound, that I fuffer Pain 5 
and I err not in believing I fee When I fee, hear when I hear, and fuffer when I fuffer ^ provided 
I flop and go no farther. Thefe things are too felf-evident to be longer infifted on. Therefore 
being inwardly confeious of our Liberty, at the time of a particular Good's being prefent to the 
Mind, we are not to be doubtful of our Freedom on its refpecl. But whereas this inward Senfiu 
tion is ibmetimes abfent from our Mind", and we confult only what confus'd remains it has left 

in 



To 4 g. , F. Malebranche Concerning 

in our Memory ; we. may by the confederation of bbjfoafted reafons, which keep us from an in- 
ward feeling, perfuade our lelves that 'tis impoffible for Man to be free : Jult as a Stoick who in 
want of nothing, and Philoibphizing at his Cafe,, may imagine that Pain is no Evil, becaufe the 
. Internal Serif e he has of himfelf, does not actually convince him of the contrary ; and fo he may 
prove, like Seneca, by reafons in one fenfe moft true, that 'tis a contradiction for the wife man to 
fee. miferable. 

But though our Self '-confeioufnefs were inefficient to convince us of our Freedom, yet Reafon 
might evince as much : For fince the light of Reafon allures us that God a£ts only lor himfelf, 
and that he can give no Motion to us, but what mull: tend towards him ; the Imprefficn towards 
Good in general may be irrefiftible ; but 'tis plain, that that which we have for particular Goods 
muff be necelTarily free. For if it were invincible, we fhould have no Motion to carry us to 
God, though he gives it only for himfelf; and we mould be confhain'd to fettle on particular 
Goods j though GOD, ORDER and REASON, forbid us. So that Sin could not be laid at 
our door, and God would be the real Caufe of our Corruptions •, forafmuch as we mould not be 
Free, but purely Natural, and altogether necejfary Agents. ' 

Thus though inward Senfation did not teach us we were free, Reafon would difcover it was 
neceflary for Man rb be created fo •, if we fuppofe him capable of defiring particular Goods, and 
only capable of defiring them through the Impreflion or Motion which God perpetually gives 
us for himfelf Which likewife may be prov'd by Reafon. But our capacity to fuffer Pain can- 
not be prov'd this way ; but can only be difcover'd by Confidence, or inward Senfation-, and yet 
no Man can doubt but a Man is liable to fuffer Pain. 

As We know not our Soul by any clear Idea we have of it, as I have before explain'd, fb 'tis in 
Vain to try to difcover what it is in us that terminates the A£tion which God imprefles, or that 
yields to be conquer'd by a refiftible Determination, and which we may change by our Will, or by 
our Impreflion towards all Good, and our Union with him, who includes the Ideas of all Beings. 
For in fhort, we have no clear Idea of any Modificarion of our Soul : Nothing but our Internal 
Senfe can teach us that we are, and what we are : and this only mull be confulted to convince us 
we sue free. And its Anfwers are clear, and fatisfa£tory enough upon the Point, when we actually 
propole to our lelves any particular Good -, for no Man whatever can doubt whether he be invinfibbj 
inclin'd to eat of a Fruit, or avoid fome flight inconfiderable Pain. But if inftead of hearkning 
to our Inward Senfation, we attend to abftra£ted Reafons, which throw us off the Contempla- 
tion of our f elves, poflibly lofing fight of them, we may forget that we are in Being •, and trying 
to reconcile the prefcience of God, and his abfolute power over us, with our Liberty, we f hall 
plunge into an Errour that will overturn all the Principles of Religion and Morality. 

I produce here an Objection which is ufually made againft what I have been faying, which though 
but very weak and defective, is ftrong enough to give a great many trouble to evade. The Hating 
of God, fay they, is an Action which does not partake of Good ; and therefore is all the Sinner' s r 
God having no part in it : And confequently Man a£ls and gives himfelf new Modifications, b^ 
an action which does not come from God. 

I Anfwer, That Sinners hate not God, butbecaufe they freely and falfly judge that he is Evil; 
for Good, confider'd as fuch, cannot be the Objett of Hatred. Therefore they hate God with that 
very Motion of Love he influences them with towards Good. Now the Reafon why they conclude he 
is not Good, is their making an undue ufe of their Liberty ; for being not convine'd with irrefiftible 
Evidence that he is not Good, they ought not to believe him Evil, nor confequently to hate him. 

In Hatred two things may be diftinguif h'd, viz. the Senfation of the Soul, and Motion of the WilL 
This Senfation cannot be Evil •, for it is a Modification of the Soul, and has neither Moral Good nor 
III in it. Nor is the Motion more corrupt, fince it is not diftinguifhable from that of Love. For Ex- 
ternal Evil being only the privation of Good, 'tis manifeft, rhat to fly Evil, is to fly the privation of 
Good, that is, to purfue Good. Wherefore all that is real and pofitive, even in our Hatred of God. 
himfelf, has nothing Evil in it •, and the Sinner cannot hate God, without an abominable abufe of 
the action which God inceflantly gives to incline him to the Love of Him. 



Cod worlds whatever is real in the Sensations of Concupifcence ^ and yet is not 

the Author of Concupifcence. 

This Ilk- A S the Difficulties that are rais'd about Concupifcence, sre near akin to thofe before expkin'd % 
flratim re- f\_ I think it convenient to (hew, that God is not the Author of Concupifcence, though it be 
lares to the j ie t i iat WO rks all in us, even in the production of fenfible Pleafure. 

rerofthe*" * c ou g' u ^ ^'^ t0 be granted for the Reafons produe'd in the Fifth Chapter of the Firft Book of 
firft F.cok the preceding 1 real if e, and elfewhere, that by the natural Laws of the Union of the Soul and Body, 
of the Man, even before the Fall, was inclin'd by preventing Pleafures to the ufe of fenfible Goods-, and 
Search. that as often as fuch and fuch Traces were delineated in the principal part of his Brain, fuch and 
fuch Thoughts arofe in his Mind. Now thofe Laws were molt Proper and Equitable, for the Rea- 
fons I there have given : Which being fuppos'd, as before the Trangreflions all things were perfe&ly 
well ordefd, ib Man had neceflarily that Power over his Body, as that he could prevent the pro- 
duction of thefe Traces when he would -, Order requiring that his Mind fhould have the Dominion 
over his Body : Which Power of his Mind precifely confuted in this, that according to its different 

Defires 



The Search after Truth, 105 

Defires and Applications, it flopt die Communication of Motions which were produc'd in his own 
Body by circumambient Objects, over which his Will had not an immediate and direft Authority, 
as over his proper Body : And it cannot, I think, be conceiv'd how he could hinder the Formation 
of the Traces in his Brain any other way. Therefore fhe Will of God, or the general Law of Na-< 
ture, which is the trueCaufe of the Communication of Motions, depended on fome occafions, upon 
the Will of Adam : For God had that confideration for him :, that he produc'd not without his confent 
new Morions in his Body, oratleaftinthe principal part to which his Soul was immediately united. 
Such was the Inltitution of Nature before the Sin. ORDER would have it fo •, and confequent- 
ly HE whole efiential and neceffary Will is always conformable to ORDER. Which Will re* 
maining immutably the fame, the EilablHh'd Order was fubverted by the firft Man's Difobedience ; 
becaufe for the demerits of his Sin, it was confonant to Order, that he fhould be Lord of nothing- . 
It is not reafonable that the Sinner mould fufpend the Communication of Motions, that the Will In t j, e ob _ 
of God fhould conform to his; or that any exceptions fhould be made to the Law of Nature on jeflion to 
his Behalf: In fo much that Man is fubjeel: to Concupifcence, his Mind depends on his Body -, the Article 
he feels in himfelf indeliberate Pleafures, and involuntary and rebellious Motions, purfuant to that P^* 6 . 11 ' 
molt juff and exaft Law which unites the two Parts of which he is eompos'd. upon "he 

feventh Chapter of the fecond Book, I explain what I here fay in general of the lofs of Power, Man had over his Body. 

Thus the forma/ Re of on of Concupifcence, no lefs than that of Sin, is nothing real and pofitive ; 
being no more in Man, than the lofs of the Power he had to wave, and fufpend to the Commu-» 
nication of Motions on fome occafions : Nor are we to admit any pofitive Will in God to produce 
it-. For this lofs which Man has fuftain'd, was not a confequence of Order, or of the immutable 
Will of God, which never fwerves from it, and is conftantly the fame ; but only a confequence 
of Sin, which has rendred Man unworthy of an Advantage due only to his Innocence and Up- 
rightnefs. Wherefore we may fay, that not God, but Sin only, has been the Caufe of Concu- 
pifcence. 

Neverthelefs, God Works all that is Real 'and Pofitive in the Senfations and Motions of Concupif- 
cence ; for God does every thing : but all that has nothing of Evil. 'Tis by the general Law of Na- 
ture, that is, by the Will of God, that fenfible Objefts produce in Man's Body certain Motions, 
and that thefe Motions raife in the Soul certain Senfations, ufeful to the prefervation of the Body^ 
or the Porpagation of the Species. Who then dare prefume to fay thefe things are not good in 
themfelves? 

I know it is faid that Sin is the Caufe of certain Pleafures. But do they that fay it, conceive it ? 
Can it be thought that Sin, which is nothing, fhould aftually produce fometbing ? Can notbingbe 
fuppos'd to be a (real) Caufe. However 'tis fo laid: but poffibly for want of taking due pains 
of ferioufly confidering what they fay-, or becaufe they are unwilling to enter on an Explication 
that is contrary to the Difcourfes they have heard from Men, who, it may be, talk with more 
Gravity and AfTurance, than Reflexion and Knowledge. 

Sin is the Caufe of Concupifcence, but not oft leaf ure -, as Free Will is the Caufe of Sin, though not 
of the natural Motion of the Soul. The Pleafure of the Soul is good, as well as its Motion or 
Love: and there is nothing good but what God does. The Rebellion of the Body, and the guilt 
of Pleafure, proceed from Sin : As the Adherency of the Soul to a particular Good, or its Reff, 
proceeds from the Sinner : But thefe are only Privations and Nothings, whereof the Creature is 
capable. 

Every Pleafure is Good, and likewife in fome meafure makes happy the PofTeflbur, at leaft for the 
time of the Enjoyment: But it may be faid to be evil\ becaufe inffead of elevating the Mind to 
Him that is the true Caufe of it, through the Errour of our Intellectual, and corruption of our 
Moral Part, it proftrates it before fenfible Objects, that only feem to produce it. Again it is evil, 
in as much as it is Injuftice in us who are Sinners •, and confequently meriting rather to be punifh'd 
than rewarded, to oblige God purfuant to his (Primitive) Will, to recompenfe us with pleafant 
Senfations. In a word (not to repeat here what 1 have faid in other places) it is evil, becaufe God 
at prefent forbids it, by Reafon of its alienating the Mind, from himfelf, for whom he hath made 
and preferves it. For that which was ordain'd by God to preferve RighteousMan in his Innocence, 
now fixesV//?/tf/Manin his Sin •, and the Senfations of Pleafure, which he wifely eftablifh'd as the 
eafieft and moft obvious Expedients to teach Man, (without calling off his Reafon from his true 
Good,) whether he ought to unite himfelf with the invironing Bodies ; at prefent fill the Capaci- 
ty of his Mind, and fatten him on Objects incapable of afting in him, and infinitely below him * 
becaufe he looks upon thefe Objefts to be the true Caufes of the Happinefs he enjoys occafonal/y 
from them. 



Dd « THE 



0(5 F. Malebranche Concerning 

■ 



THE 

SECOND ILLUSTRATION 

UPON THE 

Firft CHAPTER of theFirft BOOK; 

Where I fay, 

That the Will cannot diver fly determine its Propensity to Good, but by com- 
manding the ZJnderftanding to represent to it fome particular ObjeU. 

IT muft not be imagin'd that the Will commands the Underjianding any other Way than by its 
Dcjires and Motions, there being no other A&ion of the Will : nor muft it be believ'd that 
rp-iTthe tue Underjianding obeys the Will, by producing in it felf the Ideas of Things which the Soul de- 
6th chapter fires-, for the Undemanding afts not at all, but only receives Light, or the Ideas of Things, 
of Tan if .through its neceflary Union with Him who comprehends all Beings in an intelligible manner, as 
Boo\ in. j s explained in the * Third Bock. 

Here then is all the Myftery -, Man participates of the Sovereign Reafon, and Truth difplays it 
felf to him proportionably to his Application, and his praying to it. Now the Defire of the Soul 
is a Natural Prayer, that is always heard ; it being a natural Law, that Ideas mould be fo much 
readier, and more prefent to the. Mind, as the Will is more earneft in defiling them. Thus, pro- 
vided our Thinking Capacity, or Underltanding, be not clogg'd and fill'd up by the confus'd Sen- 
faticns we receive occasionally from the Motions occurring in our Body^ we fhould ho fooner de- 
fire to. think on any Objecf, but its Idea would be always prefent to our Mind ; which Idea, Ex- 
perience witneffihg, is fo much more prefent and clear, as our Defire is more importunate, and 
our confus'd Senfations, furnifh'd to us" by the Body, lefs forcible and applicative, as I have faid 
in the foregoing Illuftration. 

Therefore, in faying that the Will commands the Underjianding to reprefent to it fome particu- 
lar ObjoSt, I meant no more than that the Soul, willing to confider that Obje£t with Attention, 
draws near it by her Defire ; becaufe this Defire, confequently to the efficacious Wills of God, 
which are the inviolable Laws of Nature, is the Caufe of the Prefence and Clearnefs of the Idea 
that reprefents the Objecf. I could not at that time fpeak otherwife than I did, nor explain my 
felf as I do at prefent, as having not yet prov'd God thefole Author of our Ideas, and our parti- 
cular Volitions only the occajional Caujes of them. I fpoke according to the common Opinion,, as 
I have been frequently oblig'd to do, becaufe all cannot be faid at once : The Reader ought to be 
equitable, and give Credit for fome time, if lie would have Satisfaction ; for none but Geometric 
cians pay always down in hand. 



THE 

ILL USTR ATION 

UPON THE 

Third CHAPTER of the Firft BOOK; 

Where I fay, 

That Myfteries of Faith being of a Supernatural Order, we need not wonder 
if we want the Evidence, jince we want the Ideas of them. 

'TTTl fell I fay that we have no Ideas of the Myfteries of faith, it is vifible from the foregoing 

W and following Difcourle, that I fpeak but of clear Ideas, which are productive of Light 

and Evidence, and which give us a Comprebenjion of the Objecl, if we may be allow'd fo to fpeak. 

] grant that a Peafant could not believe, for Example, that the Son of God was made Man, or 

that 



The Search after Truth. toy 

that there were Three Perfons in the Godhead, if he had no Idea of the Union of the WORD 
wifih our Humanity, and no Notion of Per/on. But if theie Ideas were clear, we might by con- 
fidering them, perfectly comprehend thefe Myfteries, and explain them to others -, and fo they 
would be no longer ineffable Myfteries. The Word Per/on has, as * St. Auftin fays, been apply 'd * Kc o'mnl- 
•to the Pother, Son and Holy Ghoft, not fo much to exprefs diftinQly what they are, as not to be" tfycre-. 
filent upon a Myftery whereof we are obliged to fpeak. mm '." ter :, 

tres cum trcs cffefatc.imur j S.Aufl. deTrin. lib. 7. cap. 4. And in another place, Cum qwritur quid tres ? Magna prorfm inopia hu- 
lriMum laborat Eloquium. Dittum ejl tamcn tres pcrfoiu non ut Mini diceretur, fei ne taceretur. Ibid. lib. 5. cap. 9. 

I fay here that we have no Ideas of our Myfteries, as I laid elfewhere we have no Idea of our 
Sottl^ becaufe the Idea we have of the latter is no clearer than thole we have of the former : 
Therefore the Word Idea is equivocal •, fometimes I have taken it for whatever reprefents to the 
Mind any Object, whether clearly, or confus'd and darkly -, fometimes more generally, lor what- 
ever is the immediate Object of the Mind • fometimes likewife for that which reprefents Things * C hap. to. 
lb clearly to the Mind, that we may with a bare Perception difcover whether fuch or fuch Modi- Bw{ 1. 
■rations do belong to them. For this Reafon I have fometimes laid we * had an Idea ol the Soul, t See ch,f* 
and ibmetimes deny'd it i t for "tis difficult, and often wearifom and ungrateful to obferve a too B *^. m - 

t a. r • ■> t- n- and us II- 

.vigorous Exactnels in one s Exprethons. luftrarion. 

When an Author contradicts himfelf but in the Opinion of his Criticks, or fuch as would, fain 
have him do ir, he ought not to be much concern'd at it ; and if he would fatisfie by tedious Ex- 
plications whatever the Malice or Ignorance of Men might object to him, he would not only com- 
pofe an ill Book, but all his Readers would be difgufted with the Anfwers he gave to Objections, 
either imaginary, or contrary to that equitable Temper which all the World pretends to ; for a 
Man cannot endure to be fufpected either of Malice or Ignorance •, nor is it allowable to anfwer 
weak or invidious Objections for the raoft part, except when there are Men that have urg'd them, 
and fo have skteen'd the Reader from the Reproach which fuch Anfwers feem to afperfe on thofe 
that demand them. 



THE 

ILLUSTRATION 

On thefe Words of the 

Fifth CHAPTER of the Firft BOOK, 

This being the Cafe, it ought to be concluded that Adam was not invited to 
the Love of God, and the reft of his Duty, by a preventing Fleafure ; for- 
afmuch as the Knowledge which he had of God, as of his Good, and the 
Joy he was continually poffefsd with, neceffarily confequent to the View of 
his felicity in his uniting himfelf with God, were fujfeient Motives to re- 
commend his Duty to him, and to make his A&ions more meritorious than if 
he had been], as it were, determined by a preventing Fleafure, 

IN order to our diftinct underftanding all this, it mull be known that we are determin'd to act: 
from only Knowledge and Pleafure ; for whenever we begin to love an Object, 'tis from our 
difcovering by Reafon that it is good, or feeling by Pleafure that it is agreeable. But there is 
great difference between Knowledge and Pleafure : Knowledge enlightens our Mind, and mani- 
fefts the Good, but does not actually and efficatioufly incline us to the loving it ; whereas Plea- 
fure effectually drives and determines us to love the Object that feems to caufe it. Knowledge, 
or Light, does not induce us of it felf -, but leaving us wholly to our felves, lets us freely deter- 
mine our own Motion to the Good which it prefents : Pleafure, on the contrary, anticipates our 
Reafon, interrupts us from confulting it, leaves us not to our' own Conduct, and weakens our 
Liberty. 

Therefore, as Adam had before his Pall, a Time appointed to merit Eternal Happinefs, and 
had a full and perfect Liberty to that intent -, and as his Light was fufficient to hold him clofe- 
ly united to God, whom he already lov'd by the natural Tendency of his Soul ; he ought not to 
be carry'd to his Duty by preventing Pleasures, which would have lelTen'd his Merit by leiTen- 
ing his Liberty. Adam might have had lome fort of Right to complain of God, if he had hin- 
dered him from meriting his Reward as he ought to do ; that is, by Actions abfolutely free s 

And 



108 F. Maleb&anche Concerning 

Fsrtijfam And it had been a fort of injuring his Free Willy for God to have given him that kind of Grace 
qnifte dt^ -whjch j s at prefent only neceffary to counterpoife the preventing Delights of Concupifcence. 
™amiftt'fa- Whtlft Adam had all neceffary Supplies for his Perfeverance, it had been to fulpect his Venue, 



cere 



qu'yJ and, as it Were, to accuie him of Infidelity, to give him any Prevention : It had been leaving 
vcUet.hu*. him an Occafion of Glorying in himfelf, to have taken away all Senfe of the Wants pofiible 
deCotfupt t0 hetall him, and Infirmities he was obnoxious to -, for I own that as yet he had neither Want 
~*L. ™* nor Weaknefs. Laftly, What is infinitely more confiderable, it had been to render the incarna- 
Sest\x$&tion of JESUS CHRIST indifferent; which certainly was the firft and greatelt Defign of 
Dialogue Him who fuffer'd all Men to be involv'd in Sin, that he might mew them Mercy in JESUS 
£* . rl j e C H R IS T, to the end that he who glories might glory only in the LORD. 
Conventions, towards the End of the Byuffcfs Edition. 

To me therefore it feems undeniable that Adam had no Senfe of Preventing Pleafure * in his Dit- 
ty, but it does not feem equally certain that he had a Senfe of Joy, though I fuppofe it here, as 
believing it highly probable. But to explain my felf : 

There is this Difference between Preventing Pleafure and the Pleafure of Joy, tliat the former 
precedes Reafbn, and the latter follows it ; for Joy naturally refults from the Knowledge one has 
of his own Happineis or Perfections, becaufe he cannot coniider himfelf as happy or perfect, but 
he mult inttantly thereupon feel a certain Joy. As we may be confeions of our Happineis by Plea- 
fure, or dif cover it by Reafon, fo Joy is of two forts •, I fpeak not here of that which is purely /iv?- 
fible, but of that which Adam might have been poffefs'd with, a* neceffanly confequent to the KnotK- 
ledgehe had of his -Happinefs in uniting himfelf with God: And fbme Realbns there are, which 
rndke it doubtful whether he was actually poffeis'd of it. 

The Principal of all is, that his Mind perhaps had been fo taken up with it, that it had rob- 
bed him of his Liberty, and invincibly united him to God ; for 'tis reafonable to believe that this 
Joy ought to be proportion'd to the Happineis which Adam poffefs'd, and confequently exceed- 
ing great. ... 

But in anfwer to this, I fay, Firft, That purely Intel/etfual Joy leaves the Mind to its entire Li- 
berty, and takes up but very little of its Thinking Capacity ; wherein it differs from Senfible Joy, 
which commonly difturbs the Reafon, and leffens the Liberty. 

• I anfwer, Secondly, That the Happineis of Adam at the flrit Inftant of his Creation, did not 
confift in a plenary and entire Pofleltion of the Supreme Good, it being poflible for him to lofe it, 
and become miferable : But herein his Happinefs especially confifted, That he fuffer'd no Evil, and 
was in the good Favour of Him who mult have perfected his Felicity, if he had perievefd in his 
State of Innocency. Thus his Joy was not exceffive ■, nay, it was or ought to have been temper' d 
with an Alloy of Fear, for he ought to have been diffident of himfelf. 

I anfwer, Laftly, That Joy does not always intend the Mind upon the true Caufe that produces 
it : As a Senfe of Joy arifes upon the Contemplation of one's own Perfections, it is natural to be- 
lieve that Prolpecl: is the Caufe' of it ; for when a Thing conftantly follows from another, 'tis na- 
turally look'd upon as one of its Effects. Thus a Man confiders himfelf as the Author of his own 
prefent Happinefs, he finds a fecret Complacency in his Natural Perfections, he loves himfelf and 
thinks not of Him who operates in him in an imperceptible manner. 

'Tis true, Adam more diftinftly knew than the greateft of Philofophers, that God alone was able 
to aft in him, and produce that Senfe of Joy which he felt upon the Confideration of his Happi- 
nefs and Perfections. This he knew clearly by the Light of Reafon, when he attended to it, but 
not by any Senfation ; which, on the contrary, taught him that his Joy was a Conlequence of his 
Perfection, feeing he had the conftant Senfe of it, and that without any Application on his part : 
And fo this Senfation might lead him to coniider his own Perfections, and take pleafure in him- 
felf if he either forgot, or any ways loll fight of Him whofe Operations in us are not of -a fen- 
iible Nature. So far would this Joy have been from rendring him impeccable, as is pretended, 
that, on the contrary, it might probably be the Occafion of his Pride and Fall. And 'tis for this 
Realbn that I fay in this Chapter, that Adam ought to have taken care not to have fuffer'd the Ca- 
pacity of his Mind to be filPd. with a prefumptuo/ts Joy, kindled in his Soul upon Reflexion on hi$ 
own Natural Perfections. 



THE 



The Search after Truth, i op 



THE 

ILLUSTRATION 

UPON THE 

Fifth CHAPTER of the Firft BOOK; 

Where I lay, 
That ? reverting Delight is the Grace of ] E S U S C H R I $ T. 

T Hough I fay in this Chapter, that Preventing Delight is the Grace which JESUS CHR IS T 
has particularly merited for us •, and that I term it elfewhere abfolutely, The Qrace of our 
LORD; yet this is not faid as if there were no other Grace befides this, or as if there were any 
but what He has merited •, but I name it fo, to diftinguifli it from the Grace which GOD gave 
Adam in his Creation, which commonly we call the Grace of the Creator : For the Grace by which 
Adam might have perfever'd in Innocence was chiefly a Grace of Light ? or Knowledge, as I have 
explain'd in the foregoing Reflexion •, becaufe, being free of Concupifcence, he had no need of 
Preventing Pleafures to refill it. 

But the Grace which is at prefent neceffary to fupport us in our Duty, and to beget and keep 
Charity alive in us, is Preventing Delegation : For as Pleafure produces and cherifhes the Love of 
the Things that caufe, or feem to caufe it •, fo Preventing Pleafure s, which Bodies occafwnally ad- 
minifter, produce and maintain in us our Cupidity. So that Cupidity being entirely oppofite to 
Charity, if God did not beget and fuftain in us the Latter by Preventing Delegations, 'tis plain 
that it would be enfeebled by the Preventing Pleafures of Concupifcence, proportionably as Con- 
cupilcence was corroborated by them. 

What I here fay, fuppofes that God leaves our Concupilcence to work in us, and does not 
weaken it by an infus , d Abhorrence to fenfible Objects, which ( as a Refult from Sin ) muft ne- 
ceffarily tempt us. I fpeak of Things according to ordinary procedure : But fuppofing that God 
leffens Concupifcence inftead of increafing Delegable 'Grace, it comes to the fame' thing ; for it 
is plain that a Balance may be put two Ways in xauilibrio, when one of the Scales is too heavy 
burthen'd, either by adding Weight to the oppofite Scale, or retrenching the Excefs of the over- 
weighted. 

Nor do I fuppofe it is impoflible to do any good A£tion, without a Preventing Delegation : Up- 
on which Particular I have explain'd my felf fufficientiy in the Fourth Chapter of the Third Book, 
And it feems too evident to be doubted, that a Man having his Heart poffels'd with the Love of 
God, may by the Strength of his Love, unaflifted with Preventing Delight, give, for inftance, a 
Peny to a poor Man, or patiently futTer fome little Affront. I am perluaded likewife that this De- 
light is not neceffary, except when the Temptation is ftrong, or the Love for God weak. How- 
ever, it may be faid to be abfolutely neceffary to a Righteous Man, whofe Faith might (one would 
think ) be refolute, and his Hope ftrong enough to conquer very violent Temptations ; the Joy or 
f'ore-tafte of Eternal Happinefs being capable of refilling the lenfible Allurements of tranfkory 
Goods. 

'Tis true, Delegation, or AUual Grace, is neceffary to every good Aftion, if by theie Words be 
meant Charity, in which Senfe St. Aufin commonly took them : For 'tis evident, that whatever is 
done without fome Refpecl: or other had to God, is good for nothing. But clearing the Terms of 
Equivocations, and taking Delegation in the Senfe I have given, I cannot fee how what I have laid 
can be call'd in queftion. 

But fee wherein the Difficulty confiits : Pleafure and Love are fuppos'd to be one and the fame 
thing, becaufe feldom apart ; and St. Auftin does not always diftinguifh them : And on this Sup- 
polition they may reafonably fay as they do ; and we may conclude with St. Auftin, ^jtod amplim nos 
deleffat, fecundum id operemur hccejje efl : For certainly we will what we love ; and fo likewile 
it may be faid, that we. cannot perform any good or meritorious Aclion, without Delegation or 
Charity. But I hope to make it appear in the Explanation I lhall make upon the Trafl concerning c!m P- ?• 
the Paffions, that there is as much difference between Pleafure and deliberate or indeliberate Love, Bw ^ v « 
as there is between our Knowledge and our Love, or ( to give a fenfible Representation of this 
Difference ) between the Figure of a Body and its Motion, i 



E e THE 




ji F. Malebranche Concerning 

THE 

ILLUSTRATION 

Upon what I have faid at the Beginning of the 

": Tenth CHAPTER of theFirft BOOK, 

And in the 

Sixth CHAPTER of the Second BO OK, 

CONCERNING 

M E T H O 

"that 'tis 'very difficult to prove the Exijience of Bodies : What we ought 
to Efteem of the Proofs which are brought of their Exiftence. 

"]i yrE N are commonly perfectly ignorant of what they prefume beft to underftand, and have 
JVj. a good Knowledge of other things, whilft they imagine they have not fo much as their 
Ideas. When their Senfes have to do in their Judgments, they fubmit to what they do not 
comprehend •, at leaft to what they know but imperfectly and confufedly. ' And when their Ideas 
are purely intelle&ual, (give me leave to ufe fuch ExpreiTions,) they will hardly admit undenia- 
ble Demonftrations. 

What Notion, for Inftance, have the generality of Men, when we prove to them moft of 
Metaphyfical Truths ; when we demonftrate the Exiftence of a God, the Efficacy of his Will, 
the Immutability of his Decrees : That there is but one God, or true Caufe, that works all in all 
things ; but one Supreme Reafon which all Intelligent Beings participate •, but one neceffary 
Love, which is the Principle of all created Wills ? They think we pronounce Words with- 
out Senfe •, that we have no Ideas of the things advanc'd •, and that we had better fay nothing. 
Metaphyfical Truths and Arguments are not of a fenfible Nature •, they have nothing moving 
and affecf ing, and confequently leave not Conviftion behind them. Neverthelefs, abfiraS Ideas 
are certainly the moft diftincf ; and Metaphyfical Truths the moft clear and evident of all 
other. 

Men fometimes fay they have no Idea of God, nor any Knowledge of his Will, and common- 
ly believe too what they fay •, but 'tis tor want of knowing what they know, it may be, beft : For 
where's the Man that hefitates in anfwering to the Queftion, Whether God is Wife, Juft, or Power- 
ful > Whether he is Divifible, Triangular, Movable, or fubjecf to any kind of Change whatever ? 
Whereas we cannot anlwer Without fcruple,and fear of being miftaken,whether certain Qualities do 
or do not belong to a Subject which we have no Idea of. So again, Who is it dares lay, that God 
a£ts not by the moft. limple Means ? That he is irregular in his Defigns ? That he makes Mon- 
fters by a pofitive, direft, and particular Will, and not by a kind of NeceiTity ? In a word, That 
his Will is, or may be, contrary to ORDER, whereof every Man knows fomething, more or 
lefs : But if a Man had no Idea of the Will of GOD, he might at leaft doubt whether he a£led 
according to certain Laws, which he clearly conceives he is obliged to follow, on Suppofition 
H E will aa. 

Men therefore have the Ideas of things purely Intelligible ; which Ideas are much clearer than 
thofe of fenfible Objects : They are better allured of the Exiftence of a God, than of that of Bo- 
dies ; and when they retire into themfelves, they more clearly difcover certain Wills of God, by 
which he produces and preferves all Beings, than thofe of their beft Friends, or whom they have 
ftudied all their Lives : For the Union of their Mind with God, and that of their Will with his, 
that is, with the Laiv Eternal, or hnmut able Order, is immediate, direcf, and necefTary : whereas 
their Union with fenfible Objecfs, being founded only for the Prefervation of their Life and 
Health, gives them no Knowledge of thefe Obje&s, but as they relate to that Defign. 

'Tis this immediate and direct Union, which is not known, lays St. Aa ft in, but by thofe whofe 
Mind is purified •, that enlightens our moft fecret Reafon, and exhorts and moves us in the inmoft 
Recdfes of our Heart. By this we learn both iheTboaghts and the Wills of God ; that is, Eternal 
Truths and Laws : For no one can doubt but we know fome of them with Evidence. But our 
Union with our choicett Friends teaches us not evidently either what they think, or what they 
will. We think we know right well, but we are moft commonly miftaken, becaufe we receive 
our Information only from their Lips. 

Nor can our Union, which we have through our Senfes, with circumambient Bodies, inftru£t 
us : For the Teftimony of the Senfes is never exacf ly true, but commonly every way falfe, as I 

have 



The Search after Truth. nt 

have made appear in this Treatife ; and 'tis for that Reafon I fay 'tis an harder thing than is be- 
ltev'd, to prove pofitively the Exiftence of Bodies, though our Senfes tell us they exift ; becaufe 
Reafon does not fo readily inform us, as we imagine h and it muft be molt attentively confuked 
to give us a clear Refolve. 

But as Men are more Senfible t\nn Reafonable, fo they more willingly liften to the Verdict of the 
Senfes, than the Teftimony of internal Truth ; and becaufe they have always confuked their Eyes 
to be affur'd of the Exigence of Matter, without troubling their Heads to advife with their Rea- "* 
fon J they are furpriz'd to hear it faid, it is hard to demonftrate it. They think they need but 
open their Eyes, to fee that there are Bodies ; but if this does not take away all fufpicion of II- 
lufion, they believe it abundantly fufficient to come near and handle them 5 after which they can 
hardly conceive we can have any peffible Reafons to make us doubt of their Exigence. 

But if we believe our Eyes, they'll tell us, that Colours are laid upon the furface of Bodies, 
and Light diftus'd in the Air and Sun 5 our Ears make us hear Sounds as undulated in the Air, and 
ecchoing from the ringing Bodies ^ and, if we credit the Report of the other Senfes, Heat will be 
in the Fire, Sweetnefs in the Sugar, Odour in Musk, and all fenhble Qualities in the Bodies 
which feem to exhale or difperfe them. And yet it is certain, from the Reafcns I have given in the 
Firlt Book, concerning the Search after Truth, that thefe Qualities are not out of the Soul that 
feels them, at lealt it is not evident they are in the Bodies that are about us. What Reafon there- 
fore is there, from the Reports of our always-treacherous and delufive Senfes * to conclude, there 
are actually Bodies without us, and that they are like thofe wey^r -, I mean thofe which are the 
immediate Objecf of our Soul, when we behold them with bodily Eyes ? Certainly this does not 
want Difficulty, whatever may be faid of it. 

Farther : If the Exiftence of any Body may be certainly prov'd upon the Teftimony of our 
Senfes, none could have better Pretence than That to which the Soul is immediately united : The 
livelier!: Senfation, and that which feems to have themoft neceffary relation to an acfually-exifting 
Body, is Pain. And yet it often happens that thofe who have loft an Arm feel moft violent Pains 
in it long after it has been cut off. They know well enough they want it, when they confult their 
Memory, or only look upon their Body -, but theSenfe of Pain deceives them : And if, as it often 
happens, they be fuppos'd to have quite forgotten what formerly they were, and to have no other 
Senfes left them than that whereby they feel Pain in their imaginary Arm -, certainly they could 
not be convinced but that they had an Arm in which they felt fo violent torment. 

There have been thofe who have believ'd they had Horns on their Heads ^ others who have ima- 
gine! they were made of Butter, or Glafs, or that their Body was not of the Shape of other Mens, 
but fafhion'd like that of a Cock, a Wol£ or an Ox. But thefe, you'll fay, were mad Men -, and 
I readily believe it. But their Soul was capable of deceiving them about thefe things, and confe- 
quently all other Men may fall into the fame Errours, if they judge of Objects by the Teftimony 
of their Senfes : For it muft be obferv'd, that thefe mad Men actually feel themfelves to be fuch 
as they think they are, and their Errour confifts not in the Senfation they have, but in the Judg- 
ment they make. If they fhould only fay, they felt or Java themfelves like Cocks, they would 
not be deceived : But herein only they deceive themfelves, in that they believe their Body like that 
they feel ; I mean, like that which is the immediate Objecf of their Mind, when they confider it. 
And fo thofe who believe themfelves fuch as they really are, are no more judicious in their Judg- 
ments they make of themfelves than thefe mad Men, if they judge precifely by the Teftimony of 
their Senfes ; but are to thank their Fortune more than their Reafon, if they are not miftaken. 

But at the Bottom, How can we be fure that thofe who go under the Notion of mad Men are 
really what they are taken for > May we not fay they are reckon'd craz'd, becaufe they have pe- 
culiar Sentiments > For 'tis evident, that a Man is not reckon'd mad for having the Senfe of what 
is not, but only for having a Senfe of things quite contrary to that of others, whether their Senfe 
be true or falfe, right or wrong. 

A Clown, for Example, having his Eyes fo difpos'd as to fee the Moon juft fuch as fhe is, or only 
foas fhe is beheld, or fbmetime may -be hereafter, with new-invented Glaifes looks on her with Ad- 
miration, and cries to his Companions, What high Mountains and deep Valleys, what Seas, and The Moon 
Lakes, and Gulphs, and Rocks, do I behold ! See, fays he, what a vaft Sea lies all along the when be- 
Eaft, whilft nothing but Land and Mountains extend from Weft to South I Don't you fee on the ^%,?* th 
fame hand a Mountain higher than ever we beheld ? And don't you wonder to fee a Sea all over iookfmudi 
black, and an huge dreadful Gulph in the middle of the Planet > What would his Fellows an- like what 
fwer to fuch Exclamations > Or what would they think of him ? Certainly, that he was Mad, is here re- 
or Lunatick, and diftemper'd by the malign Influences of the Planet he beholds and admires : For P reiented ' 
no Man has the fame Notions, and that's enough. Thus to be mad in the Opinion of others, 
there's no need to be really fo, but only to have Thoughts and Senfation different from them : 
For if all Men fhould believe themfelves to be Cocks, he that maintain'd he had an humane 
Shape would certainly go for a Fool or a Mad Man. 

But you'll fay, Has a Man a Beak at the end of his Nofe, and a Comb upon his Head > I fup- 
pofe not ; but I don't know fo much, when I judge only by my Senfes, and know not how to put 
them to their proper ufe. In vain fhall I try by handling my Head and Face •, for I feel my own 
Body, and thofe about me, but with Hands whole length and figure I don't know. Nay I can- 
not be certainly affur'd whether I have truly Hands or not ; for that which makes me think I have, 
is, that at the time that I feem to move them, there happen fome Motions in a particular part 
of my Brain, which, in the vulgar Notion, is the Seat of the Common Senfe. But it may be I 

have 



in F. Malebranche Concerning 

have not that Part which is fo generally talk'd of, and fo little known -, at leaft I am notfenfb/e of 
this, though I feel my Hands •, fo that I have more right to believe 1 have Hands than that little 
Gland which is ftill daily difputed againft. But, Laflly, I know neither the Figure nor Motions 
of this Gland, and yet I am allured, that by them only I can be inftrufted in the Figure and 
Motion of my own Body, and thofe that are round about me. 

Well rhen, What are we oblig'd to conclude from all this ? Why, that 'tis not a Body that can 
give Light to Reafon -, that the Part to which the Soul is immediately united, is neither vifiblenor 
intelligible of it felf -, that neither our own nor furrounding Bodies can be the immediate Objeft 
•of our Mind -, that we cannot learn from our Brain fo much, as whether it aQually exifts, much 
lefs whether there are circumambient Bodies : That therefore we are to fly to the Exiltence of 
ibmefuperiour Intelligence, who alone is capable of afring in us, in fuch a manner as to give a 
real Reprefentation of external Bodies, without giving us any Idea of our Brain, though theMo- 
tions produe'd in it ferve as an Occafwn to this Intelligent Being, to difcover thefe Bodies tojis : 
For, infhort, we fee with Eyes, whofe Figure we do not know, what is the Figure of external 
Bodies ; and though the Colours which appear on Objects, are no livelier than thofe which are 
painted on the Optick Nerve, thefe are quite hid from us, whillt we 'admire the Splendour of 
the other. 

But after all, Under what Obligation is an Intelligent Being to mew us Bodies upon fome Mo- 
tions happening in our Brain ? Again, What Neceflity is there of external Bodies for him to 
ftir up thefe Motions in our Brain ? Do not Sleep, Paflions, and Madnels, produce thefe Mo- 
tions, though external Bodies do not contribute to them ? Is it evident, that Bodies incapable of 
'fsee ch.$. moving one another, * mould communicate to thofe they ftrike, a moving Force which they have 
Part ii. of not i n themfelves ? But grant that Bodies move themfelves, and thofe they ftrike againit ; can 
wkh V £he we tnence infer, that he who gives Being to all things cannot immediately by himfelf ftir up in 
illuftrati- our Brain the Motions to which the Ideas of our Mind are connected > Lafily, Where's the 
en. Contradiction, that our Soul mould receive new Ideas whilft our Brain remains without new Mo- 

tions ; fince it is certain the latter do not produce the former, fince we have no Knowledge of 
f Seech. 6. thefe Motions, and that God alone can reprefent to us our Ideas, t as I have elfewhere proved. 
Boll in °* Therefore 'tis abfolutely neceffary (pofitively to be allured of the Exiftence of external Bodies) to 
with its' ii- know God who gives us theSenfation of them ; and to know, that, becaufe he is infinitely per- 
iuftration. fecf , he cannot deceive us. For if the Intelligence, who furnifhes us with the Ideas of all 
things, would, as I may fay, divert himfelf, by reprefenting Bodies as actually exifting, whilft there 
,was nothing of them, it is plain he could eafily do it. 

For thefe, or the like Reafons, M. des Cartes, refolving to eftablifh his Philofophy on im- 
movable Foundations, thought he had no right to fuppofe the Exiftence of Bodies, nor to prove 
them by fenfible Arguments, though highly convincing with the common part of Mankind. Un- 
doubtedly he knew as well as we, that he needed but open his Eyes to lee Bodies, and to draw 
•near and handle them, to be fatisfied whether his Eyes abufed him in their Reports. He well 
enough knew the Mind of Man, to judge that fuch like Proofs had been acceptable and welcome : 
But he did not feek iox fenfible Probabilities, nor vain and popular Applaufes-, preferring deipis'd 
Truth before the Glory of an unmerited Reputation -, and chufing rather to render himfelf ridicu- 
lous to little Souls, by Doubts, thought by them extravagant, than to affert what he thought 
not certain and undeniable. 

But though M. des Cartes has given the ftrongeft Arguments that bare Reafon could furnifh out 
for the Exiftence of Bodies ; though it be evident, that God is no Deceiver, and it may be laid 
he would really deceive us, did we deceive our felves, whilft we made a due ufe of our Mind, 
and the other Faculties, whereof he is the Author •, yet it may be affirmed, that the Exiftence of 
Matter is not yet perfectly demonftrated : For, in fine, in point of Philofophy, we are to believe 
nothing till the Evidence of it obliges us ; but to make ufe of our Liberty as much as we can, 
giving no greater Extent to our Judgments than our Perceptions. Wherefore, when we lee Bo- 
dies, we mould judge only that we lee them, and that thefe vifible or intelligible Bodies actually 
exift. But why muft we judge pofitively there is a Material World ^without us, like the Intelli- 
gible World we perceive ? 

But, fay you, we fee thefe Bodies without us, and likewife very remote from that we animate : 
We may then judge they are without us, and yet our Judgments reach no farther than our Per- 
ceptions. But what ? Don't we fee Light without us, and in the Sun, though it be not in it ? 
But be it fo : Bodies that we fee without us are really without us ; for indeed it is not to be deny'd. 
But is it not evident that there are Outneffes, and RemoteneJJes, and intelligible Spaces in the in- 
telligible World, which is the immediate Objeft of our Mind ? The material Body which we 
annnate (oblerve it well) is not the fame we fee when we behold it, I mean when we turn our 
corporeal Eyes upon it, but an intelligible Body -, and there are intelligible Spaces between this in- 
telligible Body and the intelligible Sun we fee, as there are material Spaces between our Body and 
the Sun which we behold. Certainly God ordain'd Spaces between Bodies which he created, but 
he neither fees thefe Bodies nor thele Spaces by themfelves ; he can only fee them by Bodies and 
Spaces intellectual : God derives no Knowledge but from himfelf ; he fees not the material World, 
lave in the intelligible World which he comprehends, and in the Knowledge he has of his own 
Will, which gives actually Exiftence and Motion to all things. Therefore there are intelligible 
Spaces between the intelligible Bodies which we immediately fee, as there are material Spaces be- 
tween Bodies which our Eyes behold. 

Now 



Ybe Search after Truth. \\o 



\ Now it ought to be obferv'd, that: as there is none but God who knows his Will by himfelf, which 
produces all Beings :, it is impoflible to know from any other, whether there be actually without us 
a material World like that we fee; becaufe the material World is neither Vifible, nor Intelligible of 
it felf. Therefore to be fully convinced of the Exiftence of Bodies, it is not only neceflary to de- 
monstrate there is a God, and that he is no Deceiver •, but alfo that this God has aftur'd us there is 
iuch a World actually created : Which thing I find wanting in M. des Cartels Woiks. 

God fpeaks to the Mind, and obliges it to afient but two feveral ways. By Evidence and Faith. 
1 acknowledge that Faith obliges us to believe the Exiftence of Bodies : But as to Evidence, me- 
thinks it wants fomething to be perfect •, and that we are not invincibly carry'd to believe there is 
any thing Exifling befides God and our own Mind. 'Tis true, we have an extream propenfion to be- 
lieve there are filch things, as circumambient Bodies • So far I agree with M. des Cartes. But this 
Propenfion however natural, does not evidently force us ; but only perfwafively induce us, by the 
impreflion. But we ought only to form our Free Judgments, as Light and Evidence oblige us : for 
if we leave our felves to the guidance of fenfible Impreflions, we /"hall feldom or ever be unmiftaken. 
- For how comes it that we erre in the Judgments we make about feniible Qualities, about the 
Magnitude, Figure,and Motion of Bodies,but from our following an lmprejfion like that which indu- 
ces us to believe the Exiftence of Bodies ? Do not wefenfibly perceive the Fire to be hot, Snow to be' 
white, and the Sun to be all glorious with a radiating Light ? Do not we fee that fenfible Qualities 
nolefsjthan Bodies are without us ? And yet 'tis certain, that the former winch we fee without 
us are not really fo •, or if you had rather, there is no certainty about it. What Reafon then have 
we, to judge, that befides intelligible Bodies which we fee there are others that we. beheld. Or what 
Evidence can a Man have, that an Impreflion, not only delufive, in refpect of feniible Qualities, 
but alfo in regard to the Magnitude, Figure, and Motion of Bodies, -mould not be as treacherous 
in refpect to the actual Exiftence of the Bodies themfelves : I ask, what Evidence can a Man have ? 
For as to Probabilities I grant they are not wanting. 

I know very well there's this Difference between fenfible Qualities^ and Bodies ; that Reafon 
much eafier corrects the Impreflion, or natural Judgments which relate to fenfible Qualities, than 
thofe which concern the Exiftence of Bodies : and likewife that all the cOtre&ions made by Reafon, 
with reference to fenfible Qualities, perfectly comport with Religion, and Chriftian Morality, and 
that we cannot deny the Exiftence of Bodies, through a Principle of Religion. 

'Tis eafie to conceive that Pleafure, and Pain, Heat, and even Colours, are not Modes ofcoYpo- 
real Exiftence ; that fenfible Qualities in general are not contain'd in the Idea we have of Matter. 
In a Word, that our Senfes do not reprefent fenfible Objects, as they are in their own nature, but 
as_.they are with reference to the prefervation of our Health and Life ; which is conformable, not 
only to Reafon, but much more to Religion, and Chriftian Morality ; as has been evidene'd in fe- 
veral places of this Treatife. • 

. But 'tis not fo eafie to be pofitively afcertain'd of the Non-exiftence of External Bodies, as it is 
to be pofitively convine'd, that Pain and Heat are not in the Bodies which feem to caufe them in us. 
'Tis moft certain, at leaft, that there's a poffibility of outward Bodies : We have no Argument to 
prove there are none , and we have a very ftrong inclination to believe there are; and there- 
fore we have more reafon to conclude for the Exiftence than the Non-exiftence of them ; and confe-. 
quentiy it feems that we ought to believe they are. For we are naturally inclin'd to follow our na- 
tural Judgment fo long as it's not pofitively corrigible by Light and Evidence. For every natural 
Judgment coming from God may be rightly feconded by our free Judgments, when God furnifhes 
us not with means to manifeft its falfity •, And if on fuch occafions we miftake, the Author of our 
Mind may feem in a manner to be the Author of our Errors and Delinquencies. 

This Reafoning is, poflibly, good : though it muft be acknowledg'd that it ought not to go for 
an Evident Demonftration of the Exiftence of Bodies: For indeed God does not irrefiftibly force 
us to confent to it •, if we give our confent, it is a free act , and we may with-hold it if we pleafe j 
If this arguing I have made be juft, we are to believe it highly probable, that there are Bodies ; 
but this bare Argumentation alone ought not to give us a plenary Conviction and Acquiefcence ; 
otherwife, it is we our felves that act, and not God in us-; it being by a free ad, and confequently 
liable to Error, that we confent^ and not by ah invincible Impreflion : for we believe it freely be- 
caufe we will, and not becaufe we fee any obliging Evidence. 

Surely nothing but Faith can convince us of the actual Exiftence of Bodies : We can have no 
exact Demonftration of any other Being's Exiftence, than the neceflary : and if we warily confider 
it^ we fhall find it even impoflible to know with perfect Evidence, whether GOD is, or is not 
the Creatour of a Material, and fenfible World ; for no fuch Evidence is to be met with, except in 
neceflary Relations, which are not to be found betwixt G O D, and fuch a World as this. It was 
poflible for him not to have created it : If he has made it, it is becaufe he wiWd it, and freely 
will'd it. 

The Saints in Heaven fee by an evident Light, That the F A T H E R begets the SON, and 
that the HO LY GHOST proceeds from the FATHER and the SON; for thefe are ne- 
ceflaryEmanations : But theWorld being no neceflaryEmanation from6' O D 3 thofe who moft clear- 
ly fee his Being, fee not evidently his External Productions. Nevertbeiefs I am perfwaded, that 
the Blcfled are certain of the World's Exiftence ■„ but 'tis bejcaufe GOD aflures them of it, by ma- 
nifefting his Will to them, in a manner by us unknown ; and we on Earth are certain too : but 'tis 
becaufe Faith obliges us to believe, That GOD has created this World ; and that this Faith is 

F f conformable 



1 1 4. F. Ma lebranche Concerning 

' 

conformable to our natural Judgments, or our compound Senfetions, when they are confirm'd bf 
all our Senfes, corrected by our Memory, and redtify'd by our Reafon. 

1 confefs, that at firft fight the Proof or Principle of our Faith feems to fuppofe the Exigence 
of Bodies : Fides ex auditu. It feems to fuppofe Prophets, Apoftles, Sacred- Writ and Miracles ; 
but if we clofely examine it, we (hall find, that in fuppofing but the Appearances of Men, Prophets, 
Apoftles, Holy Scripture, Miracles, &c. what we have learn'd from thefe fuppofVd Appearances, 
Sands undeniably certain ; fince, as 1 have prov'd in'feveral places of this Work, GOD only 
can reprefent to the Mind thefe pretended Appearances ; and He is no Deceiver. For Faith 
fuppofes all this, Now in the Appearance of Holy Scripture, and by the Seemingnefs of Miracles, 
we learn, That GO D has created an Heaven and an Earth, that the Word is made Fiejf), and other 
fuch like Truths, which fuppofe the Exiftence of a created World. Therefore Faith verifies the 
Exiftence of Bodies ; and ah thefe Appearances are a&mMy fabfianiiatedby it. 'Tis needlefs toin- 
. lift longer upon anfwering an Objection, which feems too abftracted for the common part of Men ; 
and Ibelieve that this will be enough to fatisfie thofe who pretend not to be over-difficult. 

From all which we are to conclude, That we both may, and ought to correct our Natural Judg- 
ments, or compound Perceptions, which relate to the fenfible Qualities, we attribute to the Bodies 
that furround us, of to That w'e animate. But as for natural Judgments, which relate to the actu- 
al Exiitence of Bodies ; though abfolutely, we are not oblig'd to form free ones to accord with 
them ; yet we ought not to fuperfede doing it,becaufe thefe natural Judgments agree perfectly with 
Faith. 

Finally, J have made this Explanation, chiefly to the intent we may ferioufiy reflect upon this 
Truth ; That nothing but Eternal Wifdomcan enlighten us, and that ail fenfible Notices, wherein 
our Body is concerned, are fallacious ; at leaft are not attended with that Light, which we feel our 
felves oblig'd to fubmit.to. I am fenfible that thefe Notions will not pafs with the common fort of 
Men ; and that as they are difpos'd by the Superfluity, or Poverty of their Animal Spirits, they 
will either ridicule, or flinch at the Reafonings I have laid down. For the Imagination cannot en- 
dure abftraft and urn ordinary Truths : but either confiders them as ghaftly Spectres, or ridiculous 
Phantafms ; But I chufe rather to be the Subject of Droll, and Raillery for the ftrong and bold Ima- 
gination, and the Object of Indignation, and Fear to the weak and timorous -, than to be wanting 
in what 1 owe to Truth, and to thofe generous Defenders of the Mind againffc the Efforts of the 
Body, who know how to diftinguifh the Refponfes of illuminating Wifdom, from the confus'd 
Noifeof the perplexing, and erroneous Imagination. 



ILLUS T R ATION 

UPON THE 

Fifth CHAPTER of the Second BOOK. 

Of the Memory^ and Spiritual Habits. 

I Had no mind to fpeak in this Chapter of the Memory, and fpiritual Habits, for feveral Rea- 
fons ; the chief of which is, That we have no clear Idea of our Soul. For how can we clearly 
explain what are the Difpofitions which the Operations of the Soul leave in her ; fwhich Dif- 
pofitions are herHabits)whilft we have no clearKnowledge of theNature of our Soul? 'Tis plain 
that 'tis impoffible to know diltinctly the Changes, whereof a Being is capable, when we have no 
diftinct Knowledge of the Nature of that Being. For if, for Inftance, we had no clear Idea of Ex- 
tenfion, in vain mould we endeavour to difcover its Figures. However, fince I am defir'd to fpeak 
of a Matter which I know not in it felf :, fee what a compafs 1 fetch, that I may only keep to clear 
Idea's. 

I fuppofe that there's none but God who acts upon the Mind, and reprefents to it the Idea's of all 
things } and that if the Mind perceive any Object by a very clear and diftinct Idea, 'tis becaufe God 
reprefents that Idea in a moft perfect manner. 

1 farther fuppofe, that the Will of God being entirely conformable to. O R D E R, and Juftice, 
we need but to have a Right to any thing, to obtain it. The Suppofitions being laid down, which 
are eafily conceiv'd, the Spiritual Memory is readily explained. For Order requiring, that Spirits, 
which have frequently thought of any Object, Ihould more eafily think again upon ir, and have a 
more clear and lively Idea of it, than thofe who have but feldom confider'd it } The Will of God, 
which continually operates by Order, reprefents to their VJnderftanding, as often as defir'd, the 
clear and lively Idea of that Object. So that according to this Explication, the Memory, and other 
Habits of pure Intelligences, confifts not in an Eafinefs of operating, which refults from any Modifica- 
tions of their Being; but in the immutable Order of God, and in a Right the Mind obtains to thofe 
things, which have been already fubmitted to it. And all the Power of the Mind immediatelty and 

folely 



The Search after Truth. I {% 

folcly depends on God alone « the force. or facility of ading, which all Creatures have in their O- 
perations, being in this Sencebut the efficacious Will of the Creatour. 

Nor do I think we are oblig'd to give up this Explication, by reafon of the evil Habits of Sinners" 
and damn'd Perfons. For tho' God does all that is Real, and Pofitive in the Aftions of Sinners it 
is evident, by what I have faid in thefirfi Illuflration, that he is not the Author of Sin. 

Neverthelefs I believe, as I think I ought, that after the Aclion of the Soul, there remain fome 
Changes which difpofe it to that fame Action again. But as I know them not, fo I cannot explain 
them • for I have no clear Idea of my own Mind, wherein to difcover all the Modifications it is 
capable of. I believe by Theological, and not clear and evident Proofs ; that the Reafon of pure Seethe ll 
Intelligences feeing the Objeas they have before confider'd, more diftinftly than others, is not meer- luxation" 
ly becaufe God reprefents them in a livelier and perfe&er manner ; but becaufe they are really upon the 
moi e difpos'd to receive the fame A&ion of God in them. Jnft as the facility of playing on an Or- 7th cha P- 
gan, which fome have acquir'd, proceeds not from any greater Force and Aftion, which the Ani- ^oTm' 
mal Spirits (that areneceflary to the Motion of the Fingers) have in them, than in other Alen: but 
from the Smoothnefs, and Glibnefs which the Paflages of the Animal Spirits have gotten by Exer- 
cife, as in this Chapter is explain'd : But yet I grant the life of Memory, and the other Habits is 
unneceffary in thofe, who being perfectly united to God, find in his Light , all forts of Idea's ; and 
in his Wilt, all the facility of afting that can be defired. 



I LLUST R AT ION 

U P O N T H E 

Seventh CHAPTER of the Second BOOK. 

A Reduction of the Proofs and Explications I have given of Original Sin : 
Together with the Anjwer to the Objections, that I thought moft urgent. 

IN order to anfwer methodically to the Difficulties that may arife, touching Original Sin, and 
its manner of Derivation from Fathers to Children ; I thought fit to exhibit in few words,what 
I have faid on that Subjedt, in feveral places of the foregoing Treatife. Here follow my prin- 
cipal Proofs, which I have difpofed after a particular fafhion, to make them more fenfibleto 
thofe that will confider them. 

I. 
God voills Order in his Works. What we clearly conceive to be agreeable to Order, God wills * 
and what we conceive clearly to be repugnant to It, God wills not : which is a Truth, manifeft to 
all thofe who can confider the infinitely perfect Being, with a Heady and clear'd View. Nothing 
can unfix, or trouble their profpeft of this Truth ; whilft they clearly fee, that all the Difficulties 
that can be raifed againft this Principle, proceed but from the Ignorance of thofe things which are 
necefTary to be known to folve them. 

II. 
God has no other End in his Operations, than himfelf ; this Order demands. 

III- 

God creates, and preferves the Mind of Man to be taken up with him, to know and to love him « 
as being himfelf the End of his own Works •, Order will have it fo. God cannot will, that a Being 
fhould love what is not amiable- or rather,. He cannot will, that what is lefs amiable, fhould be 
more beloved. Therefore 'tis evident that Nature is corrupted, and in Diforder, fince the Mind 
loves Bodies that are not amiable, and that commonly more than God. Original Sin, then, or the 
Corruption of Nature, needs no Proof: For every one finds plain enough in himfelf a Law, which 
captivates and diforders him ; a Law that is not given by Cod, fince it is contrary to Order, by 
which His Will is governed. 

Neverthelefs Man before his Fall, was admonilhed by preventing Sen rations ; and not by clear 
Knowledge, whether he ought to unite to, or feparate from the encompaffing Bodies ; Order re- 
quired it. 'Tis a Diforder, that the Mind fhould be oblig'd to apply it felf to them : for though 
it may be united to them, it is not made for them. It ought therefore to have Knowledge of God^ 
and Senfe of Bodies. Again ; whereas Bodies are incapable of being the Good of the Mind, it 
would with Regret and Pain, unite to them, if it knew them to be only what they are, without be- 
ing fenfible of fomething in them, which is not. Wherefore the Counterfeit Good ought to be dif- 
cerned by a preventing Senfation, that it may be lord with a Love of Irtftindt. ; and the True Good 
ought to be known by a clear Knowledge, that it may be lov'd with a rational Love, and a Love of 
Choice. Lafily, Man being made, and preferved by God, to know, and love him ; ought not to 

have 



1 6 F. MalbbranChe Concerning 

have the Capacity of his Mind either pofTefs'd, or lhar'd in fpight of him, with the Knowledge of 
the infinite Figures, and Configurations of Bodies about him, or of that he animates-, and yet to 
know by a clear Knowledge, Whether fuch a Fruit, at fuch a Seafon, be fit for Nourifliment of his 
Body, maniieftly requires the Intelligence of fo many things, and the making fo many Argumen- 
tations, as would quite fill up the molt comprehenfive of created Minds. 

V. 

But though the firft Man was advertis'd by preventing Senfations , Whether he ought, or ought 
not to mak? ufe of furrounding Bodies, yet he was not mov'd by involuntary, and rebellions 
Paffions ; and he obliterated outof his Mind the Idea's of fenfible things, when he pleas'd, whe- 
ther r s'd them or not ; becaufe Order would have it fo. The Mind may be united to a Body, 

but it Ihould command it, and not depend on it. Again, All the Love which God invefts us with, 
ought to terminate on him, becaufe he produces nothing in us but what is for himfelf. Lafily, Bo- 
dies ate not amiable ; but below what within us is capable of loving. Therefore in the firft Inflitu- 
tion of Nature, Bodies could not turn our Mind towards them, nor incline it to con'fider them, 
and love them, as its Goods. 

VI. 

The Bodies about us aft not on our Soul, fave when they produce fome Motions in our Body, and 
that thefe Motions are communicated to the principal Part of our Brain. For it is by the Changes 
which happen in this Part, that the Soul changes her felf, and finds her felf mov'd by fenfible Ob- 
jects. This 1 have fufficiently prov'd, and Experience demonftrates the fame. Which being fup- 
pos'd, it is clear, from the preceding Article, that Adam ftopt.when he pleas'd, the Motions 
communicated to his Body, at leaft thofe communicated to the principal part of his Brain : Order 
wiWd it fo ; and confequently He whofe Will always conforms to Order, and who can do nothing a- 
gainlt It though He be Almighty. Thus Man might, on certain Occafions, fufpend the Natural Law 
of the Communication of Motions, feeing he was not tainted with Concupifence, nor did he feel in 
himfelf any involuntary and rebellious Motions. 

VII. 

But Adam loft that Power by finning ; Order would have it fo .• for it is not reafonable, that 
in Favour of a Sinner, and a Rebel, there Ihould be any other Exceptions, to the general Law of the 
Communication of Motions, than what are abfolutely neceflary to the Prefervation of our Life and 
Civil Society. Therefore the Body of Man being continually fliaken, by the Action of fenfible 
Objects, and his Soul agitated by all the Concuflions of the principal part of his Brain, he is be- 
come a dependent on the Body, to which he was only united, and over which he had a Sovereign- 
ty before his Fall. 

VIII., 

Let us fee now how the firft Man was capable of finning. It is natural to love Pleafure, and to 
taft it ; and this was not forbidden Adam. The Cafe is the fame with joy : one may rejoice at 
the fight of his Natural Perfections •, That is not evil in it felf. Man was made to be happy, and 
'tis Pleafure and Joy which actually beatific and content : Adam therefore tailed PleafoVe in the 
ufe of fenfible Goods •, and he felt a Joy upori viewing his own Perfections : For 'tis impoflible to 
confider ones felf, as happy, or perfect, and not be pofTefs'd with it. He felt no fuch Pleafure in 
his Duty -, for though he knew God was his Good, it was not in a fenfible way ; as I have prov'd 
in feveral places. So the Joy he might find in his Duty, was not very fenfible • which being fup- 
pos'd, we conclude, That whereas the firft tJWan had not an infinite Capacity of Mind, his Plea- 
fure, or his Joy weakned its clear fight, which gave him to know, That God was his Good, and 
that he ought only to love him. For Pleafure is in the Soul, and the Modification of it ; and 
therefore fills up our Capacity of Thought, proportionably as it affect and works onus: this is a 
thing which we learn by Experience, or rather from that inward Senfation we have of our felves. 
We may then conceive, That the firft Man having infenfibly fuffer'd the Capacity of his Mind, to 
be pofTefs'd, or divided, by the lively Senfe of a prefumptuous Joy, or, it may be, fome Love, or 
fenfible Pleafure ; thePrefence of God r and the Confideration of his Duty were eras'd from his 
Mind, for neglecting couragioufly to purfue his Light in the Search of his True Good : fo this Di- 
ffraction made him capable of falling. For his principal Grace and ftrength was his Light, and the 
clear Knowledge of his Duty ; forafmuch as then he had no need of preventing Delights, which 
are now neceflary to oppofe to Concupi fence. 

IX. i 

And it muft be obferv'd, that neither the preventing Senfe of Pleafure, which Adam felt in the 
ufe of the Goods of the Body, nor the Joy that pofTefs'd him, when reflecting on his own Happi- 
. nefs or Perfection, was the true Caufe of his Fall ; for he knew very well, that none but God 
could give him rhatSenfeof Pleafure or Joy : and fo he in Duty ihould have lov'd him only, for- 
afmuch as none merits our Love, fave the true Caufe of our Felicity. As nothing pertui bated his 
Knowledge and Light, whilft he ftrove to keep it pure and incorrupt ; fo he might, and ought to 
have expung'd from his Mind, thofe Senfations which divided it, and which endanger'd its falling 
off, and lofing fight of him, who ftrengthened, and enlightned it. He ought to have well re- 
membred, that if God offer'd himfelf not to his Senfe, but only his Vnderftanding, as his Good, 
ft was to afford him a readier way to merit his Reward, by a continual Exercife of his Liberty. 

Suppofing then, That Adam and Eve have finn'd, and confequently thereupon felt in themfelves 

involuntary 



iThe Search after Truth, %\j 

involuhtafy and rebellious Motions - I fay, That their Children muft needs be born Sinners, and 
•fubjed, as they were, to Motions of Concupifcencc. See my Reafons for it* 

X. 

I have prov'd at large, in the Chapter that occafion-'d this Difcourfe, that there is fuch a Com- 
munication between the Brain of the Mother, and that of the Child, that all the Motions and 
Traces excited in the former, are ftirr'd up in the latter. Therefore as the Soul of the Mantis 
united to its Body, at the very inftant of its Creation, it being the Conformation of the Body, which 
obliges Gcd, in confequence of his general Will, to inform it with a Soul h 'tis plain, that at the 
very moment of this Soul's Creation, it has corrupt Inclinations, and turns towards the Body : 
finceithas, from that fame moment, Inclinations anfwerable to the Motions that are adually in 
the Brain it is united to. 

XI. 
But becaufe it is a Diforder, That the Mind fhould propend to Bodies, and expend its Love up- 
on them } the Infant is a Sinner, and in Diforder, as foon as out of the Hands of his Maker. God 
who is the Lover of Order, hates him in this Estate ; notwithstanding his Sin is not free and eligi- 
ble. But his Mother conceiv'd him in Iniquity, becaufe of the Communication eftablifh'd by the 
Order of Nature, betwixt her Brain, and the Brain of her Infant. 

XII. 
Now this Communication is very good in its Institution, for feveral Reafons. Firfi, Becaufe ufe- 
ful, and it maybe, necefTary to the Conformation of the Foetus. Secondly, Becaufe the Infant, by 
this means, might have fome Inteicourfe with his Parents ; k being but reafonable, that he mould 
know, to whom he was oblig'd for his Body, which he animated. Lafily, Ke could not, but 
by help of this Communication, know external Occurrences, and think of them, as he mould do. 
Having a Body, 'twas fit he fhould have Thoughts relating to it, and not be hood-wink'd to the 
Works of God, amongft which he liv'd. There are, likely, many other Reafons for this Com- 
munication than thofe I have given ; but thefe are sufficient to juftifie it, and to cover His Condud 
from Genfure and Reproach, every Will of whom is neceflarily conformable to ORDER. 

♦XIII, 

However, there is noReafon, that the Infant, in fpight of his Will, fhould receive the Traces 
of fenfible Objeds. If the Souls of Children were cteated but one moment before they were uni- 
ted to their Bodies ; if they were but an instant in a State of Innocence and Order , they would 
have plenary Right and Power, from the neceffity of Order, or of the Eternal Law, to fufpend. 
that Communication : juft as the fir/l Man, before his Sin, ftopt when he pleas'd the Motions 
which arofe in him^ Order requiring, That the Body fhould be obedient to the Mind. But where- 
as the Souls of Children were never well-pleafing to God ^ it was never reafonable, that God on 
their behalf fhould difpence with the Law of the Communication of Motions ^ and fo it is juft that 
Infants fhould be born Sinners, and in Diforder. And the Order of Nature, which is juft, and 
equitable, was not the Caufe of their Sin ; but the Sin of their Progenitors. In which fence it is 
not juft and reafonable, that a finful Father fhould procreate Children perfeder than himfelF, or 
that they fhould have a Dominion over their Bodies, which their Mother has not over her own. . 

XlV. 
,'Tistrue, That after the Sin oi Adam, which ruin'd and corrupted all things, God might by 
changing fomethingin the Order of Nature, have remedied the Difoider which that Sin had caus'd. 
But God changes not his Will in that 'manner : He wills nothing but what is juft, and what He once 
wills, He ever wills. He never corrects himfelf, nor repents of what he does •, but his Will is con- 
stant and immutable. His Eternal Decrees depends not on the inconstant Will of Man, nor is it v 
juft they fhould be submitted to it. 

XV. 

But if it may be permitted to dive into the Councels of the Almighty, and to fpeak our Thoughts 
upon the Motives, which might determine him to eftab'lifh the Order now explain'd, and permit 
the Sin of Adam ; I can't fee how we can conceive a Notion more worthy the Greatnefs of God, 
and more confonant to Reafon and Religion, than to believe his principal Defign in his External 
Operations, was the Incarnation of his SON, That God eftablilh'd the Order of Nature, See the 5. 
and permitted the Diforder which befel it , to help forward his Great Work ; that D l a]o P^n. 
He permitted all Men to be fubjed to ,Sm,that none might glory in himfelf^ and fufxet'&Concupifcence ° an C c ^~„ 
in the Perfedeft, and Holiest of Men, left they fhould take a vain Complacency in their own Per- f at io„. 
fons. For upon confidering the Perfection of one's Being, 'tis difficult to defpife it, unlefs, at the Aug.ih 
fame time, we contemplate, and love the Supreme Good \ before whom all our Perfedion and 5M. lib.61 
Greatnefs diflblves, and falls to nothing. > cap. 3. 

I own, That Concupifunce may be the occafion of our Merit, and that 'tis most juft the Mind 
fhould for a Seafon follow Order with Pain and Difficulty, that it may merit to be eternally fubjed 
to it with Eafe and Pleafure. I grant, That upon that'Profp^d God might have permitted Con- 
cupifcence, when he forefaw the Sin. But Comupifcence not being abfolutely necefTary to our Merit- 
ing, if God permitted it, it was, That Man might be.able to do no good, without the Aids which 
JESUS CHRIST has merited for him : and that he might not glory in his own strength. 
For 'tis vifible, That a Man cannot encounter and conquer himfelf, unlefs animated by the Spirit 

G e tif ' 



n8 F. MaLebranche Concerning 

of Chrift, who, as Head of the Faithful, infpires them with quite oppofite Sentiments to thofe o£ 
Concupifcence, derived to them from the Original Man. 

XVI. 
Suppofing then, That Infants are born with Concupifcence, 'tis plain they are effeftively Sinners, 
fince their Heart is fet upon Bodies as much as it is capable : there is as yet "in their Will but one. 
Love, and that diforder'd and corrupt • and fo they have nothing in them that can be the Qbjeft 
of the Love of God, becaufe he cannot love Diforder. 

XVII. 

But when they have been regenerated in JESUS CHRIST, that is, when their Heart has 
been converted to God, either by an actual Motion of Love, or by an internal Difpofition, like that 
which remains after an Aft of Loving God : then Concupifcence is no more a Sin in them, becaufe it 
does not folely poffefs the Heart, nor domineer any longer in it. Habitual Love, which remains 
in them, through the Grace of Baptifm in our L O R D, is more free, or more ffcrong than that 
which is in them through the Contagion of Concupifcence deriv'd from Adam. They are like the 
Juft, who in their Sleep obey the Motions of Concupifcence, yet lofe not the Grace of their Baptifm, 
becaule their Confent to thefe Motions is involunta: y. . 

XVIII. 
It fhould not be thought ftrange, That I believe it poflible for Children to love God with a Love 
of Choice, at the time of their Baptifm. For fince the Second Adam is contrary to the Firfi, why 
mould he not, at the tim.e of Regeneration, deliver Children from the Servitude of their Body, 
whereunto they are fubjefted by the Firjl ? That being enlightned and quickned by a lively and 
efficacious Grace, to the loving of God, they may love him with a free and rational Lfve, without 
being obflruftedby the firfi Adam. You fay, it is not obfervable, that their Body for a moment 
leaves afting on the Mind ; But is that fuch a Wonder, that we can't fee what is not vifible ? One. 
fingle Inftant is fufficient for the Exercife of that Aft of Love : And as it may be perform'd in the 
Soul, without imprinting any Footfteps in the Brain, 'tis no more to be admir'd, that the Adult 
in their Baptifm do not always mind it ; for we have no Memory of things which are not regift- 
red in the Traces of the Brain. 

XIX. 
St. Paul teaches us,That the Old Man, or Concupifcence, is crucify ? d with JESUS CHRIST,' 
and that we are dead and buried with him by Baptifm. What means this, but that then we are 
deliver'd from the Warring of the Body again]} the Mind, and that Concupiscence is as it were Morti- 
fy'd in that moment : 'Tis true it revives ; but having been deftroy'd, and thereby left Children in 
a State of loving God, it can do them no harm by its reviving. For when there are two Loves in 
the Heart, a Natural, and a Free, Order will, that the Free be only refpefted. But if Infants ia 
Baptifm lov'd God by an Aft in no wife free, and afterwards lov'd Bodies by many Afts of the 
fame Species ; God could not perhaps, according to Order, have more refpeft to one fingle Aft, 
thantomany, which were all natural, and without Liberty. Or rather, if their contrary Loves 
were equal in force, he mnft have refpeft to that which was laft ; by the fame Reafon, that when 
there has been fucceffively in an Heart Two Free-Loves contrary to each other, God has always re-: 
fpeft to the Laft, fince Grace is deftroy'd by any one Mortal Sin. 

XX. 
Neverthelefs, it cannot be deny'd, but God may juftifiethe Infant, without interrupting the 
Dominion of his Body over his Mind ; or convert his Will towards him, bydepofiting in his Soul 
a Difpofition like that, which remains after an Aftual Motion of our Loving God. But that way 
of afting, I doubt, feems lefs Natural than the Other •, for it cannot clearly be conceiv'd what 
thefe remaining Difpofitions can be. 'Tis true, that ought not to be much admir'd • fince having 
Panii of noc ^ ar ^4 ea °f °nr Soul, as I have elfewhere prov'd, we need not wonder if we know not all the 
Bookii. Modifications it is capable of. But the Mind cannot be fully fatisfied upon things, which it does 
with toll" not clearly conceive ; and without recourfe to an extraordinary Miracle, we cannot fee what can 
lufcration? give the Soul thefe Difpofitions, without a preceding Ail : furely it cannot be done by jways that 
feem moft plain and fimple. Whereas the fecond Adam afting on the baptized Infant's Mind for one 
moment, the contrary to what the firfi Adam product in it before, Regeneration is perform'd by 
the ufual ways of afting which God takes in his fanftifying the Adult: For the Infant, at that 
moment, being void of Senfations and Paffions, which divide its Thinking and Willing Capacity, 
has nothing to encumber it, and prevent its knowing and loving its true Good. This is all I fay 
at prefent, becaufe it is not neceffary to know precifeIy,how Regeneration of Infants is perform'd ; 
provided we admit in them a true Regeneration, or an inward and real Juffcification, caus'd by 
Afts, or at leaft by Habits of Faith, Hope, and Charity. My offering an Explication, fo repug- 
nant to Prejudices, isdefign'd for the Satisfaction of thofe, who will not allow of Spiritual Habits, 
and to prove to them the Poffibility of the Regeneration of Infants : For the Notion of Imputa- 
tion feems to me to include a manifcflrContradiftion ; it being impoflible, That God fhould con- 
fider his Creatures as Righteous, and aftually love them, whilft they are aftually in Diforder and 
Corruption. Though he may for his S O N's fake have a Defign to re-inftate them in O R D E R, 
and love them when re-inftated- 

OBJECTS 



The Search after Truth. i $ o 



OBJECTIONS 

Againft the 

Proofs and Explications of Original Sin. 

' ■'- - ■ ■ ■ ■ ' — - » 

OBJECTION againft the fir ft Article. 

GO D wills Order, it is true :, but 'tis his Will that makes it : it does not fuppofe it : What- 
ever God wills is in Order purely for this Reafon that God wills it : If God wills that At every 
Minds mould befubjeft to Bodies, mould love and fear them, there is no diforder in all ° b J eftion 
this. If God will'd that two times two mould not be four, we mould not fpeak falfe, SeArti- 
in faying two times two were not four .• For it would be a Truth. God is the Principle of all deicis 
Truth : and the Matter of all Order : he fuppofes nothing ; neither Truth, nor Order : but makes made a " 
all. gainfo 

ANSWER. 

Then all is thrown in Confufion. There is no longer any Science nor Morality, nor undeniable 
Proofs of our Religion. Which confequence is evident to any Man who clearly comprehends this 
falfe Principle -, That God produces Order and Truth by a Will abfolutely Free. But this is not to 
anfwer it. 

I Anfwer then that God can neither do nor will any thing without knowledge-, that therefore his 
Will fuppofes fomething ; but what it fuppofes is nothing of a created nature, Order, Truth, Eternal 
Wifdom, is the Exemplar of all the Works of God : which Wifdom is not made ; God who makes 
all things never made it, though he conftantly begets it by the necefllty of his Being. 

Whatever God wills is in Order, for that fole reafon, that he wills it : No body denies it. But 
this is becaufe God cannot aft againft himfelf, that is, his Wifdom and his Knowledge. He is at 
liberty not to produce any External Work: but fuppofing he will aft ^ he cannot aft other- 
ways than by the immutable order of his Wifdom, which he necefTarily Loves. Hor Religion and 
Reafon teach me that he works nothing without his SON, without his WORD, without his 
WISDOM. Therefore I fear not to affirm, that God cannot pofitively will that the mindfbould be 
fubjetl to the Body. Becaufe that Wifdom, whereby God wills, whatever he wills, makes me clear- 
ly underftand it is contrary to Order : And I fee this clearly in that fame Wifdom ; becaufe it is the 
Soveraign and llniverfal Reafon, which is participated by all Spirits, for which all Intelligences are 
created, and by which all Men are Reafonable. For no Man is his own Reafon, Light, and Wifdom j 
unlefs it be when his Reafon is Particular, his Light, an Ignis" fatuus, and his Wifdom Folly. 
. . As the Generality of Men know not diftinftly that it is only Eternal Wifdom which enlightens 
them \ and that Intelligible Ideas which are the Immediate objeft of their Mind, are not created j 
fo they imagine, that Eternal Laws and Immutable Truths, receive their Eftablifhment from a free 
will of God. And this is what occafion'd M. des Cartes to fay,that God was able to effeft that twice 
four mould not be eight ; and that the three Angles of a Triangle mould not be equal to twoRights. 
Becaufe there is no Order, fays he, no Law, no Reafon, Goodnefs or Truth, but depends on God, and 
that is he who from all Eternity , has ordairfd and eftabliftfd, as fupreme Legiftator, 'Eternal Truths, ^"^f 1 "^ 
This Learned Man did not obferve that there was an Order, a Law, a Sovereign Reafon Coeternal obwtion 
with God, and necefTarily lov'd by him, and accordingly to which he mull necefTarily aft, fuppo- againfthis 
fing he will aft. For God is indifferent as to his External Workings , but the manner of his work- Meditatir 
ing, though he be perfectly free, is not indifferent to him. He always afts in the wifeft and perfeft- ons - Art - 
eft manner poffible : he conftantly follows immutable, and necefTary Order. Thus God is at liber- 6 " Art " 8 * 
ty not to make either Spirits , or Bodies, but if he creates thefe two Kinds of Beings, he muft See the II- 
create them by the fimpleft ways, and fituate them in the moft perfeft Order. He may for Exam- lu f" tratI ° n 
pie unite Spirits to Bodies, but 1 maintain that he cannot fub]e& them thereunto, unlefs in purfuance ^hcLp. 
of the Order which he always follows, the Sin of Spirits obliges him to ufe them in that manner : of Pan 11. 
as I have already explain'd in the feventh Article , and in the firft Explication towards the end. Book ill. 

To anticipate fome inftances that might be urg'd againft me, I think it necefTary to fay that Men 
are to blame to confult themfelves when they would know what God can do or will. They are 
notto judge of his wills by the inward fenfe they have of their own Inclinations. Eor otherwise 
they would often make him an unjuft, cruel, finful,infteadof an Almighty God. They ought to lay 
slide the generalPrinciple of theirPrejudices,which difpofes them to judge of all things with reference 
to themfelves, and not- to attribute to God what they do not clearly conceive to be included in the 
Idea of a Being infinitely perfeft. For they ought not to judge of things fave by clear Ideas. And 

then 



ISO - F. Malebranche Concerning 

then the God they worfhip, will not be like thofe of Antiquity, Cruel, Adulterous, Voluptious, 
as tbePerfons who have imagin'd them : nor will he referable the God of fome Chriftians, who to 
make him ds powerful as the Sinner wifb.es him, afcribe to him an a&ual power of a&irig againit all 
Order, of leaving Sin unpunifhf, and of condemning to eternal Torments Perfons never fo righteous 
and Innocent. 

Second OBJECTION againft the Fir ft Article. 

If God wills Order, what is it that makes Monfters, I fay not amongft Men ; for they have fin- 
ned, but amongft Animals and Plants ? What is the caufe of the general corruption of the Air 
which breeds fo many Difeafes ? By what Order is it that the Seafons are fo irregular, and that the 
Sun and the Froft burn upand kill the Fruits of the Earth? Is it to aft with Wifdom and Order, to 
furnim an Animal with parts quiteufelefs, and to congeal the Fruits after they are perfectly form- 
ed ? Is not this rather becaufeGod does what he pleafes,and that his power fuperfedes all Order and 
Rule? For to mention things of greater Importance than the Fruits of the Earth, wherewith he 
may do as he fees good : the Clay whereof God makes Vcftfels of wrath, is the fame with that which 
he fafhions Feffels of Mercy. 

ANSWER. 

Thefe are the difficulties which ferve only to obfeure the Truth, as proceeding from the dark- 
nefs of the Mind. We know that God is juffc : we fee that the wicked are Happy : ought we to 
deny what wee fee ; ought we to doubt of what we know, becaufe we may poffibly be fo ftupid as not 
to know, and fo Libertine as not to believe what Religion teaches us of future Torments ? So we 
know that God is Wife •, and all that he does is Good •, mean while we fee Monfters, or defective 
Works. Whatare we to believe that God is out of bis aim, or that thefe Monfters are not his 
handiwork? Certainly if we have fence and conftancy of Mind, we fhall believe neither the one 
nor the other. For 'tis manifeft that God does all, and that whatever he does is as perfect as 
. poffible, with relation to the fimplicity and fewnefs of the means heimploys, in the Formation 
of his Work. We mull hold faft to what we fee, and not quit our ground for any difficulties im- 
poffible to be refolv'd 5 when our Ignorance is the caufe of that Impoffibility. If Ignorance muffc 
raife Difficulties, and fuch like Difficulties overthrow the beft eftablifht Opinions, what will re« 
main certain among Men who know not ail things ? What ? Shall not the brighteft Lights be able 
to difperfe the leaftDarknefs ; and fhall any little fhadow Eclipfe thecleareft and the liveliellLight ? 

But though the anfwering fuch fort of Difficulties might be difpene'd with, without Prejudice 
to the fore-eftablifnt Principle :, yet it is not amifs to (how they are not unanfwerable. For the Mind 
of Man is fo unjuft in its Judgments, that it may poffibly prefer the Opinions which feem to refult 
from thefe imaginary Difficulties, before certain Truths, which no Man can doubt of, but becaufe 
he will', and with thatdefign ceafes to examine them, I fay then that God wilisorder, though there 
are Monfters; and 'tis moreover becaufe God wills order, that there are Monfters ; and this is my 
reafon. . 

Order requires that the Laws of nature whereby God produces th3t infinite Variety, foconfpi- 
cuousinthe World, fhould be very fimple, and very few in number. Now 'tis the limpficity of 
thefe general Laws, which in fome particular Juncture^, and becaufe of the Difpofition of the fub- 
ject , produces irregular Motions, or rather Monftrous Combinations: and confequently 
God's willing order is the caufe of thefe Monfters. Thus God does not pofitively or directly will th& 
Exiftence of Monfters : but he pofitively wills certain Laws of the Communication cf Motions, 
whereof Monfters are the neceflary confequences ; becaufe thefe Laws, though of a moft fimple 
kind, aremeverthelefs capable of producing that variety of forms which can't be fufficiently ad- 
mired. 

For Example : In confequence of the general Laws of the Communication of Motiens, there are 
fome Bodies which are driven near the Centre of the Earth. The Body of a Man, or an Animal 
is one of thefe .• that which upholds him in the Air breaks under his Feet : isitjuft, or according 
to Order /hatGod fhould change his general Will,for that particular Cafe ? Surely it ieems not pro- 
bable. That Animal therefore muft neceffarily break, or maim its Body. And thus we ought to 
argue about the generation of Monfters. 

ORDER requires that all Beings fhould have what's necefiary to their Prefcrvation, and the 
Propagation of the Species ; provided this may be done by moSi fimple Means, and worthy the Wif- 
dom of God. And fo we fee that Animals, as alfo Plants have general Means to preferve them- 
felves, and to continue their Species : and if fome Animals fail thereof, in fome particular Occa- 
fions, 'tis becaufe thefe general Laws, whereby they were form'd, reach not thefe private Emer- 
gencies, becaufe they refpecr. not Animals feparately, but generally extend to all Beings ; and thac 
the Good of the Publick muft be preferr'd before Particular Advantages. 

'Tis evident, That if God made but one Animal, it would not be Monftrous : But Order would 
require, That he fhould not make that Animal by the fame Laws that he at prefent forms all o- 
thers • for the Adion of God muft be proportion^ to his Defign. By the Laws of Nature he de- 
figns not the making one Animal , but a whole World ; and he muft make it by the fimplicfl Means, 
asOrJerrequires, 'Tis enough then that the World be not monftrous, or that the general Effe&s be 
fuitableto the general Laws, to vindicate the Work of Gcd from Cenfure and Reproach, 

If 



The Search after Truths lit 

If, for all particular Changes, God had inftituted fo many particular Laws ; or if He had con- 
jlitpred in 1 every Being a particular Nature or Principle, of all the Motions that arrive in it ; I con- 
feis it would be hard to julBfie his Wifdom again ft fo viiible Difordejs. Wi; inould perhaps be 
forc'd to confefs, either that God wills :.ot 0*der, or that he knows not how, or is not able to re- 
difie Diforder. For, in fliort, it feeras co me impoffible to afcribe an almoft infinite Number of 
fecond Canfes, of natural Forces, Vermes, Qualities and Faculties, to what we call the Sports a n d 
Disorders of Nature, with a Salvo to the infinite Power and Wifdom of the Author of all thing 

OBJECTION againfi the Second Article. 

GOD can never ad for Himfelf. A wife Being will do nothing ufelefs; but whatever God 
fliould do for himfelf, would be ufelefs • becaufe he wants nothing. God wills nothing for him-- 
felf, if by theNeceffity of his Elfence he has al'l the Perfection he can. defire. And if God defires 
nothing for himfelf, he works nothing for himfelf, fince he works only by the Efficacy of his Will. 
The Nature of Good, is to be communicative and diffufive • 'tis to be ufeful to others, and not to 
it felf; 'tis to feek out ; 'tis, if it be poffible, to create, Perfons whom it may make. happy.There- 
fore it is a Contradiction, for God, who is eilentially and foprcmely good, toad for himfelf. 

A'NSWER. 

GOD may be faid to aft for himfelf two ways; either with intent to derive fome Advantage 
from what he does ; or to the end, his Creature may find its Happinefs and Perfection in him. I 
inquire not, atprefent, whether God ads for himfelf, in the firftfenfe; and whether to receive 
an Honour worthy of himfelf, he has made, and reftor'd all things by his SON, in whom, ac- 
cording to the Scripture, all things fubftft. I only affert, that God cannot create, and preferve 
Spirits, in order to know, and love created Beings. 'Tis an Immutable, Eternal, and neceffary 
Law. That they fhould know, and love God; as I have explain'd in the Third Article. Thus 
this Objection does not impugn my Principle, but, on the contrary, corroborates it : and if it be 
certain, that 'tis the Nature of Good to difleminate, and communicate it felf abroad, (for I Hand 
not to examine that Axiome) 'tis evident, That God being eifentially and fupreamly Good, it is 
no Contradiction he fhould ad in the Sencel intended. 

' OBJECTION agakft the Fourth Article. 

Ignorance being a Conference of Sin, Adam before his Fall had a perfect Knowledge of the Na- 
ture of his own Body, and of thofe he livM amongft : He mult, for Example, have been perfect- 
ly acquainted with the Nature of all Animals, to give them, as he did, fuch Names as agreed to 
them. 

ANSWER. 

'Tis a Miftake : Ignorance is neither an Evil, nor a Confequence of Sin. 'Tis Errour or Blind- 
nefs.of Mind, which is both one, and the other. None but God knows all things without any 
Shadow of Ignorance ; Ignorance is incident to the brighter!, and molt enlightned Intelligences. 
Whatever is finite cannot comprehend Infinity : and thus there is no Spirit that can comprehend \ 
only all the Proper ties of Triangles; Adam knew, the firft minute of his Creation, whatever was 
requifite he mould know, and nothing more •, and. it was to no purpofe for him to know exactly the 
Difpofition of all the Parts of his Body, and of thofe he madeufe of: the Reafons are to be feen in 
this Article, and elfewhere. 

The Impofition of Names, in Scripture, rather denotes the Authority than the perfed Knowledge And calls 
of the Impofer. As the Lord of Heaven had made Adam the Lord of Earth, he conceded him the them dlby 
Privilege of giving Names to the Animals, as he himfelf had done to the Stars,. 'Tis evident,That T ^ elrmm ^ 
Sounds, or Words, neither have, nor can have any natural relation to the things they fignifie ; let ' 47 " 
the Divine Ylato, and the Myflerious Pythagoras fay what they pleafe of it. One might perhaps ex- 
plain the Nature of an Horfe, or an Oxe, in an entire Book, but a Word is not a Book : and it's 
ridiculous to imagine, That Monofyllables, as Sus, which in Hebrew fignifies a Horfe, and Schor, 
which fignifies an Oxe, fhould reprefent the Nature of thefe Animals. Notwithstanding there is 
great probability thefe Names were impos'd by Adam, fince they are found in Gene/is : the Author Ch a P- *° 
whereof allures us, That the Names which Adam gave the Creatures were the fame which were in I9 ' 
ufe in his time; for I cannot fee what elfe can be meant by thefe Words, Omne quod vocavit Adam > 
anima v'wentis, ipfum eft nomen ejus. And whatfoever Adam call'd every living Creature, that 
was the Name thereof. 

But I grant that Adam gave Names to Animals, which have fome reference to their Nature, and 
I fubferibe to the Learned Etymologies that an Author of this Age. gives us of them. I will that he 
call'd domeftick Animals Behemoth, becaufe of their keeping filence; the Ram Ajil, becaufe he is 
ftrong ; the Buck Sair, becaufe fwift ; the Hog Chazjr, becaufe of his little Eyes ; the Afs Cha- 

H h mor f 



i £2 F. Malebrancjhe Concerning 

mor, becaufe in the Eaft Country red AfTes are common. But I cant conceive that any more is 
requlfite, than to op-n the Eyes to know if a Buck be fwift, an Afs red, and whether a Hog has 
little or great Eyest Adam calls by the Name of 'Belt and Behemah, what we term a Brute, or a 
great domeftick Creature, becaufe thefe Beafts are mute and ftupid. What fhould we thence con- 
clude? That he knew oerfectly their Nature? That is not evident : I fhould rather beapprehen- 
five, left it mould be thence concluded, That Adam, being fimple enough to put a Queftion to an 
Oxe, as being the largeib cf domeftick Animals, and'wondring that he could not anfwer him, de- 
fpis'd him, and nam'd by a Term of Contempt, Beir and Behemab. 

Second OBJECTION aga'mftthe Fourth Article, 

Some preventing Senfations are incommodious and painful : Adam was juft and innocent, and 
confequently ought not to feel the fmart of them. He ought then on all occafions to be guided 
by Reafon and Knowledge, and not by preventing Senfations, like thofe we have at prefent. 

-ANSWER. - . 

1 confefs there are preventing Senfations, which are difagreeable and painful, but they never 
occafion'd any Fain in the firft Man ;■ becaufe in the inftant they gave him any, he, by an Act of his 
Will, withftood the !mpreffion v and, in the very inftant of that Volition, he ceas'd to be touch'd 
with it. Thefe Senfations did only refpe&fully caution him what ought to be done, or omitted ; 
and did not incommode his Felicity : They but made him fenfibl'e that be was capable of lofing it - 
and that he who made him Happy, could punifli and make him miferable, if he faifd in his Fide- 
lity. 

But to perfwade our felves, that the firft Man was never overtaken with the Senfe of any lively 
Pain, we need but confider thefe two things. Firft, that Pain is very light, when the Motions it 
is annex'd to are very languid •, becaufe it is always proportion'd to the force of the Motions, that 
are communicated to the chief part of the Brain. Secondly, That is of the Nature of Motion, to 
include a SucceJJion of Time -, and it cannot be violent at the firft inftant of its Communication. 
Which being fpppos'd, it is plain, that the firft Man never felt a violent furprizing Pain, that was 
capable to make him miferable •, becaufe he could put a ftop to the Motions that caus'd it. But if 
fo be, he could effectually ftop them, at the firft inftant of their Action, there is no doubt but he 
would do it, fince he was always defirous of Happinefs ; and that Averfion is naturally conjoin'd 
to the Senfe of Pain. 

Adam therefore never fuffer'd any violent Pain ; but I think we are not oblig'd to fay, that he 
never felt any light and inconfiderable fmart, fuch as is that when we taft a fpwre Fruit, fuppofing- 
it to be ripe. His Felicity had been very tender, if fo little a thing had been able to.di.fh irb it. 
For fuch Delicacy is a fign of Weaknefs : for how can that Joy and Plealure be fubftantial, that 
. fuch a Trifle can diffolve and annihilate ? Pain never truly molefts our Happinefs but when it is 
involuntary, and poffeffes us in fpight of our Refiftance. JESUS CHRIST was happy, 
though on the Crofs, in the midft of his Groans, and Agonies,becaufe he fuffered nothing, but what 
he was willing to undergo. Thus Adam fuffering nothing againft his will, it cannot be faid we 
make him unhappy before his Sin, in fuppofing him admonifh'd by preventing, but refpe&ful, and 
fubmiffive Senfations, of what he ought to avoid, for the prefervation of his Life. 

OBJECTION againft the Fifth Article. 

Adam felt preventing Pleafures : But thefe are involuntary Motions ; Therefore Adam was 
agitated with involuntary Motions. 

ANSWER. 

I Anfwer that Adam's, Senfations preceded his Reafon, the proofs I have fhown for it in the 
Fourth Article. But 1 deny that they preceded bis Will ; or that they ftirr'd up in it any parti- 
cular Motions. For Adam was willingly admonifh'd by thefe Senfations, what he ought to do for 
the prefervation of his Life : But he was never willing to be perturbated by them in fpight of 
his VVtll. For that's a Contradiction. Moreover, when he dejtr'd to apply himfelf to the contem- 
plation of Truth, without any diftra&ion of Thought, hisSenfes and his Paffions kept an intire Si- 
lence. Order would it fhould be fo -, |br that's a necefTary fequel of that abfolute power he had 
over his Body. 

Sec the II- I anfwer fecondly, that it is not true, that the Pleafure of the Soul is the fame thing with its 
luftmion Motion, and its Love. Pleafure and Love are modes of the Souls Exiftence. But Pleafure has no 
upon the neceilary relation to the objeft that feems tocaufe it ; and Love is neceffarily related unto Good. 
lookv!' plea f ure is t0 . thc Soul wnat Fi £ we is to Body: and Motion is to Body what Love is to the Soul. 
But the Motion of a Body is very different from its Figure. I grant that the Soul which has a.con- 
ftantPropenfitytoGood, advances, as I may fay, more readily towards it, when mitigated by a 

fenfe 



The Search after Truth. j 2? 



fenfe of Pleafure, that when difcourag'd by her flittering Pain ; as a Body when driven ru,.i eafief 
along if it have a Spherical, than if if have a Cubical Figure. But the figure of a Body differs 
from its Motion, and it m,iy be Spherical, and yet remain at reft. 'Tis true in this cafe it goes 
not with Spirits as with Bodies ; thole cannot feel a Pleafure but they mu.ft be in motion : becaufe 
God who only makes, and prefewes them for himfelf, drives them perpetually on towards good. 
But that doesnbt prove that the pleafure of the Soul, is the fame thing as its Motion: For two 
things, though differing from each other, may yet be always found inseparably together. 

I anfwer laftly, that although pleafure were not different from the Love or Motion of the Soul, 
yet that which the firft Man felt in the ufe of the goods of the Body, did not incline him to the 
Loving Bodies. 'Tis true, Pleafure carries theSoul towards the cbjedt, that caufes it in her, But 
it is not the Fruit that we eat with Pleafure, which caufes the Pleafure in us. Not Bodies but God 
only can a£t upon the Soul, and in any manner make it happy. And vte are in an Error to think 
that Bodies have in them, what we feel occafionally from their prefence. Adam before his Sin be- 
ing not fo flupid as to imagine, that Bodies were the caufes of his Pleafures, was not carry'd to 
the love of them, by the motions that accompany'd his Pleafures. Jf pleafure contributed to the 
fall of the firft Man, it was not by working in him what at prefent it does in us :, But only by fill- 
ing up or dividing his capacity of Thought, ic effae'd or diminiftfd in his Mind the prefence of 
his true good, and of his Duty. 

OBJECTION againft the fixth Article. 

What likeiyhood is there that the immutable Will of God had a dependance on the will of Man, 
and that on Adam's behalf there were exceptions made to the generalLaw of the Communication of" 
Motions. 

ANSWER. 

At leaft it is not evident but fuch exception might be made ^now it is evidentthat immutable or- 
der requires the fubjecYion of the Body to the Mind : and 'tis a contradiction for God not to love, 
and will order-, * for God neceflarily loves his Sun. Therefore it was neceffary before the Sin or Inthe . 
the firft Man, that exceptions fhould be made in his favour to the general Law of the Gomrauni- ^ llul ^ ati - 
cation of Motions. This feems it may be of a too abftradted nature : Here then isfomewhat of a the^ature 
more fenfible kind. of ideas, 

I fball more particularly explain what is Order, and why God neceflarily loves it. 

Man though a Sinner has the power of moving and flopping his Arm when he pleafes. There- 
fore according to the different Volitions of Man, the Animal Spirits are determin'd to the railing, 
or flopping fome Motions in his Body ; which certainly cannnot be perform'd by the general Law 
of the Communication of Motions. If then the will of God be flill fnbmitted to our own : why 
might it not be fubmitted to the will of Adam! If for the good of the Body, and of civil Society, 
God flops the communication of motions in Sinners, why would he not do the like in favour of a 
Righteous Man, for the good of his Soul, and for the prefervation of the Union and Society 
with his God for whom only he was made. As God will have no Society with Sinners, fo af- 
ter the Sin he depriv'd them of the power they had to fequefter themfelves , as it were , 
from the Body to unite themfelves with him. But he has left them the Power of flopping or chang- 
ing the communication of Motions, with reference to the prefervation of Life, and erf Civil So- 
ciety. Becaufe he was not willing to deftroy his Work ; having before the conftructionof ic, de- 
creed according to St. Paul, to re-eflablifh and renew it in Jefus Chrifi. 

OBJECTION againft the Seventh Article. 

Man in his prefent ftate conveys his Body all manner of ways : he moves at pleafure all the 
parts of it, which are neceffary to be mov'd for the profecution, and fhunning of fenfible good and 
'evil: and confequently he flops or changes every moment the natural communication of motions, 
not only for trifles, and things of little importance, but alfo for things ufelefs to Life and civil 
Society, and even for Crimes, which violate Society, fhorten Life, and difhonour God all manner 
of ways. God wills order, it is true: But will order have the laws of motions violated for the 
fake of Evil, and kept inviolable on the account of Good. Whymuft Man lofe the power of flop- 
ping the motions which fenfible objects produce in his Body, fince thefe Motions keep him from 
doing good, from repairing to God, and returning to his duty ? and yet retain the power of do- 
ing fo much evil, by his Tongue and his Arm, and other parts of his Body, whofe motions de- 
pend upon his will ? 

ANSWER. 

To the anfwering this Objeftion it muffc be confider'd, that Man having fin'd ought to have re- • 
fcnrn'd to his Original nothing. For being no longer in Oder, nor able to retrieve it, he ought r J ch r 5 ia . 

Iogue of Cbriftian Converfations. 
* to 



i^\ F. Malebranche Concerning 

to ceafe to Exift. God loves only order, the Sinner is not in order, and therefore hot in the 
Love of God. The Sinner therefore cannot fubfift, fince the fubfiftence of Creatures depends on 
the will of the Creator •, but he wills not that they fhould exift: if he does not love them. The 
Sinner cannot by himfelf regain loft order, becaufe he cannot juftifie himfelf, and all that he can 
fuffes- cannot atone for his offence. He muft then be reduc'd to nothing. But as it is unreafonable 
to think that God makes a Work to annihilate it, or to let it fall into a ftate worfe than annihila- 
tion, 'tis evident that God would not have made Man, nor permitted his Sin,, which he forefaw, 
unlefs he had had in view the Incarnation of his Son-, in whom all things fubfift, and by whom the 
"Univerfc receives a Beauty, a Perfection, and greatnefs worthy of the Wifdom and the Power of 
its Author. 

Man, then, may be confider'd after his Sin withouta Reftorer, but under the Expectation of one. 1 
In considering him without a Reftorer, we plainly fee he ought to have no Society with God ; that 
that he»is unable of himfelf to make the leaft .approaches to him ; that God muft needs repel him, 
and feverely ufe him, when he offers to leave the Body to unite himfelf to him : that is to fay, 
that Man after the Sin muft lofe the power of getting clear of fenilble impreffions, and motions 
•* bf concupjfcence. He ought Hkewife to be annihilated, for the forern.enuon'd Reafons. But he 
expects a Reftorer, and if we conlider him under that Expectation, we Tee ckarly that he muft fub- 
fift. He and his Pojterity, whence his Reftorer is to arife • and thu^ it is necefiafty tnat M an a f Ce r 
his Sin preierve ftill the power of diverfely moving all thofe parts of the body,, whofe motion 
may be ferviceable to his Prefervation. < 

'Tistrue that Men abufe daily the power they have of producing certain motions ; and that 
their power of moving their tongue for Example, feverai ways, is the .cauie of innumerable Evils. 
But if it be minded, that power will appear abfolutely necelfary to keep up Society, to comtOrt 
one another in the Exigences of thU prefent Life, and to inftruct them in Religion, which affords 
hope of a Redeemer :, for whom the World fubfifts. If we carefully examine what are the mo-* 
tions we produce in us, and in what parts of our Body we can affect them, we fhall clearly fee that 
God has left us the power of our Body no farther than is neceflary to the prefervation of Life, and 
the cherifhing and upholding civil Society. For example, the Beating of the Heart, the Dilatation, 
of the Midriff, the periftaltick motion of the Guts, the Circulation of the Spirits, and Bloody 
and the diverfe motions of the Nerves in the Paffions, are produc'd in us without ftaying for the 
order of the Soul. As they ought to be much what the fame on all occafions, nothing obliges 
God to fubmit them now to the will of Man. But the motions of the Mufcles imploy'd in ftir- 
ricg the Tongue, the Arms, and Legs, being to change every minute, according to the almoffc 
infinite diverfky of good, or evil Objects all about us, it was necelfary thefe motions fhould de- 
pend on the will of Men. 

But we are to remember, That God acts always by the fimpleft ways: and that the Laws of 
Nature ought to be general •, and that fo, God having given us the power of moving our Arm 
and Tongue, he ought not to take away that of fhiking a Man unjuflly, or of flandering or re- 
proaching him. For if our natural Faculties depended on our Dcfigns, there would be no Uni- 
formity nor ceitain Rule in the Laws of Nature : which however muft be moft fimpie and general,' 
to be anfwerable to th^ Wifdom of God, and iuitable to Order. So that God, in purfuance of his 
Decrees, chufes rathetf to caufe the Materiality of Sin, as fay the Divines, or to make ufe of the 
Injuftice of Men, as fays one of the Prophets, than by changing his Will to put a ftop to the Dis- 
orders of Sinners. But he defers his revenging the injurious Treatment, which they give him, till 
the time when it fhall be permitted him to do it, without fwerving from his immutable Decrees ; 
that is to fay,when Death having corrupted the Body of thevoluptuous,God fhall be freed from the 
neceflity he has impos'd on hiriifelf, of giving them Senfations and Thoughts relating to it. 

OBJECTION againjr the Eleventh and Twelfth Articles. 

Original Sin not only enflaves Man to his Body, and fubjects him to the Motions of Concupi- 
fcence, but likewife fills him with Vices wholly Spiritual : not only the Body of the Infant before 
Baptifm being corrupted, but alfo his Soul, and all his Faculties ftain'd and infected with Sin. 
Though theRebellion of the Body be the principle of fome grofTerVices,fuch as Intemperance and Vn- 
clcannefs, yet it is not the Caufe of Vices purely Spiritual, as are Tride and Envj. And therefore 
Original Sin is fomething very different from Concupifcence,vihich is born with us : and is more likely 
the Privation of Grace, or of Original Righteoufnefs. 

ANSWER. 

I acknowledge, That Children are void of Original Righteoufnefs ; and I prove it, in mewing," 
That they are not born upright, and that God hates them. For methinks one cannot give a 
clearer Idea of Righteoufnefs and Vprightnefs, than to fay a Will is upright- when it loves Cod , and 
that it is crooked and perverfe when it draws towards Bodies. But if by Righteoufnefs, or Original 
Grace, we unnderfland fome unknown Qualities, like thofe which God is faid to have infus'd into 
the Heart of the firft Man, to adorn him, and render him pleafing in his fight ; it is ftill evident, 
that the Privation of this is not Original Sin ; for to fpeak properly, that Priyation is not heredi- 
tarily 



The Search after Truth. 125 



iarily tranfmitted. If Children have not thefe Qualities, 'tis becaufe God does not give 'em them ; 
and if God does not beftow them, 'tis becaufe they are unworthy to receive them :. and 'tis that 
Vmortbincfs ivhich is tranfmitted, and which is the Caufb of the Privation of Original Right eoufnefs: 
And fo that! Vmvorthincfs is properly Original Sin. 

Now this Unworthinefs, (which confiits, as I have (hewn, in this : That the Inclinations of 
Children are actually corrupt, and their Heart bent upon the Love of Bodies j ) this, I fay, is 
really in them. 'Tis not thi Imputation of the Sin of their Father ; they are actually themfelves in 
a diforder'd State. In like manner as thofe who are juftify'd by J E S U S C H R I S T, of whom 
Adam was the Type, are not juftify'd by Imputation : But are really reflor'd to Order, by an in- 
wardRighteoufnefs,different from that^of our L O R D,though it be he that has merited itforthem. 

The Soul has but two natural or eifential Relations ; the one to God, and the other to her Body. 
Now 'tis evident, That the Relation, or Union which fhe has with God, cannot vitiate or corrupt 
her : and therefore fhe is neither vicious, nor corrupt, at the fir ft inftant of her Creation ; but 
by the relation fhe has to her Body. Thus one of the two muft needs be faid, either that Pride 
and other, which we call Spiritual Vices, can be communicated by the Body, or that Children are 
not fubject to them at the moment of their Birth : I fay at the moment of their Birth ; for I do not 
deny but thefe ill Habits are eafily acquired. Though pure Intelligences had no other relation than 
to God, and at the inftant of their Creation were fubjeft to no Vice, yet they fell into Diforder. 
But the Caufe of it was their making a wrong ufe ot their Liberty, whereof Infants have made no 
life at all : For Original Sin is not of a free Nature. 

But to come to the Point ; I am of Opinion, That they err, who chink that the Rebellion of 
the Body is the Caufe but of grofs Vices, fuch as Intemperance and Vncleannefs • and not of thofe 
which are call'd Spiritual, as Pride and Envy : and I am perfiiaded there is that Correspondence 
between the Difpofition of our Brain, and thofe of our Soul, as that thereis not perhaps any cor- 
rupt Habit in the Soul, but what has its Principle in the Body. " 

St. Paul in feveral places terms by the Name of the Law, the Wifdom,t\\Q Defires, and the Works 
of the Flefh ; whatever is contrary to the Law of the Spirit. He fpeaks not of Spiritual Vices- 
He reckons amongft the Works of the Flefh, Idolatry, Herefies, Dijfentions, and many other 
Vices which go by the Name of Spiritual. To give way to Vainglory, Wrath and Envy is, in 
his Doctrine, to follow the Motions of the Fkfh. In fhort, It appears from the Expreffions of that 
Apoftle, That all Sin proceeds from the Flefh : not that the Flefh commits it, or that the Spirit of 
Man, without the Grace, or Spirit of CHRIST, can do good : but becaufe the Flefh ads up- 
on the Spirit in fuch a manner, that the latter works no evil without being follicited to it by the 
former. Hear what St. Paul fays in the Epiftle to the Romans, 1 delight in the law of the Lord, af- Rora,c *7" 
ter the inward Man. But I fee another law in my members warring againft the law of my mind and 
bringing me into captivity to the law of fin, which is in my members. And a little lower ; So then with 
my mind I my felfferve the law of God, but with the flefh the law of fin ; He fpeaks after the fame man- 
ner in feveral places of his Epifiles. So that Concupifcence, or the Rebellion of the Body, not on- 
ly difpofes us to Carnal or fhameful Vices, but likewife to thofe which are thought to be Spiritual. ' 
I here (ball endeavour to prove it by a fenfible manner. 

When a Man's in Converfation, it is certain, as I think, that fome Tracks are machinally pro- 
due'd in his Brain, and Motions excited in his Animal Spirits, that beget in his Soul corrupt 
Thoughts and Inclinations. Our Thoughts on thefe Occafions are not naturally conformable to 
u Tnith, nor our Inclinations to Order, T hey rife in us for the Good of the Body, and of the pre- 
fent Life, becaufe 'tis the Body that exites them : So they obliterate the Prefence of God, and 
the Thoughts of our Duty out of our Mind ; and tend only to recommend us to other Men, and 
make them confider us as worth their Affection and Efteern. Therefore this fecret Pride, which 
kindles in us on fuch Occafions, is a Spiritual Vice, whofe Principle is the Rebellion of the Body. 

For Example ; If the Perfons, in whofe Prefence we are,are rais'd to Honorary Pofts and Titles, 
the Luftre of their Grandeur both dairies and dejects us. And as the Traces which their Pre- 
fence imprints on our Brain are very deep, and the Motions of the Spirits rapid ; they radiate, as 
I may fay, through all the Body ; they fpread themfelves on the Face, and give a fenfible Teftimo- ' 
ny of our Reverence and Fear, and our moft latent Sentiments. Next, Thefe Traces, by the 
fenfible Expreffions of our inward Motions, work upon the Perfon that obferve us ; whom they 
difpofe to Sentiments of Candour and Civility, by the Traces which our refpedrful and timorous 
Deportment machinally produce in his Brain r which Traces, rallying on his Face, and difarrri 
him of that Majefty which appear'd in't, and give the reft "of his Body fuch an Air and Pofture, 
as at length rid us of our Goncern, and re-embolden us. Thus by a mutual and frequent Reper- 
cuflion of thefe fenfible Expreffions, our Air and Behaviour at laft fettles in that fafhion which the 
governing Perfon withes. 

But as all the Motions of the Animal Spirits are attended with Motions of the Soul, and the 
Tracesof the Bra mare purfu'd by Thoughts of the Mind; 'tis plain, that fince we are depriv'd of 
the Power of expunging thefe Traces, and flopping thefe Motions, we find our felves follicited, by 
the over-ruling Prefence of the Perfon, to embrace his Opinions, andfubmitto his Defires, and to 
be wholly devoted to his Pleafure, as he indeed is difpos'd to ftudy ours, but in a very different 
manner. And for this Reafon worldly Converfation quickens and invigorates the Concupifcence of 
Pride, as difhoneft Commerce, feafting and enjoying fenfible Pleafures, ftrengthen Carnal Concu- 
pifcence; which is a Remark very neceffary for Morality. 

'Tis of great Ufe and Advantage, that there are Traces in the Brain, which inceffantly repre° 

I i tent 



1 26 F. Malebranche Concerning 

fent Man to himfelf, to mak e him careful of his Perfon : and that there are others, which ferve &S 
make and preferve Society, fince Men are not made to live alone. But Man having loft the Power 
of eraling them when he pleas'd, and when convenient, they perpetually provoke him to EviL' 
As he cannot hinder their reprefenting him to himfelf, he is continually follicited to Motions of 
Pride and Vanity, to defpife others, and center all things in himfelf. And as he is not Matter of 
thofe Traces which importune him, to keep up Society with others, he is agitated by Motions of 
Complaifance, Flattery, Jealoufie, and the like Inclinations, as it were. in fpight of him. Thus; 
all thofe, which go by the Name of Spiritual Vices, derive from the Flefb ; as well as Vnchaflnefs 
and Intemperance. ' 

There are not only in our Brain, Difpofitions which excite in us Senfations and . Motions, with" 
reference to the Propagation of the Species, and the Prefervation of Life \ but it may be a greater, 
Number that ftir up in us Thoughts and Paffions , with refpedt to Society, to our own private Ad- 
vancements, and to thofe of our Friends. We are by Nature united to all furrounaing Bodies,' 
and by them, to all the things that any way relate to us : But we cannot be united ,to them, fave 
by fome Difpofitions in our Brain. Having not therefore the Power of withftanding the Action 
of thefe natural Difpofitions, our Union turns into Dependence, and we grow fubjedt through our, 
Body to all kind of Vices. 

We are not pure Intelligences : all the Difpofitions of our Soul produce refpe&ive. Difpofitions 
in our Body, and thofe in our Body mutually excite others like them in our Soul. Not that the 
Soul is abfolutely incapable of receiving any thing, except by the Body ^ but becaufe, as long as 
She is united to ft, (he cannot admit any 'Change in her Modifications, without making fome Alte- 
ration in the Body. 'Tis true, flie may be enlightned, or receive new Ideas, and the Body need 
not have any hand in it; but that's becaufe pure Ideas are not Modifications of the Soul, as I have 
prov'd in another place. I fpeak not here of fenfible Ideas, becaufe thefe include a Senfation, ancl 
every Senfation is a mode of the Souls exijling. 

Tl^e Second OBJECTIO N againft the Eleventh and Twelfth Articles} 

As by one If Original Sin defcends, by reafon of the Communication which is found between the Brain of 
Man fin en- the Mother, and that of her Infant, the tjMother is the caufe of the Sin: and the Father has no. 

tred into 



VuZ t0 u part in it. Yet St. Paul teaches us, that by Man came fin into the World '■: He does not fo much as 
&c. ' f P e ak of the Woman. Therefore, &c. 

ANSWER. 



Rom. 5 
12. 



iwtsjha- David allures us, that his Mother conceived him in iniquity : and the Son of Syrach fays, Of tho 

pen in hi- Woman came the beginning of Sin, and by her we all dy. Neither of them fpeak of Man. St. Paul 

iTfmhatk on the contrar y feys,that by Man,Sin entred into the World,and fpeaksnot of the Woman. How will 

my Mother l ^ e Teftimonies accord, and which of the two is to be juftify'd, if it be neceflary to vindicate 

conceh'd either. In difcourfe we never attribute to the Woman any thing peculiar to the Man, wherein flie 

wf. has no part : But that is often afcrib'd to the Man which is proper to the VVoman, becaufe her, 

Ec.2<*25* ^k*'"' *s her Matter and /#«<*. We fee that the Evangelifis, and alfo the Holy Virgin, call Jo- { 

Luke 2. feph tne father of Jefus, when (he fays to her Son , Behold thy Father and I have fought thee forrowingi 

48. Therefore feeing we are affiir'd by Holy Writ, that Woman has fubje&ed us to Sin and Death, it 

is abfolutely neceflary to believe it ; nor can it be thrown upon the Man ; But though it teftifies in 

feveral places that 'tis by Man that Sin enters into the World, yet there is not an equal neceffity to 

believe it, fince what is of the Woman is commonly attributed to the Man. And if we were ob- 

lig'd by Faith to excufe either the Man, or the Woman, it would be more reafonable to excufe the 

former than the latter. 

However 1 believe thefe forecited pafTages are to be litterally explain'd, and that we are to fay, 
both the Man and Woman are the true caufes of Sin, each in their own way. The Woman, in 
that by her. Sin is communicated ; it being by her that the Man begets theChildren ; and theMan; 
in that his Sin is the caufe of Concupifcence •, as his a&ion is the caufe of the fecundity of the Wo- 
man, or of the communication that is between her and her Infant. 

It is certain, that 'tis the Man that impregnates the Woman, and confeyiently is the caufe of that 
communication, between her Body and the Child's, fince that communication is the Principle of 
its Life. Now that Communication not only gives the Child's Body the difpofitions of its Mo* 
ther's, but alfo gives its Mind the difpofitions of her Mind.- Therefore we may fay with St. ?<*«/,' 
that by one Man fin entred into the world ; and neverthelefs by reafon of that communication we may 
fay, that Sm came from a Woman, and by her we all dye : -and that our Mother has conceived us in M- 
qutty, as is faid in other places of Scripture. 

Itmay be faid perhaps, that though Man had not finn'd, yet Woman had produe'd finful 
Children ; for having her felf finn'd, fbe had loft the Power God gave her over her Body : and 
thus, though Man had remain'd Innocent, fhe had corrupted the Brain, and confequently the Mind 
of her Child, by reafon of that communication between them. 

But this furely looks not very probable. For Man whilft righteous, knowing what he does, can-^ 
not give the Woman that wretched fecundity of conceiving finful Children. If he remains Righte- 
ous 



The Search after Truth. j'^W 

6ns, he wills not any Children but for God, to whom Infant Sinners cannot be well pleafing • for I 
fuppofe not here a Mediator. I grant however that in that cafe the Marriage had not been diflblv'd 
and that the Man had known his Wife. But it is certain, that the Body of the Woman belong'd 
to her Husband , fince it was taken out of his :, and was the fame Flefh. Duo in came una. It is 
moreover certain, that Children are as much the Fathers as the Mothers. Which being fo , we 
can't be perfuaded that the Woman would have loft the Power over her Body, if her Husband had 
not finn'd as well as (he. For if the Woman had beendepriv'd of that Power whilft the Man re- 
main'd Innocent, there had been this Diforder in the Univerfe, that an upright Man mould have a 
corrupt Body, and finful Children. Whereas it is againft Order, or rather a contradiction, that a 
juft God fhould punifh a perfectly Innocent Man. And for this reafon Eve feels no involuntary 
and rebellious Motions, immediately after her fin ; as yet fhe is not afliam'd of her'Nakednefs, nor 
goes to hide her felf. On the contrary, fhe comes to her Husband, though naked as her felt} her 
Eyes are not yet open'd ; but fhe is ftill as before, the abfolute Comptroller of her own Body. 
Order requir'd that immediately after her Sin, her Soul fhould be diftnrb'd by the rebellion of 
her Body, and by the fhame of her own and her Husband's nakednefs -, for there was no reafon that 
God fliould any longer fufpend on her behalf the Laws of the Communication of Motions : as I 
have laid in the feventh Article. But becaufe her Body is her Husband's, who is as yet Innocent - 
fhe is not punifh'd in this Body ^ but this punifhment is deferr'd till the time that he fhould eat 
liimfelf of the Fruit which fhe prefented him : Then it was they both began to feel the re- 
bellion of their Body ; that they faw they were naked, and that fhame oblig'd them to cover 
themfelves with Fig-leaves. Thus we muft fay, that Adam was truly the caufe of Original Sin 
and Concupifcence, fince it was his Sin that depriv'd both himfelf and his Wife c*f their power o- Gen * c ' 3 ' 
ver their Body ^ by which defectivenefs of power the Woman produces in the Brain of her Child 
fuch tracks as corrupt its Soul at the very inftant of its Creation. 

OBJECTION againft the Twelfth Article. 

'Tis but random divining to fay the communication between the Mother's and the Infants Brain 
is neceflary or ufeful to the conformation of the foetus. For there is no fuch Communication be- 
tween the Brain of an Hen, and that of her Chickens, which notwithstanding are perfectly and 
compleatly form'd, 

ANSWER. 

1 ."■'.,, 

I anfwer that in the feventh Chapter of the Second Book, I have fufficiently demonftrated, that 
Communication, bytheufel make of it, in explaining the Generation of Monfters; as alfo cer- 
tain" natural Marks and Fears deriv'd from the Mother. For 'tis evident, that a Man who fwoons 
away at the fight of a Snake, becaufe his Mother was frighted with one when fhe bore him in her 
Womb, could not be fubjedt to that Infirmity, but becaufe formerly fuch Traces had been imprint- 
ed on bisBrain,as thefe which open upon feeing aSnake,and that they were accompany'd with a like 
Accident. And herein I am no Diviner •, for I do not venture to determine wherein that Com- 
munication precifely confifts. I might fay it was perform'd by thofe Fibres which the Fcetut (hoots 
into the Matrix of the Mother, and by the Nerves wherewith that partis, very probably, fill»d ; 
and in faying fo I fhould no more divine, than would a Man who had never feen the Engines calPd 
La Santaritaine, in affirming there were Wheels and Pumps to raife the Water. Nevertbelefs I Ld saman- 
can't fee why divining is not fometimes allowable, provided a Manfets not up for a Prophet, and uine upon 
{peaks not in too pofttive a ftrain ; I rather think he is permitted to fpeak his Thoughts, whilft he Pomneuf 
pretends not to be Infallible, nor Lords it unjuftly over others by dogmatical Decifions, or by the ln nTis - 
help of Scientific^ Terms. 'Tis not always divining to fpeak of things which are not vifible, and 
which contradict Prejudices, If fo be we fpeak no more than we eafily conceive, and which readi- 
ly makes its way into the mind of others who defire to underftand Reafon. 

I fay then, that fuppofing the general Laws of the Communication of Motions, fuch as they are 
there is great Probability that the particular Communication of the Mother's Brain, with that of 
her Infant, is neceffary to form its Body, in a requifite manner ; or at leaft is neceflary to give the 
Brain of the Infant certain difpofitions, which ought to vary according to different Times and 
Countries, as I have explain'd in the fame Chapter. 

I confefs there is no Communication between the Brain of an Hen* and that of a Chicken, in the 
Egg, which neverthelefs is perfectly well form'd. But it ought to be obferv'd, that the Chicken 
is farther advanc'd in the Egg, when the Hen lays it, than the Foetus when it defcends into the 
Matrix : which may well be concluded, fince there goes lefs time to the hatching Chickens, than 
there goes to the bringing forth Whelps ; though the Belly of the Bitch being very hot, and her 
Blood in perpetual motion, the Whelps fhould be fooner form'd than the Eggs hatch'd, were not 
the Chickens farther advanc'd in their Eggs, than the Whelp in their Cicatricles. Now there is 
great probability that the formation of the Chicken in the Egg, before it was laid, was effected by 
the communication I am fpeaking of. 

I anfwer in the fecond place, that the growth of the Body of Fowls, is poffibly more conformable 
to the general laws of Motion than that of four-footed Animals ; and that fo the communication of 
the Females Brain, with that of her young ones, is not fo neceflary in Fowls as in other Animals : 

For 



ia8 F. Malebranche Concerning 

For the reafon that makes that communication neceflary, is probably the remedying the defect of 
thefe general Laws, which in fome particular Cafes, are infufficient to regulate the Formation and 
Growth of* Animals. , 

I anfwer laftly, there is no fuch neceflky, to the prefervation of the Life of Birds, that they 
fhould have fo many particular Difpofitions in their Brain as other Animals. They have Wings to 
fly harm, and to fecure their feed :, and have no, need of all that particular Mecbanifm which is the 
principle of the cunning, and docility of fome domeftick Creatures. Therefore the old ones need 
not inftrud their young in many things, as they breed them, nor capacitate them to be taught ma- 
\ hy afterwards, .by giving them a difpofition of Brain that's fit for Docility. Thofe who breed 
young Dogs for the Game, fometimes find thofe which naturally let, meerly from the inftrudion 
they receiv'd from their Damm, who often usM to fet with them in her Belly. There is a great 
difference almoft always obfervable in the breed of thefe Creatures, fome of which are much 
more Docil and Tradable than others of the fame Species.But I do not think there ever was a Fowl 
that taught any thing extraordinary to her young ; that a Hen, for Example, ever hatch'd a Chic- 
ken who could do any thing but what they all do naturally. Birds then are not fo tradable or ca- 
pable of Inftrudion as other Animals. The Difpofition of their Brain is not ordinarily capable 
of many Changes j nor do they ad fo much by Imitation, as fome domeftick Animals. Young 
Ducks, which follow an Hen, don't ftay for her Example to take the Water ; and the Chickens, 
on the contrary, never betake themfelves to fwim, though hatch'd and led by a Duck, that loves 
the Water. But there are Animals thateafily and readily imitate the uncommon Motions, which 
they fee others do. However I do not pretend, that much ftrefs is to be laid on thefe laft Refledi- 
ons, fince they are not neceflary to eftablilh my Opinion. 

Second OBJECTION again]} the Twelfth Article. 

*Tis likewife divining to affirm, That the Mother before - her Sin might have any intercourjfe 
with her Embryo ; there being no neceffary relation between our Thoughts and Motions happen- 
ing in our Brain. And therefore that Communication between the Mother's and the Infant's Brain 
is ufelefs. 

ANSWE R. 

It is evident, That without this Communication, the Infant was incapable of having any Com» 
merce with its Mother, or the Mother with her Infant, without a particular Miracle. Now be- 
fore the Sin Order requir'd, That the Mother mould have notice of all the Corporeal wants of her 
Infant, and that the Infant ftlould refent its Obligations to jts Parents. Therefore fince all things 
were in Order before the Sin, and that God ads always agreeably to Order, the Mother and the 
Child had fome Commerce by means of this Communication. 

To underftand wherein this Commerce may have confifted, it mull be remembred, That the 
Connexion of the Tracks of the Brain, with the Ideas of the Soul, may be feveral ways effeded, 

chap. 2. either by Nature, or by the Inftitution of Men, or fome other way, as I have fliewn how in the Se- 

Part 2. con< i fi^ 

In beholding a Square, or the Look of a Perfon fuffering any Tain, the Idea of a Square, or of an 
afflided Perfon, rifes in the Mind. This is common to all Nations, and the Connexion between 
thefe Ideas and thefe Traces, is natural. When an Englifhman hears pronounc'd, or reads the 
Word Square, he has likewife the Idea of a Square : but the Connexion, which is between the 
Sound,ox the Letters of that Word, and its Idea, is not natural, nor is it general with all the World. 
I fay then, That the Mother and her Infant muft naturally have had a Correfpondence between 
them^ upon all the things that could be reprefented to the Mind by natural Connexions : That if 
the Mother, for Inftance, had feen a Square, the Infant would have feen one too ; and that if thff 
Infant had imagined any Figure, he would have likewife excited the Traces of the fame Figure in 
the Imagination of his Mother. But they would have had no Commerce together about things of 
a purely Spiritual Nature, nor even about Corporeal things, whenever they conceiv'd them, with- 
out the help of the Senfes and Imagination. The Mother might have thought on GOD, have 
, heard or read the Word Square, or the like ; and yet the Child not have difcover'd what were her 
Thoughts thereof, unlefs in Trad of Time, me mould have fetled a new Commerce of intellectu- 
al Ideas with it, much what the fame with that of Nurfes, when they teach their Children to 
fpeak. I explain and prove thefe things. 

One would think I had fufficiently prov'd them, by the Explication I gave of the Caufe of Here* 
ditary Averfions , and Marks which Children bring with them into the World, deriv'd from the 
Traces of their Mothers. Now thefe Traces of corporeal things are infeperable from their Ideas - 
which makes the Ideas to be communicated along with them, and the Children to fee, feel, imagine 
the fame things as their Mothers. They have now, whether they will or not, the Senfations of 
their Mothers '. but were they not Sinners, they would have had the power of hindring,- when they 
pleas'd, the Effed of that their Communication with their Mother. They might likewife have re - 
excited in their Brain, the Tracks which they receiv'd from their Mothers, by the fame reafon that 
we imagine what we pleafe, when our Senfations are not too vivid andarfeding : which being fup- 
pos'd, it is evident, That the Mother, when considerately attending to her Infant, might have 

difcover'd 



7})e Search after Truth. K i<j 

clifcover'd, by a kind of Repercuffion, whether or no it receiv'd the Impreflion flie excited in it, 
and likewife other things that it might think upon. For as the Mother could not vibrate the Fi- 
bres of her Brain, but the Fibres of the Infant's Brain muft have receiv'd the Impreflion ; fo the In- 
fant could not ftop that Vibration, or caufe any other, without giving the Mother notice by fome 
light Impreflion, provided (he made her felf very attentive, by the power flie had of ftifling every 
other Noife than that which her Infant caus'd in her. Thus it miilt be acknowledge, That the 
Mother, and the Infant, would have had fome intercourfe before the Sin, or elfe we muft deny all 
Correfpondence between their Brains, or the power of the Soul over the Body, to be fuch as I 
have before maintain'd. This appears evident, though the wanton Imagination ftarts, and Pre- 
judices band againft it. 'Tis true, this Commerce at firil would have reach'd but to Matters that 
come under the Senfes and Imagination , it not being abfolutely necefTary, that the Child, which 
had only a Corporeal Dependence on the Mother, ihould receive from her any other ideas than 
thofe of fenfible Objects. For its Soul being ftridly united to God, whilft in a State of Innocency, 
would have receiv'd immediately from him ail the Ideas which refpeded not the Body : But where- 
as in time we may affix the molt abftrad Ideas to things fenfible, which have no relation to them, 
this Commerce between the Mother and her Child, would, very likely, have quickly extended to 
things of a more Spiritual Order, if they ftrove tocorrefpond about luch fort of Matters. 

I am fenfible, that what I now fay will not feem reafonable to very many ; and that even thofe 
who refill their Prejudices, and labour againft the continual Tide of fenfible Impreffions, will ad- 
mire at the Novelty of this Notion, But if we ferioufly refled on the way that a Mailer takes to 
inftrud his Difcipks, and obferve what different means he is ublig'd to makeufeof, to manifeft 
his own Ideas of things to them } the Com parifons he makes, and the Judgments he palles about 
thefe Ideas, and the other Difpofitions of his Mind, in reference to his Scholars , we ftiall fee it 
will be a much harder Task for him to difcover his Thoughts and inward Difpofitions of Mind to 
them, than for a Mother to do it to her Infants ; provided we only fuppofe, that the Traces of ths 
Mother's Brain are imprinted on the Child's, which is evident from all that I have faid before. 
For, in fine, it is manifeft, tnat the Voice, and all exterionr Signs that we employ toexprefs our 
Thoughts to others, obtain the defir'd EfTed, only becaufe they imprint on the Brain of our Hear- 
ers, the fame Traces, and raifethe fame Emotions of the Spirits, as accompany our Ideas, and our 
inward Difpofition, on their refped. 

OBJECTION againji the Seventeenth and following Articles. 

'Tis a rafli AfTertion to fay, Children i n Baptifm are juftify'd by adual Motions of their Will to- 
wards God. We muft not give vent to fuch New Opinions ; which do no good, but only make a 
noife. 

ANSWER. 

I grant, that we ought not positively to affirm, That Children are juftify'd by formal Ads of 
their Will : I believe it impoflible to know any thing of it } and that we are not pofitively to 
aflTert any thing but what we know. But becaufe there are but too many, who are apt to believe, 
That Juflification of Children is only external, and by Imputation, by reafon, fay they, they are 
incapable of performing any Aft of Love towards God; I think it fit to let them know, that they 
are brought by Prejudice to that Opinion. For the Prejudices of Men, in refped of Children, are 
fuch, as make them commonly fanfie they have no Thought in their Mother's Womb, and in the 
beginning of their Age, and even that they are abfolutely incapable of thinking. They believe 
that they have not fomuch as the Ideas of things ; that it is their Matters that furnifh them with 
Difcourfe ^ and that if they have any Inclinations, they are of another Nature from ours, and in- 
competent to carry them to the Sovereign Good. The greateft part of Men can't diftindly con- 
ceive, That Cifildrens Souls are like thofe of grown up Perfons , And that they don't come to 
Strength and 1'erfedion by degrees, like the Body ; And that if they were deliver'd one moment 
from the Impreflion the Body made upon them, and mov'd by the Deledation of Grace, they 
would in that moment be more pure and enlighten'd than the Souls of the greateft Saints ; who 
feel always working in their Mind and Heart the Leaven of Concupifcence. 

Concupifcence is commonly look'd upon as Natural,and is not always confider'd as a confequence of 
Sin : and this makes Men conclude unawares, that the Stupidity of Children is a necefTary confe- 
quence of their Infirmity of Body, Tendernefs of Age, and alfo incapacity _ of Mind. Which 
Conclusion or Pre) ;dice is conftantly reprefented to the Mind, and prepoflefs it in fuch a manner, 
as hinders it from examining the thing in its own Nature. Therefore thofe who have treated of 
the Effed of Baptifm, in the Ages paft, have omitted the explaining the Regeneration of Infants by 
the aduai Motions of their Heart : Not thatthey.were induc'd by ftrong Reafons to judge it impof- 
fible • for their Works do not (hew they have ever fo much as examin'd it ^ but fas is vifiblej' be- 
caufe' they have fuppofVd it fo ; and that it has hardly entred their Heads to doubt of.it: or 
poffibly, becaufe they wav/'d giving an Explication fo repugnant to Prejudices, at a Time when no 
fuch Attempts were mad?, to get rid of them, as nowadays there are. 

But if it be confider'd how necefTary it is to give a clofer Explication than that, for Inftance, 

K k which 



I go F. Malebranche Concerning 

* Lib. i. which St. Aufttn gives in* feveral places, which looks towards Imputation •, though in others he 
it Na.pt. fp ea k s i n a way tRa t does -f not countenance it: If it be confider'd that Imputation is very commodi* 
26 P 27 5 & om y anc * lively for that Reafon embrac'd by forae Ancient and [[ Orthodox Divines ; and^ moreover 
in fui. 1.6. abfolutely neceffary for thofe, who, without any convincing Proof, deny Spiiitual Habits; whom 
c. 19. & a- it may be good to fatisfie, if poffible. Laftly, If refpect be had to natural Equity, which forbids 
^ bi us to condemn the fecret Purpofes and Intentions ; after all this, I fay, what I offer may poflibly 

\xb ? de ptc- a PP ear improbable : But yet I can't fee why it fhouldbe taken ill, that I endeavour to content even 
cam. me- the moft querelous Minds touching their Difficulties about Original Sin. 
' ritis, 0.19* _ &. alibi. || Innocent. III. in Dicrtt. z-de Baptifmotf ejus Effeclu. Et in Condi. Viemienji general: 15. fob Clement V. 



ILLUSTRATION 

UPON THE 

Third CHAPTER of the Third P A R T of the 

Second BO OK. 

Wherein I Jpeak of the power of Imagination of fame -Authors, and particw 

larly of Tertullian. 

AS I am well fatisfy'd that the moft general and fruitful Principle of Errors in the Scicencesl 
and efpecially in Morals, is the lmpreffion made by lively Imaginations on the Mind of 
, Men, who are manag'd more by Mechanifm than by Reafon ; fo I thought it lay upon me 
to fet this truth to open view, by all the ways that might awaken them from their (lumber 
on its account : And becaufe Examples ftrike deepeft, efpecially when the Inftance is omewhat 
great, and uncommon \ I thought that the celebrated Names of Tertullian, Seneca, and Montague^ 
were the moft proper to raife their Attention, and give them a fenfible conviction of the contagi- 
ous Empire of the Imagination over Reafon. For if Words, all-dead, and unanimated by the look 
and fenfible behaviour of thefe famous Authors, have ftill more Force than the Reafon of a great 
many others ; if the Turn of Expreffion, that gives but a faint Idea of the fenfible action, which 
the Imagination lively diffufes over the Face s and the reft of the Body of thofe who are pierc'd with 
what they fay •, is able to Agitate, Penetrate, and Convince a great many : certainly ic muft be 
granted that nothing is more dangerous, than a refpectful Attention to Men of a ftrong and lively 
Imagination. For their Air and Way is a natural Language, fo powerful and convincing ; and they 
know how to Image things fo paflionately to the Life, that they feldom fail of railing the Senfes 
and Paffions againft Reafon, and pouring, as 1 may fay, Conviction and Certitude into their 
Spectators. 

I eafily forefaw, in alledging thefe great Examples, that it was impracticable to cure thofe who 
were amaz'd, and thunder-ftruck,withthe reading of thefe three fanfd Authors.For a little know- 
ledge of the nature of Man will fuffice to teach us, that the wounds of the Brain are harder to be 
heal'd than thofe of the other parts of the Body,and that 'tis eafier to clofe up a fore not expos'd to 
frefh infult from without, than to make a perfect cure of an inveterate Prejudice that juftifies it 
felf each minute by very-probable-Reafons. 

'Tis extreamly difficult to clofe up exactly the Traces of the Brain, becaufe expos'd to the courfe 
of the Spirits, and liable to be conftantly renew'd by infinite other Traces which may be call'd ac~ 
eefj'ory. Thefe forts of Wounds cannot ordinarily be cufd, or made up, till the Brain receives o- 
thers more deep, which oppofing them caufe a violent and continual Revulfion in the Spirits. For 
we ought not to reckon a Prejudice quite cur'd, when we fancy it is, becaufe we are not actually 
affected with it : then only the cure is perfected when the Trace is quite fhut up ; and not when 
the Spirits defift from their wanted courfe for fome particular Reafon. 

I knew then well enough that fuch as had been proftrated, and over-whelm'd by the Force and 
Motions of Teytullian, ravifiYd and, dazl'd by the loftinefsand beauties of Seneca, charm'd and 
corrupted by the gentile, eafie and natural Turns of Montague, would not change their Opinion by 
reading a few Pages of my Book. I judg'd on the contrary I mould incur their difpleafure, by try- 
ing to didblve the inchantment which fo held them. 

But as I hop J thefe Examples would be ufeful to my defign for the fore-mention'd Reafons: I 
thought I was to be more regardful of the Profit of many who were Free from Pi epofleffion, than 
of the Spleen of fome particulars, thu I concluded would cenfure the liberty I had taken. I con- 
fider'd there woe vei y few fo itrongly prevented with efteem for thefe Authors, but it was hop'd 
might return to found fence again. I concluded laftly, that there being hardly one, it may be, 
jJutpnflefs'd with all Three together, becaufe of the diverfe Characters of their Imagination ; the 
molt Opinioxiatcd might find I was in the right in a good many things. 

I know 



The Search after Truth. \%t 

I know what Refpeft I ought to have for the Works of Tertullian, as well on account of the Sub- 
jects that he treats of, as of the Approbation they have receiv'd from feveral Perfons, who ought 
to be able to judge of them. And I have fufficiently manifefted that Temper of Mind, by what 
I have faid of him, and by the Quality of the Book de Pallio, ofwhich alone I have fpoke with fo 
much freedom, though there were others, it may be, fitter for my purpofe. 

But after all I don't think that Time ought to change and amplifie the Ideas of things- that all " 
Antiquities are venerable ; and that illegitimate Reafons, and extravagant ways are worthy of Re- 
fpecl:, becaufe they were a long time in the World before us. I can't think that affeaed Obfcuri- 
ties ought to be venerated like Sacred Myftei ies ; Sallies of Imagination to go for mining Lights of 
Knowledge ; and African Heats, which work in a Mind naturally full of Fire, to be look'd on as 
Motions of a Propbetick Spirit, which can divulge nothing but fublime Truths. 

I am certain, that even thofe who defer mod to Tertullian's Works, will agree with me in all 
this, and that they are too equitable, to juftifie the Diforders of Imagination againft Reafon. But 
it may be they are a-kin to thofe Judicious Perfons, who, though they infinitely love Truth, yet 
they are not infenfible to outfide Manners. For 1 have oftentime obferv'd fome of them fo en- 
chanted with certain ftrong, lively, great, and pompous Expreflions of Tertullian, that having 
prov'd to them that Author was none of the molt Judicious and Reafonable, they would think it 
enough to convince and furprize me, only to repeat them. 

I own that Tertullian has Expreflions extreamly ftrong and bold, which produce moft lively and 
animated Images in the Mind j and upon that fcorc / juftly bring him for an Example, of the Po- 
wer which ftrong Imaginations have to - move, and convince by Impreflion. Thus thofe who 
urge to me thefe Objections, confirm my Opinion by oppofing it. Their Prepofleflion and Efteem 
for Tertullian juftifies my Conduct : the frequent Citations, and the big Words, which they alledge, 
prove what I fav. For they ufe not in Difcourfe to produce entire Reafonings -, but often quote 
ftrong and lively Expreflions, in order to dazzle, perturbate, and cpnvince by the fenfible Im- 
preflion. 

_ There is no Reafon. I think, to imagine, that I fet up for a Cenfor of fo many great Men, who 
cite Tertullian conftantly in the Pulpit, and elfewhere • They have their Reafons for it : into which 
I neither do, nor ought to enquire. What I have faid of that Author is methinks evident enough : 
Let every one deduce his Confequences according to his Knowledge, without attributing thofe 
Thoughts to me, which I never had. Thofe who pretend to dive into the Defigns of others 
frame commonly fuch Phantafms as referable but themfelves : it being cuftomary with Men,to taint, 
and infect others with the Venom of their own Paffions. We are apt to meafure all things by our 
felves, and they would do well to confider, who condemn me, whether they do not judge them- 
felves un-a-wares, in doing it. But if they would have me declare my felf upon the Citations of 
Tertullian, I grant a Man has right to make ufe of them for feveral Reafons ; and like wife that they 
are fometimes moft ufefully employ'd, to make fome practical Truths more fenfible, which are bar- 
ren and unfruitful, as long as they lie dormant in our inward Reafons, and raife in us no contrary 
Motions to thofe which the Goods of the Body excite in us. 

Neverthelefs I can't think thofe Mens Opinions very unreafonable, who believe we are not to 
cite Authors by Name, fave when they are infallible ^ and that, except in things out of Reafons 
Prerogative, and which Authority ought to take place, no Quotations are to be made. This for- 
merly was the Cuftom of the Fathers : St. Cyprian never citQ&Tertuttian though he has taken a great 
deal from him ; and if it be true what St. Jerome reports of that Holy Bifhop, by hear-fay, vi&i 
That talking of Tertullian he call'd him his Mafter ; either his Name muft not have been fo Au- 
thoritave, nor his Expreflion fo forcible as they are at prefent upon Mens minds ; or elfe St. Cy~ 
frian was wonderfully rigorous in the Obfervance of that Cuftom of his Time : it being very 
ftrange fuch a Difciple Ihould never have mention'd his Mafter in any of his Works. 

St. Jerome's Hiftory is commonly urg'd in Defence of Tertullian -, and I have been fometimes 
told, I was too blame to fpeak fo as I did, of a Man, whom St. Cyprian call'd his Mafter. But I 
queftion whether St. Jerome would not have been too ealie of belief, in what made for the Honour 
of Tertullian. To m.e he feems to have had fome what too great an Inclination for him, fince he in J ^ v ' d ^po- 
fome meafure excufes his Fall by retorting his Herefie on the Envy of the Romifh Clergy, and the t ^etiiT' 
evil Ufage he receiv'd from them. But if that Story, which is founded only on what St. Jerome chrico- 
heard one Perfon fay, be true ^ I muft confefs, I know not what to make of that Silence obferv'd mmRgma- 
by St. Cyprian in his Writings, with reference to Tertullian. That Silence of a Scholar may befuf- naEcckfa 
petted to conceal fome Myftery not advantagious to the Mafter • and if that Hiftory,as well as Ter- ^JJjJ"" 
tuUian's own Works, did not give us fufficiently to underftand, that he was not altogether worthy dehpfa, 
of the great Efteem that is paid him by very many •, yet I queftion whether St. Cyprian's Conduft, in muhis 
his Silence, his Stile , his Ways, would not be fufficient to leflen it •, and to make us think, Ubrisaov* 
That, probably, that Author's Reputation was not fo well eftablifh'd in Africa it felf, which ought Jjjjl? 
to have been more favourable to him than a Clime fo temperate as ours. Hieron." 

in Catalogo de Script. EccleC 

Our own Country and Africa produce very different Wits : the Genius of the former, being 
natural, rational, and "irreconcileable to all over-ftrain'd Manners, it is ftrange to find any among 
them addicted to an Author, who never ftudied nor follow'd Nature : and who inftead of confut- 
ing his Reafon, fuffers himfelf to be tranfported by his ungovern'd heats into altogether obfcure, 

monftrous, and extravagant Expreflions. 

' But 



i^i F. Malebranche Concerning 

But this probably is Owing to the mighty Force of Imagination which difarms Reafon, and everf 
changes Nature. And indeed a Man in the Fury of Paffion perturbates, and even changes the na-* 
tural fituation of our Imagination to adapt it to his own. And then there is no Motion but what 
Teems Natural, no Expreffion but's Agreeable, no Nonfcnce but's convincing. For we ftand to ex- 
amine nothing ferioufly. Now as the Paflions vindicate themfelves, and irregular immaginations 
take delight only in their Irregularity, 'tis impoffible to judge foberly of things, as long as theBrain 
preferves the violent Impreflion it has received. There is no Man in the Tranfport of Paffion but 
is perpetually follicited to juftifie it ; nor any difturb'd in Brain, but is pleasM in the difturbance.' 
For if thofe who fancy themfelves Cocks, Wolves, Oxen, pleafe themfelves wonderfully in imita- 
ting the actions that are cuftomavy with thefe Greatures, though quite contrary to the nature of 
Man: it may eafily be judg'd that we fhall be far from condemning the Behaviour of thofe, who 
by the Contagion of their Imagination have made us in a manner like them. For in condemning 
them we are confcious we condemn our felves. 

There's a very particular Reafon why fome of the Learn'd mould glory in efpoufing Tertullian, 
and exprefllng fo extraordinary an efteem for him. Which is that affected obfcurity, which ferves 
as one of the principal Rules of his Rhetorick. 

In thefe days all empty and fenfelefs Expreffions, and all obfcure and perplex'd ways of fpeak- 
ing, go under the name of nonfence. But there have been" found fuch as have look'd upon Obfcuri- 
ty, as one of the greateftmyfteries in Eloquence, with whom the Art of perfwading confifted part- 
ly in being unintelligible. 

If publick Haranguers had always the clear and diftind Ideas of the Truths they went about to 
perfwade/ and fpoke only to perfons that were capable of a competent Attention to underftand. 
them, the precept of affecting obfcurity in difcourfe, would be the molt extravagant in the World. 
But though this precept abfolutely contradicts all Reafon, yet it may be faid to be proportionate 
and fit for the Genius of moft'Men : not only becaufe a Myfterious Obfcurity conceals the Ignorance 
of the Speaker, but alfo for its railing fuch a fenfe in others as difpofes them to yield, and be 
convinc'd. 

Experience manifefts, that moft Men efteem what they do not -comprehend; that they reve- 
rence, like Myfteries, whatever is above their reach, and think an Orator has a wonderful Talent, 
when he dazles them, by the glitterings of difcourfe, and by a Language of Imagination, when 
Reafon has nothing to do. 

The Inclination Men have for Grandeur exceeds that which they have for Truth : wherefore 
Pompous Nonfence which perfwades by the Imprejfton, is better receivM than pure Argumentation 
which periwades by force of Evidence : fince Evidence makes way only by Reflections, which al- 
ways coft the Maker trouble : but fenfible Conviction flows into the Soul, and penetrates it in a 
moft agreeable manner. 

The Good which alone is capable of fatisfying our defires, is at once Infinite, and Jnacceffi;. !e, 
and great and obfcure Expreffions have fomething of this Character. So that Obfcurity raifing our 
Defires, whilft Greatnefs provokes our Admiration, and Efteem ; thefe Expteffions win us by the 
Motions they produce in us. 

When we underftand, or think we underftand a difficult and obfcure Author, we value our 
felves above others that do not ; and fometimes look upon them, as Ignorant. The Pains we 
have taken to mafter him, interefs us in his Defence. For by venerating this Author, and procu- 
ring the Veneration of others, we juftifie our own ftudies : and as we find pleafure in juftifying 
our felves, fo we muft not fail to praife and defend him with Earheftnefs and Zeal, and by lively 
and fenfible ways. 

Thefe Reafons, and fome others of lefs force are fufficient, I think, to let us know, that the ob- 
fcurity of Tertullian is no difadvantage to him in the Opinion of fome Perfons ; and that likely 
they would have lefs admir'd him, if the Truths which are fcatter'd over his Works were reduced 
to their more fimple and clear Ideas. 

Mathematical Truths and Relations are always Sum'd up in their Exponent s, that is, in the moft 
fimple terms that exprefs them; and are difengag'd from all perplexing and obfeuring Dependen- 
cies. For Geometricians love naked Truth ; and defire not toconvince by Impreffion, but by Light 
and Evidence. But what would become of moft of Tertullian^ Thoughts, were they redue'd to 
their Exponents by the Rules of Logical Geometricians, and fhould we fee them ftrip'd of all that 
fenfible Pomp which dazles Reafon. Yet if we would judge folidly of this Author's Reafonings, 
we ought to make the Experiment. 

However I do not pretend that Tertullian ought to have written with Geometrical Plainnefs. Fi- 
gures which exprefs our fentiments and motions , with refpect to the Truths we expofe toothers, 
are abfolutely neceffary ; and I think that more efpecially in difcourfe of Religion and Morality we 
ought to Employ thofe Ornaments which procure all the reverence that is due to Truth, and thofe 
Motions which actuate the Soul, and incline her to vertuous Actions. But we are not to.drefs up 
and adorn a Phantafm without fubftance and reality ; nor excite Motions when there's no occafion ; 
and if we will vigoroufly imprefs on our Hearers Conviction, and Certitude, 'tis neceffary that the 
Ccuviiiion mould relate to fomething true and folid. We muft neither convince, nor be convin- 
ced without knowing evidently, diftinftly, precifely, why we do the one, orfufferthe other. 
We ought 10 know both what we fay, and what we think ; and only to Love Truth, and Know- 
ledge, without putting out the Eyes of others, after we have made blind our felves, 

T H E 



The Search after Truth, ~iiy 

ILLUSTR AT ION 

UPON THE 

Nature of I D E A S. 

Wherein I explain how we fee all things in God , both Truths and Laws 

Eternal. 

I Hoped that what I had faid upon the nature of Ideas, was fufficient to have fhown that God 
only enlightens our underftanding. But I have found by Experience, that there are Perfons 
incapable of a competent Attention to conceive the Reafons I have given of this Princiole„ 
Abftraded reafons are incomprehenfible to the greateft part of Men, but that which is fenfi- 
ble awakens them, and fixes and keeps open the Eye of their Mind. They cannot confider nor 
confequently, comprehend what comes not under the Senfes, nor Imagination. Which thing I 
have often faid, nor can I too often repeat. 

'Tis plain that Bodies are not vifible of themfelves : that they cannot ad upon our mind, nor re- 
prefent themfelves to it. This has no need of proof ^ but is difcover'd by a bare perception and 
is infinitely more certain, than that Bodies communicate their Motion when they meet. But' it is 
not certain, fave with thofe who filence their Senfes, to lifteh to their Reafon. Therefore all 
Mankind believe that Bodies impel each other, becaufe the Senfes tell them fo, but they do not be-» 
lieve that Bodies are of themfelves abfolutely invifible, and incapable of ading on the Mind, be- 
caufe the Senfes do not tell them this, but feem to fay the contrary. 

Neverthelefs there are Tome whofe reafon is fo fteadfaft and refolv'd , as to rife up to the rnoft 
abftrad Truths. They contemplate them with attention, and couragioufly refill the Impreffion of 
their Senfes and Imagination. But the Body infenfibly weighing down the Mind, they relapfe, thefe 
Ideas vanifh, and whilft the Imagination ftirsup more fenfible and lively, the former are beheld as 
Apparitions, that only caufe miftruit and fear of delufion. 

We are eafily apt to difbruft thofe Perfons, or things we are not familiar with, and which have 
not afforded us any fenfible pleafure : For 'tis Pleafure that wins the Heart, and Familiarity thaC 
cures our Trouble and difquiet of Mind. Wherefore thofe who are not us'd to Metaphyseal, and 
abftrad Truths, are very prone to believe we purpofe to feduce them, when we only labour, to in-, 
itrud them. They look with a fufpicious Eye, and a kind of dread, upon Ideas which have nothing 
charming and fenfible, and the Love they bear to their own Repofe and Felicity, fpeediiy rids them 
of fo vexatious a Contemplation , which feems incapable of contenting them. 

If the Queftion, before us, were not of the greateft Importance, the Reafons I have given, and 
fome others not neceffary to be produc'd, would oblige me to fay no more of it - 7 for I forefee that 
whateverl can fay upon this fubjed will never enter'the Heads of fome People. But this Princi- 
ple, That there is none but God who enlightens us ^ and that this illumination is efFeded by the ma- 
nifeftation of an immutable, and neceffary Reafon, or Wifdom ; feems to me fo conformable to Reli- 
gion, that I think my felf indifpenfably oblig'd to Explain it, and maintain it to the utmoffc of my 
Power. I had rather be call'd a Vifionifl, Enthuftafi, and all the fine Names that the Imagination, 
(which in little Souls is always Sarcaftical) ufes to oppofe to reafons it cannot comprehend , or de- 
fend it felf againft-, than to grant that Bodies are capable of inftruding me 3 that I am my own 
Mafier, Reafon and Light : and that to be thoroughly inform'd in all things, I need only confult my 
felf } or other Men, who perhaps may fill my Ears with a loud noife , but certainly cannot infufe 
Light and Knowledge into my Mind. Here then are fome farther Reafons for the Opinion 1 have 
eftablifh'd, in the Chapter belonging to thisllluftration. 

No body will deny that Man is capable of knowing Truth : and theleaft intelligent Philofophers 
acknowledge that he partakes of a certain Reafon, which they don't determine. And therefore they 
define him animal Rationis particeps. For there is no body but knows, at lealt confufedly, that the 
efTential difference of Man confifts in his necefTary union with Univerfal Reafon, though it be not 
commonly known who it is that includes this Reafon, and little Care is taken to difcover it. I fee 
for Example,that two times two are four, and that aFriend is preferable to a Dog ., and lam certain 
there is no Man in the World but fees this as well as I. Now I difcover not thefe truths in the 
Mind of others, no more than others do in mine : Therefore there is necefTarily an Vniverfal Rea- 
fon which enligntens me, and all intelligent Beings. For if the Reafon I confult were not the fame as 
that which anfwers the Chinefe, 'tis evident, I could not be afTur'd, as I am, that the Chinefe fee the simbo vU 
demus verum e(fe quod dicis& umbo vldemiis verum ejje quod dico, ubi quxfo idvidemus? Nee ego utique in te, nee tain me\ fed. 
umbo in ipfa, qu/efupra meutesnoftw eft, wornmmnbili veritate. Confefs.de S. Aug, /, 12. c. 25. See St Auftin De lib'ero arbitrio, 
Sac. Book 2. Chap, 8. 

L fame 



ig* ?. Malebranchb Concerning 

fame Truths as I fee. Therefore the Reafon we confult, when we retire into our felves^ is in tank' 
verfal Reafon : I fay when we retire into our felves , for I fpeak not here of the Reafon which is 
follow'd by a Man in a Paffion. When a Man prefers the Life of his Coach-Horfe before that of his 
Coach* Man, he has his Reafons for it, but they are particular Reafons which every rational Man ab- 
hors. They are reafons which at Bottom are not reasonable, becaufe not conformable to Soveratgn 
or univerfal Reafon, which all Mankind confults. 

I am certain that the Ideas of things are immutable, and that Eternal Truths and Laws are necejfa- 
ry. 'Tis impoffible they fhould not be what they are. But in my felf I find nothing either immu= 
table, or necefTary : ' Tis pofljble for me not to exift : or exift otherwife than I do. There may 
be Minds that are not like me : and yet I am certain there can be no mind that fees other Truths,, 
and Laws than what I fee. For every mind necefTarily fees that two times two are four ; and that a 
Friend is to be prefer'd before a Dog. We mufl then conclude, That the Reafon which is confut- 
ed by all minds is an immutable and necefTary Reafon. 

Moreover, it is evident, that this fame reafon is Infinite. The mind of Man clearly conceives 
that there either are, or may be an infinite number of intelligible Triangles, Tetr agones, Pentagones, 
and other fuch like Figures. Nor does it only conceive, that the Ideas of figures are inexhauftible, 
and that it might ftill difcover new ones, though it fhould ftudy only thefe Figures to all Eternity ; 
but it perceives an Infinity in Extenfion. The mind clearly perceives that the number which mul- 
tiplied by it felf produces 5, or any of the numbers between 4 and 9, between 9 and \6, between 
16 and 25, &c. is a Quantity, a Relation, zFratlion, whofe terms contain more figures than will 
reach from one Pole ot the World to the other. It clearly fees it is fuch a Relation as none but God 
can comprehend, and that 'tis impoffible to exprefs it exaftly, becaufe to exprefs it we need a Era* 
tJion whofe two terms are Infinite. I might bring a great many fuch Examples,from which we might 
conclude, not only that the Mind of Man is finite, but that the Reafon he confults is Infinite. For 
in brief, his Mind clearly fees infinite, in this Reafon, though he does not comprehend it , fince he 
can compare incommenfurable numbers together , and know their Relations, though he cannot 
compare them with the unite. Or, (that we may ftick only to what is fenfible,) The Reafon which 
Man confults is infinite, fince it cannot be exhaufted,and it has always fomething to anfwer to what- 
ever we demand. 

But if it be true, that the Reafon whereof all Men participate be univerfal , and infinite .- if it 
be true that it is immutable and necefTary • it is certain, that it differs not from that of God himfelft 
For none but the univerfal and infinite Being contains in himfelf univerfal and infinite Reafon. All 
Creatures are particular Beings ; wherefore Vniverfal Reafon is not created. No Creatures are in- 
finite : Univerfal Reafon therefore is no Creature. But the Reafon we confult is not only Univer- 
fal and Infinite, but alfo necefTary and independant,and we conceive it in one fence more independant 
than God himfelf. For God cannot but ad by this Reafon ; on which he in one fence depends 5 
and which he muft needs confult and follow. But God confults only himfelf: He depends on no- 
thing. This Reafon therefore is not diftincb from him ; but is coeternal and confubftantial with 
him. We fee clearly that God cannot punifh an innocent Creature : that he cannot, fubje£t minds 
to Bodies, and that he's oblig'd to follow Order. We fee therefore the Rule, Order and Reafon 
of God -, for what other Wifdom than that of God can we fee,when we fear not to affirm,that God 
is oblig'd to follow it ? 

But after all, can we conceive any Wifdom which is not the Wifdom of God ? Does Solomon, 
who Ipeaks fo well of Wifdom, diftinguifh it into two forts ? Does not he teach us that which is 
Coeternal with God, that by which he has eftablifh'd the Order we fee in his Works, is the fame 
which prefides over all Minds ; and which Legiflators confult to make Juft and Reafonable Laws. 
We need only read the Eighth Qhapter of Proverbs, to be perfwaded of this Truth. I know that the 
Holy Scripture fpeaks of a certain Wifdom, which it names the Wifdom of the Age, the Wifdom of 
Men ; but then it fpeaks only according to appearance, or ordinary Opinion : For we learn in o- 
ther places, that that Wifdom is Folly , and Abomination , not only before God, but before all 
Men that confult Reafon. 

Certainly, if Eternal Laws and Truths depended on God, and were eftablifh'd by a free will of 
the Creator : in a word, if the Reafon we confult were not necefTary and independant : it feems evi- 
dent to me, that we muft bid farewel to all true Science \ and that we might err in affirming that 
the Arithmetick and Geometrie of theChinefe is the fame as ours. For indeed if it were not abfolute- 
ly necefTary that 2 times 4 fhould be 8, or the three Angles of a Triangle equal to two right ones ; 
what proof could we have that thefe forts of Truth were not like thofe which are receiv'd , but in 
fomeUniverfities,and which continue but a certain Seafon ? Do we clearly conceive that God' cannot 
defift to will what he will'd with a will abfolutely free and indifferent ? or rather do we clearly con- 
ceive it impoffible for God to have wilTd certain things, for a determinate time, or place, for fome 
particular Perfons, or certain kinds of Beings ; fuppofing him, as fome will have him, intirely free 
and indifferent in that Will •, For my own part, I cannot conceive any Necejfity in Indifferency, nor 
reconcile two fooppofite things together. 

Butletitbefuppos'd, that it can be clearly perceiv'd, that God by a Will intirely indifferent, 
has eftablifh'd for all times, and for all places, Laws and Truths Eternal ; and that at prefent they 
are immutable becaufe of that Decree. But where do they fee this Decree ? Has God created any 
Beingreprefentativeofit ? Will they fay it is a Modification of their Soul? They fee clearly 
ahat Decree •, for they have learn'd that Immutability is afcertain'd to EternalTruths and Laws : But 
where is it that they fee it ? Certainly if they fee it not in God, they fee it not at all For that 

Decree 



The Search after Truth. "f^'e 

Decree can be no where but in God, nor can it be feen but where he is. The Philofophers cannot 
then be certain of any thing, unjefs they confult God, and are anfwer'd by him. 'Tis in vain for 
^them to exclaim : and they muft either yield or hold their Peace. 

But after all, that Decree is an ungrounded Imagination. When we think on Order and Eter- 
nal Laws and Truths, we do not naturally enquire the Caufe • for they have none. We do not 
clearly fee the neceflity of this Decree, nor do we think immediately upon it : On the contrary we 
perceive evidently by a fimple view, that the nature of numbers, and intelligible Ideas is immuta- 
ble, neceflary, and independent. We fee clearly that it is abfolutely neceflary for 2 times 4 to be 
?, and that the fquare of the Diagonal of a fquare is double to that fquare. If we doubt of the ab- 
solute neceflity of thefe Truths, 'tis becaufe we turn our back upon their Light, reafon upon a falfe 
Principle , and fearch for their nature , their Immutability ^ and independance out of themfelves. 
Thus the Decree for the Immutability of thefe Truths is a fidion of the mind, which fuppofing it 
fees not wh3t it fees in the Wifdom of God j and knowing him to be the caufe of all things, thinks; 
it felf oblig'd to imagine a Decree to afcertain immutability to thefe Truths, which it cannot 
ehoofe but acknowledge to be immutable. But this Suppofition is falfe, and we ought to beware of 
it. 'Tis only in the Wifdom of God y that we fee Eternal, immutable, and neceflary Truths : nor can 
we fee any where elfe the Order which God himfelf is oblig'd to follow, as I have faid before : The 
mind is made for that Wifdom, and in one fence it can fee nothing elfe. For if it can fee the Crea- 
tures, 'tis befaufe He whom it fees, though in a very imperfect manner, during this life, compre- 
hends them all in the immenfity of his Being, in an intelligible manner, and proportionate to the 
mind, as I have fhown in another place. 

If we had not in our felves the Idea of Infinite, and if we faw not all things by the natural union 
of our mind with univerfal, and infinite Reafon, it feems evident, that we could not have liberty 
to think on all things : For the mind cannot deftre to confider things except it has fome Idea of 
tbem, and it is not in its Power to think adually on any thing but what it may defire to think on. 
And fb we (hall cafhier Man of his Liberty of thinking on All, if we feparate his mind from him 
who comprehends all. Again : fince we can love nothing but what we fee, if God fhould only 
give us particular Ideas, it is manifeft he would fo determine all the Motions ot our Will, that ft 
would be neceflary for us to Love only particular Beings. For in brief, if we had not the Idea of 
infinite, we could not love it : and if thofe who pofitively affirm they have no Idea of God , fpeak 
as they think, I fcruple not to affirm they have never lovM God, for nothing feems certainer to me, 
than that nothing can be the Objed of our Love, which is not of our conception. 
, Laftly, If Order, and Eternal Laws were not immutable, by the neceflity of their nature, the 
cleareft and ftrongeft proofs of Religion would, Iqueftionnot, be deftroy'd in their Principle, as 
well as Liberty, and the moft certain Sciences. For it is evident, that the Chriftian Religion 
which propofes JESUS CHRIST as a Mediator, and Refiorer, fuppofes the Corruption of 
nature, by original Sin. But what proof can we have of this Corruption ? The flelh wars, you 
will fay, againft the Spirit, has brought it into fubjedion, and tyrannizes over it. This I grant. 
But this, fays a Libertine, is no Diforder. This is as it pleas'd God ; who ordain'd it fo ; who is 
the Matter of his own decrees ; and who conftitutes what Order he thinks fit amongft his Creatures. 
How fhail it be prov'd that 'tis a Diforder for Minds to be fubjeded to Bodies, unlefs we have a 
clear Idea of Order, and neceflity, and know, that God himfelf is oblig'd to fallow it, by a ne- 
ceflary Love which he bears to himfelf ? But farther, ftppofing that Order depends on a free De- 
cree of God, we muft flill have rccourfe to him to be inform'd of it : God muft neverthelefs be con- 
fulted, ncitwithftanding the averfion which fome of the Learned have, to apply to him •, and this 
truth muft ftill be granted, that we have need of God to be inftruded. But that fuppos'd free De- 
cree which is the caufe of Order, is a meer fiftion of mind for the Reafons I have given. 

If it be not a neceflary Order that Man fhould be made for his Author, and that his will fhould 
be conformable to Order, or to the effential and neceflary will of God: If it be not true that 
jdftions axe good or ill, becaufe agreeable or repugnant to an immutable and neceflary Order, and that 
this fame order requires that the Good fhould be rewarded, and the Evil punifh'd: Laft of all, if 
all Men have not naturally a clear Idea of Order, even of fuch an one as God himfelf cannot will the 
contrary to what it prefer ibes, (fince God cannot will Diforder J certainly I can fee nothing but 
Univerfal Confufion. For what is there to be blam'd in the moft infamous and unjuft adions of the 
Heathens, to whom God has given no Laws ? What will be the reafon that will dare to judge them, 
if there be no fupream reafon that condemns them ? 

There is a Poet who fays, 'tis impoflible to diftinguifh Juftice from Injuftice : and a Philofopher Necmturi 
that will have it an infirmity, to blufh or be afham'd for infamous adions. Thefe and the like Pa- ^[fj"^ 
radoxes are often aflerted in the heat of Imagination, and in the tranfport of the Paflions. But how ^w»«! 
can we condemn thefe Opinions, if there be not an Univerfal and Neceflary Order, Rule, or Reafon, Lucretius. 
which is alfoprefent to thofe who can retire into themfelves ? We fear not on feveral occafions to Diogenes. 
judge others, and alfo our felves : but by what Authority fhould we do it, if the inward Reafon 
that judges , when we feem to pronounce Sentence againft others and our felves , be not 
fupream, and common to all men ? 

But if this Reafon were not prefent to thofe who retreat into their own Breaft ; and if the Hea- 
thens too, had not naturally fome union with the order we fpeak of •, upon the fcore of what Sin 
or Difobedience could they be reckon'd culpable , and by what Juftice could God punifh them ? 
This I fay, upon a Prophet's teaching me that God is willing to * make Men the Arbiters betwixt * Aldtl0W 

Inhabitants of Jerufalem, judge betwixt me and rnj Vineyard. Tf a . 5. 3 

him 



.136 



F. Malebranche Concerning 



him and his People, provided they determine by the immutable, and neceffary order of Juicice? 
Nero kill'd his Mother, it is true : But in what has he done amiis ? He follow'd the natural Motion 
of his Hatred : God gave him no Precept to the contrary : the Laws of the Jews were not made* 
for him. You'll fay perhaps that fuch adions are reftrain'd by the Natural Law, and that was 
known to him: But what prx>of can you have of it? For my own part I agree to it; becaufe indeed this 
is an irrefiftible Proof for an Immutable, and Neceflary Older :, and for the Knowledge which e- 
very Mind has of it, and that fo much more clear, as it is more united to Univerfai Reaibn^ and 
lefs fenfible to the impreffion of the Senfes and Paffions ; In a word, as it is more reafonable.. But 
'tis requifite that I explain. as clearly as poffibly I can , the fenfe I have about Natural, or Divine 
Order and Law. For the difficulty that is found to ernbwee my Opinion, proceeds, it may be, from 
the want of a dtftind conception of my meaning. 

'Tis certain that God comprehends in himfelf, after an intelligible manner, the Perfusions of all 
the Beings he has created, or can create :, and that by the'fe intelligible Perfections, he knows the 
Effenceof all things, as by his own Wills he knows their Exiftence. Which perfections are like- 
wife the immediate Objed of the Mind of Man, for the Reafons 1 have given. Therefore the in- 
telligible Ideas, or the Perfections which are in God, which reprefent to us what is external tohim, ; 
are abfolutely neceflary and immutable. But Truths are nothing but relations of Equality, or Inequa- 
lity, that are found between thefe Intelligible Beings, flnce it is only true that 2 times 2 are 4, or 
that 2 times 2 are not 5, becaufe there is a Relation of Equality between 2 times 2 and 4, and of In- 
equality between 2 times 2 and 5. Therefore Truths areas immutable, and neceflary as Ideas. Ic 
has ever been a truth, that 2 times 2 are 4, and 'tis impoflible it (hould ever be falfe : which is vi- 
Art. 6.& **kle, without any Neceflity, that God, as fupream Legiflator, fhould have eftablifh'd thefe Truths/ 
8. fo, as is faid by M. des Cartes , in his Anfwer to the fix Objedions. 

We eafily comprehend then what is Truth, but Men find fome difficulty to conceive what is this 
immutable, and neceflary Order : what is this Natural, and Divine Law which God neceflarily 
wills, and which the Righteous likewife will. For a Man's Righteoufnefs confifts in his Loving Or-* 
der i and in his conforming his Will in all things to it : as that which makes a Sinner in his difiiking 
Order in fome things, and willing that it (hould conform to his Defires. Yet methinks thefe things 
are not fo myfterious, as is imagin'd -, and I am perfwaded all the difficulty that is found in them 
proceeds from the trouble the mind is at to afpire to abftrad, and Metaphyseal Thoughts. Here 
then is in part what are my Thoughts of Order. 

'Tis evident that the perfections which are in God reprefentative of created, or poflible Beings^ 
are not all Equal : That thofe for Example which reprefent Bodies, are lefs noble, than others 
that reprefent Spirits •, and that even in thofe which reprefent only Bodies, or Spirits, there are 
degrees of perfection, greater and lefler ad infinitum. This is clearly, and eafily conceiv'd, though 
it be hard to reconcile the fimplicity oi the Divine Ejfence, with that variety of Intelligible Ideas, 
included in his Wifdom. For 'tis evident, that if all the Ideas of God were equal, he could fee no 
difference between his Works ; fince he cannot fee his Creatures, fave in that which is in himfelf, 
reprefenting them : And if the Idea of a Watch which fhows the Hour, with all the different Mo- 
tions of ^he Planets, were no perfeder than that of another, which only points to the hour, or 
than that of a Circle and a Square, a Watch would be no perfeder than a Circle. For we can judge - 
of the Perfection of Works, only by the Perfection of the Ideas we have of them : and if there 
was noi more underftanding, or fign of Wifdom, in a Watch, than a Circle," it would be as eafie 
to conceive the moft complicated Machines, as a Square, or a Circle. 

If then it be true, that God is the Vniverfal Being, who includes in Himfelf all Beings, in an 
intelligible manner, and that all thefe intelligible Beings which have in God a neceflary Exiftence, 
are not equally perfect } 'tis evident, there will be between them an Immutable and Necefla- 
ry Order, and that as there are Eternal andneceffary Truths, becaufe there are Relations of Magni- 
tudebetween intelligible Beings, there muft likewife be an immutable and neceffary Order, by reafon 
of the Relations 0/ Perfection, that are between thefe Beings. ; Tis therefore an Immutable Order, 
that Spirits fhould be nobler than Bodies, as it is a neceffary Truth, that 2 times 2 fhould be 4, or 
that 2 times 2 fhould not be 5 . 

But hitherto immutable Order feems rather a Speculative Truth, than a neceflary Law ; For if 
Order be confider'd but as we have juft now done ; we fee, for Example, that it is" True, that 
Minds are more noble than Bodies : but we do not fee that this Truth is at the fame time an Order, 
which has the force of a L^n>, and that there is an Obligation of preferring Minds before Bo- 
dies. It mufl: then be confider'd, that God loves himfelf, by a neceffary Love ; and therefore has 
a greater degree of love for that which in him reprefents, or includes a greater degree of perfedi- 
on,than for that which includes a lefs. So that if we will fuppofe an Intelligible Mind to be athoufand 
times perfeder, than an Intelligible Body, the love wherewith God loves Himfelf, muft neceflarily be 
a thoufand times greater for the former, than for the latter. For the Love of God is neceflarily 
proportion'd to the Order which is between the intelligible Beings, that he includes. Infomuch 
that the Order which is purely Speculative, has the force of a Law in refped of God himfelf, fup- 
pofing, as is certain, that God loves himfelf Neceffarily. And God cannot love Intelligible Bodies, 
more than Intelligible CMinds, though he may love created Bodies better than created Minds, as I 
fhall mow by and by. 

Now that immutable Order, which has the force of a Law in regard of God .himfelf, has vifibly 
the force of a Law in reference to us. For this Order we know, and our natural love comports 
with it, when we retire into our felves, and our Senfes. and Paffions leave us to our Liberty ; In a 

word. 



The Search after Truth* \y* 

»roro!,wricn our Self-love does not corrupt our Natural. Being we are made for God,and that 'tis im* 
j>oflible for us to be quite feparate from him, we difcern in him this Order, and we are naturally 
invited to love it. For 'tis His Light which enlightens us, and his Love which animates us though 
our Senfes and Paflions obfcure this Light, and determine againft Order, the Impreffion we receive 
to love according to it. But in fpite of Concupifcencc which conceals this Order, and hinders us 
from following it, it is ftill an effcntial, and indifpenfable Law to us •, and not only to us, but to all 
created Intilligences, and even to the Damn'd. For 1 do not believe they are fo utterly eftrang'd 
from God, as not to have a faint Idea of Order ; as not to find ftill fome beauty in it,} and even 
to be ready to conform to it in fome particular Infhnces, which are not prejudicial to Self-Love. 
Corruption of Heart confiits in Opposition to Order. Therefore Malice or Corruption of Will^being 
not equal, even among the Damn'd, it is plain, they are not all equally oppofite to Order , and thac 
they do not hate it in all cafes, unlefs in confequence of their 1-atred to God For as no one can 
hate Good confiderM barely as fuch, fo no one can hate Order, but when it feems to thwart his 
Inclinations. But though it feem contrary to our Inclinations, it never thelefs retains the force of a 
Law, which Condemns, and alfo punifhes us, by a W~ m that never dies. 

Now then we fee what Order is, and how it has the ftrength of a Law, by that neceffary Love 
which God has for himfelf. We conceive how this Law comes to be general for all Minds God 
not excepted, and why it is neceffary, and abfolutely indifpenfible Laff.ly, we conceive, or we 
may eafdy conceive in general, that it is the Principle of all Divine and Humane Laws, and that 
'tis according to this Law that all Intelligences are judg'd, and all Creatures difpos'd in the re- 
ipedive rank that belongs to them. 

I acknowledge it is not eafie to explain all this in particular, and I venture not to" -undertake It. 
For fhould I go to fhow the Connexion particular Laws have with, the general^ and account for the 
agreement which certain manners of ading have to Order, 1 fhould be forc'd to engage in Difficul- 
ties, that it may be I could not refolve, and which would lead me out of fight of ray fubjed. 

Neverthelefs if it be confiderM that God neither has, nor can have any other Law, than his own 
Wifdom, and the neceffary Love he has for it, we fhall eafily judge, that all Divine Laws muft de- 
pend on it : And if it be obferv'd. that he has made the World with reference only to thatWifdom 
and Love, fince he ads only for Himfelf • we mall not doubt but all natural Laws muft tend to the 
Prefervation, and Perfedion of this World, according to indifpenfable Order, and by their de- 
pendance on neceffary Love. For the Wifdom and Will of God regulates all things. 

There is no need I fhould explain at prefent, this Principle more at large : what I have already 
faid being fufficient to infer this Confequence, That in the firft inftitution of Nature it was Impof- 
fible for Minds to be fubjeded to Bodies. For fince God cannot ad without Knowledge and againft: 
his Witt, he has made the World by his Wifdom, and by the motion of his Love : He has made all 
things by his Son, and in his Holy Spirit, as we are taught in Scripture. Now in the Wifdom of 
God, Minds are perfeder than Bodies, and by the neceffary Love God has for himfelf, he prefers 
what is more perfed to what is lefs fo. Therefore it is not poffible that Minds fhould be fubjed to 
Bodies in the firft inftitution of Nature. Otherwife it muft be faid, that God in creating the 
World, has not follow'd the Rules of his Eternal Wifdom, nor the Motions of his natural and ne- 
ceffary Love : which not only is inconceivable, but involves a manifeft contradidion. 

True it is that at prefent the created Mind is debas'd below a material and fenfible Body, but 
that's becaufe Order confidered as a neceffary Law, will have it fb. 'Tis becaufe God loving him- 
felf by a neceffary Love, which is always his Inviolable Law, cannot love Spirits that are repugnant 
to him, nor consequently prefer them to Bodies, in which there is nothing evil, nor in the hatred 
of God. For God loves not Sinners in themfelves. Nor would they fubfift in the Univerfe but 
through JESUS CHRIST. God neither preferves them, nor loves them, but that they may p^J^-jl. 
ceafe to be Sinners, through the Grace of CHRIST JESUS: or that, if they remain eter- i ' f a " 
nally Sinners, they may be eternally condemned, by immutable and neceffary Order, and by the Chriftian 
Judgment of our L O R D, by vertue of whom they fubfift for the Glory of the Divine Juftice : Conveifa- 
for without Him they would be annihilated. This I fay by the way, to clear fome difficulties that tions * 
might remain touching what I faid elfewhere about Original Sin, or the general Corruption of 
Nature. 

'Tis, if I miftake not, a very ufeful refledion to confider that the Mind has but two ways of 
knowing Ob jeds. By Light and by Senfation. It fees them by Light, when it has a clear Idea of 
them, and when by confuting that Idea it can difcover all the properties whereof they are capa^ 
ble. It fees things by Senfation, when it finds not in it felf their clear Idea to confult it -, and fo 
cannot clearly difcover their properties ; but only know them by a confus'd Senfation without Light 
and Evidence. 'Tis by Light and a clear Idea the mind fees the E [fences of things, Numbers and 
Extenfion : 'Tis by a confusM Idea, or Senfation, that it judges of the Exijlence of Creatures, and 
knows its own. 

What the Mind perceives by Light, or by a clear Idea , it perceives in a moft perfed manner : 
moreover, it fees clearly that all the Obfcurity, or Imperfedion of its Knowledge proceeds from 
its own Weaknefs and Limitation, or from want of Application, and not from the Imperfedion 
of the Idea it perceives. But what the mind perceives by Senfation is never clearly known : not for 
want of any Application on part of the Mind, (for we always are very applicative to what we feel,) 
but by the defedivenefs of the Idea, which is extreamly obfcure and confus'd. 

Hence we may conclude that it is in God, or in an immutable nature, that we fee all that we 
know by Light,or a clear Idea ; not only becaufe we difcover byLight,only numbers Extenfion, and 
the Eflences of Beings, which depend not on a free Ad of God, as 1 have already faid ^ but alfo 

M m becaufe 



1^3 F. Malebranche Concerning 

becarfc ( - r e know thefe things in a very perfed manner, and we fhould even know them in an infi- 
nitely perfect manner^ if cu. thinking Capacity weie infinite, fince nothing is wanting to the Idea 
that leprefenis them. We ought likewifeto conclude, that we fee in our felves whatever we know 
by Senfation, However, this is not, as if we -could produce in our felves any new modification, or 
that the fenfations, , or modifications of our Soul could reprefent the Objects, on occalion whereof 
God excites them in us : But only that our Senfations which are not diftinguifbed from our felves, 
and confequently cannot reprefent any thing diftindt from us, may neverthelefs reprefent the exi- 
ftence of Beings, or caufe us to judge that they exift. Fo God railing Senfations in us upon the 
prefence of Objects, by an action that has nothing fenfible, we fancy we receive from the Object 
not only the Idea which reprefents its effence, but alfo the Senfation which makes us judge of its 
exiftence : For there is always a pure Idea, and a confufed Senfation in the Knowledge we have of 
things as actually exifting, if we except that of God, and of our own Soul. I except the Exiftence 
of God. For this we know by a pure Idea, and without Senfation, lince it depends not on any 
caufe, and is included in the Idea of a neceffary Being, as the Equality of Diameters is included 
in the Idea of a Circle. And I except the Exiftence of our Soul •, becaufe we are inwardly confeious 
that we Think, Will, and Feel: and have no clear Idea of otir Soul, as 1 have fufficiently explain- 
ed in the feventh Chapter of the fecond Part of the third Book, and elfe where. 

Thefe are fome of the Reafons which we have to add to thofe already given, to prove that all our 
Light is deriv'd to us from God, and that the immediate, and direct Object of our clear and evi- 
dent notices is an immutable, and neceffary Nature : Some Objections are ufually made againft this 
Opinion \ which I fhall now endeavour to folve. 



Againft what has been [aid, that none hut God enlightens us^ and that we fee all 

things in him. 

OBJECTION I. 

OU R Soul thinks becaufe it is her Nature. God in creating her gave her the faculty of think- 
ing : and (he needs nothing more. But if any thing elfe is wanting, let us ftick to what Ex- 
perience teaches us of ovr fenfes, which is, that they are the manifeft caufes of our Ideas. 'Tis ari 
ill way ofPhilofophizing to argue againft Experience. 

ANSWER. 

I cannot but admire that the Cartefian Gentlemen, who with fo much reafon reject and fcorn the 
general Terms of Nature and faculty fhould fo willingly employ them on this occafion. They cry 
out againft a Man that fhall fay the Fire burns by its nature , and converts certain Bodies into Glafs 
by a natural Faculty : And yet fome of them fear not to fay that the Humane Mind produces the 
Ideas of all things in it felf by its nature, and becaufe it has a thinking faculty. But be it fpoken 
without offence, thefe words are no more fignifkative in their Mouths, than in the Peripateticks, 
I know very well that the Soul is capable of thinking. But 1 know like wife that extenfion is capa- 
ble of Figures : The Soul is capable of Will as matter is of Motion. But as it is falfe that matter 
though capable of figure, and motion, has in it felf a force, faculty^ or nature by which it can 
move it felf, and give it felf now a round figure, and anon a fquare one ; fo though the Soul be 
naturally, and effentially capable of Knowledge, and Will, it is falfe that fhe has Faculties where- 
by fhe can produce in her Ideas, or motion towards good. There is a great difference between be- 
ing Moveable, and felf moving. Matter is by its nature moveable, and capable of Figures- nor 
can it fubfift without a figure. But it neither moves it felf, nor fhapes it felf, nor has it any facul- 
ty to do it, The Mind is of its nature capable of motion, and Ideas I acknowledge. But it nei- 
ther moves, nor enlightens its felf. But 'tis God that does all in Minds, as well as in Bodies. 
See the Can we ^ av tnaC God effects the changes that happen in matter, and that he caufes not thofe 

firfc illu- which occur in the Mind ? Is this to give to God the things that are his, to leave thefe latter fort of 
ftration. Beings to their own management ? Is he not equally Lord of all things? Is he not the Creator, 
Prefer ver, and true mover of Minds as well as Bodies? Certainly he makes all, both Subftances, 
Accidents, Beings, and Modes of Being. For in fhort, he knows all : But he knows nothing but 
what he does. We therefore ftreighten him in his Knowledge, if we limit him in his Action. 

But if it muftbe faid thatCreatures have fach faculties as are commonly conceived,and that natural 
Bodies have a Nature which is the Principle of their Motion and Reft, as fays Ariftotle and his Follow- 
ers: This indeed overthrows all my Ideas •, but yet I will rather agree to it, than fay the Mind 
enlightens it felf. Men may fay that theSoul has the force of movjng divei fly the Limbs of herBody, 
and of communicating to them Senfe and Life: They may. fay, if they pleafe, that it is fhe that 
gives heat to the Blood, motion to the Spirits ! and to the reft of her Body, its Bulk, Situation and 
Figure : Only let them not fay that the Mind gives Light and Motion to it felf. If God works not 
all, let us allow him at leaft to do what is Nobleft and Perfecteft in the World. And if Creatures 
do any thing, let them move Bodies, and range and pofture them as they think fit : But let them 
never act upon Minds. 
We will fay (\i that will ferve) that Bodies move each other, after they have been mov'd them- 

felves 



The Search after Truth'. I2q 

f elves ; or rather will fit down ignorant of the different Difpofitions of matter as not concerning 
us : But let not our Minds be ignorant whence proceeds the Light that enlightens thtm : Let them 
know frofn what hind they receive all that can make them more happy, or more perfect, let them 
at knowledge their dependence in its whole extent, and know, that whatever rhev actually have, 
God gives them every moment •, for as fays a great Father upon another Subject, "7m a very criminal Eft quippe 
fPride to ufe the gifts of God, as our onm innate Perfections. -Above all let us take heed of imagining fupi-rb'a,^ 
that the Senfes inftru't Reifon, that the Body enlightens the Mind, that the Soul receive of the bo- ^ ccm ^ 
dy what it waits it felf. We had better believe our felves independent, than to believe we truly ^TcLais* 1 ' 
depend on Bodies. 'Tis much better to be our own Miters, thm to feek for Mailers a- tanquam 
mong inferior Creatures. But we had much better fubmit our felves to Eternal Truth, which af- math. 
lures usin the Gofpel, that none elfe is our Inftrudtor 5 than to believe the Teftimony of our Senfes, s ; Beni.rfs 
or of fome Men, who prefume to talk to us as our Teachers. Experience (whatever may be faid,) ^%» rfo 
does not countenance prejudices. For our Senfes, no lefs than our Teachers after the Flefh, are 
only occafionalcaufes of the Inftrucrion which Eternal Wifdom infufes into our moft inward Reafon. 
But becaufe this Wifdom enlightens us by an infenfible Operation, we imagine it is our Eyes, or the 
Words of thofe that verberate the Air againft our Ears, who produce this Light, or pronounce 
that intelligible Voice which inftructs us. And for this Reafon, as I have faid in another place, our 
L O R D thought it not enough to inftrud us in an inte'Hble manner by his Divinity ^ unlefs he 
condefcended alfo to inform us in a fenfible wav bv his Humanity, thereby teaching us that he is e- 
yery way our Mailer. And beraufe we cannot eafily retire into our felves, to confult him, in Qua- 
lity of eternalTruth, immutable Order , intelligible Light, he has rendred Truth fenfible by his Words, 
O^der Amiable by his Example, Light Vifible by a Body which breakstne force of itsLuilre ; and af- 
ter all we are Hill fo ung-ateful, unjufl, flupid and infenfible, as to reiped: as our Mailers, aid that 
againft his exprefs prohibition, not only other Men, buc it may be the moft infenfible and vileft 
Bodies. 

OBJECTION II. 

Si.ice the Soul is more perfect than Bodies, how comes it that fhe cannot include in her that 
which reprefe its them ? Why may not the Idea of extenfion be one of her Modifications ^ 'tis 
true there is none but God who acts in her, and modifies her? But why muft (he fee Bodies in 
G , 11 fhe caa fee th^m ia her own Subflance, fhe is not material, it's confefs'd. But God, though 
a pure Spirit, fees Bodies in himfelf } why then may not the Soul though Spiritual fee Bodies by 
coufideiing for/t//? 

ANSWER.- 

Do not we fee that there is this difference between God and the Humane Soul, that Gcd is Being 
without tefhidtion, Univerfal, Infinite Being, and the Soul is a fort of particular Being ? fj "T« a This is 
property of infinite to be at the fame time one, and yet all things ; composed as we may fay of infinite per- omitted in 
feilwns, and yet fo fimple that every per fecJion he poffefjes, includes all the other without ary real diftmfti- '? me Edi ' 
on • for as every Divine perfeclion is infinite, it conflitutes the whole Divine Effence ; But the Soul fince a ti0ns * 
limited Being cannot have extenfion in her without becoming material."] God includes in himfelt Bo- 
dies in an intelligible manner. He fees their EfTences or Ideas, in his Wiidom •, and their Exi- 
flencein his Love, or in his Wills. This muft: neceffarily be faid, fince God has made Bodies -, 
and he knew what he made before any thing was created. But the Soul cannot fee in her felf what 
fhe does not contain : Nor can fhe fee clearly what fhe does contain, but only has a confus'd Senia- 
tion of it. I explain my felf. 

The Soul does not include Intelligible extenfion, as one of her modes of Being : Becaufe this ex- 
tenfion is not any mode of Being but a true Being. We can conceive that Extenfion feparately from 
any thing elfe, but we cannot conceive any modes of Being without perceiving the Subject, or Be- 
ing whereof they are the modes. We perceive this extenfion without thinking on oui mind, and 
we cannot conceive it to be any modification of our mind. This extenfion when circumfcrib'd 
makes fome figure, but the Limits of the mind cannot be figured. This extenfion having parts 
may be divided, at leaft in one fence, but we fee nothing in the Soul that is divifible. This exten- 
fion therefore that w&fee is no mode of the minds Exiftence, and therefore the mind cannot fee it 
within it felf. How can we fee it in one fpecies of Being all forts of Beings? In one particular and 
finite Being, a Triangle in general, and infinite Triangles ? For in fine, the Soul perceives a Tri- 
angle, or a Circle in general, though it be a Contradiction for the Soul to have a modification in 
general. The Senfations of Colour which the Soul afcribes to figures make them particular, becaufe 
no modification of a particular Being can be general. 

Surely we may affirm what we clearly conceive. But we clearly conceive that theExtenfion which 
we fee is fomething diftind from our felves, therefore we may affirm, that this extenfion is not a 
modification of our Being, and that 'tis fometbing actually diftind from us. For we muft obferve, 
that the Sun for tnitance that we fee is not that we look lipon. The Sun and all we fee in the ma- 
terial World is not vifible of it felf, as 1 have formerly prov'd. The Soul can only fee the Sun to 
which fhe is immediately united. But we have a clear Perception, and a dijiintl Senfation, that the 
Sun is fomething different from us. Therefore we fpeak againft our Light, and againft our Confci- 
ence, when we fay the Soul fees all furrounding Bodies in her own modifications. 

Pleafure, Pain, Savour, Heat, Colour, all our Senfations, and Paffions, are the modifications of 

bur Soul. But though they be fo, do we clearly know them? Can we compare Heat with Savour, 

• Odor 



j^d F. Malebranche Concerning 

Odor with Colour ? Can we difcover what Relation there is between Red and Green 1 Or even be- 
tween Green and Green ? 'Tis not fo with figures, we compare them with one another, we find 
out exactly their Proportions : We know precifely that the ' diagonal of a Square, multiplied 
into it felf, makes a Square, that's double to the former, what Analogy is there between thefe in- 
telligible Figures, which are moft clear Ideas, with the modifications of our Soul, which are only 
confus'd Senfations ? And why mult it be pretended, that intelligible Figures cannot be perceived 
by the Soul, unlefs they be her modifications, fince the Soul knows not any of her modifications by 
a clear Idea, but only by Confcience or internal Senfe ? As I have elfewhere prov'd, and lhall prove 
again in the next llluftration. If we could not fee the figures of Bodies, except in our felves,they 
would be on the contrary unintelligible to us : For we do not know our felves, but are darknefs to 
our felves •, and we mult caft our Eye outward if we would behold our felves / And we lhall never 
know what we are till we lhall contemplate our felves in him who is our Light, and in whom all 
things become Light. For no where but in God material Beings are perfectly intelligible ^ but out 
of him the rnoft Spiritual Subltances are utterly invifible. The Idea of Extenfion, which we fee in 
God, is moft clear. But though we fee not in God the Idea of our Soul, we are very confcious that 
we exifi^ and are fenfible of what we actually have. But 'tis impoffible to difcover what we are, or 
any of the modifications we are capable of. 

OBJECTION III. 

In God there is nothing moveable : In him there is nothing Figured. If there be a Sun in the In= 
telligible World, that Sun is always equal to it felf •, whereas the vifible Sun appears bigger when' 
near the Horizon, than when remote from it, therefore it is not the intelligible Sun we fee. The 
cafe is the fame in refpedt of other Creatures. Therefore we fee not in God the Works of Godo' 

A N S W E R. 

To give an Anfvver to all this we need only confider, that God includes within himfelf, an infi- 
nite intelligible Extenfion ^ For God knows Extenfion, in. as much as he has made it, and he can 
know it no otherwife than in himfelf. Therefore as the mind may perceive part of that intelligi- 
ble Extenfion, which God includes, it is certain it may perceive in God all Figures ; for a\\ finite In- 
telligible Extenfion is neceffarily an intelligible Figure, fince Figure is nothing but the termination of 
Extenfion. Moreover that Figure of intelligible and general Extenfion becomes fenfible, and parti- 
cular, by Colour, or fome other fenfible Quality, which the Soul afcribes to it j for the Soul almoffc 
always beftows her own Senfation upon a lively and affecting Idea. Thus there is no neceffity, that 
there fhould be in God fenfible Bodies, or Figures in Intelligible Extenfion , in order to our feeing 
them in God, or that God may fee them himfelf, though he confiders nothing but himfelf. 

So likewife if it be conceived that a Figure of intelligible Extenfion, made fenfible by Colour, 
fhould be taken, fucceffively, from the different Parts of that fame infinite Extenfion - or if it be 
conceiv'd that a Figure of Intelligible Extenfion may turn upon its Center, or fucceffively approach 
another, we perceive the motion of a fenfible or Intelligible Figure, though there be no motion in 
intelligible Extenfion. For God fees not the motion of Bodies in his Sub/lance, or in the Idea he 
has of them in himfelf. But only by the knowledge he has of his own Wilis relating to them. He 
fees their Exiftence only by that way, becaufe his Will only gives Being to all things. The Wills of 
God change nothing in his Subftance : nor do they move it : Perhaps Intelligible Extenfion is im- 
moveable all manner of ways, even intelligibly. But though we fee only this intelligible Extenfion, 
immoveable or otherwife, it feems moveable to us, becaufe of the Senfation of Colour^ or the con- 
fufcd Image remaining after the Senfation, which we fucceffively annex to the feveral parts of In- 
telligible Extenfion, that furnilhes us with an Idea, when we fee or imagine the motion of any 
Body. 

From what I have faid, we may underftand why we fee the Intelligible Sun, fometimes greater 
and fometimes lefs, though it be always the fame with refpedt to God. For all that is requir'd to 
this, is but to fee, one while, a greater part of Intelligible Extenfion, and another while a lefs, 
and to have a lively Senfation of Light, tobeftow upon that part of Extenfion. Now as all the 
Parts of Intelligible Extenfion are all of the fame nature, they may all indifferently reprefent any 
Body whatever. 

It muft not be imaginM that the Intelligible World has any fiich relation to the material and fen- 
fible, that there mult be for inftance an Intelligible Sun, an intelligible Horfe, and an Intelligible 
Tree dcftinM to reprefent to us the Sun, an Horfe and a Tree ^ and that all thofe who fee the Sua 
necctfarily fee this pretended intelligible Sun. All intelligible Extenfion may be conceived Circu- 
lar, or to have an intelligible Figure of an Horfe, or a Tree, and fo may ferve to reprefent the 
Sun, an Horfe and Tree, and confequently be a Sun, a Horfe and a Tree in the intelligible World, 
and likewife to become a fenfible and vifible Sun, Horfe, and Tree, if the Soul has any Senfation 
occafion by Bodies to affix to thefe Ideas. 

Therefore when I faid that we faw different Bodies by the knowledge we have of the Perfections 
of God which reprefent them : I did not mean precifely that there were certain particular Ideas in 
God to reprefent each Body in particular ; and that we faw fuch a particular Idea, in feeing fuch a 
particular Body. For it is certain we could not fee this Body fometimes great, and fometimes fmall, 

one 



The Sedrch after Truth. i 4 1 

fene while round, and another while fquare, if we faw it by a particular Idea, that was always the 
feme. But I fay we fee all things in God, by the application God makes ot intelligible Extenfion to 
our mind, in a thoufand different ways, and that thus intelligible Extenfion includes in it all the 
Perfections, or rather differences, of Bodies -, becaufe of the different Senfations, the Soul beftows 
upon the Ideas which fhe receives occafionally from them. I have difcours'd after another manner • 
but it mould be concluded, that wasonlf to make fomeof my proofs more forcible and fenfible- 
and it mould not be gather'd from what I have here faid, t] it the foundation of thofe proofs is 
ruin'd. I could give the reafons of the different ways wherein 1 explain my felf, if I thought it ne- 
ceflary. 

I venture not to dive deeper into this Subject, for fear of fpeaking things either too Abftracr, or 
Uncommon: Or, if that feem better, for fear of hazarding to fpeak things which I neither know.* 
nor am capable of difcovering : Only let me produce thofe paflages of Scripture which fcem con- 
trary to what I have now eftablifh'd, which I mail endeavour to Explain. 

OBJECTION. 

; St. John in his Gofpel , and in the.firfr. of his Epiftles, fays, No man bath feen God at any time : ch. 1. i8t*. 
The only begotten Son who is in the bofom of the father he hath declar d him. Ch.4. 12°. 

ANSWER. 

I anfwer, that 'tis not properly to fee God, to fee the Creatures in him. 'Tis not to fee his ef- 
fence to fee the eff-nces of Creatures irt his Subftance^ as it is not to fee a Mirrour, to view only 
the Objeds it reprefeats. , 

Not but that we might fay with.St. Paul, St. Auftin, St. Gregory, and many other. Fathers of the Cor. 13. 
Church, that we fee God in this Life, though in a very imperfect Manner. The Words cf St. Gre- 
gory in his Morals upon Job, are thefe. A luce incorruptibili caligo nos noftra corruptionis obfeurat ; cumq- L.31.C.20 
& videri aliquatenus poteft & tamen videri lux ipjaficuti eft non poteft, quam longe fit indicat. Quam ft 
mens non cerneret,nec quia longe effe videret.Si autem perfttle jam cerneret,profeclo ham quafifcr caliginem 
non videret. lgitur quia nee omnino cernitur, nee rurfum omntno non cernitur, retle diclum eft, quia a longe 
Deus videfur. Though. St. Gregory in explaining this paffage of Jobficuli ejus a longe profpiciunt fays, 
that in this Life we only fee God a far of: This is not as if God were not mod prefent to us •, but 
that the Clouds of our Concupifcence conceal him from us. Caligo nos noftra corruptionis objeur at. 
For in other places, he with St. Auftin compares the light of God, which is God lumfelf, to the 
Light of the Sun which furrounds us, and which we fee not becaufe we are blind, or fhut our Eyes 
when dazled with its Luftre. In Sole oculos claufos tenemus, 

St. Auftin goes farther yet than his faithful Difciple St. Gregory. For though he confeffes that we 
know God but in a very imperfect, manner at prefent, yet he affirms, in feveral places, that God Vrop'mquu 
is better known to us, than thofe things wefancy we know belt. He that has made all things, ffays «>" ?"*»?»* 
he) is near er us , than his Creatures; For in him we have Life , and Motion and Being, Mo ft of 'muitJqu* 
Created Beings are not proportionate to our Mind, becaufe they are corporeal, and of a fort diftinguifhd fdlafunt. 
from it. And lower °. The Inquirers into the fecrets of Nature, are juftly condemn d in the Book of Wif- In illo e- 
dom ; for if they have been able to penetrate what is mo ft fecret and unreveafd to Men, with how much nim vivi - 
gr eater eafe might they have difcover'dthe Author and Sovereign of the Vniverfe ; The Foundations of the ^L?% 
Earth are hid from our Eyes : But he that laid the Foundations is prefent to our Minds. And for this fumus.' 
Reafon that Holy Father believes, that he that has Charity knows God better than he knows his iftorum au- 
Brother. Ecce flays he) jam poteft Notiorem Deum habere quam Fratrem. Plane Notiorem, quia prafen- te ^ pteraf, 
tiorem .' Notiorem quia interior em : Notiorem quia certiorem. I bring not any other proofs of St. r ^ mti f«"t 
Auftinh Opinion : Thofe who defirethem, may fine! all forts in that learn'd Collection Ambrofius ft™^ „~ t 
Vitlor has made of them, in the fecond Volume of his Chriftian Philofophy. dijfimiihZ 

dinem fiii generis. %ette culp.mwrin libro Japientia inquifitores hujus fxculi. Si enim tantum, iriquit , potuerunt valere utpoflent 
aeftimare foculum , quomodo ejus Sominum , non facilius inveneruht ? Ignou enim funt 'funddmenta Cculis nojiris , £? qui fumavit 
terram propinqmt metitibus noftrir. De Gen. ad litt. 1. 3. ch. 16, De Trinitate, lib. 8- ch. 8. 

But to return to the paffage of St. John, No man has feen God at any time I believe the defign of 
the Evangelift, in affirming no Man has feen God, is to ftate the difference between the Old and 
NewTeftament. Between J E S U S CHRIST and the Patriarchs and Prophets, of whom it is 
written, that they have feen God. For Mofes, Jacob, Ifaiah, and others, faw God only with cor- 
poreal Eyes, and under an unknown Form : They have not feen him in himfelf, Deum nemovidit 
unquam ; But the only Son, who' is in the Bolbm of the Father , has inftru&ed us in what He has 
(Qen. Vnigtnitus qui eft in finu Patris : Jpfe enarravit. 

OBJECTION. * 

St. Paul writing to Timothy, fays, that God inhabits inacceffible Light which no man hath f§en\ nor iTim.i$„ 
i An fee if the Light of God cannot be approached to, we cannot fee all things in it **• 

1ST n AN- 



I2j.a F. MaLebranche Concerning 

ANSWER. ' 

St. Paul cannot be contrary to St. John who allures us, that JESUS CHRIST, is the true 
Light that lightens all Men who come into the World. For. the mind of Man, which many of 
the * Fathers call Illuminated, or Enlightned Light. Lumen llluminatum, is Enlightned only with 

* St. CyrlU the Light of Eternal Wifdom, which the Fathers therefore call Illuminating Light, Lumen Illuminans. 

of Alexan- jyavid advifes to approach to God, and to be enlightned by him ; Accedite ad eum & iUuminaminu 

the* word" But ll0W can we ^ e en ^g htne ^ by it, if we cannot fee the Light by which we are to be enlightned ? 

of st.fohn, Therefore when St. Paul fays, that Light is inacceffible, he means to f Carnal Man who cannot re- 

Erat lux tire into himfelf to contemplate it : Or if he fpeaks of all Men, 'tis becaufe there are none but are 

vera. difturb'd from the perfecl: Contemplation of Truth, becaufe our Body incelTantly troubles the at- 

St. Aug. ten f 10n f our m ind. 

Tr. 14. 

upon St. John, St. Greg. c. 27. upon 28 of Job. \ Jnacceffibilem dixit ; fed omni bomini bumana fapienti : Scriptura quippefacra omnes 

carnalium fellatores humanitatis nomine notare fokt. St. (7«g. in,cap. 28. J06. 

OBJECT ION. - 

Ex.33. 20. God anfwering Mofes when he defired to fee him, fays, Thou canjlnotfee my Face ; for there fhali 
no man fee Me and live. 

ANSWER. 

It is evident that the literal fence of this PalTage is not contrary to what I have faid hitherto. 

For I do not fuppofe it poffible to fee God in this life, as Mofes defired to fee Him. However, I 

Anfwer, that we mult die to fee God : For the Soul unites herfelfto Truth proportionably as (he 

quits her union with the Body : Which is a Truth that cannot be fnfficiehtly confider'd. Thofe 

who follow the Motions of their paffions ^ thofe whofe Imagination is dehTd, with the enjoyment 

of Pleafures ; Thofe who have ftrengthned the Union, and- Correfpondence of their Mind with 

Neither, is i^ c \ r Body : in a word, thofe who live cannot fee God : For they cannot retire into themfelves to 

zt found m con r/ u i t t j-, e Truth. Happy therefore are they who have a pure Heart, a difengag'd Spirit, a clear 

the living. Imagination, who have no dependance on the World, and hardly any on the Body. In a word, 

Job 28. ' happy are the Dead, for they (hall fee God. Wifdom has publifhd it openly upon the Mountain ; 

i3» and Wifdom whifpers it fecretly to thofe who confuit Hei* by retiring into themfelves. 

Thofe who are conliantly quickning in them the Concupifcence of Pride, who are indefatigably 
forming a thoufand Ambitious defigns, who unite, and even enflave their Soul, not only to the Bo- 
dy, but all furrounding Obje&s : In a word, thofe who Live not only the Life of the Body, but alfo 
that of the World, cannot fee God : For WISDOM inhabits the molt retired and inward Rea- 
fon, whilft they perpetually expand themfelves abroad. 

But fuch as cohitantly deaden the Activity of their Senfes, who faithfully preferve the Purity of 
their Imagination,, who couragioufly refiftthe Motionsof their Paffions ^ In a word, that break all 
thofe Bonds whereby others continue enchain'd to theBody'and fenfible grandeur ; may difcover in- 
finite Truths, and fee that Wifdom which is hid from the Eyes of all Living, They after a fort do 
job 28. cea f e to live when they, retire into themfelves : They relinquish the Body when they draw near to 
21, Truth. For the mind of Man obtains that Site and Pofition between God and Bodies, that it can 

never quit the one but it mult approach the other. It cannot draw towards God bat it mult re- 
move from Bodies, nor purfue Bodies but it mult recede from God : But becaufe we cannot give 
an abfolute Farewell to the Body, till Death makes the feparation, I confefs it impoffible, till then, 
to be perfectly united to God. We may at prefent, as fays St. Paul, fee God confufedly as in a 
■ r^ we ' u Glafs, but we cannot fee him face to face. Non videbit me homo & vivet. Yet we may fee him in 
aiiafs P art * that is , imperfectly and confufedly. 
darkly, but then face to face. Now I know in part, &c. 1 Cof. 13. 2. 

It mult not be imagin'd, that life is equal in all Men living, or that it confifts in an indivifible 
point. The Dominion of the Body over the Mind, which withftands our uniting our felves with 
God by the Knowledge of Truth, is fufceptible of more and lefs. The Soul is not equally in all 
Men united by Senfations to the Body, which fhe animates, nor by Paffions to thofe, her Inclinati- 
ons carry her to : And there are fome who fo mortifie the Concupifcence of Pleafure, and of Pride 
within them , that they fcarce retain any Commerce with their Body, or the World ; and foare as 
it were Dead : St. Paul is a great inftance hereof, who chaftis'd his Body , and brought it to fub- 
je&ion ; who was fo humbled, and deftroy'd, that he thought no longer on the World, nor the 
World on him : For the World was dead, and crucified to him, as he was dead and crucified in 
the World. And on this account it was, fays St. Gregory, that he was Co fenfible to Truth, and fo 
prepar'd to receive thofe Divine Lights which are included in his Epiftles ; which however all glo- 
, rious and fplendid, make no impreffion fave on thofe who mortifie their Senfes and Paffions by his 

rat Man' Example. For as he fays himfelf, the carnal and fenfible Man cannot comprehend Spiritual things: 

receive tb not the things of the Spirit of God, for they are foolijbnefs unto him. . 1 Cor. c. 2. 1 4. Ad Moyfen dicitur, non videbit me- homo & 
vivet, ac fi aperte diceretur : Nullus unquam Deum Jpiritualiter videt qui mundo carwtlitcr vivit. St. Greg, upon the 28. of 
.fo6ch.2§. 

Becaufe 



The Search after Truth. j » ? 

■ Becaufe Worldly addrefs the tall of the Age , to finenefs of Wit , the Nicety, the Livelinefs the 
Beauty of Imagination, whereby we live to the World, and the World to us , infufe into our 

Mindan incredible ftupidity and a fad infenlibilitytoallthofe Truths which cannot be nerfecllv 
eonceiv d, unlefs in the fiience and calm of the Senfes and Paffions. 

. We mult therefore dejire that Death which unites us to God, or'at leaft the image ofthat Death 
that is the Myftenons Sleep in which all our External Senfes being lock'd up, we may hear the 
Voice of internal /Truth, which is never audible but in the fiience of the Night, when Darknefs in- 
volves fenfible Objeds and when the Woild is as it were dead to us. Thus it is, fays St. Gregory 
that the iSpoufe heard the Foice of her belowd m her fleep, when Jhe faid, I fleep, but my heart wake?' ■ 
Outwardly I /lumber but my heart watches within : For having no life nor fenfe with referenced External 
Objecls. I become extreamly fenfible to the Foice of inward Truth, which accofts me, in my inmoft reafon 
Htnc eft quodfponfa tn canticis canticorum fponfi vocem quafi per fomnium audierat, qua dicebat Ep'o 
dormto, & cor meumvigilat. Ac fi dicer et 1 dum exterior es fenfus ab hujus vita follicitudinibu- fopio 
vacante mente, vtvactus interna cognofco. Foris dormio, fed intus cor vigilat : quia dum exterior a quafi 
mnfentio, interior a folerter apprehendo. Bene ergo Eliu ait quod per fomnium loquitur Deus. St Cre/orv^ 
Morals upon the 33. Ch. of Job. * 7 ' 



THE 




IL LUST RAT IO 

UPON THE 

Seventh CHAPTER of the Second P A R T of the 

Third BOOK. 

Where I prove, 

That we have no clear Idea of the Nature^ or Modifications of our Soul 

I Have often faid, and think fufficiently prov'd in the third Book, of the preceding Treatife, 
that we have no clear Idea, but only the Confcience, or inward Senfation of our Soul ; and that 
therefore we have a much more imperfedt knowledge thereof than we have of Extenfion. Anfwerto 
Which to me feenfd fo evident, that I did not think it necelfary to prove it more at large. the. fifth 
But the Authority of M. des Cartes,who poffitively fays,7W the nature of the Mind is better known than ° b J e &ion 
that of any other thing, has fo prepolfefs'd fome of his Difciples, that what I have faid upon that thefecond 
Subject, ferves only to make them think me a weak Perfon unable to reach to, and hold faff ab- Meditati- 
ftra&ed Truths, which have nothing in them to welcome and retain the attention of their Con- on to- 
templators. wai- ds the 

I confefs, I am extreamly Feeble, Senfible, and Heavy, and my Mind depends on my Body more end v 
ways than I can exprefs. 1 know it : Ifeelit : and I continually labour to increafe this knowledge I 
have of my felf. For though we cannot help our being miferable- we ought at leaft to have the 
knowledge, and the fenfeof it ; we ought at leaft, to be humbled , upon the fight of our inward 
Miferies, and to acknowledge the need we have of being deliver'd from. this Body of Death which 
throws trouble and confufion into all the faculties of our Soul. 

But yet the Queftion before us is fo well proportion'd to the Mind, that I can fee no need of any 
great Application to refolve it, and for that reafon I did not infill: upon it. For I think it may be 
affirm'd, that moft Mens ignorance about the Soul, as of its diftin&ion from the Body, of its Spiri- 
tuality, Immortality, of its other properties, is fufficiently demonftrative, that we have no clear 
and di/tind Idea of it. 

It may be faid that we have a clear Idea of Body, becaufe we need but confult the Idea that re~ 
prefents it, to difcover what Modifications it is capable of. We plainly fee, that it may be either 
round or fquare, in Reft or Motion. We eafily conceive, that a (quare may be divided into two 
Triangles, two Parallelograms, or two Trapezia. We never are at aftand what to anfwer to the 
demand, whether this or that be implied or denied in Extenfion, becaufe the Idea of Extenfion be- 
ing clear, we may eafily, and, by a bare perception, difcover what it includes, and what it ex- 
cludes. 

But it does not appear to rne that we have any fuch Idea of our Mind, as can difcover when we 
confult it, the Modifications it will admit. Had we never felt either Pleafure or Pain, we could not 
tell whether our Soul were fufceptible of either. If a Man had never eaten a Melon, felt Smart, or 
feen Red or Blue, he might have confulted long enough this pretended Idea of his Soul, before he 
could diftin&ly difcover whether it was capable or not , of fuch Senfations or Modifications. I fay 
farther, that though a Man actually feel Pain, or fees Colour, he cannot difcover by a fimple view, 

whether 



144 J 7, Maleb'Hanch£ Concerning 

whether thefe Qualities belong to the Soul . He'll imagine that Pain is in the Body, which* occafi- 
ons hirn to fuffer it, and that Colour is diffus'd upon the furface of Objeds, though' ir~be clearly 
conceiv'd, that thefe Objeds are diftinguifh'd from the Soul. 

To be fatisfied whether or no fenfible Qualities are Modes of the Mind's exiftence, this pretend^ 
ed Idea of the Soul is never confulted. On the contrary, the Cartefians themfelves confult the Idea 
of Extenfion,and reafoh in this manner : Heat, Pain, Colour, cannot be Modifications of Extenfion : 
For this is capable but of different figures and Motions. Now there are but twO kinds of Beings' 
Bodies and Minds. Therefore Heat, Pain and Colour, and all other fenfible Qualities, are the 
Furniture of the Mind. a 

Whilft they are oblig'd to confult their Idea of Extenfion, to difcover whether fenfible Qualities 
are Modifications of their Soul ; is it not evident they have no clear Idea of it ? For otherwise 
would they ever bethink themfelves of foindired a Condud , When a Philofopher would know^ 
whether Rotundity belongs to Extenfion, does he enquire into the Idea of the Soul, or any other 
befides that of Extenfion ? Does he not fee clearly in the fame Idea of Extenfion, that Rotundity is 
a Modification of it? And would it not be extravagance in him to argue thus to be inftruded ? 
There are only two forts of Beings, Minds and Bodies : Roundnefs is not a Modification of a Mind ; 
therefore it is a Modification of a Body. . • 

We difcover then by a bare perception without Argumentation, and by the meer Application of 
the Mind to the Idea of Extenfion, that Roundnefs and every other Figure is a Modification belong- 
ing to Body , and that Pleafure, Pain, Heat, and all other fenfible Qualities, are not Modificati- 
ons of it. There can be no Queflion propos'd about what does, or does not appertain to Extenfi- 
on, but may be eafily, readily, and boldly anfwer'd by the fole confideration of the Idea that re- 
prefentsit. All Men are agreed , in their notion, and beliefs upon this Point. Forj;hofe who 
will have Matter capable of Thought, do not imagine this Faculty is to be attributed to it becaufe of 
Extenfion, being perfwaded that Extenfion confider'd, precifely as fuch, cannot Think. 

But Men are not fo well agreed about what they are to think of the Soul, and her Modifications : 
for fome there are, who fancy, that Pain, and Heat , or at leaft that Clour does not belong to her.. 
And a Man would be laught at among fome Cartefians, that fhould affirm, the Soul grows actually 
Slue , Red, Yellow, and that fhe is dyed with all the Colours of the Rain-Bow, when fhe contem- 
plates it. There are many who doubt, and more that don't believe, that the Soul becomes formally 
fiihking upon the fmell of carrion ; and that the taft of Sugar,Pepper, andSalt,are properties belong- 
ing to her. Where then is the clear Idea of the Soul that the Cartefians may confult it, and may all 
agree about the fubjed where Colours, Savours, Odours, ought to enter. 

But though the Cartefians were agreed upon thefe difficulties, yet we were not to conclude from 
their agreement, that we have a clear Idea of the Soul : For if they agree at Sail that 'tis Ifie which 
is adually Green, or Red, when a Man fees thefe Colours, yet this conid act be concluded with- 
out a long train of Reafonings -, they could not fee it by a fimple view, nor ever difcover it by ..con- 
fulting the pretended Idea of the Soul, but rather by confulting that of the Body. . They could not 
be certain, that fenfible Qualities belong'd to the Soul, were it not becaufe they did not belong ta 
Extenfion, whereof they have a clear Idea. Nor could they ever convince of it fuch as, having lit- 
tle thought, are incapable of complicated Perceptions, or Reafonings- or rather fuch as cannot 
dwell upon the confideration of the clear Idea of Body,and who are apt to confound all things; And 
fo there would be always , Clowns, Women, Children, and it may be fome Scholars, and Dodors 
who would doubt of it. But Women, and Children, Learned and Unlearned, the molt Intelli- 
gent and moftftupid Per fons, eafily conceive, by their Idea of Extenfion, that it is fufceptible of 
all forts of Figures •, they clearly comprehend that Extenfion is not capable of Pain, Savour, Odour, 
or any other Senfation, when they but faithfully and attentively confider the Idea only that repre» 
fents it : For there is no fenfible Quality included in it's reprefentative Idea. 

'Tis true, they may doubt whether Body is^ or is not capable of admitting fome Senfation, or 
fenfible Quality : But then they underftand by Body fome other thing than Extenfion, and have no 
clear Idea of Body taken in this fenfe. But when des Cartes, or the Cartefians, whom 1 am con- 
cerned with, maintain that the Soul isbetter known than Body, they mean only by Body, bare Ex- 
tenfion. Which makes me admire how they can hold, that the nature of the Soul is clearer known 
than that of the Body, fince the Idea of Body, or Extenfion,is fo manifeft,that all the World's agreed 
about what it contains, and what it excludes, whilft the Idea of the Soul is fo confus'd, that the 
Cartefians themfelves daily difpute, whether the Modifications of Colour appertain to it. 

We know, (fay thefe Philofophers, with. their Matter des Cartes) the nature of a fubftance fo much 
more difiinOly, as we know more of its Attributes. Now there is nothing whereof we know fo many Attri- 
butes as of our Mind. Becaufe as many as we know in other things we may put to the mind's account from 
its knowing them ; and therefore its Nature is better known than that of any other thing. 

But who is it that fees not a great deal of difference between knowing by a clear Idea and know- 
ing by Confcience. When I know that 2 times 2 are 4, I know it very clearly ; but I know not 
clearly what within me 'tis that knows it. I feel it, Iconfefs; I know it by confeioufnefs, or inter-, 
nal fenfe : But I have noclear Idea of it as I have of Numbers, whofe Relations I can diftindly dif- 
cover. I can reckon in my mind three properties, one of knowing that 2 times 2 are 4, ano- 
ther of knowing that 3 times 3 are 9, a third of knowing that 4 times 4 are 16". And thefe 
Properties,if you pleafe,fhall be different from one another,and fo I may count an infinite number of 
Properties belonging to me. But I deny that we can clearly know the nature of the things that we 
can reckon thus. 

It 



Tfje Search after Truth. tfyy 

It may be laid that we have a clear Idea of a Being, and that we know its feature, when we can 
Compare it with others, which we likewifc have a clear Idea of, or at leafc when we can compare 
together the Modifications incident to it. We have clear ideas of Numbers, and of the parts of 
fcxtenfion,becaufe we can compare thefc things together. As 2 may be compar'd with 4, 4 with 16, 
and every number, with any other: So likewife a fquare may be compar'd with a Triangle, a Circle 
with an Ellipfts, a Square and a Triangle wich every other Square and Triangle; and thus a Man 
may clearly difcover the relations thefc figures , and thefe Numbers have to one another. 
But we cannot compare our Mind with other Beings , thereby to difcover clearly their 
% Relations ; nor can we compate the Modifications of the Mind together. Can we clearly difcover 
what Relation, or Proportion there is between Fleafure and Pain, Heat and Colour ? Or to keep to 
Modifications of the fame fort ; can we determine exaclty the Proportion between Green and Red 
Ifellow and Piirple,or even between Purple and Purple ? We fee well enough that one is darker, or 
brighter than the other. But we know not evidently how much, nor what it is to be Darker or 
Brighter. We have then no clear Idea either of the Soul, or her Modifications ; and though 1 fee or 
have the fenie of Colours, Tails, Smells ; yet I may fay as 1 have done , that I know them not by 
a clear hie?, kwcz I cannot clearly difcover their Relations. 

'Tis true I can difcover the exact proportions betwen founds : That a Diopafon for inftance is 
i)ouble, that a Fifth is as 3 toi, and that a Fourth is as 4 to 3. But I cannot know thefe proporti T 
ons by the fenfation I have of them. If ! know that an Eighth or Diopafon is double, 'tis becaufe I" 
Jiave learn't, by Experience, that the fame firing founds an Eighth, when having ffcricken it whole, 
1 ftrike it prefently again, dividing it into two equal parts, or becaufe I know the number of Titra- 
tions is double in equal time, or by fome fuch way, arid this becaufe the Trepidations of the air, the 
Vibrations of the firings, and the firing it felf are things which may be compared by clear Ideas,and 
that we diftindiy conceive what relations there can be between a firing and it's parts, as likewife 
between the celerity of different Vibration's. But 'we cannot compare founds betwixt themfelves, or 
as they are fenfible Qualities, and Modifications of the Soul ; nor that way are their Proportions or 
Relations difcovercMe. And though Muficians diftinguifh very well the different concords, yet 
they do not diftinguifh their proportions by clear Ideas. By the ear only they judge by a clear 
Idea, or otherwife than by fenfation. Therefore Muficians have no clear Idea of founds, as they 
are fenfation; or Modifications of the Soul : And confequently we conceive not theSoul nor her Mo- 
difications by a clear Idea, but only by Confidence or internal fenfe. 

Moreover we know not wherein conlifl thofe difpofitions df the Soul, which facilitate her to act 
and rcprefent Objects to her felf. Nay we cannot conceive wherein fuch Difpofitions might poffibly 
confift. I fay farther, that we cannot bepofitively afTur'd by Reafon, whether the mcer Soul fepurate 
from the Body, or confider'd without relation to it, be capable of Habits ox Memory. But how 
can wc be ignorant of thefe things,if the nature of the Soul be better known to us than of the Body. 
'Tis eafily difcern'd wherein that readinefs confifts, wherewith the animal Spirits flow into the 
Nerves, which they have often us'd to glide into ; at lead 'tis no trouble to difcover, that whilffc 
the conduits of the Nerves are widened, and the Fibres recumbent after a particular manner, the 
Spirits may eafily infinuate themfelves. But what is it we can conceive capable of augmenting the 
Soul's Facility to aft or think. For my part, I own, I cannot comprehend it : And in vain fhould I 
interrogate my felf what thefe difpofitions are ; For I could give my felf no anfwer, nor light up- 
on the matter, though I have a moft lively fenfe of that eafinefsv with which fome Thoughts arife 
in me. And if I had no particular Reafons to induce me to believe that I really have fuch Difpofi- 
tions, though I know theln not in me ; I fhould judge there neither was fpiritual Habit, nor Me- 
mory in my Soul. But in fhort, feeing there is doubt and fcruple about it, we have an in- 
fallible Symptom, that Men are not fo enlightned as is pretended. For Doubt can never be recon- 
cil'd to Evidence, and clear Ideas. 

'Tis certain, that a Man of the greateft Underftanding, cannot evidently know whether he de- 
ferves Hatred or Love, as fpeaks the Wifeman. My own confeioufhefs of my felf cannot fatisfy Ecc j g c> „ 
me, herein. St. Paul fays indeed, his Confcience reproach'd him with nothing, yet for all that he 1. 
does not affirm he is juftified ; On the contrary he afTerts he is not thereby jultified, and that he I judge not 
dares not judge himielf, fince he that judges is the Lord. But having a clear Idea of Order; if we ™ in ? own 
had another as clear of the Soul, from the inward feeling of our felves we fhould evidently know, ji' 0V f°S 
whether fhe was conformable to Older. We fhould know whether we were Righteous or not, ,hh w by my 
and we could exactly difcover all our interiour Difpofitions to Good and Evil, whenever we were felf,. yet 1 
confeious of them. But if we could know our.felves juft as we are, we fhould not be fo fubjedt to a m "°\ 
Prefumption ; And there is great likelihood that St. Peter would not have faid to his Mafter whom ^fV 11 ' 
he was no: long after to 'deny, iVIoy cannot I follow thee now ? I will lay down my life for thy fake, fj tL:°" 
ulnimam meam pro te ponam. For being inwardly confeious of his own Strength and good Will, he judgetbme 
might have icen with Evidence, whether he had Refolution and Courage to conquer Death, or ra- utbe lord 
ther the infults of a filly Maid, and two or three Servants. 1 Cuv - *"• 

If the nature of the Soul be more known than any other. If the Idea we have of her be as clear f ^ n 

hat we have of the Body, i ask only how it comes to pafs that there are fo many who confound 37 . 
her with it ? Is it poflible to confound two clear Ideas intirely different ? Let us do juitice to all 3 
Mankind: Thofe who diffent from our Opinion are as rational as our felvc?, they have the fame 
Ideas of things, and are partakers in the fame Reafon. Why then do they confound what we di- 
ftinguifn? Do they ufe on other occafions to confound things, whereof they have clear ideas? Do 

O o they 



1^6 F. MalebranChe Concerning 



they ever confound two different numbers, or take a Square for a Circle ? And yet the Soul differs 
more from the Body, than one of thefe Figures from the other ; For they are two fubftances which 
are in nothing alike, and are confounded notwithftanding. Which mult therefore proceed front 
fome difficulty there is to difcover their difference , from its not being obfervable by a fimple per-, 
ception -, and from the Impoffibility of concluding that one is not the other without Argument 
and Reaioning. It muft come from hence, wt, That the Idea of Extenfion muft be caufioufly con- 
fulted, and Extenfion difcover'd to be no Mode of Exiftence of a Body, but the Body it felf, as be- 
ing reprefented a fubfifting Thing, and as the Principle and Foundation of whatever we conceive 
clearly in Bodies : And thatfo the Modes of which Body is capable, having no Proportion of fen- 
fible Qualities ^ the fubject of thefe Qualities, or rather the Being of which they are Modes muft 
needs be different from Body : For fuch like argumentation is requifite to prevent our confounding 
the Soul with the Body. But if we had a clear Idea of the Soul, as we have of Body, certainly we 
need not take thefe round-about ways to diftinguifh her from it. Since it would be difcoverable 
by a fimple view, and with as great eafe as we fee a Circle is not a Square. 

I infiit not longer upon proving that we know not the Soul nor her Modifications by clear Ideas. 
Survey our felves on what fide foever we will •, this fumciently appears : And I bad not added this 
to what 1 have faid in the Search after Truth, if Tome C 'arte 'flans had not found fault with it. If this 
will not fatisfy them, I mall expect they will make me fenfible of this clear Idea, which 1 am not a- 
ble to find in my felf, do whatever I can to difcover it. 



THE 

ILLUSTRATION 

U P O N T H E 

Eighth CHAPTER of the Second P A R T of the 

Third BOOK. 

Of hofe and general terms which Jignify nothing. How they are difiinguifti d 

from others. 

IN order to comprehend what I have faid in fome Places •, how that they give not the reafons 
of things who explain them by Logical Terms, and General Ideas we need but confider ; that 
whatever exifts is redue'd to Being, or Modes of Being •, whatever Term fignifies neither of 
thefe fignifies nothing, and every Term that fignifies not one or other of them diftin&ly, and 
in particular, fignifies nothing diftind. This to me feems moft clear and evident, but what is e- 
vident in it felf, is not fo to all the World. Words are the current Coin , wherewith Men pay 
themfelves, and others. All Terms that are inoffenfive to the Ear, have free Pafsport amongft 
them. And Truth comes fo rarely into the Commerce of the World, thatthofe who fpeak it, or 
hear it, have commonly no regard for it. The gift of Speech is the greateft of Talents ; the lan- 
guage of Imagination is the fureft of means-, and a Memory charg'd with incomprehenfible Terms 
will always make a fplendid appearance, whatever the Cartefians may fay of it. 

When Men fhall have no addiction but to Truth, they will be Cautious of what they fay, they 
will carefully examine their own meaning, rejecting with fcorn fenfelefs and insignificant Terms, 
andclofely adhering to clear Ideas. But when will the time come that Men fhall love Truth on- 
ly ? We may fay, when they fhall depend no longer on their Body, when they fhall have no ne- 
ceffary relation to fenfible Objedts, when they fhall not any more corrupt one another, but faithful- 
ly confult their Mafter who inftructs them in the recedes of their Reafon. But this will never 
happen whilft we live on Earth. 

However all Men are not equally indifferent for Truth. If there are fome who fpeak without 
Reflection, and hear without diftindtion, and have no attention but to what affects them : there 
are others who induftrioufly labour to inform themfelves, and to convince others of the Truth. 
And to thefe chiefly I addrefs my felf, for at their Inftance I entred on making thefe Re- 
marks. 

I fay then that whatever is, whether it actually exifts or not, and confequently whatever is intel- 
ligible is either a Being, or a Mode of Being. By Being 1 mean fomething of an abfolute Nature, 
or that may be conceiv'd alone, as unrelated to any other thing. By Mode of Being I underftand. 
fomething relative, or that cannot be conceiv'd alone. Now there are two kinds of Modes of Be- 
ing. The one confifts in the Relation of the Parts of any Whole, to any Part of the fame whole : 
The other in the Relation of one thing to another which makes not anyPart of the fame whole. The 
Roundnefs of wax is a Mode of Being of the former fort, as confifting in the Equality of Diftance. 



which 



The Search after Truth. j a*. 

Which have all the Superficial parts to the central. The Motion or fituation of the wax is a Mode of 
Being of the lecond fort : Which confifts in the Relation the wax has to circumambient Bodies. I 
fpeak not of potion taken for the Moving Force -, tor it is plain, that that force neither is nor can 
be a Mode of Bodies exifting, for conceive them Modified how we will, we cannot conceive them as 
a moving Force. 

It being certain; that whatever is intelligible, is either a Being, or a Mode of Being, it is as evi- 
dent that every Term that fignifies not one or other of thefe, fignifies nothing ; and that every 
Term that fignifies not this or that particular Being, or Mode of Being, is obfcure and confus'd ; 
and confequently we cannot conceive either what others fay to us, or we to others, if we have no 
diftindt Ideas of Being, or of the Mode of Being, which refpedtively anfwer to the Terms they ufe, 
or we imploy our felves. 

Neverthelefs I grant that we may, and even fometimes mull imploy thofe words which do not 
directly raife diftindt Ideas. We may, becaufe it is not always neceflary to put the Definition in- 
ftead of the Defined, and that abridg'd Expreffions are to good ufe imploy'd though confus'd in 
themfelves. And We muft, when we are oblig'd to fpeak of things whereof we have no clear Idea, 
and which we cannot conceive, but by our inward Senfation, as when we fpeak of the Soul, and 
her Modifications. Only we mult take care not to ufe obfcure and equivocal, when we have clear 
Terms ^ or any which may excite falfe Ideas in thofe we fpeak to. This will be better underftood 
by an inftance. 

It is more perfpicuous to fay, that God created the World by his Will, than to fay he created it 
by his Power. This laft word is a Logical Term, which excites no diftindt and particular Idea, 
but affords Liberty to imagine that the Power of God is fomething diftindt from the efficacy of his 
Will, We fpeak more clearly when we fay God pardons Sinners, in JESUS CHRIST; 
than in abfolutely faying, he forgives them by his Clemency and Mercy : Thefe Terms are Equivo- 
cal ; and adminifter occafion to think that the Clemency of God, is, it may be contrary to his Ju- 
ftice: That Sin may be left unpunifh'd ; and that the fatisfadtion of Our LORD is not neceffary, 
and the like. 

, Thefe Terms of a Loofe and Indefinite fenfe are often us'd when we fpeak of the Divine Perfecti- 
ons •, which is not to be condtmn'd.fince Philofophical accuracy is not at all tinies neceffary.But by a 
culpable dullnefs and negligence fucri abufeis made of thefe generalExpreffions and fo many falfe con- 
fequences are drawn from them,that though all Men have the fame Idea of God, and that they con- 
fiderhim as a Being infinitely Perfedt •, yet there was hardly any Imperfedtion but was attributed to 
him in Idolatrous times, and Mens difcourfes of him were commonly unfeemly and unworthy : And 
all for want of carefully comparing the things they faid of him with the idea that reprefents him, 
or rather with Himfelf. 

But chiefly in matter of natural Philofophy, thefe rambling and general Terms are abus'd, which 
excite no diftindt Ideas either of Beings or their Modes. For example when we fay that Bodies 
tend to their Center, that they fall by their Gravity, that they afcend by their Levity, that they 
move by their Nature, that they fucceffively change their Forms, that they adt by their Vertues, 
Qualities, Faculties, &c. we ufe filch Terms as have no fignification, and all thefe Propofitions are 
abfolutely falfe, in the fenfe that moft Philofophers take them. There is no Center in the fenfe that 
is commonly underftood. Thefe Terms, Gravity, Form, Nature, and the like, excite no Idea ei^ 
ther of a Being or a mode of Being. They are empty and infignificative Terms, which Wife-Men 
mould avoid. The Knowledge of the unwife vs as talk without fenfe, fays the Son oiSirach. Thefe Eccl# 2u 
Terms are good for nothing, but to fhelter the Ignorance of Pretenders to Learning, and to make X 8. ' 
the Ignorant and Libertines believe that God is not the True Caufe of all things. 

This methinks is certain , and eafy to be conceiv'd : Yet moft Men talk freely of all things, 
without caring to examine whether the Terms they employ have any clear and exadt fignification. 
And many Authors there are of huge and bulky Volumes, in which its harder than may be thought, 
to find any 4)a(Tage where they have underftood what they have written. Therefore thofe who 
are great Readers, and refpedtful Hearers of the rambling and general Difcourfes of the falfly 
Learn'd, are in the darkeft Ignorance. And I fee no way they have to get free of it, but by con- 
flantly making, and renewing their Refolution, of believing no Man on his word, and before they 
have annex'd very diftindt Ideas to the moft common Terms which others ufe. For thefe Terms 
are not clear, as is commonly imagin'd •, and they feem fo only from the common Ufe that is made 
of them : Becaufe Men fancy they well underftand what they fay or hear, when they have faid or 
heard the fame an hundred times, though they have never examin'd it. 



THE 



1 4:8 F. MaLebranche Concerning 



mi ■'■tnH 



THE 

ILLUSTR AT ION 

U P O N T H E 

Conclufion of the Three Firft BOOKS. 

That Phyficians and Cafuifis are abfolutely necejjary for us ; But that It is dan* 
gerous to confult and follow them in many occafions. 



\_J 



(Ertainly Man before his Fall, Wag ppflefs'd of all things neceflary to preferve his Mind and 
Body in a perfect State. He needed neither Pbyfician, nor Cafuift i He confulted Inward 
Truth, as the Infallible Rule of his Duty ^ and his Settfes were fo faithful in their Reports 
that they never deceiv'd hirn in the ufe he ought to make of encompaffing Bodies , for the 
prefervation of his own. • 

But fince thj Tranfgreffion things are much chang'd, We confult our Pafiions much more than 
Law or Truth Eternal ; and our Senfes are fo diforder'd, that in following them we fometimes 
deftroy our Health and Life. The Cafuift and Phyfician are become abfolutely neceffary. And thofe 
who pretend to be molt dexterous at Self-management upon all occafions, fall commonly into the 
grofleft Mifcarriages, which teach them a little too late, that they follow a Mafter that is not o± 
ver-wife. 

Neverthelefs I think I may fay that Sin has not fo diforderM all the faculties of the Soul, but 
that we may confult our felves, in many inftances, and that it often fortunes that we lofe the Life 
of our Sow/, or Body, by applying to Phyficians, unexpert in their Profeffion, and unacquainted 
with the conftitution of our Body, or to Cafuift s unskill'd in Religion and Morality, who pierce 
not to the bottom of the confcience, to difcover the Engagements and Difpofitions of thofe who 
come to be refolv'd. 

When I have faid in the Conclufion of the Three firft Books of The Search after Truth, has given 
occafion to fome Perfons, to imagine I pretended that in Order to preferve life and health, we 
ought to follow our Senfes and Paffions in all things ; and that to be guided in our Duty it was 
needlefs to confult other Men, fince Eternal Wifdom is our Teacher that fpeaks intelligibly to us in 
the receffes of our Reafon. And though I never faid nor thought that Phyficians and Cafuifts were 
ufelefs, fome Perfons expedite at judging and concluding, are perfuaded it was my Opinion, be- 
caufe, it may be, it was theirs : And that they do not fo much confider Man as he is at prefent, as 
what he was before the Fall. Here then in a great part are my Thoughts upon the queftion. 

Man may be confider'd in two States of Body, Health and Sicknefs. If he be confider'd in per- 
feft Health,it cannot I think be doubted but his fenfes are much more ufeful to preferve it, than the 
Reafon and Experience of theableft Phyficians. There's no need of advifing with the Do&or to 
know what Weight a man may bear, whether Wood and Stones are to be eaten, whether he may 
throw himfelf from a Precipice. His fenfes teaching him, in the readieft and moft undoubted man- 
ner, what ought to be done in the like ordinary occafions. Which is, one would think, iufficient 
to juftifie what I have faid in the conclufion of the three firft Books. 

But that will not ferve turn to juftify my Thoughts, and even my Words in another place. viZi 

Sook T. That our fenfes acquit themfclves of their Duty fo excellently well, and conduct us in thatjuft and faithful 

manner to their End, that they feem to be injurioufly charged with Corruptnefs and Irregularity. Fori 

• have always been perfwaded that the Juftnefs, Exaftnefsand admirable Order which is foundin our 

Senfations with reference to the prefervation of Life^ was no Confequence of Sin, but the firft In- 

ftitution of Nature. 

'Tis objected that at prefent this Order is diforder'd, and that if we were led by our fenfes, we 
fnould not only eat Poifon, but fhould almoft always receive in, much more Nutriment than we 
Could digeft 

But as to Poifons I don't believe our fenfes would ever invite us to eat them ; but that if our 
Eyes fhould by chance provoke us to taft them, we fhould not find in them a relilh that would in- 
duce us to fwallow them, fuppofing thefe Poifons were in their Natural State. For there is great 
difference between Poifons, as they are Naturally produe'd, and empoifon'd Food ; between crude 
Pepper, and Pepper'd Meats. Our fenfes I grant invite us to eat Poifon'd Victuals. But they do 
not incline us to eat Poifons, or it may be, not fo much as to tafte them, provided thefe Poifons 
remain in the capacity wherein God has produe'd them. For our fenfes reach but to the Natural 
Order of things as conftituted by their Maker. 

I grant 



The Search after Truth! 

' I grant likewife that our fenfes at prefcnt induce us to eat certain Meats to excefs arid forfeiting 
but that's becaufe thefe Meats are not in their Natural State. We fhould never perhaps overcharge 
our felves with Wheat, if we ground it With Teeth, made for that purpofe -, But it is ground, 
and fifted , and kneaded, and baked ^ Sophifticated too fometimes with Milk, with Butter, and 
Sugar, it's eaten alfo with preferves, and with Ragoos of feveral forts which provoke appetite. 
And fowe need not wonder if our fenfes incline us to excefs, when Reafon and Experience lend 
both their affiftance to impofe on them. 

So it is in refpeft of fleih, which the fenfes abhor when Raw and Full of Blood, when beheld af- 
ter the Animal died of it felf. But Men have bethought themfelves to kill the Beafts^ to drain out 
the Blood, to cdncoA the flefh with Fire, to Seafon, and Difguife it, and after this accufe their 
Senfes of Corruption and diforder • fince they Irnploy their Reafon in preparing other forts of 
Diet than Nature fuppliesto them, 1 muft own there is need of the fame Reafon to Moderate their 
Appetite, in their Eating : And if the Cooks have found out the art of making us eat Old Shooes 
in their High Seafon'd Difhes, it lies upon us to make as much ufe of our reafon in miftrufting thefe 
Adulterated meats which are not fuch as God has made them : For he has given us our fenfes only 
with Relation to the Natural Order of things. 

: It muft farther be obferv'd that our Imagination, and fenfes are miftruftful and fufpicious when 
we take unufual Aliments. For if a Men had never Eaten, nor feen Eaten a particular Fruit he met 
with, he would have fome averfion and fenfe of fear upon the tafting it: His Imagination and 
lenfes would be naturally arr.ect and attentive to the relifh it afforded ; though never fo hungry he 
would eat but little the firft time, and if this Fruit had any dangerous quality it would be fure to 
create in him fome dread or abhorrence. Thus his Machine would be fo difpos'd as to decline it 
another time ; and the Odium which he had to it fenfibly difcovering it felf in his Looks, would 
prevent others from eating it. All this would beperform'd, or might be perform'd in him, whilft 
Reafon had no fhare in it : For I fpeak not here of thofe fupplies which Reafon, and Experience 
may adminifter. But. feeing our Friends take corrupt nutriment, we do the fame : For we live by 
Opinion •, and Example emboldens us. 

We examine not the effe&s thefe Aliments may produce in us, and we fear not to eat them to 
excefs. But our fenfes are not fo great abettors of the Intemperance as is believ'd. 'Tis true there 
poffibly are in the World fuch Fruits as that their Tafts may impofe onPerfons never fo attentive to 
the Reports of their fenfes : But this certainly is very rare : And we ought not to conclude from 
thefe particular, inftances, . that our fenfes are all corrupt, and that they commonly deceive us, in 
things relating to the good of the Body. It may be, thefe Fruits deceive our Taft, becaufe we have 
altered, and corrupted our Organ by the frequent ufe of unnatural Nourifhment. For 'tis certain 
that the High Seafon'd Difhes, we feed upon, by their tod Poignant, and penetrating Particles, 
..hurt the Fibres of the Tongue, and deprive it of it's Nicenefs and Sagacity. The Example of thofe 
who can find.no relifh except in Ragoos, proves my affertion ^ for if we find no favour in Corn, and 
in crude Flefh* 'tis becaufe our Tongue is grown infenfible to thofe Particles, whofe motions are 
Moderate. . . . ± ■ 

But though we fuppofe there are fome Fruits whofe favour is capable of deceiving the moft curi- 
ous fenfes, ,and which ftill retain their Natural perfection ^ yet we ought not to believe this pro- 
ceeded from Sin : But only that from the great fimplicity of Natural Laws , ( by vertue of which 
the fenfe of Taft is form'd and perfected^ 'twas impoffible for it to have fufficient Nicenefs and Sa- 
gacity for all forts of Eatables. Befides, that defeft of fenfe would not be remedilefs, becaufe when 
the Mother bad an averfion to dangerous Eruits, fhe would communicate it to her Children, not 
only when unborn, but alfo when come into the World. For Children only Eat what is given 
them by their Mothers, and they Machinally, and by the Air of their Countenance inf ufe into them 
an abhorrence for Fruits that are dangerous to be Eaten. So that God has made fufficient Provifioft 
by our fenfes for the prefervation of our Life, and nothing can be better Order'd. For as Order 
requires, that the Laws of Union of our Soul and Body fhould be moft Simple • they muft be of a 
very General Nature : And God ought not to eftablifli particular Laws for fuch inftancessand emer- 
gences, as moft rarely happen, Reafon on fuch occafions muft Help out the Senfes : For Reafon may 
be employ'd in all things. But the fenfes are determin'd to fome Natural Judgments, which are 
the moft advantageous Imaginable, as I have prov'd in the firft Book. Yet even thefe Judgments 
are fometimes fallacious •, becaufe 'tis impoffible it fhould be otherwife without multiplying the moft 
fimple Laws of Union of the Body with the Soul. 

If we confider Man as now he is, under a State of Sicknefs, we muft confefs his fenfes often de- 
ceive him, even in things that relate to the prefervation of his Life. For the Oeconomy of his Ma- 
chine being difturb'd in Proportion to it's difturbance, irregular motions muft unavoidably be ex- 
cited iri his Brain. Neverthelefs his fenfes are not fo corrupted, as is Ordinarily believ'd: And 
God has fo, wifely provided for the prefervation of Life by the Laws of Union of the Soul and Body, 
that though thefe laws are extreamly fimple, they often fuffice to reftore us to our Health \ and it is 
much the furer way to follow them,than to employ ourReafon,or certainPhyficians that do not care- 
fully ftudy thedifpofitipn of their Patients. For as a wound clofes and heals up of its felf when con- 
ftantly cleans'd and lick'd, as is done by Animals when wounded : So Ordinary difeafes are fpeedi- 
ly difpers'd, when we let them alone, and exa&ly obferve that courfe of Life, which thefe Difeafes, 
as it were by mftina, and Senfation, put us upon. 

Pp . Wine," 



I^o R Malebranche Concerning 

Wine for example; feems bitter to a Mart in a FeaVer, and Hkewife is prejudicial to him in that 
Condition : This fame Man finds it agreeable to the Palate, when he is in Health, and then too it 
is Wholefome for him. It fometimes even happens that Wine is mofc ufeful to the Sick that relifh 
it provided their tali be not an efFeft of the Habit of drinking it, and that their defire of it pro- 
ceed from the prefent difpofition of their Body : That it cannot be doubted but that we are to con* 
fult our fenfes in Sicknefs for the way we are to take to the recovery of our Health. Here follows 
my Opinion about what we ought to do. ...... 

'Tis requifite that the diftemper'd Perfon (hould be extrearhly attentive to thofe fecret defires 
which fometimes arife in him on occafion of the aftual difpofition of his Body ± but above all, take 
heed left thefe defires {hould be the confequence of fome preceding Habit. He muft, to that intent, 
flacken, as 1 may fay, the bent of Imagination , or , thinking on nothing that may determine it, 
obferve to what he is inclin'd, and examine whether his prefent Inclination proceeds from the 
actual difpofition of his Body : Which done, he ought to follow it, but with much caution and re- 
ferve- it being extreamly difficult to be afTur'd whether thefe fecret Inclinations are owing to the 
prefentState of Body ; and 'tis fometimes good to have the advice of fomeExperienc'd Perfon upon 
it. But if the Sick Perfon thus giving a loofe to his Imagination, as I have been faying, finds no- 
thing offer it felf to his Mindy. he muft remain quiet, and ufe abftinence, for this likely will 
quicken him to fome defire, or fpend the humours that-diftemper him. But if the difeafe increafe, 
notwithftanding his Abftinence and Reft, 'tis then necefTary to have recourfe to experience and the 
Phyfician. He muft give then an exaft account of all to a Skillful one that knows,if poffible,the Con- 
ftitution of his Body ; He muft clearly explain to Him the beginnings, and progrefsof his Difeafe, 
and the State of Body he was in, before he fell into it, that He may confult his Experience and 
Reafon with reference to the Perfon to be cur'dby him. And then though the Phyfician prefcribe 7 
bitter Medicines, and which are really forts of Poifon, yet they muft be taken becaufe we Experi- 
mentally know that thefe Poifons ftay not in the Body, but drive out fometimes along with them 
the corrupt humours which are the caufe of the Difeafe. Here it is that Reafon, or rather Expe- 
rience, muft over-rule the Senfes ; provided the abhorrence of the recommended Potion be not of 
a frefh date. For if this Averfion was Cotemporary with the difeafe, it would rather be a Symp- 
tom of the Medicine's being of the fame Nature with the ill humours that caus'd the diftemper , and 
fo perhaps would but augment and ftrengthen it. 

Neverthelefs I think it advifable before we venture upon ftrong Medicines, and which we are 
much averfe to, to begin with thofe that are more gentle and natural : As by Drinking a good 
quantity of Water, or taking an eafie Emetich, if we have loft our Appetite, and are not very hard 
to Vomit. Water may attenuate the too condens'd humours, and Facilitate the Circulation of the 
Blood into all the Parts of the Body : And Pbmitives cleanfing the Stomach, hinder the Nourifhment 
we take in, from corrupting, and feeding any longer intermittent Feaver s. But I ought not to- 
infift upon thefe 'things. I am therefore of Opinion that we ought to follow the advife of the wife 
Phyficians, who are not too hafty and expeditious,who are not too prefumptuous upon the Recipe\ 
nor too eafie to give t\\dxNoftrums and Prefcriptions. For where one remedy does a SickMan good, 
there are a great many that do him harm. As the fuffeiing Perfons are impatient, and as it makes 
not for the Honour of the Phyficians, nor the profit of the Apothecary, to vifit the fick without pre- 
ferring to them, fo they vilit too feldom, and prefcribe too often. When therefore a Man is Sick, 
he ought to requeft of his Phyfician, that he would hazard nothing ; but follow Nature , and 
ftrengthen it if he can : He ought to let him know that he has more Reafon, and Patience, than to 
take it ill that he vifits him often without giving him relief: For on thefe occafions he fometimes 
does a great deal, who does no mifchief. 

I conclude then that we muft have recourfe toPhyficians,and refufe not to obey them,if we would 
preferve our Life. For though they cannot be afTur'd of refroring our Health, yet fometimes 
they may contribute much for it, by reafon of the continual Experiments, they make upon diffe- 
rent Difeafes. They know indeed very little, with any exattnefs, yet ftill they know much more 
than our felves ; and provided they will give themfelves the trouble of ftudying our con- 
ftitution, of carefully obferving all the Symptoms of the Difeafe, and diligently attending to our 
own inward Feeling-, we may hope from them all the Affiftances that we may reafonably expeft 
from Men. 

What we have faid of Phyficians may in a manner be apply'd to Cafuifts, whom 'tis abfo- 
lutely necefTary to confult on fome occafions ; and commonly ufeful. But it fometimes hap- 
pens not only to be moft ufelefs, but highly dangerous, to advife with them ; which 1 ex- 
plain and prove. 

'Tis commonly faid that humane Reafon is fubjeft to Error; but herein there is an equivocal 
fence, which we are not fufficiently aware of. For it muft not be imagin'd that the Reafon which 
Man confults is corrupted, or that it ever mifleads, when faithfully confulted. I have faid ir y 
and I fay it again, that none but the Soveraign Reafon makes us Rational : None but the Supream 
Truth enlightens us, nor any but God, that fpeaks clearly, and knows how to inftrudt us. We 
have but one True Mafter, even JESUS CHRIST Our LORD, Eternal WISDOM, 
the W O R D of the Father, in whom^re all the Treafures of Wifdom, and the Knowledge of 
God : And 'tis Blafphemy to fay, this Vniverfal Reafon, whereof all Men participate, and by 
which alone they are reafonable, is fubjett to Error, and capable of deceiving us. 'Tis not Man's 
Reafon but his Heart that betrays, him ; 'Tis not his Light, but his Darknefs that hinders him from 
feeing. 'Tis not the Union he has with God, which feduces him, nor in one fence, his Union with 

the 



The Search after Truth. ■ {*{ 

the Body : But 'tis the dependence he has on his Body, or rather, 'tis .becaufe he will de- 
ceive himfelf} and enjoy the Pkafure of Judging, before he has been at the Pains of Examining- 
tis becaufe he will reft, before he arrives to the place of the Reft of Truth. I have more exactly 
explain d the caufe of our Errors, in many places of the preceding Book, and I hefefuppofe what 
I there have faid. 

; Which being laid down, I affirm it is needlefs to confult Cafuijis when it is certain, that Truth 
fpeaks to us ; which we are fure it does when Evidence difplays it felf in the Anfwers that are made 
to our £w^*r/M, that is, to the attention of our Mind. Therefore when we retire into our own 
Breaft, and in the filence of our Senfes, and Paffions, hear a Voice fo clear, and intelligible, that 
we cannot be doubtful of the Truth of it, we muft fubmit to it, let the World think of us what 
they pleafe : We muft have no regard to cuftom, nor liften to our fecret Inclinations, nor defer 
too much to the refolves of thofe who go for the Learned part of Men. We muft not give way to 
be mifguided by the falfe fhew of a pretended Piety ; nor be humbled by the oppofitions of thofe 
who know not the Soul which animates them : But we muft bear patiently their proud Infults, 
without condemning their Intentions, or defpifing their Perfons. We muft, with fimplicity of 
heart, rejoice in the Light of Truth, which illuminates us ; and though its Anfwers condemn us, 
yet ought we to prefer, them, before all the fubtil Diftinftions the Imagination invents, for the ju- 
ilification of the Paffions. 

Every Man, for Example, thai can enter into himfelf, and ftill the confus'd noife of the Senfes 
and Paffions, clearly difcovers that every motion of Love, which is given us by God, muft Center 
upon him, and that God himfelf cannot difpenfe with the Obligation we have to Love him, in all 
things. 'Tis evident, that God cannot fuperfede acting for Himfelf, cannot create, or preferve 
our Will, to will any thing befides him, or to will any thing but what he Wills Himfelf. For I can- 
not fee how it is conceivable, that God can Will a Creature fhould have more Love for what is lefs 
lovely, or fhould Love Soveraignly, as its end, what is not Supreamly amiable. 

I know well that Men who interrogate their Paffions, inftead of confuting Order, may eafily ima- 
gine that God has no other Rule of his Will than his will it felf, and that if God obferves Order, 
'tis meerly hecaufe he voilVd it, and has made this fame Order by a Will abfolutely Free and Indif- 
ferent. ; There are thofe who think there is no Order immutable and neceflary by its Nature : And 
and that the Order or Wifdom of God, whereby he has made all things , though the firft of Crea- 
tures, is yet it felf a Creature, made by a Free- Will of God, and not begotten of his Subftance 
by the neceffity of his EfTence. But this Opinion which fhakes all the Foundations of Mora- 
lity by robbing Order, and the Eternal Laws, depending on it, of their Immutability, and over- 
turns the entire Edifice of the Chriftian Religion,, by diverting JESUS CHRIST, or the 
WORD of God, of his Divinity, does not yet fo perfectly benight the Mind, as to hide from it 
this Truth: That God Wills Order. Thus whether the Will of God Makes Order, or Suppofes it, 
we clearly fee when we retire into our felves, that the God we Worfhip cannot do what plainly 
appears to us to be contrary to Order. So that Order Willing that our Time, or the Duration 
of our Being, fhould be for him that preferves us, that the Motion! of otir Heart fhould continually 
tend towards him, who continually impreffes it in us ; that all the Powers of our Souls fhould la- 
bour only for him, by vet tue of whom they ad. God cannot difpenfe with the Commandment Mark 12. 
he gave by Mofes in the Law, and repeated by his Son in the Gofpel, Thoufbalt Love the Lord thy %o. 
Cod with < all thy Heart, and with all thy Soul, and with all thy Mind, and with all thy Strength. 

But becaufe Order requires that every Righteous Perfon fhould be happy, and every Sinner mi- 
ferable, and that every A&ion conformable to Order, and every Motion of Love to God fhould be 
rewarded, and every other contrary to Order, or that tends not to him, punifh'd : It is evident^ 
that whoever will be happy muft conftantly tend towards God ', and reject with abhorrence what- 
ever flops or retards him in his courfe, or Weakens his propenfion to the true good : And for 
this he need not confult any Cafuijis-, For when God fpeaks, 'tis fit that Men fhould be filent : 
And when we are abfolutely certain, that Our Senfes, and Paffions , have no Voice in thofe 
refolves we hear, in our moft Secret and inward Reafon, we ought always refpedtfully to attend 
and fubmit to them. 

Would we be refolv'd whether we may go to' a Ball or a Play : Whether we may in Confcience 
fpend a great part of theDay in Sports,and vainConverfation,whether certain Converfations,Studies, 
and Employs, are conformable to our Obligations. Let us retire into our felves , and hufh our 
Senfes and 'Paffions, and then fee in the Light of God, whether we can do for him any fuch 
A&ion: Let us interrogate him who is the Way, the Truth, and the Life, to know if the Road 
we purfue will not lead us to the Gates of Death : And whether (God being Efientially Jaft, and 
neceffarily oblig'd to punifh what is not agreeable to Order, and to reward all conformity to it) 
we have reafon to believe we are going to augment, or enfure our Felicity, by the Action we in- 
tend to do. .,.,,. 1 

If it be our Love to God that leads us to the Ball, let us go : If Heaven is to be gam d by play- 
ing, let us play Day and Night : If we have in profpeft the Glory of God in our Employment, 
let us exercife it-, Let us do all things with joy, for our Recompence fhall be great in Heaven. But 
if after having carefully examin'd our Eflential Obligations, we clearly difcover that neither our 
Being, nor the Time that meafures it, is at our own difpofal, and that we do an unjuft thing, 
which it neceflarily lies upon God to punifh, when our only ftudy is how to fpend our time in 
Mirth and Pleafure , If our Lord and Mafter CHRIST, who has purchas'd us by his Blood, 
f eproaches our Infidelity and Ingratitude in a moft clear and intelligible manner, for living alter 



ijj - F. MaLebranche Concerning 

the Flefcand the World , for Leading an Effeminate, and Voluptuous Life, and following Opinio 
On and Cuftorri : Let us yield to his Voice, and not harden our Hearts, nor feek put fuch Spiritual^ 
Guides, as comfort us under thefe Reproaches, and fecure us againft thefe Menaces, and involve in 
delightful Clouds that Light which ftrikes, and pierces our very Soul. ._'■:_ 

When the Blind leads the Blind they both fall into the Ditch, fays the tvangelift. But if Gccji 
excufesnot the Blind who commits himfelf to the Conduct of a Blind Leader, will he excufe him. 
who feeing clearly will yet willingly be guided by the Blind, becaufe he leads him pleafantly, and 
entertains him by the w ay, according to his Inclinations ? Thefe voluntary Blind Men ought to 
know, that God who never deceives, frequently permits thefe Seducers in punifhment to the cor- 
rupt Affections of thofe that feek them. That Blkidnefs is a penalty of Sin, though it be often the 
caufeofit; and that it is juft, that he who cared not to hear Eternal Wifdom, who fpoke only 
for his good, mould at laft fuller himfelf to be corrupted by Men,whofe deception is fo much more 
dangerous, as their Flatteries are more pleafmg. 

'Tis true 'tis no ealie thing to retire into our felves, to filence our Senfes, and Paffions, and to 
diftinguifh the Voice of God, from that of our Body : For we molt commonly take fenfible Proofs 
, for evident Reafons ^ and on that account it is neceflary to confult the Cafuifts. But it is not al- 
ways needful: For we fee our Duty on many occafions, with the cleareft Evidence, and an un- 
doubted certainty. And then it is even dangerous to confult them, unlefs it be. done with the 
greateft Sincerity, and by a Spirit of Humility , and Obedience. For thefe difpofitions ob- 
lige God to prevent our deception, or at leaft to keep us from deceiving our felves in any hurtful, 
manner. 

When it is convenient to advife with a Spiritual' Guide, fuch an one is"' to be chofen , as under- 
stands Religion, and reverences the Gofpel, and is acquainted with humane Nature. We muft take 
heed leaft the converfe of the World has corrupted him, leaft Friendflup fhould make him too Gen- 
tle and Complaifant, leaft he mould be Brib'dby his hopes or fears of us j We muft choofe one in a 
thoqland, lays St. Therefia, who, as fhe relates her felf,had like to have loft her way to H'eaven,by 
the means of an Ignorant Guide. 

The World is full of Deceivers, I fay of Well- Meaning Deceivers-, no Iefs than "others. Thofe 
who Love us, feduce us by their Complaifance : Thofe who are below us, flatter us } out of Re- 
fpect or Fear : Thofe above us out of Contempt, or Negligence, overlook our neceflities. Befides, 
all Men giveus Counfel, agreeable to the Breviates we give of our own Condition, and we never 
fail to make the belt of our Cafe, infenfibly laying our hand upon our fore when we ate afbam'd 
of it. We often deceive our Counfellours, that we may deceive our felves : For we fancy our 
felves fecure, whilft we follow their Directions. They do but conduct us whither we defign'd to 
go ^ and yet we would fain perfwade our felves, in fpite of our Light, and the Secret reproofs ot 
our Reafbn, that 'tis our Obedience which determines us. We feduce our felves, arid God: per- 
mits us ^ but we can never deceive him who Penetrates the Bottom of our Heavtc. And though 
we deafen our felves never fo much to the Voice of Internal Truth,' we are fufficiently made; fenfi- 
ble by the inward Reproaches, we receive, from the Supream Truth, leaving us to our felves, 
that it enlightens our Darknefs , and difcovers all the Wiles and Stratagems of Self- 
Love. 

, 'Tis therefore evident, that our Reafon muft be confblted for the Health of our Soul, as our 
Senfes are to be advis'd with for the Health of our Body ; and that when the former cannot clearly 
refolve us, we muft apply to the Cafuifts as we muft have recourfe to the Phyfician, when the lat- 
ter* are defective : But this is to be done with Judgment, fince Ignorant Cafmfis may Murther our 
Soul, as Vnskilful Phyficians may Poifon our Body. 

Whereas I explain not in particular the Rules which, may be given about the choice and ufe 
that's to be made of Phyficians and Cafuifts. I defire my Sentiments may be candidly inter- 
preted , and that it may not be imagin'd I am againft drawing all poffible fupplies from other 
Men. I know that a particular Bleffing attends our fubmifllon to the Opinions of the Wife 
and Underftanding : And I am willing to believe this general Rule, that 'tis requifite to die in 
the ufual Forms, is furer for the common fort of Men -, than any I could eftablifh for the Preferva- 
tion of Life 

But becaufe 'tis of perpetual ufe to retire into our felves, to confult the Gofpel ; and to liften 
to JESUS CHRIST, whether he fpeaks immediately to our Mind and Heart, or by Faith 
declares himfelf to our Ears and Eyes ^ I thought I might be allow'd to fay what I have laid. For 
Our Cafuifts deceive tis when they go contrary to the Doctrine of our Faith and Reafdh. And as 
we give Honour to God by believing that his Works have what is neceflary to their prefervation, 
I thought I could make Men fenfible their Machine wasfo admirably contriv'd, that it's own Nature 
can better furnilh it with what's neceflary to it's fafety, than Science and even the Experience of the 
ableft Phyficians. 



THE 



The Search after Truth! iij 



io*L£ii j ij:u ,i 



THE 

ILLUSTRATION 

UPON THE 

Third CHAPTER of the Fifth BOOR. 

That Love is different from Pleafure and Joy. 

TH E Mind commonly confounds things that are very different, when they happen at the 
fame time, and are not contrary to each other. As I have fliown by many Inftances in this 
Work ; becaufe herein chiefly confifl our Errors, inRefpedt of what paffes within us. Be- 
ing we have no clear Idea of what conftitutes the Nature or EiTence of our Mind, nor of 
any of the Modification it can receive, it often falls out, that to our confounding different things, 
they need but happen in us at the fame time. For we eafily confound what we know not, by a clear 
and diftindt Idea. 

It is not only impoffible clearly to conceive wherein confifts the difference of our InternalMotions- 
it is even difficult to difcover any difference between them : For to do, this we muft turn our Eyes 
inward,and retire into our felves ; not to confider them with reference to Good and Evil, which we 
do willingly enough : But to contemplate our felves with an abftract and barren confideration 
which colls us great trouble, and diftra&ion of Thought,. 

We eafily conceive, that the Roundnefs of a Body differs from its Motion; and though we know 
by Experience, that a Bowl on a plane cannot be prefs'd without being mov'd, and fo Motion and 
Roundnefs are found together : Yet we ufe not to confound them with one another, becaufe we 
conceive Motion and Figure by clear and diftinct Ideas. But 'tis not fo with Tleafure and Love y 
which we almofl always confound together. Our Mind grows, as it were Moveable by Pleafure, 
as a Bowl by it's roundnefs, and becaufe it is never, void of an imprefllon towards Good, it immedi- 
ately puts it felf in Motion towards the Objects which caufes, or feems to caufe the Pleafure. So 
that the Motion of Love happening in the Soul at the very time of it's feeling this Pleafure, is fuf- 
ficient to make her undiflinguifh or confound them, becaufe /he has no clear Idea of her Love 
and Pleafure as (he has of Figure and Motion. And for this Reafon fome are perfwaded, that Plea* 
fure and Love are not different, and that 1 diftinguilh too many things in each of our 
PaJJions. 
But that it may clearly appear, that Pleafure and Love are two very different things : I divide 
, Pleafures into two forts, the one fort precedes Reafon, as are agreeable Senfations, and go com- 
monly by the Name of the Pleafures of the Body. The other fort neither precede Reafon, nor the 
fenfes, and are generally call'd the Pleafures of the Soul. Such is the Joy that arife in us, in 
purfuance of a clear knowledge ofconfus'd fenfation we have of fome Good, that either does, or 
fliall accrue to us. 

For Example, a Man in tailing a Fruit, which he does not know, finds pleafure in eating it, 
if it bo good for Nourifhment. Which is a preceding or preventing Pleafure ; for fince he 
feels it before he knows whether the Fruit be good , 'tis evident it prevents his Reafon. An 
Huntfman when hungry experts to find, or actually finds fomething Eatable ; which gives him 
an actual fenfe of Joy. Now this Joy is a Pleafure which follows the knowledge of his prefent or 
future good. 

It is perhaps evident by this diftinttion of Pleafure into that which follows, and that which pre- 
vents Reafon ; that neither of them but differs from Love. For preventing pleafure undoubtedly 
precedes Love,Cmce it precedes all Knowledge, which fome way or other is always fuppos'dby Love. 
On the contrary, Joy, or the Pleafure which fuppofes foregoing Knowledge, prefuppofes likewife 
Love ; fince Joy fuppofes either a confus'd Senfation, or a clear Knowledge of the prefent or 
future Pofleffion of what we Love : For if we poffefs'd a thing for which we have no Love, we 
fliould receive no Joy from it. Therefore Pleafure is very different from Low, -fince that which 
prevents Reafon ; prevent and caufes Love, and that which follows Reafon, neceflarily/«^oyh Love; 
as an Effect fuppofes the Caufe. 

Moreover, if Pleafure and Love were the fame thing, there could be no Pleafure without Love, 
nor Love without Pleafure, otherwife a thing could be without it felf. Neverthelefs a Chriftian 
I oves his Enemy, and a well-educated Child his Father, though never fo irrational and unkind. 

Q.q The 



S e a. V. Malebranche Concerning 

The Sight of their Duty, the Fear of God, the Love of Order and Juftice caufes them to Love,) 
hoc only without Pleafure, but even with a fort of Horrour, thofe Perfons that are no ways de- 
lightful. I own they fometimes have the Senfe of Pleafure or Joy, upon the Refle&ion, that they 
perform their Duty ; or upon the Hopes of being rewarded as they do deferve. But befides, that 
this Pleafure is very manifeftly different from the Love they bear to their Father, and Enemy j 
though perhaps it may be the Motive of it, it fometimes is not fo much as the Motive of their act- 
ing ; but 'tis only an abftract View of Order, or a Notion of Fear, which preferves their Love* 
In one fenfe it may be truly faid, they have a Love for thefe Perfons, even whilft they do not 
think of them. For Love remains in us during the Avocations of Thought, and in Sleep : But I 
conceive that Pleafure has no longer a Subftance in the Soul, than (he is aware of it. Thus Love 
or Charity remaining in us without Pleafure or Delegation, cannot be maintain'd to be the very 
fame thing. , ■ ,-,.._ 

Since Pleafure and Pain are two contraries •, if Pleafure were the fame with Love, Pain would 
not differ from Hatred. But 'tis evident, that Pain is different from Hatred ; becaufe it often 
fubfifts without it. A Man, forlnftance, who is wounded unawares, fuffers a moft real and 
cutting Pain, whilft he is free from Hatred. For he knows not even the Caufe of his Pain, or the 
ObjeQ of his Hatred, or rather the Caufe of his Pain not defer ving his Hatred, cannot raife it. 
Thus he Hates not that Caufe of his Pain , though his Pain moves or difpofes him to Hatred. 
1 'Tis true , he defervedly Hates Pain ; but the Hatred of Pain is hot Pain, but fuppofes it. 
Hatred of Pain does not Merit our Hatred , as does Pain : For the former is, on the con- 
trary , very agreeable ; in that we are pleafed in Hating it , as we are difpleafed in Suf- 
fering it. Pain therefore not being Hatred , the Pleafure which is contrary to Pain is not 
Love, which is contrary to Hatred, and confequently the Pleafure which is presedaneous to Reafon," 
is not the fame thing as Love. I prove likewife that Joy, or the Pleafure which purfues Rea- 
fon, is diftinguiih'd from Love. 

Joy and Sorrow being contraries:, if Joy were the fame thing with Love,' Sorrow and 
Hatred would be all one. But it is evident , that Sorrow differs from Hatred , becaufe 
it fometimes has a feparate Subfiftence. A Man , for Example, by chance finds hirafelf 
depriv'd of things that he has need of -, this is enough to make him forrowful : But it can- 
not provoke him to Hatred', Either becaufe he knows not what it was that depriv'd him 
of this neceffary thing ; or becaufe , being unworthy of his Hatred , it could not . excite 
it. 'Tis true , this Man Hates the Privation of the Good which he Loves •, But it is 
manifeft, that this kind of Hatred is really Love: For he Hates the Privation of Good- meer^. 
!y becaufe he Loves Good ; and fince to fly the Privation of Good, is to tend towards 
Good ; Is is evident , that the Motion of his Hatred is not different from that of his Love. 
Therefore his Hatred , if he have any , being not contrary to his Love, and Sorrow being 
always contrary to Joy, it is evident , that his Sorrow is not his Hatred : and confequent- 
ly Joy is different from Love. Laftly, It is evident , that Sorrow- proceeds from the Pre- 
fence of fomething which we hate , or rather from the Abfence of fomething which we Love. 
Therefore Sorrow fuppofes Hatred , or rather Love, but 'tis very different from them 
both. 

I know St. Auftin defines Pain to be an Averfion the Soul conceives from the Bodies be- 
ing difpofed otberwife than /he would have it ; and that he often confounds Delegation 
with Charity, Pleafure with Joy, Pain with Sorrow, Pleafure arid Joy with Love } Pain 
and Sorrow, with Averfion or Hatred. But there's great Probability this Holy Father in all 
this follow'd the common way of fpeaking of the Vulgar, who confound-moft of thofe things 
which occur in them at one and the fame time : Or, it may be, did not examine thefe things 
in fo Nice and Philofophical a manner as he might have done. Yet I think I both may and ought 
to fay, that to me it feems neceffary exa&ly to diftinguifli thefe things, if we would explain 
our felves clearly and without Equivocation upon moft of the Queftions handled by him. For even 
Men of a quite oppofite Opinion ufe to build upon the Authority of this great Man , be- 
caufe of the various Senfes and Conftru&ions his Speech will afford ; which is not always 
Nice and accurate enough to reconcile Perfons, who are perhaps more eager to difpute, than 
defirous to agree. 



THE 



The Search after Truth 1 -|-- 



lL 



THE 

ILLUSTRATION 

flPd-N THE 

Third CHAPTER of the Second PART of the 

Sixth BOOK. 

Concerning , the Efficacy afcribed to Second Caufes. 

EVER fince the Tranfgreflion of our firjl Parent, the Mind rambling conftantly abroad, for- 
gets both it felf, and Him who pierces and enlightens it ; and is fo abfurdly pliant to the Se~ 
ducements of its Body, and thofe about it, as to imagine its own Happinefs and Perfedion is 
to be found in them. He that alone is able to ad in us, is at prefent hidden from ourEyes: 
His Operations are of an infenfible kind ; and though he produces and preferves all Beings, yet the, 
Mind whilft the earneft Enquirer of theCaufe of all things, cannot eafily know him, though it 
meets him every moment. Some Phiiofophers chufe rather to imagine a Nature and particular Fa- 
culties, as the Caufes of thofe which we term Natural Effeds, than to render to God all the Honour 
that is due to his Power. And though they have no Proof, nor even clear Idea of this pretended 
Nature and Faculties, as I hope to make appear, they had rather talk without knowing what they 
fay, and reverence a purely imaginary Power, than by any Effay of Thought to difcover that Invi- 
fible Hand which works all in all things. < ; , 

'Its unavoidable for me to believe that one of the molt deplorable Confequences of Original Sin # 
is our having no Tafte nor. Senfe for God ; or our Incapacity of Tafiing or Meeting him without a 
fort of Dread and Abhorrence, We ought to/eeGod in all things, to befenfible of his Power and 
force in all Natural Effeds ; to admire his Wifdom in the wonderful Order of his Creatures : In a 
word, to Worjhip, to Fear, to Love Him only in all his Works. But in Our prefent State there is 
a Secret Oppofition between Man and GOD; Man, confcious of his being a Sinner, hides him- 
felf, flies the Light, and is afraid to meet his Maker; and therefore had rather imagine in fur- 
rounding Bodies, a blind Power or Nature with which he can be familiar, than find in them the 
terrible power of an Holy and Juft GOD, who knows and Operates all in all. 

I confefs there are very many Perfons, who from another Principle than that of the Heathen 
iphilofophers, follow their Opinion about Nature , and Second Caufes : But I hopeto convince them 
in the Procefs of this Difcourfe, that they fall into this Sentiment, out of a Prejudice which 'tis im- 
poffible to fhake off, without thofe Succours which are furnifti'd by the Principles of a Philofophy, 
that has not always been fufficiently known. - For in all likelihood,this is what has kept them from 
declaring for an Opinion, which I think my felf oblig'd to efpoufe. 

1 have a great many Reafons which will not let me attribute to Second orNatural Caufes, a Force^ 
Power, or Efficacy,to produce any thing whatever. The chief whereof is, That this Opinion is to 
me utterly inconceivable. Though I ufe all pofllble Endeavours to comprehend it, I cannot find 
in my felf the Idea to reprefent to me, what can be that Force or Power afcrib'd to the Creatures. 
And I need not fear paffing a rafti Judgoient,in affirming that thofe who hold that the Creatures are 
endued with a Force and Power, advance what they do not clearly conceive. For, in lhort, if the 
Phiiofophers clearly conceive, that Second Caufes have a true Force to ad and produce their Like ; 
I being a Man as well as they, and participating of the fame Sovereign Reafon, might in all probabili- 
ty difcover the Idea which reprefent to them that Force. But , all the efforts that my Mind 
can make can difcover no other Force, Efficacy or Power, than in the Will of the Infinitely perfect 
Being. . ' ,. 

Befides, when I think upon the different Opinions of Phiiofophers upon this fubjed , I can no 
longer doubt of my aflertion. For if they faw clearly what this Power of Creatures was, or what 
was in them. truly powerful, they would agree in their Opinion about it. When Men cannot 
accord, though they have no private Intereft to hinder them, 'tis a certain Sign they have no 
clear Idea of what they fay, and that they underftand not one another, efpecially if they dif- 
pute on fubjeds that are not of a Complex Nature, and of difficult difcuffion ; like this before 
us. For there would be no difficulty to refolveit, if Men had a clear Idea of a created Force or 
Power. Here then follow forae of their Opinions, that we may fee how little agreement there is a- 
mongthem. ^ 



7 e6 F. MaLebranche Concerning 

For the There are Philofophers who maintain that fecond Caufes ad by their Matter, Figure and Motion- 
moil ex- and the c e j n on e fenfe are right enough : Others by their fubftantial form. Many by Occidents or 
traordma- Q mVlt - m f ome by Matter and Form ■ others by Form and Occidents, and others ftill by certain 
OrinioSs verms or faculties dtftincJ from all this. There are of them who affirm that the fubftantial Form 
sismre{ produces Forms >, and the Accidental Form, Accidents: Others fay that the Forms produce both o~ 
Metaphy- t her Forms and Accidents : Others, ftill that bare Accidents are not only capable of producing -A- 
ficks. Difp, w - rfcwW but even Forms. But it muft not be imagin'd that thofe for inftance, who fay, that Acci* 
Aff rt 2 2 *»** c ' an Produce Forms by vertue of the Form they are join'd to, underftaiKi it the fame way. For 
& ,. " one part of them will have Accidents to be the very Force, or Virtue o\ the Subftanttal Fcrm : Ano- 
Scor*. in 4. ther that they imbibe into them the Influence of the Form, and only ad fo by vertue of it : A 
Sent. Dili Third laftly "will have them to be but Inftrumental Gaufes. But neither are thefe latter fort alto- 
12 ' lm 5* gether agreed about what is meant by Inftrumental Caufe , and the vertue they receive from the 
37- 2. v. princ ^ al Nor can the philofophers compromife about the Adion whereby fecond Caufes pro- 
Paiaudan. duce their EfFeds. For fome of them pretend that Caufality ought not to be produe'd, fince it is this 
in 4- Sent. wn i c h produces. Others will that they truly aft by their own Adion. But they are involv'd in 
D. 12.Q. j- Q mM y Labyrinths in explaining precifely wherein this Adion confifts, and there are fo many diffe- 
Perer. 8*. rent Opinions about it, that I cannot find in my Heart to recite them. 

Phyf-Ch. 3. Conimbr. upon Ariflotle\ Phyficks , and many others cited by Suare^. See F onfe'ea's Metaplryf. qu. 13. Seft. 3. and 
Sowin. and ■favell. upon the fameQueftion. 

Such is the ftrange variety of Opinions, though I have not produe'd thofe of the Ancient Philofo- 
phers, or that were born in very remote Gountries. But we have fufficient Reafon to conclude, 
that they are no more agreed upon the fubjed of fecond Caufes, than thofe before alledg'd. 
Avicenna, for inftance, is of Opinion that Corporeal Subftances cannot produce any thing but Acci- 
Biivio lib. dents: This, according to Ruvio, is his Hypothecs. He fnppofes that God produces immediately 
2. Ph. a moji perfed Spiritual Subftance : That thvs produces another lefs perfetl, and thus a third, and fo on 
Traa. 4- to the loft, which produces all Corporeal Subftances ; and Corporeal Subftances, Accidents: But ' Avi- 
^ u - 2- cembrom not able to comprehend how Corporeal Subftances; which cannot penetrate. each other, 
See suarex fhould caufe alterations in them, fuppofes that there are Spirits which are capable of ading on Bo'-' 
Difp. 18. rfjffL becaufe they alone can penetrate them. For thefe Gentlemen not admitting the Vacuum, not 
Sect. 1. t j le _j toms f Democritus, nor having fufficient knowledge of the fubtil matter of M. des Cartes, could 
not with the Gajfendi ft s and.Carteftans, think of Bodies which were little enough to infinuate into 
the pores of thofe that are hardeft, and molt folid. 

Methinks this diverfity of Opinions juftifies this thought of ours, that Men often talk of things 
which they underftand not ; and that the Power of Creatures, being a Ficlion of Mind, of which 
we have naturally no Idea, every Man makes it, and imagines it what he pleafes. 

'Tis true, this Power has been acknowledg'd for a Real and True, by moft Men in all Ages ; but 
it has never yet been prov'd, I fay not demonftratively, but in any wife fo, as to make an impreflion 
upon an Attentive, thinking Man. For the confus'd Proofs which are built only upon the falla L 
cious Teftimony of the Senfes, and Paffions, are to be rejeded by thofe who know how to exercife 
their Reafon. 
Ch. 1. of Ariftotle, fpeaking of what they call Nature, fays it is Ridiculous to go about to prove that Na- 
the fecond tural Bodies have an inward Principle of Motion and Reft -, becaufe fays lie, it is a thing that's Self- 
Book of Evident. He likewife does not doubt but a Bowl which ftrikes another, has the force of putting 
ficks lt mMotion - This is witneffed by his Eyes, and that's enough for him , who feldom follows any 
other Teftimony than of the Senfes, (very rarely that of his Reafon) and is very indifferent whe- 
ther it be intelligible or not. 

Thofe who impugn the Opinion of fome Divines, who have written againft Second Caufes, fay, 
ltke^ri/iwJe,that the Senfes convince us of their Efficacy : And this is their firft and principal Proof. 
'Tis evident, fay they, that the Fire burns, that the Sun fhines, that Water cools, and he muft be 
See Fonfe- out of his Senfes who can doubt of it. The Authors of the other Opinion, fays the great Averroes, 
fa, suttrex, are out of their Wits. We muft, fay almoft all the Peripateticks, ufe fenfible Proofs for their Con- 
and o- vidion, who deny this Efficacy, and fo oblige them to confefs we are capable of ading on them, and 
foredted. woun ding them. 'Tis a judgment which * Ariftotle has already pronoune'd againft them, and it 
* Book 1*. ought to be put in Execution. 

of his To- But this pretended Demonftration cannot but create Pity : For it gives us to know the Weaknefs 
picks.C.i. of an Humane Mind : And that the Thilofophers themfelves are infinitely more fenfible than Rea- 
fonable. It evinces that thofe who glory in being the Inquirers of Truth, know not even whom they 
are to confult to hear anyNews of it : Whether Soveraign Reafon, which never deceives, but always 
fpeaks things as they are in themfelves, or the Body which fpeaks only out of Intereft, and with 
reference to the prefervation and convenience of Life. For in fine what prejudices will not be jufti- 
fied if we fet up our Senfes for Judges, to which moft of them owe their Birth ? As I have mown 
in The Search after Truth. 

When I fee a Bowl fhock another, my Eyes tell me, or feemtotell me, that it is the True Caufe 
ofthc motion it impreffes ; for the true caufe that moves Bodies, is not vifible to my Eyes. But 
if I interrogate my Reafon, I evidently fee, that Bodies having no Power to move themfelves, and 
their moving force being nothing but the Will of God, which preferves them fucceflively in different 
places, they cannot communicate a Power which they have not, nor could communicate, if they 
had it. For 'tis plain that there muft be Wifdom, and that Infinite, to regulate the communica- 
tion 



The Search after Truth. \ t; j 

Hon of motions, with that exa&nefs, Proportion, and Uniformity which we tee. A Body can- 
not know that infinite multitude of impuls'd Bodies round about it ; and though we mould fuppofe . 
it to have knowledge, yet it would not have enough fo proportionably to regulate and diftribute, 
at the inftant of protrufion, the moving force it felf is carried with. 

When I open my Eyes, the Sun appears to me fplendidly glorious in Light : And it feems not 
only to be vtfible it felf, but to make all the World fo too. Methinks 'tis he that arrays the Earth 
with flowers, and enriches it with Fruits. That gives Life to Animals and ftriking by His Heat 
into the very Womb of the Earth, impregnates Her with Stones Marbles and Metalls. But in con- 
fulting my Reafon I fee nothing of all this : And if I faithfully confuk it, I plainly difcover the 
feducement of my Senfes, and find that God W orks all in all. For knowing that all the changes 
which accrue to Bodies, have no other principle than the different Communications of Motions 
which occur in viftble and invifible Bodies : 1 fee that God does all ; fince 'tis his Will that caufes] 
and his Wiftiom that regulates all thefe Communications. 

_ I fuppofe that Local Motion is the principle of Generations, Corruptions, Alterations, and U- 
niverfally of all the changes incident to the Corporeal World :, which is an Opinion fufficiently now 
receiv'd among Men of Letters. But let their Opinion about it be what it will, that matters not 
much ; fince it feems much eafier to conceive, that a Body drives another when it Itrikes it, than 
to comprehend how Fire can produce Heat and Light, and educe from the power of matter a fubftance 
that was not in it before. And if it be neceffary to acknowledge that God is the True Caufe of 
the different Communications of Motion, by a much ftronger leafon wefhould conclude, that none 
but He can Create, and Annihilate real Qualities, and fubftantial Forms. I fay Create and Annihi- 
late : For it feems to me at lead as difficult to educe from matter a fubftance that was not in it, or to 
reauce it into it again, whilft yet there nothing remains of it, as to create it, or Annihilate it. But 
I flick not to the Terms : And I make ufe of thofe, becaufe there are no other that I know of, 
which exprefs without Obfcurity and Ambiguity, the changes fuppos'd by the Philofophers to ar- 
rive every moment by the force of fecond Caufes. 

■ I had fome fcruple to fet down here, the other Arguments which are commonly urg'd, for the 
Force and Efficacy of natural Caufes ; # For they appear fo weak and trifling to thofe who withftand 
Prejudices, and prefer their Reafon before their Senfes, that I can fcarce believe, methinks, that 
Reafonable Men could be perfwaded by them. However I produce, and anfwer them, fince there 
are many Philofophers who urge them. 

ARGUMENT I. 

If fecond Caufes did not Operate, fay * Suarez., -\- Fonfeca, and fome others, Animate things * In M * 
could not be diftinguifh'd from Inanimate, fince neither one, nor the other, would have an inward ^ e f taph o 
principle of their Adions, Sea P .'i. 

Affert. i. 

ANSWER. }*»»% 

I anfwer, that Men would have the fame fenfible proofs that have convinc'd them of the diflin&i- 2 . 
on they make between things Animate and Inanimate. They would ftill fee Animals do the fame 
A&ions, as eat, grow, cry, run, bound, &c. and would difcern nothing like this in Stones : And See Book 
this one thing makes the vulgar Philofophers believe, that Beafts live, and that Stones do not. For 4-Ch. n. 
we are not to fancy that they know by a clear and diftindt. view of Mind, what is the Life of a Dog. j? w * r ^ 
'Tis their Senfes which regulate their Decifions upon this Queftion. and Book 

If it were neceffary, I could prove here that the principle of the Life of a Dog differs not from $. p ar t 2. 
the principle of the Motion of a Watch. For the Life of Bodies whatever they be, can confift but Ch. 7, 
in the Motion of their Parts : And we may eafily judge that the fame fubtil matter, which caufes 
the Fermentation of the Blood, and Animal Spirits, in a Dog, and which is the principle of his 
Life, is no perfetter than that which gives Motion to the Spring of a Watch, or which caufes the 
Gravitation in r.he Weights of a Clock, which is the principle of their Life,ov to fpeak as others do, 
of their Motion. 

It behoves the Peripateticks to give thofe whom they ftile Cartefians a clear Idea of what they call 
the Life of Bea/ls, Corporeal Soul, Body which Perceives, and Defires, Sees, Feels, Wills, and then we 
ihall clearly refolve their Difficulties, if after that they fhall perfift in railing them. 

ARGUMENT II. 

It were impoffible to difcover the Differences, or Powers of the Elements : So that Fire might 
refrigerate as Water, and nothing would be of a fettled and fix'd Nature. 

ANSWER. 

I anfwer, That whilft Nature remains as it is, that is to fay, whilft the Laws of the Communica- 
tion of Motions remain conftantly the fame ; it is a Contradiction , that Fire mould not burn, or 
feparate the Parts of certain Bodies. Fire cannot refrigerate like Water, unlefs it becomes Wa- 
ter - for Ffre being only Fewel, whofe Parts have been violently agitated by an invifible furround- See«. 2, 

Rr ing wwlv - 



jcg F. Maleb ranch e Concerning 

ing Matter, as is eafle to demonftrate ; it is impoffible its Parts fhould not Communicate fome o£ 
their Motion to approaching Bodies : Now as thefe Laws are conftant, the Nature of Fire, its Vir- 
I tues and Qualities are unchangeable." But this Nature, and thefe Vertues, are only Confluences . 
of the General and Efficacious Will of G O D, who does all in all things. Therefore the Study of Na- 
ture, is in all refpefts falfe and vain, when we look for other true Caufes than the Wills of the 

ALMIGHTY. . 

I confefs that we are not to have recourfe to God, or the Univerfal Caufe, when we require the 
Reafon of particular Effeds. For we fhould be ridiculous to affert, for Inftance, That GOD 
dries the Ways, or Freezes the Water in the River. We muft fay, The Air dries the Earth, be- 
caufe it moves,and bears off the Water with it that dilutes it : Or that the Air,or the fubtil Matter 
Freezes the River in Winter, becaufe at that time it communicates not fufficient Motion to the 
Parts that conftitute the Water. In a Word, we muft, if we can, affign the Natural and particu- 
lar Gaufe of the Effeds propos'd, to Examination. But becaufe the Action of thefe Caufes confifts 
in the moving Force, which actuates them, which moving Force is the Will of G O D, (which create 
them), we ought not to fay they have in themfelves a Force or Power to produce any Effeds. And 
when in Reafoning we are at laft arriv'd to a general Effed, of which we feek the Caufe ; 'tis no 
good Philofophy to imagine any other than the general. And to feign a certain Nature, afirft 
Moveable, and univerfal Soul, or fome fuch Chimera, whereof we have no clear and difrinti Idea, 
would be to argue like an Heathen Philofopher. For Example, when we are ask'd, whence it comes 
that- fome Bodies are in motion, or that the agitated Air communicates its Motion to the Water, 
or rather whence proceeds the mutual Protrufion of Bodies : Motion and its Communication be- 
ing a general Effed, on which all others depend ; we cannot anfwer, I do'nt fay like Chriftians, but 
Philofophers, without afcending to God who is the Univerfal Caufe : Since, 'tis His Will that? is the 
moving Force of Bodies, and that regulates the Communication of their Motions. Had he will'd 
there fhould be no new Production in the World, he would not have put its Parts in motion : And 
if hereafter He fhall will the Incorruptibility of fome of the Beings he had made, he ihall ceafe to 
will the Communication of Motions in point of thofe Beings. - 

ARGUMENT- III. 

'Tis needlefs to Flow , to Water, and give feveral preparatory Difpofitions to Bodies, to fit 

sun ib tliem for ' what we delire fr° m them * F ° r G ° D has n0 need of P re P a «ng the Subjects on 
' ; *' l ' which he Works. , 

ANSWER. 

I anfwer-, That GOD may do abfolutely all he pleafes, without finding any Difpofitions in 
the Subjeds he works upon. But he cannot do it without a Miracle, or by Natural ways ; that is, 
by the General Laws of the Communication of Motions, which he has conftituted, and which he 
almoft always follows, in his Adings, GOD never multiplies his Wills without Reafon ; but ads 
always by the fimpleft Ways •, and for that Reafon he makes ufe of the Collifion of Bodies, in giving 
them Motion. Not that this Collifion is abfolutely neceffary to it, as our Senfes tell us, but that 
being the Occafion of the Communication of Motions, there need be but very few* Natural Laws 
to produce all the admirable Effeds we fee. For by this means we may reduce all the Laws of the 
Cdmmunication of Motions to one : Viz.. That percutient Bodies being confidered as but one, 
See Chap, at the Moment of their Contad, or Collifion, the moving Force is divided between them at their 
the laft of Separation, according to the Proportion of their Magnitude. But whereas concurrent Bodies are 
The Search. f urroun dedwith infinite others, which ad upon them, by Virtue and Efficacy of this Law ; how- 
ever conftant and uniform this Law be, it produces a World of quite different Communications, 
becaufe it ads upon infinite Bodies, which are all related to one another.. 

It is neceffary to Water a Plant to make it grow ; becaufeby the Laws of the Communication of 
Motions, hardly any other than Watry Particles can by their Motion, and by reafon of their Fi- 
gure, infinuate and Wind up themfelves into the Fibres of Plants, and by varioufly faftning and 
combining together, take the Figure that's neceffary to their Nourifhment. The fubtil Matter 
which is conftantly flowing from the Sun, may, by its agitating the Water, lift it into the Plants ; 
but it has not a competent Motion to raife grofs Earthy Particles. Yet Earth and Air too are ne- 
ceffary to the Growth of Plants- Earth topreferve the Water at their Root, and Air to give this 
Water a Moderate Fermentation. But the Adion of the Sun, the Air, and Water, confifting but 
in the Motion of their Parts, in proper fpeaking, G O D is the only Agent. For as I have faid, 
there is none but He that can by the efficacy of his Will, and by the Infinite Extent of his Know- 
ledge caufe and regulate thofe infinitely infinite Communications of Motions, which are made eve- 
ry moment, and in a Proportion infinitely exad, and regular. 

ARGUMENT IV. 

Can God refift, and Fight againft Himfelf ? Bodies juftle, ftrike, andrefiftone another, there- 
fore Gods Ads not in them, unlefs it be by his concourfe. For if it were he only that produe'd, 
and preferv'd Motion in Bodies, he would take care' to divert them before the Collifion, as know- 
ing well that they are impenetrable. To what purpofe are Bodies driven to be beaten back again, 

why 



The Search after Truth. iea 

why muft they proceed to recoil ? Or what fignifies it to produce andPreferve ufelefs Motions ; Is it 
not an Abfurdity to fay that God impugns himfelf, and that He deftroys his Works, when a' Bull 
fights with a Lyon, when a Wolf devours a Sheep, and a Sheep eats the Grafs which God makes 
to grow ? Therefore there are Second Caufes. 

A N S W E R. 

_ Therefore Second Caufes do all, and God does nothing at all. For God cannot act againfl: him- 
felf, but Concourfe is AcJion. The concurring to contrary Actions is giving contrary Concourfe,and 
confequently doing contrary Actions. To concur with the Action of Creatures that refill each other, 
is to Act againfl: himfelf. To concur to ufelefs Motions, is to Act in vain. But God does nothing 
needlefs or in vain ;, he does no contrary Actions, and therefore concurs not to the Action of Crea- . 
tures that often deftrOy one another,and makes ufelefs Actions and Motions. See where this proof 
of Second Caufes leads us. But let us fee what Reafon fays to it. 

• God Works all in every thing, and nothing refifts him. He Works all in all things, in as much as 
his Will both makes, and regulates all Motions : And nothing refifts him, becaufe he does what e- 
ver he Wills. But let us fee how this is to be conceiv'd. Having refolv'd to produce by the fimpleft 
ways, as moft conformable to Order that infinite Variety of Creatures which we admire, he wilfd 
that Bodies (hould move in a right line, becaufe that is the mofkfimple. But Bodies being impene- 
trable, and their Motions tending in Lines that oppofe, or interfect one another, they muft ne- 
ceflarily fall foul together, and confequently ceafe moving in the fame manner. God forefaw this, yet 
notwithstanding pofitively will'd the Collifion, or ihock of Bodies ; not that he's delighted in im- 
pugning himfelf, but becaufe he defign'd to make ufe of this Collifion as an Occafton for his efta- 
blifhing the General Law of the Communication of Motions ; by which he forefaw he muft produce 
an infinite Variety of admirable Effects. For I am perfwaded that thefe two Natural Laws which 
are the fimplefl of all others : Namely, that All Motion tends to make itfelf in a right line - and that 
in the Collifion^ Motions are Communicated proportionably to. the magnitude of the Colliding Bodies ; are,, 
fufficient to > produce fucb a World as we fee : That is, the Heaven and Stars, and Planets, and Co- 
mets, Earthy Water, Air, and Fire : In a Word, the Elements., ?nd all Unorganiz'd, and ina- 
nimate Bodies. For Organiz'd Bodies depend on many other Nilgai Laws, which are perfectly 
unknown. It may be hiring Bodies are not form'd like others by a determinate number of Natural 
Laws. For there is great probability, they were all form'd at the Creation of the World, and 
that Time only gives them a neceffary Growth, to make them Vifible to our Eyes ; Neverthelefs, 
it is certain, they receive that Growth by the General Laws of Nature, whereby all other Bodies 
are form'd which is the Reafon, that their Increafe is not always Regular. 

I fay then that God by the firft oi Natural Laws pofitively Wills, and confequently Caufes the 
Collifion of Bodies ; and afterwards imploys this Cc'j'Son as an Occafion of eftablifhing the Second 
N '. I Law ; which regulates the Communication vtvlotions •, and that thus the actual Collifion, 
is t ie Natural, or OccafionalCaufe of the Actual Communication of Motions. 

It this be well confider'd, it will be evidently acknowledg'd that nothing can be better Order'd. 
But fuppofing that God had not ft> Ordain'd it, and that he had diverted Bodies, when ready to 
encounter, as if there were a Vacuum to receive them, Firft they would not be fubject to that per- 
petual Viciffitnde which makes the Beauty of the Univerfe ■ For the Generation of fome Bodies is 
perform'd by the Corruption of Others ; and 'tis the contrariety of their Motion which produces 
their Variety. Secondly God would not act in the moft fimple manner : For if Bodies ready to 
meet (hould continue on their Motion, without touching, they muft needs defcribe Lines curv'd in 
a thoufand different Fafhions -, and confequently different Wills muft be admitted in God to deter- 
mine their Motions. Laftly, if there were no Uniformity in the Action of Natural Bodies, and 
that their Motion were not made in a right Line, we fhould have no certain Principle for our Rea- 
fonings in natural Philofophy, nor for our conduct in many Actions of our Life. 

'Tis not a difprder that Lyons eat Wolves, and that Wolves eat Sheep, and Sheep grafs, of which 
God has had fo fpecial a -regard, as to give it all things neceffary to it's prefervation, and likewife 
a Seed for perpetuating it's kind. This proves fecond caufes no more, than the Plurality of Caufes, 
of contrary Principles of Good, and Evil, which the Manichees imagin'd to account for thefe effects : 
But 'tis a certain Sign of the Grandeur, Wifdom and Magnificence of God. For God does no 
works unbecoming an infinite Wifdom, and he does them with that profufion as is a manifeft proof 
of his Power, and Greatnefs. Whatever is deftroy'd, is repair'd again by the fame Law that de- 
itroy'd it : So great is the Wifdom , Power and Fecundity of that Law. God prevents not the 
deftrudtion of Beings by any new Will : not only becaufe the firft fuffices to reftore them ; but 
efpeciaily becaufe his Wills are of much greater value than the Reparation of thefe Beings. They 
are far more valuable than all that they produce. And God had never made this World, fince not 
worthy of the Action by which it was produe'd , unlefs he had other profpeets than are known by 
the Philofophers, and knew how to honour himfelf in JESUS CHRIST, with an honour 
which the Creatures are not capable of giving him. 

When a Houfe falls, and crufhes an Honeft Man to death : a greater Evil happens , than when 
one Beaft devours another , or when a Body is fore'd to rebound by the mock it receives from the 
Encounter of another. But God does not multiply his Wills , to redrefs either the true or appa- 
rent Diforders which are the neceffary Confequences of natural Laws. God ought not to correct . 
nor change thefe Laws, though they fometimes produce Monfters. He is not to confound the Or- 
der, 



7° 



* See the 
Uluftrati- 
on upon 
theFourth 
Chapter 
of the fe- 
cond Part 
concern- 
ing Me- 
thod. 
+ See the 
firft Illu- 
ftration 
upon the 
FifthCha> 
pter. 



- 

F. Max. Tranche Concerning 

der, and fimplicity of his Ways. He mult neglect mean and little things : I would fay , he muft 
not have particular Wills to produce effects, which are not equivalent to, or worthy of the Action 
of the Producer. God works not Miracles fave when Order which he conftantly follows requires it : 
which Order requires that he fhould act hy the moft fimple ways - and make no exceptions to his 
general Wills, but when 'tis abfolutely necefTary to his defigns, or on particular occafions, which 
we are abfolutely ignorant of. Though we are all united to Order , or the Wifdom of God, yet 
we know not all the Rules of it. We fee in it what we ought to do, but we cannot difcover in it 
what God ought to Will,nor is it our bufmefs to be very follicitous to know it. 

A great inftance of what I have faid, we have in the Damnation of an infinite number of Perfons, 
whom God fuffer'd to perifh in times of Ignorance, and Error : God is infinitely Good : He loves 
all his Works ; He wills that all Men fhould be fav'd, and come to the Knowledge of the Truth, 
for he has made them to injoy him. And yet the greateft number are Damn'd. They live and die 
in blindnefs, and will remain in it to all Eternity. Conies not this from his acting by the fimpleffc 
means, and his following Order ? * We have mown, that according to Order, God ought not to 
prevent by Indeliberate Pleafures the -f- will of the firft Man, whofe Fall has diforder'd Nature. It 
was requifite that all Men Ihould defcend from one , not only becaufe that is the molt fimple way, 
but for feveral too Theological and abftract Reafons to be here explained. In fine we ought to be- 
lieve this conformable to the Order which God follows , and to the Wifdom he always confults in 
the intention, and execution of his defigns. The firft Man's Sin has produc'd infinite Evils, I con- 
fefs, but certainly Order requir'd that God fhould permit it , and that he fhould inftate Man in a 
peccable condition. 

God minded to repair his laps'd Work ,, feldom gives Victorious Graces that prevail over the 
malice of the greateft Sinneis. Sometimes he gives Graces ufe-lefs to the converfion of the Recei- 
ver, though he forefees their inutility, and fometimes fheds them in great Plenty , yet with little 
effect : Commonly he acts as it were by degrees, giving Men fecret infpirations of Self-denial and 
Repentance, as formerly he gave them Counfels in his Gofpel. Thus he prepares them for the 
grace of Converfion, and laft of all beftows it. Why all thefe round-about Methods and ways in- 
direct ? -Would it not have been enough for him to have pofitively WjU'd the Converfion of a Sin- 
ner, to have effected it in an efficacious and irrefiftible manner ? But is not it vifible that this pro- 
ceeds from his acting by the fin ^left Methods, and Orders willing it, though we do not always fee 
it ? For God muft neceffarily -'follow Order , and Wifdom in his actings , though thefe are Unfa- 
thomable Ahyffes to the Mind of Man. There are certain moft fimple Laws in the Order of Grace, 
by which God for the moft part acts : For this Order has its Rules as well as that of Nature, though 
we know them not-, aswe/eethofe of the Communications of Motions. Only let us follow the 
Counfels which are given us in the Gofpel by him, who perfectly knows the Laws of Grace, 

This I fay to pacify the unjuft Complaints of Sinners , who defpife the Counfels of J ] 



CHRIST, and charge their Malignity and diforders upon God. 



ESUS 
They would have God fhow 



Miracles in their behalf, and difpenfe with T 1?e general Laws of Grace. They lead their Life in 
Pleafures, they feek out for Honours , and daily renew thofe wounds which fenfible Objects have 
given their Brain, and add more to them, and after this expect God fhould cure them by a Miracle. 
Not unlike wounded Men , who in the excefs of their Pain tear their Cloaths, renovate their 
Wounds, and when in the fight of approaching Death, complain of the cruelty of their Surgeons. 
They would have God to fave them, becaufe fay they, God is Good, Wife, Powerful, and needs 
but determine it, to make us happy. Why did he make us to damn and deftroy us ? They ought 
to know that God Wills they fhould be fav'd,?nd to that intent has done all that could be done by 
Order, and Wifdom, which he confults. We cannot believe that he deferts us, whilft he gives us 
his own Son to be our Mediator, and Sacrifice. Yes, God is willing that all Mankind fhould be 
fav'd ; but by ways that we ought to ftudy with care, and follow with caution and wearinefs. God 
is not to confult our Paffions, in the Execution of his defjgns : He can have no regard but to his 
Eternal Wifdom, nor follow any other rule than the Divine Order, which Order will have us imi- 
tate JESUS CHRIST, and obey his Counfels, for our Sanctification and Salvation. But 
if God has not predeflin'd all Men to be conformable to the Image of his Son , who is the Model, 
and Exemplar of the Elect : 'Tis becaufe herein God acts by the moft fimple means, with reference 
to his defigns, which all make for his Glory : 'Tis becaufe God is an univerfal Caufe, which ought 
not to act like particular Caufes , which have particular Volitions for all they do. 'Tis becaufe his 
Wifdom, which in this refpect, is an Abyfs to our apprehenfions , Wills it fo. Laftly, 'tis becaufe 
this Conduct is more worthy of God than could be any other more favourable for the Reprobate. 
For even they are condemn'd hy an Order as worthy our Adorations , as that whereby the Eled 
are fanctified and fav'd : And nothing but our Ignorance of Order , and our Self-love , make us 
blame a Conduct which the Angels and Saints eternally admire. But let us return to the proofs of 
the efficacy of fecond Caufes. 

ARGUMENT V. 

If Bodies had not a certain Nature or Force to act with , and if God did all things, there would 
be nothing but what was Supernatural, in the molt ordinary effects. The diftinction of Natural, and 
Supernatural, which has been fo well receiv'd in the World , and eftablifht by the univerfal appro- 
bation of the Learn'd, would be Chimerical and Extravagant. 



A N- 



The Search after YriitK { I \ 

ANSWER. 

I anfwer that diftinftion is abfurd in the Mouth of Ariflotte, fince the Nature he has eftablifht is a 
meer Chimera. I fay that diftin&ion is not clear in the mouth of the Vulgar part of Men, who 
judge of things by the Impreflion they make upon their Senfes. For they know not precifely what 
they mean when they fay, the Fire burns by it's Nature. I fay that this diftindtion may pafs in the 
ihouth of a Divine, if he means by natural Effects , the confequences of the General Laws which 
God has fettled for the production and prefervation of all things : And by ftipernatural Effects thofe 
which are independent on thefe Laws. In this fenfe the Difiinttion is true. But the Philofophy of 
Ariftotle together with the Impreflion of the fenfes, makes it, as I think, dangerous, becaufe it may 
divert from God the too refpedtful admirers of the Opinions of that wretched Philofopker • or fuch 
as confult their fenfes inftead of retiring into themfelves to confult the Truth. And therefore that 
diftinc~tion is not to be made ufe of without an Explication , St. Auftin having us'd the word for- Lib , 
tune, retraced it, though there are few that could be deceiv'd by it. St. Paul fpeaking of meats tetrad. 
ofFer'd to Idols , advertiies that an Idol is nothing. If the Nature Of the Heathen Philofophy be a i Cor.io. 
ficJion, if that nature be nothing, it mould be precaution'd , for that there are many who are abus'd l 9- 
by it : And more than we fuppofe who inconfiderately attribute to it the Works of God, who are 
taken up with this Idol, or fiction of the Humane mind , and pay it thofe Honours which are only 
due to the Divinity. They are willing to let God be Author of Miracles, and fome Extraordinary 
effe&s, which in one fenfe, are little worthy of his Greatnefs and Wifdom , and they refer to the 
Power of their Imaginary nature thofe conftant and regular Effects, which none but the Wife know 
how to admire. They fuppofe too that this fo wonderful difpofition which all living Bodies have 
to preferve themfelves, and beget their like, is a production of their Nature : For according to 
thefe Philofophers the Sun and Man beget a Man. 

We may ftill diftinguifli between fupernatural and natural Order, feveral ways. For we may fay 
that the fupernatural relates to future Goods ; that it is eftablifh't, upon confideration of the merits 
of C H R I S T ; that it is the firft and principal in the defigns of God •, and other things enough 
to preferve a diftinction, which they are vainly apprehenfive mould fall to the ground, 

ARGUMENT VI. 

The main proof which is brought by the Philofophers for the Efficacy of fecond Caufes, is drawri 
from the will and liberty of Man,Man wills, and determines of himfelf. But to Will and Determine 
is to Ad. 'Tis certainly Man who commits Sin, God not being the Author of it, any more than of 
Consupifceme and Error. Therefore Man acts. 

ANSWER. 

I have fufficiently explain'd in feveral Places of the Treatife about the Search of truth , what is 
the Will, and Liberty of Man, and efpecially in the firft Chapter of the firft Booh , and in the firft 
Buftration upon it ; fo that it is needlefs to repeat it again. I acknowledge Man Wills, and Deter-; 
mines himfelf, in as much as God caufes him to Will •, inceflantly carries him towards good , and 
gives him all the Idea's and Senfations , by which he determines his Impreiion. I know likewife 
that Man alone commits Sin. But I deny that therein he does any thing ; For Sin, Errour , and 
even Concupfcence are nothing. I have explain'd my felf upon this Point in the firft lUuflration. 

Man wills, but his Volitions are impotent in themfelves ; they produce nothing, and God works 
all notwithftanding them. For 'tis even God that makes our' Will , by the Impreflion he gives us * mm u~ 
towards Good. All that Man has from himfelf are * Errour and Sin, which are nothing. bet ^ 

nifimendacjum & peccatum, Concil, Arauf. 2. Can. 22. 

There is a great difference between our Minds and Bodies that are about* us ; I grant, Our Mind 
in one fenfe Wills, Acts, and Determines it felf. Our own inward Confcioufnefs is an evident Con- 
viction. If we were deftitute of Liberty , there could be no future Recompence and Punifhment, 
for 'tis our Liberty that makes our Actions good or bad ; and without it Religion would be but 3 
Pbantafm, and a Dream. But that which we cannot fee clearly is , That Bodies have a force of 
Acting. This it is we cannot comprehend, and this we deny, when we deny the Efficacy of Second 

Caufes. ri *j u t wfri 

Even the Mind acts not in that meafure which is imagin'd. I know that I will, and that 1 Will 
freely ■ I have no Reafon to doubt of it ; which is ftronger than that inward feeling I have of my, 
felf Nor do I deny it, but I deny that my Will is the * true Caufe of the Motion of my Arm, of * In the 
the Idea'sof my Mind, and of other things which accompany my Volitions. For I fee no Relation Sence ex- 
between fo different things : Nay, I moft clearly fee there can be no Analogy between my Will to pia^dm 
move my Arm, and the Agitation of fome little Bodies, whofe Motion and Figure I do not know, ™^- 
which make choice of certain Nervous Canals, amongft a Million of others unknown to me, .in Or- longingto 
der to caufe in me the Motion 1 defire, by a World of Motions, which I defire not. I deny that my this Illu . 
Will produces in me my Idea's : I cannot fee how 'tis poflible it mould •, for fince it cannot Ait or ftration. 
Will without Knowledge, it fuppofes my Idea's , but does not make them, (Nay, I do not lo 
much as know precifely what an Idea is J I cannot tell,whether we produce them out 01 nothing,and 
fend them back to the fame nothing, when we ceafe to perceive them. I fpeak after the Notjon ot 
ibme Perfons, S f P 



2 yi F. Malebranche Concerning 

1 produce, you'll fay, my Idea's by the Faculty, which God gives me oi Thinking. I move mf\ 
Arm, becaufe of the Union which God has eftablilh'd between my Mind and Body. Faculty, Vint- 
on, are Logical Terms, of loofe and indeterminate Signification. There is no particular Being, nor 
Mode ot Being, which is either Faculty or Union. Therefore thefe Terms ought to be explain'd. 
If, you'll fay, that the Union of my Mind and Body confifts, in God's willing, That, upon my 
Defire to move my Arm, the Animal Spirits mould betake themfelves to the Mufcles it is compos'd 
of, to move it in the manner defrYd : I clearly underftand this Explication, and receive it : But 
this is exaclly.my own Affertion. For if my Will determine that of God, 'tis evident, that my 
Arm is mov'd, not by my Will, which is impotent of it felf, but by the Will of God, which ne- 
ver fails of its EffecT:. 
* -j ftill But if it be faid, The Union of my Mind and Body confifts in God's giving me a * Force to 
mean a move ray Arm, as he has given my Body likewife a Force of making me feel Pleafure and Pain • to 
true and the end I may be follicitous for this Body, and be concerned for its Prefervation •, certainly this is 
efficacious t0 f U pp fe the thing in difpute, and to make a Circle. No Man has a clear Idea of that Force 
Folcc - which the Soul has over the Body, or the Body over the Soul \ nor knows very well what he fays 
when he poiitively afferts it. That Opinion has been embrac'd through Prejudice, has been learn'd 
in Infancy, and in the Age of Senfe. But Underftand ing, Reafon, and Reflexion have no part in 
it ; which is manifeft enough from what I have faidin the foregoing Treatife. 

But you'll fay, I know by my inward Confcience of my Adion, that 1 really have this Force j 
and therefore am not miftaken in believing it. I anfwer. That when I move my Arm, I am con- 
fcious to my felf of the A&ual Volition by which I move it/, and I err not in believing I have that 
Volition. I have moreover an inward Senfe of a certain Effort or Endeavour, which accompanies 
*h feems this Volition, and it is to believ'd that I make this Endeavour. Laft of all, I grant that * I have 
evident to an inward feeling of the Motion of my Arm, at the inftant of thisEffbrt ; which fuppos'd, I agree 
me that t0 what is faid, That the Motion of the Arm is perform'd at the inftant a Man feels this Effort, or 
the Mind h as a .p ra &j c al Volition' of moving his Arm. But I deny that this Effort, which is no more than a 
ty inter^ Modification, or Senfation of the Soul, which is given us to make us underftand our Weaknefs, and 
nalSenfa- to afford us a confus'd and obfcure Senfation of our Strength, can be capable of moving, and detec- 
tion, or mining the Spirits. I deny there is any Analogy or Proportion between our Thoughts, and the Mo« 
Confci- t j om f Matter. I deny that the Soul has the leaft Knowledge of the Animal Spirits, which (he 
motforfof i m P lovs t0 move tne B °dy Animated by her. Laft of all, Though the Soul exactly knew the Ani- 
the Arm mal Spirits, and were capable of moving them, or determining their Motions, yet 1 deny that with 
(he Ani- all this fhe could make choice of thefe Duclus of the Nerves , of which fhe has no Knowledge, fo 
mates. She a s to drive the Spirits into them, and thereby move the Body with that Readinefs, Exa&nefs, and 
knows by p orce . as j s obfervable even in thofe who are the leaft acquainted with the Structure of their 

Confci- r> J 

enceonly bodv - 

what (he feels, or thinks. By inward Senfation, or Confcience, we know the fenfe we have of the Motion of our Arm. But Confcience 

does not notify the Motion of our Arm, or the pain we fuffer in it, any more than the Colours we fee upon Objects. Or if this 

will not be granted, 1 fay,that inward Senfation is not infallible,for Error is generally found in theSenfations when they are eorripos'd. 

I have fufficiently prov'd it in the firft Book of the Search after truth. 

For fuppofing that our Volitions are truly the moving Force of Bodies, (howbeit that feems in- 
conceivable.) how can we conceive the Soul moves her Body ? The Arm for Example is mov'd by 
means of an inflation or contraction caus'd by the Spirits in fome of the Mufcles, that compofe *>»• 
But to the end the Motion imprinted by the Soul on the Spirits in the Brain mav be Communicated 
to thofe in the Nerves, and from thence to others in the Mufcles of the Arm, the Volitions of the 
Soul muft needs multiply, or change in proportion to thofe almoft infinite (hocks or Collilions, 
that are made by the little Bodies that conftitute the Spirits. But this is inconceivable , without 
admitting in the Soul, an infinite number of Volitions, upon the leaft Motion of the Bodj, fince 
the moving it would necelTarily demand an innumerable multitude of Communications of Motions. 
For in fhort, the Soul being but a particular Caufe^ and not able to know exadrly the degrees of 
agitation, and the dimenfions of infinite little Corpufcles, which encounter, upon the difperfion of 
the Spirits into the Mufcles ; (he could not fettle a General Law for the Communication of thefe 
Spirits Motion, nor follow it exattly, if (he had eftablifh't it. Thus it is evident, the Soul could 
not move her Arm, although fhe had the Power of determining the Motion of the Animal Spirits. 
Thefe things are too clear to be longer infifted on. 

The cafe is the fame with our Thinking Faculty. We are inwardly confcious that we Will the 
Thinking on fomething ; that we make an effort to that purpofe, and that in the Moment of our 
defire and effort, the Idea of the thing prefents it felf to our Mind, but our inward Senfation does 
not tell us, that our Will or Effort produces our Idea. Reafon does not affure us that it's poflible; 
and only prejudice makes us believe that our defires are the caufes of our Ideas, whilft we experiment 
an hundred times a Day, that the latter accompany orpurfue the former. As God and his Opera- 
tions have nothing fenfible in them, and as we are not confcious of any thing but our defires that 
precede the prefence of our Ideas, fo we do not think our Ideas can have any other caufe than thefe 
defires. But view the thing clofely, and we (hall fee no force in us to produce them ; neither Rea* 
fon nor Confcience giving us any information thereupon. 

I don't think my felf oblig'd to tranferibe all the other proofs employ'd by the patrons for the 
Efficacy of Second Caufes. Becaufe they feem fo trifling that I might be thought to defign to ren- 
der them Ridiculous: And I (hould make my felf/o, if I gave them a Serious Anfwer. An Au- 
thor, for Example, very gravely afferts in behalf of his Opinion : Created Beings are true Material, 

Formal, 



The Search after Truth. ij% 



Fofmtl, Final Caufes, why mud not they likewlfe, be Efficient or Efficacious ? I fancy I fliould give the 
World little fatisfa&ion, if to anfwer this Gentlemans Qiieftion, I fhould ftand to explain fo grofs 
an Ambiguity, and (how the difference between an Efficacious caufe and that which the Philofo- 
phers are pleas'd to call material. Therefore I leave fuch arguments as thefe to come to thofe 
which are drawn from Holy-Writ. 

ARGUMENT VII. 

The Defenders of the Efficacay of Second Caufes, commonly alledge the following Paflages to 
fupport their Opinion. Let the Earth bring forth Grafs : Let the Waters bring forth the moving Cred- Gen « *• 
ture that hath Life, and Fowl that may fly, &c. Therefore the Earth and Water, by the Word of 
God, receiv'd the Power of producing Plants, and Animals. Afterwivds God Commanded the 
Fowls and Fifties to multiply, Be fruitful and multiply, and fill the Waters jn the Seas, and let Fowl 
multiply in the Earth. Therefore he gave them a Power of begetting their like. 

Our Saviour in the fourth Chapter of c t. Markikys, the Seed which fat Is on good Ground, brings 
forth Fruit an Hundred-fold, and that the Earth bringeth forth Fruits of her f elf , firfi the blade then the 
Ear, after that the full Corn in the Ear. Laftly, it is written in tl Bpok of Wifdqm, that the Fire 
had as it were forgotten it's firength to Burn, in favour of the People of God. It is therefore cer- 
tain from the Old and New Teftament, that Second Caufes have an A&ive Force. 

ANSWER. 

I anfwer, that in Holy- Writ there are many Paffages which afcribe to God the pretended Effica- 
cy of Second Caufes, fome of which are thefe. I am the Lord that maketh ALL THINGS, that iTa.44. 24. 
firetcheth forth the Heavens ALONE, that fpreadeth abroad the Earth by OM T SELF. Thine J ob 10 - 8 - 
bands have made me and fifluon'd me * together round about. * Vul §* te ~ 

Icanrfot tell how you came into my Womb. -It was not I that formed the Members of every one of 2 Mace. 

you. But doubtlefs the Creator of the World who formed the Generation of Man, &c'. Seeing he giveth to Ch. 7.* v. 
Life, and breath, and all things. He caufeth Grafs to grow for the Cattle, and Herb for the fervice of 22, 23. 
Men, that he may bring forth food out of the Earth. There <are infinite fuch like Paflages, but let Afts x7 ' 
thefe fuffice. 25. . 

When an Author feems to Contradict himfelf : And Natural Equity, or a ftronger Reafon obliges I4 . ' 
us to reconcile him to himfelf •, methinks we have an infallible Rule to difcover his true Opinion.For 
we need but obferve, when he fpeaks according to his own Light, and when after Common Opinion. 
When a Man Accommodates himfelf to the vulgar way of fpeaking, that is no fure fign he is of 
their Opinion. But when he fays politively the contrary to what Cuftom Authorifes, though he 
fay it but once,we have Reafon to conclude it his judgement, provided we know he fpeaks ferioufly 
aud with Mature deliberattion. 

For inftance, when an Author fpeaking of the properties of Animals, (hall fay an hundred times 
over, that Beaftshsvefenfe, that Dogs know their Mafter , that they Love and Fear him ; and but 
in twoor three places fhall affirm that Beafts are infenfible, that Dogs are incapable of Knowledge, 
and that they neither Love nor Fear any thing ; how fhall we reconcile this Author to himfelf ? 
Muft we make a Collection of all his paflages for and againft it ; and judge of bis Opinion by the 
greater number ? If lb, I conceive there is no Man to whom, for example, maybe attributed this 
Opinion, That Animals have no Soul. For even the Cartefians raoft frequently fay, that a Dogs feels 
when he is beaten, and rarely it is that they affirm he does not feel. And although I my felf en- 
counter a vafi multitude of prejudices in this Treatife, yet many paflages may be gather'd from it, 
by which, unlefs this prefent Rule be admitted, it may be prov'd that I confirm them all, and even 
that I hold the Opinion of the Efficacy of Second Caufes, which I am now refuting ; or it may be 
it might be concluded that the Search after Truth abounds with grofs and palpable contradictions, 
as do fome Perfons who 1 fear have not Equity, and penetration enough, to fet up for judges of 
the Works of others. 

Holy Scripture, and Fathers, and moft Religious Men, fpeak oftner of fenfible Goods, Riches, 
and Honours, in the vulgar Opinion, than by the true Ideas they have of them. Our LORD 
brings in Abraham laying to the Wicked Rich Man, Son, thou haft receiv'd thy GOOD things in 
thy Life time - 7 that is to fay, Riches and Honour. What we by prejudice call Good, our Good,that 
is Gold and Silver, is ftil'd in Scripture, in an hundred places our Suftenance, and Subftance, and 
even our honefty, or that which Honours us, Paupertas & Hone ft as * Deo funt. Mult thefe ways * e D r f* 4 
of fpeaking us'd by the Holy Scripture, and the moft Religious Perfons, make us believe that they Ric h es . 
contradict themfelves, oi'that Riches and Honours are truly our goods, and worthy our Love and Ecfli.it- 
our Refearches ? No, doubtlefs ; Becaufe the Modes of Speech, fuiting with prejudices, fignify 14. 
nothing : And that we fee elfewhere that Our SAVIOUR has compar'd Riches to Thorns, 
has told us, we muft renounce them -, that they are deceitful, and that all that's great and glorious 
in the World is an abomination in the fight of God. Therefore we muft not heap together the 
Paflages of Scripture or the Fathers, to judge of their Opinions by the greater < number, unlefs we 
will attribute to them every Moment, the moft irrational prejudices in the World. 

This being fuppos'd, 'tis plain that Holy Scripture fays pofitively, 'tis God that makes all 
e;en to the Grafs of the Field, that arrays the Lillies with fuch Ornaments as CHRIST pre- 
fers before thofe of Solomon in all his Glory. 'Tis not only two or three, but innumerable Paflages, 

that 



Gen.2.i 



T ~, F. MaLebra^ch6 Concerning 

that Attribute to God the pretended Efficacy of Second Caufes ■, and overthrow the Nature of the 

Pe Be P ades i we are inclin'd as it were by a kind of Natural prejudice not to think on God, in Ordinary* 

Effeas ^toSwS^a^ Efficacy to Sea>nd(iuf«, for the generality none but Mira. 

- StaS-EfiftfcSSKSi on God as ?he Author ; and the ftnfibk [^f^TltfeZ 

the ODinion of Second Caufes. The Philofophers hold this Opinion, becaufe gy the/ ™^« 

the judgment of their Senfes. The Language is accommodated to this pr «J^£. a °* tls *f£ 
monlv ltd, That Fire has a Power to Burn, as that Silver and Gold are a Man s Good, WAere 
fore thofe PalTaees which the Scripture or Fathers afford us for the Efficacy of Second Caufes, 
SaWSJiSS thofe- That an' Ambitious orCovetous Perfon woul chooie for f t « vrntaion 

o hi Behaviour. But we ale not to fay fo of thofe f^^^^^^^^ a ^^ 
God's Working all in all. For fince this Opinion is repugnant to prejudice, tnePallages that . aiiers 
it areTobTto For the fame Reafon that we are to conclude it 

^SSn^SSStoi, that Beafb ar! Infenfible, though he fhou d ay it but n- and hen, 
and (hould conftantly in common Difcourfe fay the contrary ; as that they Feel See, and Hear. 

In the firft Chapter of Genefts, God Commands the Earth to produce Plants, and Animals, and 
Orders the ^Waters to bring forth Fifh, and Confequently fay the Penpateticks the Water and Earth, 
were indu'd with a competent Virtue, to produce thefe ErFefts. ' confeauence ? 

I cannot fee the certainty of this conclufion ^ nor any neceffity of admitting this coniequence 
thouTweweVeobligMtoexplainthisChapte'rbyit felf, without recourfe to otner pafTages ot 
Sure This method of expounding the Creation, is adapted to our way of conceiving things, 

aSKereTs"^ 

Dreiudices Since we fee Animals, and Plants on the Earth, Fowls inhabiting the Air and times 
E n the Water God, to let us underftand, that his Order confhtuted them in thefe Places 
prod? "d them therein. From theEarth he form'd Animals, and I Plants ; not that jje Earth w 
caDable of Generating or as if God had to that intent given it a force, and Vertue which it retains 
Xowf £0^ S fufficiently agreed that the Earth does not Procreate ^™*£«&*£ 
becaufe out of the Earth the Bodies of Animals were form'd, as is fa id in the tallowing Uhapter, 
9 ITofZ ground the Lord form'd every Beaft of the field, and W™^^ ™ " 
9 ' were form'd out of the gound, (formatis de humo animantibus, fays the Vulgar Latin; and not pro- 
Ed % V Therefore 8 when Mofes had related how Beafts and Fifh were produe'd .by Vertue of 
4e Command which God gave the Earth and Water to produce them he adds that itwasffcrf. 
Ch.x. 2 JL^XS, % WefhLd attribute their. Production to _ the ^Earth an Waten AndGod 
CREATED great Whales , and every living Creature that movetb, which the W A l EKb, . 
BROVGHT FORTH abundantly after their kind , and every winged Fowl after his kind, 
fnd a little lower after he had fpoken of the formation of Animals, he adjoyns And GOD 
%^E^ic^^^h%tr his kind, and Cattel after their kind, and every thing that creep- 

£th Z t obf rvfbk h by The way, That what the Vulgar Tranflates, Producant a f « reptile anim* 
J^S^%^^^^^f^ L f the Water bring forth abundant* * , moving- 
Creature' that hath life, and Fowl that may fly above the Ear A the ^^^r^/^^ 
Let the Fowl ilv above the Earth : Which diftinaion fhows, as is evident from the tore citecfc 
narfaee of the n4t Chapter that Fowls were not produe'd from the Water, and that it was not 
^efs^nS^o^t^V/BX^ were truly empower'd to produceFifh and Fowl,but only to 
Ste : the refpXe place defign'd for each by the Order *^"J^*£%£ ^ £ 
due'din; Et volatile VOL IT ETfuperTerram For «>™ m °SL w a t^ Id'sJte which are 
produces Trees and Plants we only mean to fignifie that it furnifhes Water, and Salts, which are 

thefe Scripture PafTages, which Literally taken, make for Second Caufes : For we aiefo far from 
Koblkd that it is fometimes dangerous to take Expreflions in the Letter, which are founded 
on common Opinion, by which the Language is form'd. . For the vulgar part of Men fpeak of al! 
things according to the Impreffions of Senfe, and the Prejudices of Infancy. 

The fame Reafon which conftrains us to interpret Literally fuch Scripture PafTages, as directly 

oppofe Prejudices,gives us Reafon to believe the Fathers never defign'd ex propofito, to maintain the 

Efficacy of Second Caufes, or the Nature of Ariflotle. For though they often fpeak in a manner 

t^Tcoun tenances Prejudices, and the judgments of Senfe, yet they fometimes fo explain them- 

Xs as to manifeft ihe difpofition of their Mind and Heart. St. Aufim, for ^inftance, gives us 

fufficenty^ That he believed the Witt of God, to be the Force and Nature ot every 

omnia thing, when he fpeaks thus, We are wont to fay, but not truly, that *^™«\*^ N ™fc** 

J po, the Nature of every Creature' being but the Will of the Creator ; How can that which t ^byje Wl 

Inucl of Cod be contrary to Nature ? Miracles therefore and Prodigies arc not agamft Nature, but agamfl what 

tmn f: we know of it. . ,. t ' 

nl Sk red nonfunu Quomodo mm eft contra «mrm % quod Dei fit voluntas ? Cum votunw urnim^ cremnscondtt* ret cu^ue »*• 

lun 1 fit 'Portent™ ergo ft noncontra naturam, fed contra quam eft not* natura. S. Aug. de Cmta.De.i /.2i. c 8. 

'Tistrue, St. Auflin fpeaks in feveral places according to Prejudice : But 1 affira .that ^hat is na 
Argument ■, for we are not Literally to explain, but thofe Expreflions which are contrary to them, 
for which 1 have given the Reafons. ^ 



The Search after Truths \jh 

' if St Aujiin in his Works, had faid nothing againft the Efficacy of Second Caufes, but had al- 
ways favour'd this Opinion, his Authority might be made ufe of to confirm it. But if it mould not 
appear that he had induftrioufly examin'd that Queflion, we might dill have reafon to think he had 
no fettled and refolv'd Opinion about the Subject, but was, it may be, drawn by the Imnreflion of 
£he Senfes inconfiderately to believe a thing which no Man would doubt of, before he had carefully 
examin'd it, 

. 'Tis certain for example that St. Aufiin always fpeaks of Beafls, as if they had a Soul, I fay not a 
Corporeal Soul ; for that Holy Father too well knew the diftinction of the Soul and Body, to think 
there were Corporeal Souls ; I fay a Spiritual Soul, for Matter is incapable of Senfc. And yet it 
would feem, methinks, more reafonable, to employ the Authority of St. Aujiin to prove that 
Beaftshave not a Soul, than to prove they have. For from the Principles which he has carefully Some of 
examin'd, and ftrongly eftablifh'd, it manifeflly follows they have none, as is fliown by Ambrofius St ^ tt fi^ 
Viclor, in his Sixth Volume of Cbrijiian Pbilofopby. But the Opinion that Beafls have a Soul, and Pnnc 'P les 
arefenfible of Pain when we flrike them, being confonant to Prejudices, (for there is no Child but What has 
believes it ; ) we have (till reafon to believe that he fpeaks according to Cuftom and Vulgar Opini- never fin- 
bn ; and that if he had ferioufly examin'd the Queflion, and once began Bo doubt and make reflexi- ne d> c ™ 

on, he would never havefaid a thine fo contrary to his Principles. not fuffer 

° r evil. But 

according td him, Pain is the greateft Evil, and Beafts fuffer it. That the more Noble cannot have the Icfs Noble for its end. 
But with him rheSoul of Beafts is Spiritual, and more Noble than the Body, and yet has no other End. That what is Spiritual 
is Immortal, yet the Soul of Beafts, though Spiritual, is fubject to Death. Many fuchlike Principles there are in his Works,where- 
by it may be concluded, That Beafts have no fuch Spiritual Soul as he admits in them. 

And thus, though all the Fathers had conftantly favour'd the Efficacy of Second Caufes, yet, it 
aiay be, no regard were due to their Opinion, unlefs it appear'd that they had carefully Examin'd 
the Queflion, and that their Alfertions, were not the refults of common Speech, which is form'd 
tmd founded upon Prejudices. But the cafe is certainly quite contrary ; for the Fathers, and fuch 
as were moll Holy, and befl acquainted with Religion, have commonly manifefted in fome places 
brother of their Works, what was their Difpofition of Mind and Heart, in reference to the pre-* 
fent Queflion. 

The mofl Understanding, and indeed the greatefl number of Divines, feeing that on one hand 
the Holy Scripture was repugnant to the Efficacy of Second Caufes^ and on the other, that the 
Impreflion of the Senfes, the publick Vote, and efpecially Arifiotleh Philofophy, which was had in 
veneration by the Learned, eftablilh it : For Ariftotle believ'd God unconcern'd in the particulars 
of Sublunary Tranfactions ; That that change was below his Majefly, and that Nature which he 
fuppofes in all Bodies, fuffie'd to produce all that was done below. The Divines, I fay, have fo 
equally balanc'd thefe Two, as to reconcile Faith with Heathen Philofophy, Reafon with Senfe , and 
to make Second Caufes ineffective without the additional concourfe ol God Almighty. But becaufe 
that immediate concourfe, whereby God acts jointly with Second Caufes includes great difficulties 
fome Philofophers have rejected it, pretending that in Order to their Acting, there needs no more 
than that God fhould continue to them their Vertue he endow'd them with in their Creation. And 
fince this Opinion is exactly agreeable with Prejudice, becaufe of the infenfible Operation of God, 
in Second Caufes, it is commonly embrae'd by the vulgar fort of Men, and fuch as have more flu- 
died Ancient Naturalifts and Phyficians, than Theology and Truth. Mofl are of Opinion that God 
created all things at firft, and gave them all the Qualities and Faculties that were neceffary to their 
prefervation ; that he has, for example, given the firft Motion of Matter , and left it afterwards 
to it felf, to produce, by the Communication of its Motions that admirable variety of Forms we 
fee. 'Tis Ordinarily fuppos'd that Bodies can move one another - 7 and this is faid to be Mr. da 
Cartesh Opinion, though he fpeaks exprefly againft it, in the Thirty Sixth and Seventh Articles of 
the Second Part of his Tbilofophical Principles. Since Men muft unavoidably acknowledge that the 
Creatures depend on God, they Men and abridge, as much as poffible, that dependance, whether 
out of a fecret Averfion to God, or a ftrange and wretched ftupidity and infenfibility to his Ope- 
ration. But whereas this Opinion is receiv'd but by thofe who have not much fludied Religion,and 
have preferr'd their Senfes to their Reafon, and Ariftotle's Authority to that of Holy Writ , we 
have no reafon to fear its making way into the Mind of thofe , who have any Love for Truth 
and Religion ; for provided a Man ferioufly examin'd it , he muft needs difcover its falfity. 
But the Opinion of God's Immediate Concourfe to every Action of Second Caufes , feems to 
accord with thofe PalFages Of Scripture, which often attribute the fame Effect, both to. GOD and 
the Creature. 

We muft confider then, that there are places in Scripture, where 'tis faid that God is the only 
Agent : lam the Lord that maketh all things , that flretcbeth forth the Heavens alone, that fpread- 44 " 
tth abroad the Earth by my felf. Ego fum Dominus, fays Ifaiah, faciens O MNl A, Extendens coe- 2 4 Mac. 7. 
Ids' SO LV S, ftabiliens Terr am, & NV L LVS Mecum. A Mother Animated with the Spirit 22, & 23! 
of God, tells her Children, it was not her that form'd them, I cannot tell how you cams into my 
Womb : For I neither gave you Breath nor Life, neither was it I that form'd the Members of eve- 
ry one of you : But doubtlefs the Creator of the World, &c. Nefcio qualiter in utero meo apparui/lis, ,\, (? , 
fingulorum membra NO N EGO IPSA CO MP EG I, fed mundi Creator. She does not fay °„^ m 
with Ariflotle, and the School of the Peripateticks that to her, and the Sun, they ow'd their Birth; bominem. 
but to the Creator of the Univerfe. Which Opinion that God only Works, and forms Children AHfl. Thy. 
in their Mothers Womb, not being conformable to Prejudice and Common Opinion; Thefe Sen- ^^ *• *-• 

T t tences c ' 2 ' 



. • * - 

1 76 F. Malebranche Concerning 

See st. 7*. tences according to the pre-eftabliili'd Principle, mufl be explain'd in the Literal Senfe. But on 

upon the the contrary, the Notion of Second Caufes falling in with the vulgar Opinion , and being Suited 

lext - to the fenfible impreffion ^ thePafiages which exprefiy make for the feparate Efficacy of Second 

Caufes, muft be reckon'd invalid when compar'd with the former. Concourfe therefore is infuffi- 

cient to reconcile the different Texts of Scripture ^ and all Force, Power and Efficacy mufl be af- 

crib'd to God, 

But though the immediate concurrence of God with Second Caufes, were fit to accommodate the 
difagreeing paflages of Holy Writ, yet after all it is a queflion whether it ought £0 be admitted. For . 
the Sacred Books were not compos'd for the Theologifts of thefe times, but for the People of the 
Jews. So that if this People had not underftanding, or Subtilty enough, to imagine a Concourfe , 
fuch as is admitted in School- Divinity, and to agree to a thing which the greateft Divines are hard 
put to, to explain, it follows, if 1 miftake not, that the Holy Scripture which Attributes to God, 
and even to God alone, the production and prefervation of all things, would have betray'd them 
into Error. And the Holy Pen-Men had ftood chargeable with writing not only in an unintelligi- 
ble, but deceitful Language. For in faying that God Work'd all, they would have defign'd no 
more than that God affifted to all things with his concourfe, which was not probably fo much as 
thought on by the Jews ; Thofe amongft them, who we're not very great Philofophers, believing, 
that God Work'd all, and not that he concurred to all. 

But that we may pafs a more certain judgement about this Concourfe, it would be requifite to ex- 
plain with care the different Hypothefes of the School-Men upon it. For befides, thofe impene- 
trable Clouds, and Obfcurities which involve all the Opinions, that cannot be explain'd and de- 
fended without loofe and indefinite Term's ; there are upon this Matter fo great a variety of Opi- 
nions, that it would be no hard Matter to difcover the caufe of them. But I defign not to engage 
in adifcuffion that would be fo wearifom to my felf as well as the greateft part of Readers : On the 
contrary, I had rather try to fhow that my Opinions may in fome thing accord with thofe of the 
greater number of Scholaitick Divines, though I cannot but fay their Language looks very Ambi- 
guous and confus'd. To explain my felf. 

I am of Opinion, as I have faid elfewhere, that Bodies for example have no Force to move them- 
felves, and that therefore their moving force is nothing but the Action of God ; or not to make 
ufe of a Term which has no diftinct import, their moving force is nothing but the Will of God, al- 
ways neceflarily Efficacious, which fucceffively preferves them in different Places. For I believe not 
that God Creates any particular Beings, to make the moving force of Bodies-, not only becaufei 
have no Idea of fucb a kind of Being, nor fee how they could move Bodies : But alfo becaufe thefe 
Beings themfelves would have need of others to move them, and fo in infinitum. For none but 
God is'truely Immoveable, and Mover altogether. 

Which being fo, when a Body ftrikes, and moves another, I may fay that it Acts by the Con- 
v currence of God,and that this Concurrence is not diftinct from its own Action. For a Body meeting 
another moves it, by its Action, or its moving force, which at bottom is nothing but the Will of 
God preferving the Body fucceffively in different Places, the tranflation of a Body being not it's 
ABion, or moving force, but the Effell of it. Almoft all Divines fay too, that the Action of Se- 
cond Caufes is not different from that of God's Concurrence with them. For though they have a 
various Meaning, yet they fuppofe that God Ads in the Creatures by the fame- Action as the Crea- 
tures. And they are oblig'd, if I miftake not, thus to fpeak: For if the Creatures Acted by an. 
Action which God Work'd not in them, their Action, confider'd as fuch, would no doubt , be 
independent. But they acknowledge, as it becomes them, that the Creatures depend immediately 
on God, not only as to their Being, but likewifeas to their Operation. - 

So likewife, in point of free Caufes, I believe that God inceffantly gives the Mind an Impreffion 
towards Good in General, and that he moreover determines this Impreffion towards particular 
Goods, by the Idea's or Senfations that he gives us, as I have explain'd in the firft Illuftration -? 
which is the fame with what the Divines intend, by affirming, That God moves, and prevents our 
Wills. Thus the Force which puts our Minds in Motion, is the Will of God, which Animates us, 
and inclines us towards Good. For God Creates not Beings to conftitute the moving force of 
Minds, for the fame Reafon that he Creates none to be the moving force of Bodies. The Wills of 
God being of themfelves Efficacious, He need but Will, to do. And we ought not to multiply 
Beings without neceffity. Befides, whatever is real in the determinations of our Motions, pro- 
ceeds likewife from the Action of God in us, as appears from the firft Illuftration. But all we Ad 
or produce, is by our Wills, that is, by the Impreffion of the Will of God, which is our moving 
force. For our Willsare Efficacious no farther than they are of God, as mov'd Bodies impel not 
others, but in as much as they have a moving force that tranflates them ; which is no other than 
v. Suarez the Will of God, which Creates or preferves them fucceffively in different places. Therefore we 
/. i.decon- Act no otherwife than by xhzConcourfe of God ; and our Action confider'd as Efficacious, and ca- 
ewfuDa p a bi e of producing any Effect, differs not from his, but is, as fay moft Divines, the felf fame Acti- 
cumvolun- Q ^ ea d em numero aBio, 

Now all the Changes which arrive in the World have no other Natural Caufe, than the Motions 
of Bodies, and Volitions of Minds. For, Firft, by the General Laws of the Communications of Mo- 
tions, the invifible Bodies which furround thevifible, produce, by their various Motions, all thefe 
divers Changes, whofe Caufe is not apparent. And, Secondly, by the Laws of Union of our Soul 
and Body, when circumambient Bodies Act upon our own, they produce in our Soul a multiplicity 
of Senfations, Idea's, and Pajfwns. Thirdly, Our Mind, by its Volitions, produces in it felf infinite 

different 



7'he Search after Truth. \>,* 

afferent Idea's - for they are our Volitions, which as Natural Caufes intend, and Modifie our Mind : 
Their Efficacy, neverthelefs, proceeds from the Laws which God has eftablifh'd. And, Laflly" 
when our Soul acts upon our Body, (he produces /ewerd/ Changes in it , by vertue of the Laws of 
her Union with it ; and by means of our Body (he effects in thofe about it abundance of Changes, by 
vertue of the Laws of Communication of Motions. So that the Motions of Bodies and the Volitions 
of Minds, are the only Natural, or Occafional Caufes of Natural Effects, which no Man will deny 
who nfes any Attention ; fuppoling only, he be not prepoffeft by thofe who underftand not what 
they fay, who fancy perpetually to themfelves fuch Beings as they have no clear Idea's of, and who 
offer to explain things which they do, not underftand, by others abfolutely incomprehenfible. Thus 
having fhown that God by his Concourfe, or rather by his Efficacious Will, performs whatever is 
done by the Motions of Bodies, and the Wills of Minds, as Natural or Occafional Caufes,it appears 
that God does every thing by the fame Action of the Creature. Not that the Creatures have of 
themfelves any Efficacious Aclion, but that the Power of God is in a manner Communicated to 
them, by the Natural Laws which God has eftablifh'd on their account. 

This then is all that I can do to reconcile my Thoughts to the Opinion of thofe Divines, who 
defend the neceffity of immediate Concourfe, aud hold that God does All in all thirfgs by an Action 
no ways differing from the Creacures. For, as to the reft of the Divines , I think their Opinions Dunni. 
Utterly indefenfible, and efpecially that of Durandus, together with the Sentiments of fome of the >" 2 dift. 
Ancients, refuted by St. Auflin, who abfolutely denied the neceffity of God's Concurrence, pre- Si'.jJS* ^ 
tending, that Second Caufes did all things by the Power which God in their Creation gave them. pgG e „Jf, 
For though this Opinion be lefs intricate and perplex'd , than that of other Divines , yet to me.it ailfreram 
feems fo repugnant to Scripture, and fo fuicable to Prejudices , to fay no worfe of it, that I think 1. ■>. c. 20. 
it altogether unwarrantable. 

I confefs that the School-Men, who make God's immediate concourfe to be the fame Action with 
that of the Creatures, do not perfectly agree with my Explication ; and all thofe that I have read, in 4 Sent. 
except Biel and Cardinal d" Ailly, are of Opinion , That the Efficacy which produces Effects pro- D $- u ?• 
ceeds from the Second Caufe as well as the Firft. But as I make it indifpenfable for me to fpeak u ^f lu 
nothing but wh at L clearly conceive, and always t;p take the fide that beft comports with Religion, m 
I think I am not liable to blame, for deferting an Opinion which to many Men feems ftill more in-^ 
conceiveable, as they ftrive more to comprehend it ; and for eftablifhing another, which agrees 
perfectly not only with Reafon, but alfo with the Sacrednefs of our Religion, and Chrijlian Morality, 
which is a Truth already prov'd in the Chapter that's the Subject of thefe Reflexions. However 
'tis not inconvenient to fay fomething to it, that I may fully verifie what I have faid upon the pre- 
fent Queftion. 

Both Reafon and Religion evince, That God will be Lov'd, and rever'd by his Creatures : Lov'd 
as Good, and Rever'd as Power. Which is fuch a Truth as it would be Impiety and Madnefs to 
doubt of. To love God, as he requires and deferves, we muft, according to the Firft Command- * booJ^ 4. 
ment, both of the Law and Gofpel, and by Reafon it felf, as I have * fomewhere mown, Love Him c 1 . 
with all our Strength, or with the whole extent of our Loving Capacity. 'Tis not fufficient to pre- 
fer Him before all things, unlefswe moreover Love Him in all things. For otherwife our Love is 
not fo perfect as it ought to be, and we return not to God all the Love that he gives us, and gives 
us only for Himfelf, in whom every one of His Actions Center. 

So to render to God all the Reverence that is due to Him ; 'tis not enough to adore Him, as the 
Supreme Power, and fear Him more than His Creatures ; we muft likewife fear and adore Him in 
all His Clotures ; all our refpedts muft perpetually tend towards Him, to whom alone Honour and 
Glory are" o be afcrib'd : Which is what God Commands us in thefe Words': thou /halt Love the Deut.c.6. 
Lord thy God, with all thy Heart, and with all thy Soul, and with all thy Strength. And in thefe : 
Thou /halt fear the Lord thy God, and Him only /halt thou ferve. Thus the Philofophy that convinces 
us that the Efficacy of Second Caufes is a Fittion of the Mind, that the Nature of Ariflotle, and fome 
other Philofophers, is a Chimera, that none but God is Strong and Powerful enough, not only to 
Act on our Soul, but even to give the leaft Motion to Matter. This Philofophy, I fay , perfectly 
Accommodates with Religion, whofe end is to Unite us to God in the ftricteft Bonds. 

'Tis Cuftomary with us to Love only thofe things which are capable of doing us fome Good. 
This Philofophy therefore Authorifes only the Love of God,and Condemns the Love of every thing 
elfe. We ought to fear nothing but what is able to do us fome Evil. Therefore this Philofophy 
approves'the fear of God, and abfolutely Condemns all other: Thus it juftifies all the ju ft and 
Reafonable Motions of our Soul, and Condemns all thofe that are contrary to Reafon and Religion :, 
For we can never juftifiethe Love of Riches, the defire of Greatnefs, the Extravagance of De- 
bauchery by this Philofophy, by the Principles whereof, the Love for Bodies is abfuid and ridi- 
culous. 

'Tis an indifputable Truth, 'tis a Natural Opinion, 'tis even a Common Notion that we ought 
to Love the caufe of our Pleafure, and to Love it proportionably to the Felicity it either Actually 
does, or is able to poffefs us with. ' Tis not only )ufi, but as it were neceffary that the caufe of our 
happinefs, fh ould be the Object of our Love. Therefore this Philofophy will teach us to Love 
God only, a s being the only Caufe of our Felicity : That furrounding Bodies cannot Act upon that 
we Animate ; and confequently much lefs upon our Mind. That 'tis not the Sun which enlightens 
us, and gives us Life and Motion : Nor that fills the Earth with Fruits, and Beautifies it with 
Flowers, and fupplies us with Food and Nourifhment. This Philofophy feconding the Scripture, 
* teaches that 'tis God alone who gives us Rain, and Regulates the Seafons, that fills our Bodies with * A a* 14. 

Food, 15. 16. 



i^g P. MalebrAnche Concerning 

Food, and our hearts with Joy, tbftt he alone is able to do us good -, and thereby has giikn a perpetual Tefti- 
rnony of what he vs ; though in the ages paffed hefuffefd all Nations to walk in their own ways. Accord- 
ing to the Language of this Philofophy,we mull not fay that 'tis Nature that fills us with good ', ndr 
that it is * God and Nature together : But that it isGod alone,fpeaking thus without Ambiguity, 

Ergo nihil for fear of deceiving the Ignorant. For we mult diftin&ly acknowledge one ofafe of our happinefs* 

ugis,bigra- jf we we raa k e i t the on iy object of our Love. 

tijfimemor- { r ,.■,'■■„-'■■ \ 

ulium, quite riegws Deo debere, fed nuturx: quia nee naiurd Deo eft, nee. Veus fine natura, fed idem eft mnimque, nee aijint. Officium .ft 

quod A Seneca aecepijfes, Annuo diceres te debere t vet Lucid : Won credhorem mutires, fed nomen. Sen. 1. 4. de BeneF, 

'Tis likewife an undeniable Truth, That we ought to fear things that are able to harm us, and 
to fear them,in Proportion to the Evil they can do us. But this Philofophy teaches us that God only 
can do us evil •, that 'tis he, as fays Ifaiah, who forms the Light and creates Darknefs , who makes 
Ifa. 4$. 7« Peace and creates Evil ; and there is no Evil but what he does, as fays the Prophet Amos. Therefore 
Amos.3.6. jt is he only that is to be fear'd. We mufl not fear either Plague or War, or Famine, or our E- 
nemies, or even Devils themfelves : But God alone. We ought to fhun the Sword, when We fee 
a Blow a coming, we are to fly the Fire, and avoid a ruinous Houfe that's ready to crufh us :, but 
we mull not fear thefe things. We may fly from thofe Bodies which are the Occafional or Natural 
Caufes of Evil, but we mufl fear God as the true Caufe of all the misfortunes of Sinners ; and 
hate only Sin which neceffarily provokes the caufe of our Happinefs to become the Caufe of our 
Mifery : In a Word all the Motions of our Mind, mud center upon God, fince he alone's- above 
it, and the Motions of our Body may relate to the Bodies round it. This is what we learn from 
that Philofophy that admits not the Efficacy of Second Caufes. 

But this Efficacy being fupposM, I cannot fee but we have reafon to fear and Love Bodies ; and 
that to regulate our Love by Reafon, we need but prefer God before all things -, the Fir ft and Vni- 
verfal, to every Second and Particular Caufe. We can fee no need of Loving him with all our 
Strength :, Ex tot a mente, ex toto corde, ex tota anima , ex tot'vs viribus, as fays the Scripture. 

Yet when aMan contents himfelf in preferring God to all things,and adoring him with aWorfhip',- 
and a Love of Preference, without making a continual Effort to Love and Honour him in all things: 
It often fortunes that he deceives himfelf, that his Charity vanifhes, and is loft : And that he is 
more taken up with fenfible than the fupream Good. For fnould it be demanded of the greatefl Sin-^ 
ners, and even Idolaters, whether they prefen-'d the univerfal to particular Caufes, they would 
make no fcruple to anfwer amidft their Debauches^ Errours and Extravagance ; that they are not 
wanting to their effential Duty, and that they are very fenfible of what they owe to God. 'Tis ac- 
knowledge that they are deceiv'd. But take away the Efficacy of Second Caufes, and they hate no 
probable Pretext left to juftifie their Conduct and Behaviour^ whilft if it be granted them,they will 
think and Difcourfe with themfelves in the following manner, when blinded by their Paflions, and 
attentive to the Teftimony of their Senfes. 

" I am made for Happinefs : Neitheir can I, nor indeed ought I, to fnperfede my Love and Re~ 
" fpect, for whatever can be the Caufe of my Felicity : Whv then mufl not I Love and refpect 
" fenfible Objects, if they be the true Caufes of the Happinefs 1 find in their Enjoyment ? 1 acknow- 
*' ledge the Sovereign Being as only worthy of Sovereign Wo.rfhip, and I prefer Him before ail 
,l the World, But fince I fee not that He requires any thing from me, 1 enjoy the Goods he 
" affords by Means of Second Caufes, to which he has fubjefted me: And I pay not my Grati- 
st tude to him, which perhaps would be to his Dilhonour. As he gives me no Bleffing, immediate- 
" ly and by himfelf, or at leafl without the Affiflance of his Creatures, 'tis a Sign he reguires not 
" the immediate Application of my Mind and Heart ; at leafl, that he defires the Creatures fliould 
<c partake with him, in the Acknowledgments and Refentments of my Heart and Mind. Seeing 
he has communicated Part of his Power and Glory to the Sun, has environ'd him with Splendour 
and Majefty, and has given him the Supremacy in all his Works ; and feeing from the Influence 
of this great Luminary, we receive all the neceflary Bleffings of Life; Why fhould we not em- 
ploy apart of this indebted Life, in rejoicing in his Light, and teftifying the Senfe we have of 
" his Greatnefs and his Benefits ? Wou'd it not be the molt fhameful Ingratitude, to receive from 
" that excellent Creature abundance of all things, and yet to fhew no Senfe of Gratitude to him 
" for them ? And fhould we not be unfpeakably blind and ftupid, to be unmov'd with Fear and 
" Veneration in Refpect. of him, whofe Abfence freezes us to Death, and'whofe too near Approach 
" can burn and deftroy us ? I fay it again, that God is preferable to all things, and infinitely more 
" eftimable than his Creatures : But we are to fear and Love his Creatures alfo. For hereby we 
" pay Legitimate Honour to their Creatour -, Merit his good Graces , and oblige him to 
** fhower new Benefits upon us. 'Tis manifeft, he approves of the Honour that is given to his 
" Creatures •, fince they partake of his Power, and all Power defcrves to be honour'd. But becaufe 
". Honour ought to be Proportion'd to Power,and that the Power of the Sun, and all other fenfible 
" Objects, is fuch, as derives to us all forts of Goods, 'tis reafonable we fhould Honour them with 
" all our Strength, and, next to God, Confecrate to them all our Being. 

Thefe are the Natural Reafonings a Man would fall into, that fliould ground upon the Prejudice 
of the Efficacy of Second Caufes •, and probably fuch was the Arguing of the firft Founders of Idola- 
try. Take here his Senfe of it, who paffes for the mofl Learned of all the Jews : He Prefaces a 
» Mo f es a Treatife he wrote about Idolatry with thefe Words. " In the days of Enos Men fell into flrange 
Maimonid. " Wufions, and the Wife Men of that Age quite loft thiir Senfe and Reafon. Enos himfelf was one of thofe 
[[ deluded Terfons, whofe Errours were thefe. Since Cod, faid they, has created the Heavens and Stars t& 

govern 



tt 



«t 



The Search after Truth- \j& 



5 govern the World, has conftituted them on high, and invefled them with Glory and Luflrc, and em- 
M ploys them in executing his Commands, 'tis faff that we Jhouhi honour them, and pay them our Dcfc- 

u 

ec 
«c 



fence aud Homage. 'Tis the •Will of our God, that Honour Jhould be o'roen to thofe whom he has exalted 
and enthroned in Glory • as a Prince requires that his Mimjters fhould be honoured in his Prefence be- 
cause the Honour which is given to them redounds to himfelf. When once this Notion had entrcd \heir Vide Vojjt- 
" Head,thcy fell to building Temples in Honour of the Stars, gave them Sacrifice and Pra'ifes,and even pro- um ' ]lb - 2 - 
" ftrated themfelves before them; thereby imagining to pur chafe the favour of Him that created them: de .i doloU " 
" And this was the Original of Idolatry. ' *"*' 

It is fo Natural and juft to have grateful Refentments in Proportion to the Goods we receive 
that almoft all Nations have ador'd the Sun, becaufe they all concluded him the Caufe of the Blef- 
fings they enjoy'd. And if the Egyptians ador'd not only the Sun and Moon, and River Nile, be- ipfiqui ir- 
caufe its overflowing caus'd the Fertility of their Country, but even the vlleft of Animals : 'Twas »^ntur 
fas Cicero relates J from the Emolument they recc-iv'd from them. Therefore, as we cannot, and tJ£ &P ti J» 
indeed ought not to Extirpate from Men's Minds, their Natural Inclination for the true Caufes of J?"" f 
their Happinefs, 2tis evident there is at leaft ibme danger in afcribiiig Efficacy to Second Gaufes, obZiSm 
though we conjoyn the neceflky of an immediate Concourfc, which has, methinks, 1 know not what utilimem 
of incomprehenfible purport, and which ftrikes in as an after-game to juftifie our imbib'd Prejudices 1' am exea 
and Ariftotle\ Philofophy. ' ^perm, 

- , conjecrave- 

ram. Cic, 1. i. dc Njv.'.rt. Deorwti-. 

But there's no danger in fpeakirig only What we fee, and of Attributing only to God Efficacy nnd 
Power, fince we fee nothing but His Wills, which have an abfolutely neceflary and indifpenilble 
connexion with Natural Effects. I own that now adays, Men are Wife enough to avoid thofe 
grofs-Errors of Heathens and Idolaters •, ,but I fear not to fay, our Mind is ftill difpos'd, or rather 
ou/ Heart is often bent like that of the Heathens •, and that there will ever be-in the World* fome 
kind of Idolatry, until the Day in which JESUS CHRIST fhall reftore up His Kingdom 
to God his Father, having firft deitroy'd all Empire Dominion and Power, that God may be All in 
all. For is it not a kind of Idolatry, to make a God of ones Belly, as fpeaks S. Paul ? * Is not he Phil. 3. 9. 
an Idolater to the God of Riches, who labours Night and Day to acquire them ? Is this to . render **No ' 
to God the Worfhip we owe Him ? Is this to adore Him in Spirit and in Truth, tb have ou r Whore- 
Hearts fill'd with fome fenfible Beauty, and our Mind ftruck and dazled with the Ltiftre of fom e monger 
imaginary Grandeur? SelmPer- 

fon, nor covetous Man, who is an Idolater, Epk 5;. 5. f They that Worfhip him, muft Worfhip him in Spirit and 

in Truth , Job. 4. 24. 

Men fancying to themfelves, that Circumambient Bodies afford the pleafures they enjoy in the 
ufe of them, Unite to them with all the Powers of their Soul ; and thus the Principle of their Cor- 
ruption lies in the fenfible Conviction of the Efficacy of Second Caufes. 'Tis' only Reafon that 
affures them none but God A&s iri them. But befides that, this Reafon fpeaks fo low that it is 
Icarce Audible, and that the Contradicting Senfes cry fo loud, that their Clamour Stunns and 
Stupefies them, they are yet farther confirm'd in their Prejudice, by Reafons and Arguments that 
are fo much dangerous, as they have more External Characters and fenfible marks of Truth. 

The Philofophers, but efpecially the Chriftian Philofophers, ought to wage an uninterrupted 
War with Prejudices, or the Judgements of their Senfes, and particularly thofe of fo dangerous 
importance, as that of the Efficacy of Second Caufes. And yet there are Men, whom I extremely 
iionour, fas I have juft Reafon) whofromlknow not what Principle endeavour to confirm this 
Prejudice, and to make fo holy, fo pure and folid a Doctrine as this, which owns no other true 
Caufe than God, pafs for Superftitious and Extravagant Opinion. They will not have us to Love 
and Fear God in all things, but to Love and Fear all things with reference to God. We ought,fay they, m -*J m °' 
to Love the Creatures, fince they are good • to Love and refpedr. our Father ; to give Honour to tremvoca* 
our Prince and Superiours, fince God Commads it. Nor do I deny it ; but I deny that we are to musbono- 
Love the Creatures as our Goods, though they be good or perfect in themfelves. I deny that we rematati 
are to pay fervice andrefpeft to Men as to our Matters. Or, to explain my felf more clearly, I t jtf er ' m f s i 
fay, we muft not ferve our Matter, obey our Father, or Prince, with any other defign than to ferve n °" m J t °' 
and obey God. S. Paul, who became all things to all Men, and was complaifant irt all things ; for Jftm 0- 
the Salvation of thofe h= Preach'd to, fpeaks thus : Servants be obedient to them that are your Mafters, ftendimm. 
according to the fle/h, with fear and trembling, in finglenefs of your Heart, as unto CHRIST; not Hi er.inc- 
iwitb Eye-Service, as Menpleafers, but as the Servants ofChrifi, doing the Will of God from the Heart, 3^Matth. 
•with good Will doing Service, AS TO THE LORD , AND NOT TO MEN. And 22 . ' 9 ' 
in another Epiftle. Not with Eye-Service, as to ME N, but in finglenefs of Heart, fearing G O D. & 10. 33. 
And whatever ye do, doit Heartily, AS. TO THE LORD, and NO T V NTO M E N. Eph.6.6. 
We muft therefore obey our Father, ferve our Prince, and Honour our Superiours, AS UNTO Co1, 3- 22 - 
GOD ANDNOT UNTO MEN. This is manifeft, and can have no Evil confe- 
quences : For hereby Superiours would always be more honour'd ,and better ferv'd.But I think it may 
be faid, That a Matter, who would be honour'd and ferv'd, as having in himfelf another Power than 
that of God, would be a Devil ; and that thofe who ferv'd him under that apprehenfion would be 
Idolaters -,'for I cannot refrain from believing that all Honour and Love, that have not God for their 
F»nd, are Species of Idolatry. 

Soli Deo honor & gloria. 

V v ILLUi 



!86 F. MaLebranchs Concerning 



•ana 



THE 

ILLUSTRATION 

UPON WHAT 

I have laid in the Fourth Chapter of the Second Part ,concerning 

Method, and elfewhere. 

Tto Goi t!(?j always with Order^ and by the female ft ways. 

? fTT^I S thought by fome Perfons to be too raft), and venturous conjeduring, and abufing loofe, 

and General Terms, To fay that God always Ads with Order, and by ways that are 

■ wq/fy#w|>Je and eafie for the Execution of his defigns. Wherefore it will not be an ufe- 

lefs undertaking to prove and explain this Truth, fince 'tis of the greateft confequencej 

not only to the knowledge of Nature, but much more for the knowledge of Religion and Morality. 

By the Word f_ God 3 we underhand an infinitely perfed Being, whofe Wifdom and Know- 
ledge have no bounds, and who confequently knows all the means by which he can execute his De- 
figns. Which fuppos'd , I fay , that God Ads always by the fhorteft means , and by the fim- 
pleft ways. 

To make my meaning better understood , I take a fenfible Example. I fuppofe that God Wills 
the Body A fhould ftrike the Body B. Since God knows all, He perfectly knows that A may 
tend to ftrike againfb B by innumerable crooked Lines, and by but one right. Now God Wills 
only the impulfion of B by A ^ and we fuppofe that he only Wills the Tranflation of A to B, to 
effed this impulfion. A then muff, be convey'd to B by the fhorteft way, that is, by a right 
Line. For if the Body A were convey'd to B by a crooked Line, that would fhow either that the 
conveyer knew no other way, or that he purpos'd not only the Collifionof thefe Bodies, but 
alfo the means of making it, otherwife than by Relation to it, which is againft the Suppofition. 

There is required fo much more Adion to convey a Body from A to B, by a curv'd than by a 
right Line, as the curv'd is longer than the right. If therefore, God tranflated A to B by a 
curv'd Line, double to the interjacent right, half of the Adion of God would be intirely ufelefs, 
and fo half his Action would be produc'd without defign and end, as well as without effect- 
therefore, 

Again, ABion in God is Will ; therefore more Will is requir'd in God, to caufe A to be cir- 
culary than diredly tranflated. But we fuppofe that God had no Will in refped of the Motion 
of A, but as it relates to the Collifion \ therefore there is not Will enough in God to move A by 
a crooked Line ; and confequently 'tis a Contradiction for A to be fo mov'd. Thus it is a Contra- 
didion 4 that God fhould not Ad by the moft fimple ways, unlefs we fuppofe that God, in the 
choice of means he imploysTor the executing his defigns, has fomething elfe in view than thefe de- 
figns, which is a Contradiction in our Suppofition. 

When I fay there is more Will in God to tranflate a Body from A toB, by a crooked Line than 
by a ftrait •, it is not to be thence concluded, againft the fimplicity of God's EfTence and Adion. 
For it mufl: be acknowledged, That it is not comprehenfible, how either the fimplicity of an Infinite 
Being* includes all the different perfections of Finite Beings ; or how his Will continuing ever the 
fame, and always conformable to Order, varies with reference to the different Beings it produces, and 
preferves. I fpeak but according to our way of conceiving things : Now, methinks, I have a moft 
clear Conception, That when God Wills, and Creates, for Example, one cubical foot of Matter, 
He Wills another thing than when He Creates two. For nothing is plainer than that God could 
not Create two different things* nor know whether he Created one or two Cube-feet of Matter, 
or whether he convey'd a Body circularly or direiJly, if there were not in His Wills fome difference, 
in regard to Matter and its Motion, fince God fees no otherwife than in Himfelf, and in his own 
Wills, all the differences of His Creatures. Now whatever that Action is in God, which relates 
to the different Beings produc'd , or preferv'd by Him, I call the Differences , or Augmen- 
tations and Diminutions of Will in God. And in this way of conceiving things, I fay that God can- 
not employ more Will than is neceffary to the executing his Defigns, and therefore Ads always by 
the fimpleft ways with reference to them. 

However I deny not, but it's poffible for God to have a great number of ways equally fimple for 
the producing the fame effeds, or that He may produce them by different means : But this I fay, 
that He always brings them to pafs, by the ways that are moft fimple, provided they be all of the 
fame kind ; it being a Gontradidion that an Infinitely Wife Being, fhould have ufelefs or diforder- 
ly Wills. 

Now 



The Search after Truth. igj 

j Now if we bring home this Principle to Morality , we fhali fee that thofe enfure their Salvation 
Who fo prepare themfelves for Grace, by Self-denial and Repentance, and an exad Obedience to the 
Precepts of our LORD, as that God A ding by the fimpleft ways, that is, in giving them but 
little additional Grace, may Operate much in them. For though God would have all Men faved 
yet he (hall fave none but thofe that can be favd by the molt fimple means, which have reference to 
his great defign of Sandifying through JESUS CHRIST, a determinate number of Elect 
Unto his Glory -, and he will multiply the Children of Eve, till that number be fulfill'd. For God's 
defign of Sanctifying us by the fimpleft ways, made it necefTary for him, after the Sin, to multiply 
the Children of Men, that he might fill up the number of the Eled , fince there area great many 
Perfons who Damn themfelves ,by with-drawing from the Order of v God. 

But whereas God does not Work like a Particular Caufe, we ought not to imagine that He has, 
like us, particular Volitions for every thing He produces : For if it were fo, it feems evident to 
me, That the Generation of Monfters would be impoffible, and it would never happen that one of 
God's Works fnoulddeftrOy another. And fince God cannot have contrary Wills, we mult have 
had recourfe with the OWanichees, to a Principle of Evil, to freeze, for Example, the Fruits which 
God made to grow : Which being fo, there is, methinks, a necefiity to conclude the eftablifhment 
of fomz General Lam, by which God Predefines and Sanclifies his Eled in JESUS CHRIST- 
which Laws are what ->e call the Order of Grace, as God's General Wills, whereby he produces, and' 
prelerves all things in the World, are the Order of Nature, 

I know not but I may be miftaken, yet I doubt not but from this Principle might be dircdly 
drawn a great many Confequences, which might refove thofe difficulties that have been the Con- 
troverted Subjects of feverai Years. But I do not think my felf oblig'd to deduce tliem , let every 
one do it according to his Light and Abilities ; 'tis more to the purpofe to fay nothing, than to 
fay fuch things as are unneceflary to be known, and which, it may be, would be eafier agreed to 
fome time hereafter than atpreferst. Only this I would have well underftood, That the fimpleft 
ways to our Sandifkation are Self-denial and Repentance , or at leaft that it be well confider'd, 
that fince JESUS CHRIST diftindly knows the Laws of the Order of Grace, we run con- 
tinual dangers, in not following the ways he has mark'd us out, not only by his Words, but all 
the Adions of his Life. 

Yet fince we meet, with fuch particular Occurrences in the coutfe of Life, as make us dubious 
which way to determine, becaufe of the contrary Reafons that may be brought for and againft 
certain Opinions ; it will perhaps be time well fpent to fhow here, by fome particular Exam- 
ple, that much ufe may be made of the fore-going Principle^ viz.. Thar-<Iad ABs always by the 
fimpleft ways. ' 

Let us fuppofe 4 for inftance, that I defir'dtobe refolv'd, whether I ought every day-to fet apart 
fome Conftant Times for Retiring into my felf, for fetting my own Weaknefs and Miferies before 
me, and for conlidering my Obligations in the prefence of God, and praying for his Affiftance, in 
Conquering my Paffions • or on the other hand, whether I ought to wait for the Spirit of God, 
which blows where, and when it pleafes, to call me from my felf, and my Ordinary Employments, 
to apply me unto Him. For probable Reafons may be given both for and againft each of thefe 
Opinions ; and Men frequently take up with probability on fuch Occafions, which is the Reafon 
that Religious Perfons follow fometimes a quite different Conduct and not always that which is 
thefafeft. ... : 

I confider then, That if I ftay for the particular Motions of the Spirit of God, I fhall never pray 
unlels I receive particular Illuminations, or preventing Delights for that intent . Now thefe Illumina- 
tions or Delegations, being produe'd of God by Wills more particular than are thofe General Wills, 
Which conftitute the Order of Nature, are forts of Miracles. Therefore to rely upon God's Graces^ 
which are not always necefTary, is to fuppofe that He induces me to pray by means that are not the 
moft fimple, and in fome meafure to tempt God, 

But if I ufe my felf to a Cuftom of appearing, or endeavouring to appear in the prefence of God 
at particular Hours, the found of the Clock will fuffice to remind me of my Duty, and there is no 
need that God fhould by a particular will infpire me with the Thoughts of Prayer. The General 
Laws of Union of my Body and Soul, will make me think of my Duty, when the time I have ap- 
pointed for it, by fome fenfible Notice makes it felf remarkable. 

But as Self -Examination and Prayer are necefTary, and as we cannot pray without having at leaft 
the Thoughts of it • and as we cannot have the Thoughts of it, unlefs God gives them, it is fome 
advance to Salvation to have thefe Thoughts without obliging God to give them us by particular 
Wills, or kinds of Miracles. It is poffibly the want of this firft Thought of praying and conlidering 
their Obligation before God, which is the Origine of the Blind nefs and Delufion of many Men, 
and confequently of their EternaLDamnation. For God Acting always by the fimpleft means,ought 
hot by particular Wills to give them thofeThoughts which they might have obtain'd by vertue of his 
general Wills, if they had once accuftom'd themfelves, to pray regularly at particular Hours. 
Therefore, as God Wills the Saving all Men by the fimpleft ways, it is evident we ought, as much 
aspoffible, to make the Order of Nature fubfervient to that of Grace, and to reconcile, as Lmay 
fay, God's Wills together, by regulating a time which may fupply us at leaft with the Thoughts 
of Prayer. 

' for 



1 8a F. MaL£brAnChe v Concerning 

For thefe Reafons, probably, God Commanded, heretofore, the Jews to write His Command- 
ments upon the Doors of their Houfes, and conftantly to carry fome fenfible Marks that might pnt 
them in Mind of them ; which remitted God his particular Will, if I may fo fpeak, of infpiring 
them with thefe Thoughts. For Miracles of Grace were extremely rare among thejfews, the time 
being not yet fullfill'd when God was to engrave his Law, and infufe his Spirit, and his Charity m 
the heart of Men. / 

I acknowledge that all things we can do, by meer Natural ftrength, are inefficient to fit us me- 
ritorioufly for Grace, without which all the exteriour (how ol Religion can but feed and cherifh our 
Pride and Self-Love. The Pbarifees were Vain-Glorious upon their carrying the fenfible figns and we- 
moratives of the Law of God,as our Saviour reproves them , and Chriftians often make ufe oiCroJfes 
and Images, out of Curiofity, of Hypocrifie, or fome other Motive of Self-Love : Yet, fince thefe 
things may put us in Mind of God, they may be to good purpofe imploy'd •, becaufe we ought ro 
make Nature, as far as poffible, inftrumental to Grace, that God may ferve us by the fimpleft ways. 

For though we cannot naturally fit and difpofe our felves for Gi'ace, yet we may often contri- 
bute to make it efFe&ual, in as much as we can curb the eagernefs of a Pafiion, by removing from 
the Obje&s that caufe it, or by urging contrary Reafons to thofe of its Suggeftion. Thofe who 
Watch more carefully than others over the purity of their Imagination, or give not fo much way 
to be corrupted by the continual enjoyment of fenfible Pleafures, and Wordly Commerce, make 
Grace efficacious, by taking away that impediment and refiftance which it finds in others. In 
which fenfe a Difeafe, a fhower of Rain, or any other accident, that keeps us at home, may render 
Grace Efficacious : For fuch a degree of Grace as would have been too weak and ineffectual for our 
refifting the fenfible impreffion of a prefent and agreeable Object, is ftrong enough to make us rejeil 
and deteft the impure Thought, or Imagination of the fame Object. ' 

This is all we need to fay to make it rnanifeft, That the Counfels of the Gofpel are necefTary, in 
Order to God's Saving us by the fimpleft means. For 'tis advantageous to follow them, not only 
becaufe when we follow them by the Motion of God's Spirit , they determine it by vertue of im- 
mutable Order, or of the General Laws of the Order of Grace, to increafe in us our Love of Him \ 
but alfo, becaufe the practifing thefe Counfels, may frequently render Grace Efficacious, though 
Self-Love be the Motive, as it may be, on many Occafions. 



FINIS. 



■ 



A" 



183 



t tt B 



DEFENCE 



O F T H E 




AUTHOR 

O F T H E 

R E A T I S E 

Concerning the 
Againfl: the 

Acculatioh of Monfieur de la FILLS. 

In which is /hewn, That if ¥ articular Perfons be allow* d to call in Queftion 
the FAITH of others, upon Confequences well 6r ill drawn from their 
Principles, no Man could be fecure from the Imputation of Herefie. 

j^l O M E time ago came forth a Treatife, whofe very Title fcar'd a great many, and raifed 
%^ much Commotion in their Minds. Many Perfons wifh'd I would engage in the Quarrel^ 

^^ which the Author made with the Cartefians. for as, on one hand, Monfieur de Id Vil\e y 
V*J that was his Name^ had done me the Honour to lift me among thefe Philofophers, with 
what Defign I know not \ and, on the other hand, found himfelf Diverfion, by turning me into 
Ridicule, they affur'd me, that if I was willing to pals for a Rafa Foolifh and Extravagant Perfori, 
for a Vtfioniji^ and, in fine, an Herei}c\ % yet I could not in Confciende defert the Caufe of Truth* 
and leave the Enemies of our Faith, the Advantages he gave them. 

. I muft do thefe Gentlemen juftice, in confeffing their Reafons were very folid : But beg they 
would believe, that if I have not fubmitted to them, 'tis becaufe, there were others of a very dif- 
ferent Opinion ; which to me feem'd likewife highly reafonable, and for which indeed I had greater 
Inclination ; for I will not determine about the Weightinefs of their Reafons. Befides, as Mon- 
sieur de la fhUe is not very tender of Integrity, I forefaw that his Work would make a greater 
Flafh and Report, than it would do Injury to Truth. And as to my own Particular , I did not 
think he injur'd me by defpifing me : For, I can allure him, I defpife my fell much more than he 
defires. 'Tis true my Self-Contempt is not grounded on the fame Ideas, as induc'd him to treat 
me fo faftuoufly, as he does. But I would grant that the Reafons I had for defpifing my felf, were 
hot true •, and would willingly confent, that all my ill Qualities were converted into thofe he's 
pleas'd to give me, provided he'll except that one of Heretick % or of a Perfon Whdfe Faith deferves 
to be fufpecled. 

Since I know that 'tis of moffc dangerous Confequcnce, to ftirup the Pajfions of Men, efpeci- 




perceiv 

mifchievous Events to be fear'd : I think I am bound to fatisfy my Friends, and content my felf. I 
am not willing to affeft an infolent and contemptuous Silence, in Regard to Monfieur de la ViUe. 
\ fincerely confefs,- he has fenfibly offended me : For I am neither Stbtck, nor Stupid ; I feel whenl 
hurt,and am not a'fhanvd to own it. The publick Accufation of Herefie is not eafie to be born,efpeci- 
al!y by Ecclefiajticks: Which thoughnever fo unjuft,fails not to make theFaith of the accufed fufpeft- 

X x *d^ 



eri. in Blore than any Gther : And.no 1 _ai w^ thisi rl oi Afputatiorij 

uni • no it, y, it happ< .... 

ve-nothii , then, to ani to . s, where with this Author tries to blacken me. 

ig hiin before the Con;- >n h \ iftrate, to have pubiick Reparation made me ; not 

. any othvv ways pmnjeted WNa rural Utf, for the Refritatioo of-tliat which--* can la 

ufolnce give vp, "J am <*0 that H&wiil have me| a Foe/, a Vifiomfi, only fam no fjcctkkl^ nor 

am J fflfpeded of £frr|ft! ,>t lead by tnofe (.hat knoi^ me. But,! confefs,! caanot avoid having rny 

Faith Fufpefte.d, if? Stranger may be allowed to brand me with|tne Name afeNeretick, for Gonle- 

quences he is pleas'd to draw from my Principles-, for 'tis not potiible but Monfieur de la FiuYs Boole 

muit have dsceiv'd fome one or other. If at prefent I am fufpedted of Herefie, 'tis a Misfortune I 

cannoc help. 

But if it be a Crime,'tis not I that have committed it,but rath2;- he that draws confequences from, 
aPrinciple not including them. For my part I difown thefe confequences : I believe them falfe,and 
Heretical •, and if I clearly faw they were directly inferr'd from anyone of my Principles, I would- 
forfake it : ,For that Principle would be falfe, Trnths being not contrary to one another. 

But be it granted that Monfieur <& la ViWi Reafonihgs were juft, and that -Heretical Confequences 

- were'perfedtly well dedue'd from their Principle ; yet neither I, nor many others, that he ill-ufes 

faw before he wrote his Book, that they were ccntahYd in it. So that his Conduct is indefenfible 

which way foever.w-e examine it. For in fine the Ankles of Faith depend not on theQuicknefs 

and Reach of thought of any Particular Divine, as I indeavour to fhow :. and thougli we Ihould be 

certain that fome principles included impious Confequences, yet no Man has. tight to treat the Main- 

tainers of thefe principles as Heretich. 

*Ep.z I have feen in the Fathers, and chiefly in St. Auftin, the * principle 1 have advane'd, but never 

ch. 2.28. obferv'd Monfieur de la Fillers there. To me it appear'd a common Notion, that if God had Anni- 

ch.2.^7. hilated all the extcnfionin the World, all the matter , the World is made up of , .would be Annihilated. \ 

cb.6.con- had confulted feverallferibas- about it, to know- whether they had the fame Idea as my felf of the 

^Mtmict'i matter » whofe anfwersconfirm'd me in my Opinion. I concluded, for the Reafons I ihall give 

ch. 16.de a non, that we could no longer have any direel and Natural Demonftration, that the Soul is diftin- 

Tran.i. -10. guifh'd from the Body, or that (he is Immortal, if that principle be laid afide. 1 faid in the Search 

& alibi, after Truth that I did not believe any confequence could be inferr'd from this principle repugnant 

to Faith, which fame thing was defended in the Sorbon, before my maintaining it, in the publick 

Thefe*. Nay,-I proceeded to fay, Tpat if it were'/equifite, I would explain how .tHs'C opinion : might be 

reconciled with what the Fathers,' 'and.Councils have left us touching our Faith, about ihe myftery of Tran- 

fubftantiation. Laftly, I renoune'd all ^Heretical Confequences, and even the Principle, if it con- 

tain'd them, which I could not believe, nor can I to this hour. 

What ought I to fay more, to clear my Faith from the fufpicion of Herefie,even to the malicious ? 
Could I imagine any Man would have the boldnefs to rank St. Auftin,and other Fathers, among the 
Calvinifts, by condemning in the Perfon of the Cartefians and Gaffendifts, the Sentiment of that Holy" 
Doclor^ as contrary to Tranfubftantiation ? No, doubtlefs. For either Monfieur de la Ville durft 
do it, fave in a collateral manner. St Auftian in an hundred places advances as undeniable, the 
principle now in difpute. He never goes to prove it, becaufe ft does not appear that any Man in his 
time doubted of it. For indeed 'tis a principle that ought to be look'd on as a common Notion with 
all thofe, whofe mind is not prepofTefs'dwtb falfe ftudies. Whence this Father concludes, That 
the Soul is immortal -, That. fhe. is more noble than the Body -That (he is a diltindt fubftance from it* 
with many 01 her like Truths of the utmoft importance. And yet Monfieur de la ViHe , under 
Part 2. Ambiguous Terms,advances.that this Principle is not to be found in St. Auflin: He anfwers but one 
Ar j/ 6 ' # fingle paflage of that Father's Works, and to explain it, makes that learn'd Man argue at an Extra- 
vagant rate. Laftly, he oppofes to his conflant Doctrine, only the Book of Categories, as if he 
knew .not that Book to be none of St. An/tin's, and that it belongs rather to Logick, than to 
Phyficks. 

1 will not Hand to prove this in particular ; for I fee no neceffity of anfweiing Monfieur de la 
ViWs Book : And I defign to keep inviolably to the refolution I made, and have declar'd at the 
end of the Preface to the Second Vol. of the Search after Truth, viz. That I would anfwer none 
of thofe who oppos'd me before they underftand me, or whofe Difcourfes gave occafion to believe 
they were made from fome other motive than the Love of Truth. As for the reft, I fhall indeavour 
to content them. I have no delight in difquieting Mens Minds, and troubling my own repofe by 
contentious Books, or Works absolutely ufelefs to the difcovery of Truth ; and only proper to 
- violate Charity , and fcandalize our Neighbours. And if I now put Pen to Paper, 'tis becajfe E 
ought not to fuffer my Faith to be call'd in Queftioh, and that I delire to make it clearly undcrilood 
That no Man is permitted to charge me with Herefie for confequences deducible from the Principles 
1 have eftablifh'd. 

Which is not as if I thought it poffible^ to inferr directly, any Herefie, or even Error from the 
Book concerning the Search after Truth. I am ready to anfwer with Charity and Refpect, all thofe 
who fhall do mc the honour to make their Animadverfions without Paffion ; and 1 fhall always be 
glad to follow Truth, as foon as any Man can difcovcr it to me. I difown all principles from 
which may be concluded any falfliood. But I offer to prove, 1 nat we cannot juftly treat as Here- 
ticks, even obftinate Defenders of fuch Principles, as-Divines may inferr impious Conclufions from 
(provided the Embracers of thefe Principles difown the confequences :) Since,if it might be aliow'd' 
no Writer whatever could efcapc the Imputation of Herefie. My proofs- of my aflertion are as foil 

low; 



; 



-. 



agamft- M. de la Vitle, 

low - : Which I do not deduce from that which is leaft Reafonable in the common Opinions ^ \ 
fophers, with defign to make them Odious, or Ridiculous ; but choofe to tikfe for the ful i I 
What I offer to prove, untverfally receiv 'd Opinions, upon which the Peripateticks are fo bo'd 
prefumwg, as to infult perpetually over their Adverfaries. 

ARGUMENT I. 

The Peripateticks, and almoft all Men, believe that Beafts have Souls, and that thefe Souls are 
ftobler than the Bodies which they Animate. 'Tis an Opinion receivM in all times, and in all Na- 
tions, that a Dog fuffers Fain when he is beaten ■ That he is fufceptible of ali the' Motions of tne 
Paffions , Fear, Defire , Envy, Hatred, Joy\ Sorrow, and even that he knows and loves 

Tau^tb' Faith fr ° mttm ° plnl0a confa l uences Eft)L be diawn <%§2 °PP ofi£e &$M we ai 

The firfr Confequence oppofite to Faith. 

That God is Vnjuli. 

■ J . J 

j 

r. Beafts fufFer Pain, andfomeof them, are more miferable than others. Now they never finn'd; 
or made an ill ufe of their Libirty, tines they have none : Therefore GodVLteja/^in Punifhing them' 
and making them Mi ferable 5 and unequally Miferable, ffrice" they are equally Inno'enc. There 
fore this Principle is falfe, That under a Righteous God, a Creature can be miferable Without defervin- 
it, a Principle neverthelefs imploy'd by St. jlujlin, to Demonftrate Original Sin -againft the 
Pelagians. 

j Moreover there is^ this difference between the condition of Men and Beafts, that Men after- 
Death may receive ah' Happinefs which may countervail the Pains endur'd in Life. But Beafts 
at Death lofe all ; they have been miferable, and innocent, and have no Future Retribution. There- 
fore, though God be juft, yet Man may fufftr in Order to Merit ■ but if a Beaft fuffers, God is not 
Juft. 

It maybe faid, perhaps, that God may do with the Beaft as he thinks fit, provided he obfet ves 
the Rules of Juftice, with refpect to Man. But if an Angel fhould think in like manner, that God 
could not punifh him without fomeDemerits ; and that he was not oblig'd to do 'jaitice unto Man, 
Ihould we like that thought ? Certainly God lendets Juftice to all his Creatures ; and if the mean- 
eft of them are liable to Mifery, they muft needs be capable of being Criminal. 

The fecond Confequence contrary to Faith. 

That God Wills Diforder, and that Nature is not corrupted. 

The Soul of a Dog is fubftance more noble than the Body Animated by it. For according to St. 
Auftm *,'tis a fpiritual Subftance more noble than the nobleft Body. Befides which, reafon demon- * De Qhm- 
ftrates that Bodies can neither Know, nor Love ; and that Pleafure, Pain,. Joy, Sorrow, and the *»«***» 
other Paffions, cannot be Modifications of Bodies. Now 'tis believed that Dogs know, and Love "**£*• 3 *i 
their Matters, and that they are fufceptible of Paffions, as of Fear, Deiire , Joy and Sorrow, and iiL4.de 
many others : The Soul of a Dog therefore is not a Body, but a Subftance nobler than Bodies. But dnima, £J 
the Soul of a Dog is made for his Body, and has no other End, or Felicity, than the enjoyment of e i i!S ori g l - 
Bodies : Therefore God makes the more noble for the lefs noble : Therefore God Wills diforder : ^ > 5^'- 12, 
Therefore Man's Nature is not corrupted i Concupifcence is.no diforder. God might make Man u 

for the enjoyment of Bodies, and fubjed him to the Motions of Con;cupifcence, &c. 

It may be frill faid perhaps that the Soul of Beafts is made for Man : but 'tis hard to efcape by 
this fubterfuge. For whether my Dog, or my Horfe, has, or has not 2 Soul, is indifferent to me. 
'Tis not my Horfe's Soul, which carries, or draws me, but his Body. "Tis not the Soul of a 
Chicken which nourifhe* me, but its flefh. Now God might, and ought confequently to create 
Horfes, to perform all their functions which we need, without a Soul, if it be true that he has 
made them only for our ufe. Again,, the Soul of an Horfeis more valuable than the noblefc Body : 
God therefore ought not to create it for the Body of Man. Laftly, God ought not to have given 
Souls to Flies which Swallows feed upon. Swallows a; e of very little Ufe to Man, and they might 
have fed upon grain, as other Birds. 

What need then of fo innumerable a number of Souls to be Afinihilated, to preferve the Bodies 
of thefe Birds, fmce the Soul of a Fly is more worth than the Body of the perfecteft Animal? 
Wherefore in affirming that Beafts have Souls, that is to fay, fubftanccs, more noble than Bodies, 
we deprive God of Wifdom, make him act without Order, deftroy Original Sin, and confequently 
overthrow Religion, by taking away the necaffnyof a Mediator, 

The 



186 F. MAtEBRAN<iHE»s t)ef eiice 

The third Confequence contrary to Faitn*. 

The Soul of Man is Mortal^ or atleaft the Souls of Beafts pafs from one Body 

to anotbet. 

The Soul of a Beaft is a Subftdnce diftinft from its Body. This Soul is Annihilated, and there- 
fore Subftarices may naturally/be Annihilated. Therefore though the Soul of Man be a Subftance 
diftintt from his Body, itafay be Annihilated, when the Body is deftroyed : And tlius the lmmor« 
tality of the Humane Soul canrtot be Demonftrated by Reaf6n. Biit if it be ownM to be molt cer- 
tain, That no Subftance can be naturally reduc'd to nothing, the Soul of Beafts will fubfift after 
Death ; and fince they have no reward to hope for , and are made for Bodies, they muft at leaft 
pafs out of one to another, that they may not remain ufelefs in Nature : Which feems to be the 
moft reafonabklnfefence, 

Now 'tjsfMatter.of Faith, That God is juft and Wife, That he Loves not Diforder, That Na- 
ture is corrupted, That the Soul of Man is Immortal and that That of Beafts is Mortal : Be- 
caufe indeed it is not a diftinct Subftance from their Body, nor confequently capable of Knowledge 
and Love , or of any Paffions and Senfations like ours. Therefore in the Stile of Mpnfieur 
de la Ville, who condemns Men upon Confequences that he draws from their Principles , the 
Cartefiam may juftly charge him with a Crime, and all Mindkind befides , for believing Beaffs 
have Souls. ., 

What would Monfieur.«fc la Vifte fay, if in his way of proceeding we mould tax him of Impiety, 
for entertaining Opinions, from whence it might be concluded, That God is riot Juft, Wife , or 
Powerful; Opinions that overthrow Religion, that are oppofite to Original Sin, that take away 
the only Demonftration Reafon can give of the Immortality of the Soul ? What would he fay , if 
wefhould charge him with Injufticeand Cruelty for making innocent Souls to fuffer, and even for 
Annihilating them, to feed upon the Bodies which they Animate ? He is a Sinner, but they are 
Innocent ; and yet for the Nourifhment of his Body he kills Animals, and Annihilates their 
Souls, which are of greater Worth than his Body. Yet if his Body could not fubfift without the 
Flefh of Animals , or if the Annihilation of a Soul mould render his Body for ever Immortal •' 
this Cruelty, as un juft as it is, might perhaps be excufeble : But with what Pretence can he Anni- 
hilateSubftances altogether innocent, to fuftain but a few days a Body juftly condemnM to Death 
becaufe of Sin, 

Would he be fo little a Philofopher, as to excufe himfelf upon the Cuftom of the Place he lives 
in ? But what if his Zeal mould carry him into the Indies ^ where the Inhabitants found Hofpitals 
Ihf. c.n. f° r Beafts ; and the Pbilofopbers, and the better and more gentile Part of them, are fo charitable to 
to the fmalleft Flies, that, for fear of killing them, by Breathing, and Walking, they wear a fine 
Cloath before their Mouths, and fan the Ways through which they pafs ? Would he then fear to 
make innocent Souls to fuffer, or to Annihilate them for the Prefervation of a Sinner's Body ? 
Would he not rather chufe to fubfcribe to their Opinion, who give not Beafts a Soul more Noble 
than their Body, or diftin& from it ; and by publifhing this Opinion acquit himfelf of the Crimes 
of Cruelty and Injuftice, which thefe People would charge upon him j if having ^he fame Principles 
he follow'd not their Cuftom ? / 

This Example may fuffice to fliew, that we are not permitted to treat-Wen as Heretich 7 and 
dangerous Perfons, becaufe of Irreligious Confequences that may be d^duc'd from their Princi- 
ples, when thefe Confequences are difown'd by them. For though I think it would be an infinitely 
harder Task, to anfwer the aforefaid Difficulties, than thofe of M. de la Ville\ yet the Carteftans 
would be very Ridiculous, if they mould accufe Monfieur de la ViUe^ and others, that were not of 
their Opinion, of Impiety and Herefie. *Tis only the Authority of the Church, that may decide 
about Matters of Faith ^ and the Church has not oblig'd us, and probably whatever Confequence 
may be drawn from common Principles, never will oblige us to believe, that Dogs have not a Soul 
more Noble than their Body, that they know not their Matters •, that they neither fear, nor defire, 
nor fuffer any thing , becaufe it is not neceflary that Ckriftians mould be inftru&ed in thefe 
Truths, 

ARGUMENT II. 

Almoft all Men are perfwaded, That fenfible Objects are the true Caufes of Pleafure, and Pain, 
which we feel, upon their Prefence. They believe, that the Fire fends forth that agreeable Heat 
which rejoyces us •, and that our Aliments Aft in us, and give us the Welcome Senfations of Tafts. 
They doubt not but 'tis the Sun which makes the Fruits necefTary for Life, to thrive •, and that all 
fenfible Objetts have a peculiar Vertue^ by which they can do us a great deal of Good and Evil, Let 
us fee, if from thefe Principles we cannot draw Confequences contrary to Religion and Points of 
Faith. 

A Confe- 



againfi M. de la Ville. 187 

'A Confequence oppofite to the firfr Principle of Morality, which obliges us to lorn 
God with all our Strength, and to fear none but Him. 

'Tis a common Notion, by which all Men Order their Behaviour, That we ought to love, and 
fear what has Power to do us Good and Harm, to make us feel Pleafure and Pain, to render us* hap- 
py or miferable ■ and that this Caufe is to be lov'd, or fear'd, proportionably to its Power of Act- 
ing on us. But the Fire, the Sun, the Objects of our Senfes,can truly Ad on us, and make us in fome 
manner happy or miferable. This is the Principle fuppos'd ; we may therefore Love and Fear them. 
This is the Conclufion which every one naturally makes, and is the general Principle of the corrup- 
tion of Manners. 

. 'Tis evident by Reafon, and by the Firft of God's Commandments, That all the motions of our 
Soul, of Love or Fear, Defire or Joy, ought to tend to God; and that all the Motions of our 
Body may be Regulated and Determin'd, by encompafling Objects. By the Motion of our Body we 
may approach a Fruit, avoid a Blow, fly a Beaft that's ready to devour us. But we ought to Love 
and Fear none but God ; all the Motions of our Soul ought to tend to Him only-, we are to Love 
Him with all our ftrength ; this is an indifpenfible Law. We can neither Love or Fear what is be- 
low us, without diforder and corruption : Freely to fear a Beaft ready to devour us, or to fear the 
Devil, is to give them fome honour ; to Love a Fruit, to defire Riches, to rejoyce in the light of 
the Sun,as if he were the true caufe of it •, to Love even our Father,our Protestor, our Friend, as if 
they were capable of doing us good, is to pay them an Honour which is due to none but God, in 
which fenfe it is lawful to Love none. But we may, and ought to Love our Neighbour, by wifn- 
ing and procuring him, as Natural or Occafional Caufe, all that may make him happy, and no o- 
therwife. For we to Love our Brothers, not as if able to do us good, but as capable to enjoy to- 
gether with us the true Good. Thefe Truths feem evident to me •, but Men ftrangely obfeure 
them, by fuppofmg that the furrounding Bodies can Aft on us as True Caufes. 

Indeed, molt Cbriftian Philofophers acknowledge, That the Creatures can do nothing, unlets 
God concur to their Action ; and that fo, fenfible Objeds being unable to Ad on us without 
the Efficacy of the Firft Caufe, muft not be lov'd or fear'd by us, but God only, on whom they 
depend. 

Which Explication makes it manifeft, That they condemn the confequences, which I have now 
dedue'd from the Principle they receive : Butif in imitation of Monfieur de la ViUe\ Condud, I 
mould fay 'twas a flight and fubterfuge of the Philofophers, to Cloak their Impiety -, if I mould 
urge them with the Crime of fupporting Arijlotleh Opinions, and the prejudices of Senfe, at the 
expence of their Religion ; if piercing too into the inmoft recefTes of their Heart, I Ihould impute 
to them the fec*et defire, of debauching Men's Morals by the defence of a Principle, which ferves 
to juftifie all forts of diforders, and which by the confequences I have drawn from it, overthrows 
the firft Principle of Chriftian Morality. Should I be thought in my Senfes whilft I went to con- 
demn moft Men as impious upon the ftrength of the inferences I had dedue'd from their; 
Premifes ? 

Monfieur de la ViUe will no doubt pretend that my Confequences are not rightly inferr'd ; but I 
pretend the fame of his ; and to ruinethem all, I need but explicate fome Equivocal Terms, which 
I (hall fometime do, if 1 find it neceffary. 

But how will Monfieur de la rills juftifie the common Opinion of" the Efficacy of Second Caufes, 
and by what fort of concourfe will he afcribe to God all that is due to Him ? Will he make 
it clearly appear , that, one individual Adiort is all of God, and all of the Creature ? Will he 
demonftrate that the Power of the Creature is not ufelefs, though without its Efficacy, the 
ibleAftion of God would produce the fame effed ? Will he prove that Minds neither ought tp 
Love nor Fear Bodies , though the latter have a true Power of Ading, on the former ; and 
will he make multitudes of Converts hereupon , among thofe whofe Mind and Heart are 
taken up with fenfible ObJ e & s ■> fr° m a confus'd Judgment they make that thefe Objeds are 
capable of making them Happy or Miferable ? Let him confefs then , That if we might 
treat, as Hereticks , and profane Perfons , all that hold Principles , from which Heretical 
and Impious Confequences may be drawn, no Man what ever could fecure his Faith from being 
fufpeded. 

ARGUMENT III. 

The Confequence of the Principle proposed by Monfieur de la Ville, as a Point 
of Faith, viz. That the Eflence of Body confifts not in Extension. 
This negative Principle overthrows the only demonflrathe and diretl Proof 
we have of the SouVs being a diftincl Subftance from the Body, and confe- 
quently of her Immortality. 

When this truth is receiv'd, which I prefume, with many other Perfons, to have demonftrated ; 
which Monfieur de la ViUe impugns as contrary to the decifions of the Church, viz. That the Ef- 

Y y fence 



1 88 P. MaLEB RAN CHE'S Defence 

fence of matter confifts in Extenfion in Length, Breadth , and thicknefs. It is eafte to comprehend 
that the Soul, or that which is capable of Thought, is a diftinft fubftance from the Body. For it's 
manifeft that Extenfion t whatever Divifion and Motion be conceiv'd in it, can never arrive to Rea~ 
fan, Witt or Senfe. Wherefore that thinking thing which is in us, is neceffarily a fubftance diftincl: 
from our Body. . ■;--■ : 

Intellectual Notices, Volitions, and Atlual Senfations, are Actually Modes of fome fubftances Ex- 
iftence. But all the Divifions incidental to Extenfion can produce nothing but Figures : ISJbr all its 
various Motions, any thing but Relations of Diftance : Therefore Extenfion is not capable of other 
Modifications. Therefore our Thought, Defire, Senfations of Pleafure, and Pain, are Modes of a 
Subftances Exiftence, which is not a Body. Therefore the Soul is diftinft from the Body, which 
being conceded, we thus demonftrate her Immortality. 

No fubftance can be Annihilated by the Ordinary ftrength of Nature. For as nature cannot pro- 
duce fomething out of nothing : So fhe cannot reduce fomething into nothing. Modifications of 
Beings may be Annihilated ; Rotundity of a Body may be deftroy'd; for that which is round may 
become fquare. But this roundnefs is not a Being, a Thing, a Subjlance ; but only a Relation of E- 
quality of diftance, between the terminating parts of the Body, and that which is in the Center, 
Which relation changing, the Roundnefs isdeftroy'd, but the fubftance cannot be reduc'd to no- 
thing. Now for the foremention'd Reafons the Soul is not a Mode of a Body's Exifting. There- 
fore fhe is immortal ; and though the Body be diffolv'd into a Thoufand parts of a different Na- 
ture, and the ftru&ure of its Organs broke to pieces, fince the Soul confifts not in that ftrudture, 
nor in any other Modification of matter, 'tis evident that the diffolution, and even the Annihilati- 
on of the fubftance of an humane Body, were that Annihilation true, could not Annihilate the 
fubftance of our Soul. Let us add to this another proof of the immortality of the Soul, grounded 
upon the fame Principle. 

Though the Body cannot be reduc'd to nothing, becaufe it is a fubftance, it may notwithftand- 
ing die, and all its parts may be diffolv'd : Becaufe Extenfion is divifible. But the Soul being a fub- 
ftance diftind from Extenfion, cannot be divided. For we cannot divide a Thought, a Defire, 
a Senfation of Pain, or Pleafure, as we may divide a fquare into two or four Triangles. Therefore 
the fubftance of the Soul is indiffoluble , incorruptible , and confequently immortal , becaufe 
unextended. 

But if Monfieur de la VtUe fuppofes that the Effence of Body confifts in fomething befides Exten- 
fion, how will he convince the Libertines that fhe is neither material nor mortal. They will main- 
tain, that fomething wherein the Effence of Body confifts, is capable of thinking, and that the fub- 
. ftance which thinks is the fame with that which is extended. If Monfieur de la Ville denies it, they'll 
fhow that he does it,without Reafon,fince according to his Principle,Body being fomething elfe than 
Extenfion ; he has no diftind Idea of what that can be, and confequently cannot tell but that un- 
known thing may be capable of Thought. Does he think to convince them, by faying as he does 
in his Book, that the Effence of Body is to have Parts without Extenfion? Certainly they will not 
take his Word for it •, for finding it as hard to conceive parts without Extenfion, as indivifible 
Atoms, or Circles, without two Semi-circles, they muft have more deference for him, than he has 
for God himfelf. For Monfieur de la Ville, in the laft part of his Book, pretends that God him- 
felf cannot oblige us to belive contradictory things, fuch as are the Parts of a Body, without any 
Adtual extenfion. 

But the Libertines on their part would not fail of probable Reafons to confound the Soul with 
the Body. Experience, they'll fay, teaches us, That the Body is capable of Feeling, Thinking, 
and Reafoning. Tis the Body which is fenfible of Pleafure, and Pain. 'Tis the "Brain which 
thinks and reafons. The weight of the Body makes heavy the Mind. Madnefs is a truediftemper 5 
and thofe who have moft Wifdom lofe it, when that part of the Brain, where it refides, is difeas'd. 
The EfTences of Beings are unknown to us, and therefore Reafon cannot difcover of what they are 
fufceptible. So that reafon refers us to Experience, and Experience confounds, the Soul with the 
Body, and teaches us, that this is capable of thinking : Such would be their Rea'fons. 

And in Truth thofe who affureus, That the EfTences of Being are unknown ; and make it Cri- 
minal for Philofophets to demonftrate Extenfion no Modification of Being, but the very Effence of 
Matter ; would do well to confider the mifchievous Confequences, deducible from their Principles ; 
and not go to overthrow the only Demonftration we have,for the Diftin&ion between the Soul and 
Body. For, in fine, the Difiintlion of thefe two Parts of our Selves, prov'd by clear Ideas, is the 
moft Fruitful and neceffary of all Truths in point of Philofophy, and perhaps of Divinity, and Chri- 
flian Morality. But this Diftin&ion is likewife exactly demonftrated in many Places of the Search 
* BooklV. a f ter Truth * And I undertake to Monfieur de la Ville, notwithftanding his Anfwsr fraught with 
chap. 2. Ambiguities, Figures, and ContradicJions ; or rather, I undertake to the Libertines, for as for him, I 
Book VI. believe him fo fetled in his Faith, as not to.want fuch fort of Proofs. I undertake, 1 fay to the 
chap 7 Liberti " es -> Tllat they will never find any Sophifm in my Demonftraftion, That 'tis impoffible to 
Booklil. COnceive i,; clearly and diftin&ly, without embracing it ; and that ail the Proofs they offer, to 
Pan 11. confound the Soul with the Body, are drawn from Senfes ; that they are obfeure and confus'd, and 
chap. 8. can never perfwade fuch as Judge of things by clear and diftinft Ideas. 

From this Principal, That the Effence of Body confifts not in Extenfion, and that the EfTences of 
things are unknown ; I could ftill draw many other Confequences oppofite to Faith : But that is not 
neceffary^ and I would rather, if it were poffible, reconcile all falfe as well as true Philofophies 
with Religion. However impious and Heretical would be the Confequences- I could deduce from 

the 



againfi M. de la Ville.' $ 

the Opinions of Philofophers, I fhould think I wanted the Charity which I owe them if I endea- 
voured to make their Faith fufpefted. So far am I from imitating the Conduct of Monfieur de la 
Vtlle, who leaving a Principle demonftrated in all its Strength, and receiv'd by all Ages lays out 
himielf in drawing Heretical Confequenccs from it.; tho' of no ufe but to ftrengthen the Calvinifts 
and encreafe their Number, and to difturb the Faith of the Orthodox : I would, on the contrary* 
that no one fhould think on thefe Confluences ; or difown them as falfe,and wrong-inferr'd from 
the Principal. 

'All Truths hang in a Chain together ; and no falfe Principle can be held, but thofe who are any 
thing versM in the Art of Reafoning, may infer from it abundance of Confequences repugnant to 
Religion. So that if it were permitted to blacken the Faith of others, upon Confequences drawn 
from Principles believ'd by them, fince there is no Man but Errs in fomething, we might treat all 
the World, as Heretical. Wherefore the allowing Men to Dogmatize, and to make others Faith 
fufpefted, who are not of their Opinion, would be Opening a Gap to infinite Quarrels, Schifms 
Difturbances, and even Civil Wars { and all Mankind is concern'd to look upon the Abettors of 
fucha Conduft, as Slanderers and Difturbers of the publick Peace. For, in fhort, the different 
Parties in Religion, which are almoft always form'd from fuch like Confequences, produce ftrange 
Events in a State ; which all Hiftories abound with. But the Liberty to Philofophize, or to reafon 
Upon Common Notions,is not to be denied Men ; it being a Right which is as natural to them as to 
breath. Divines ought to diftinguifh Theology from Philofophy, Articles of our Faith from Opinions 
of Men. Truths, which GOD imparts to all Chriftians by a vifible Authority, from thofe which 
he beftovos on fome particular Perfons, in Recompence of their Attention and induftry. They fhould 
not confound things that depend on fo different Principles. No Queftion Humane Sciences ought 
to be made fubfervient to Religion ; but with a Spirit of Peace and Charity ; without condemning 
one another, fo long as we agree about Truths which the Church has determin'd : For this is the 
way for Truth to fhine out, and all Sciences to be brought to greater and greater Perfection, by 
the Addition of New Difcoveries to the Ancient. 

But the Imaginations of molt Men cannot be reconciPd to New Difcoveries, but even Novelty 
in Opinions, never fo advantageous to Religion, frights them ; whilfl they eafily inure themfelves 
to thefalfeft and obfeureft Principles* provided fome Ancient has advane'd them. But when once 
thefe Principles are grown familiar, they find them evident, though never fo obfeure : They believe 
them moft ufeful, though extremely dangerous ; And they are fo well us'd to fay and hear what 
they do not conceive, and to flurr a real Difficulty by an imaginary Diftindtion, that they are ever 
well fatisfy'd with their falfe Idea's, and can't endure to be talkt to in a clear and diftinft Lan- 
guage ;j like Men coming out of a dark Room, they are fearful of the Light, which ftrikes too 
violently on their Eyes, and they imagine we go to blind them, when we try to diflipate the invol- 
ving Darknefs. 

Thus though I have fhown by many Confequences, that 'tis dangerous, for Example, to main- 
tain that Beafts have a Soul more noble than the Body ; yet fince this Opinion is ancient, and moft 
Men are accuftom'd to Believe it, whilfl: the contrary bears the Character of Novelty ; Thofe who 
judge of theHarfhnefs of Opinions rather by the Fear they produce in the Imagination , than by 
the. Evidence and Light they flied in the Mind, will be fure to^vote the Cartefians Opinion danger- 
bus I and will condemn thefe Philofophers, as rafh and prefumptuous, rather than thofe who make 
Beafts capable of Reafoning. ; 

Let a Man but fay in Company, with an Air of Gravity, or rather with a Look, into which the 
Imagination, fcar'd with fomething extraordinary, forms the Face : Really the Cartefians are ftrange 
People , They maintain, That Beafts have no Soul. I am afraid in a little time they mil fay as much of 
Man: And this will be enough toperfwade a great many, that this is a dangerous Opinion. No 
Reafons can prevent the Effect of this Difcourfe upon weak Imaginations ; and unlefs there happen 
to be fome brisk Wit, that with the gayety of Carriage, Ihall re-embolden the Company from the 
Fear they had conceiv'd, the Cartefians might tire themfelves to Death, before they could by their 
Reafonings obliterate the Char after that had been given of their Perfons. 

And yet 'tis but placing the definition inftead .of the thing defined, to fhew the extravagance of 
this Difcourfe. For if a Man fhould fay ferioufly, the Cartefians are ftrange fort of Men, they affirm^ 
That Beafts have neither Thought nor Senfe ; I fear, in a fhort time, they will fay as much of us. Certainly 
we mould conclude this Man's apprehenfions but ill-grounded. But the generality of Men are un- 
able to extricate the leaft Ambiguity, efpecially when their Imagination is frighted with the No- 
tion of Novelty, which fome reprefent to them as dangerous. Befides that the Air and exteriour 
Manners eafily perfuade, but Truth is not difcover'd without fome application of Thought, where- 
of the greateft part of Mankind is incapable. 

Certainly Men that have moft Light and Underftanding, whofe Opinions are implicitely em- 
brae'd by the Vulgar, ought not to be fo eafie to condemn their Brethren, at leaft before they have 
examin'd their Sentiments with a ferious Attention •, nor ought they to poffefs their refpeftful 
Hearers with difadvantageous Notions of their Neighbour, this being contrary to the Rules of 
Charity and Jufcice. 

But the Cartefians, you'll fay, admit Principles which have mifchievous Confequences; and I 
grant it, fince you'll have it fo. But they difown thefe Confequences : They, it maybe, are fo 
grofs and ftupid, as not to fee thefe Confequences are included in their Principles. They^think 
they can feparate one from the other, and do not fuppofe other Philofophers are to be beiiev'd up- 
on their bare Word : They break not their Qharity with thofe who hold Principles which they 

think; 



190 F. Male branched Defence 

think big with impious Confequences, and as contrary to Religion, as found Senfe. For it may fe 
concluded from the dangerous Confequences I have drawn from thofe very Principles, which flnih 
the Peripateticks even to the triumphing over their Adverfaries :, How many, and how much worfc 
than thefe I might infer, if I fhould give my felt liberty to choofe out of the Body of their Philofo- 
phy that which was moft exceptionable ? But whatever the advantage is in Theological Difputes, 
as well as in Field-Battles, to be the AggrefTors ; I had rather defend my felf weakly, than con- 
quer and triumph by afTaulting. For, in fhort, I do not conceive how Men delight in making He- 
reticks, and prophane Perfons of thofe who fubmit to ail the decifions of the Church, upon Confe- 
quences which they difavow. The Vi&ory methinks is very fatal, which fpills but the Blocd of out 
own Country-Men. 

Neverthelefs, I do not believe I have advanc'd in the Search after Truth, any Principle of Philo- 
fophy productive of dangerous Confequences; on the contrary, I have left M. des Cartes in fome 
places, and Ariflotle almoft in all ; becaufe I could not reconcile the Former with Truth, nor the 
Latter with Truth or Religion ; this I leave to Men of more Wit and Invention than my felf. I faid 
that the Effence of Matter conftfled in Extenfion, becaufe I thought I had, evidently, demonftrated 
it, and thereby given clear and uncontroverted proofs of the Immortality of the Soul, and her 
diftin&ion from the Body : A Truth which is effential to Religion, and which the Philofophers 
* Sefn -8. are * oblig'd by the hit Later an Council to prove. But I never thought this Principle fo fecund 
with Truths advantageous to Religion, was contrary to the Council of Trent : Moniieur de la FiBe 
ought not to affirm it, for that will do but mifchief. This is the Conduft of the Protefiants in 
*Tf>.pae. Holland, * Vitichius, -\ Toiret, and feveral others. I fay not this to make his Faith fufpe&ed, but 
ch. 4. I am under ftrong apprehenfions, leaft his Conduct may give them occalion to affirm, That we own 
+ L ' 3« f k in France a Man cannot be a Catholick without believing that the parts of a Body may be without 
clg. Nat. an y Actual Extenfion, fince a Book Dedicated to the Bifhops, publifh'd with all the Ceremonies, 
with approbation and Privilege, treats the Cartefians as Hereticks on that particular : I fear, leaft by 
his probabilities, he may fhake the Faith of feveral Perfons, who know not precifely what is ne- 
ceflary to make an Article of Faith. But I am ftill more apprehenfive leaft the Libertines (hould 
itrengthen themfelves in their Opinions, That the Soul is Corporeal, and confequently Mortal ; 
That a thinking Subftance is the fame with an extended One, becaufe Extenfion with them, and 
Monfieur de la ViUe, being but the Mode of a Being, whofe Effence is unknown to us, we have no 
Argument from Reafon, that this Being is not capable of Thinking ; and we have many Argu« 
ments from Senfe which, though never fo falfe, are yet convincing, and even Demonftrative with 
thofe who will not be at the pains of Reafoning. 

And upon thefe grounds I think I am oblig'd to affirm, with all the confidence afforded me by 
the view of the Truth I have Demonftrated That Extenfion is not a tJWode of Being ; but a Beings 
a Thing, ^Subfiance, in a Word, Matter or Body, and that many Anfwers are to be feen in the 
Starch after Truih^tQ- thofe proofs of Senfe by which the Libertines confound the two Subftances, 
that Man's compos'd of. I maintain farther, That Monfieur de la Fille has not fhown that Opini- 
on of the Eflence of Matter to be contray to Tranfubftantiation ; that he has propos'd only thofe 
Anfwers which are eafie to be refolv'd, That we may more eafily triumph over his Adverfaries t 
That he has not impugned mine, and probably not fo much as known them, and that in the Hu- 
mour I fee him, I think not my felfobliged to acquaint him with them ; Laftly , That he has 
added to the Council of Trent , more Articles of Faith , or Explications , than any private 
* B , t Perfon has Right to give after exprefs Prohibitions contain'd in the Bull, which confirms the faid 
B«/it ia is Council * 

forbidden under Pain of Excommunication, to give any Explication of the Decrees of the Council. Vllum omnina interpretattow 
genmfuper ipfius Concilii iter em qiwcunt{ue modo edere, &c. That Power is referv'd to the Pope. 

As to what regards my own Particular, I defire the Reader not to believe Monfieur de la Vifte, 
upon his Word, but to examine with Caution and Diftruft, even thofe Matters of Fad which he 
vouches with the greateft Confidence. He boafts himfelf upon his Sincerity and Ingenuoufnefs, and 
1 am far from difputing him thofe Qualities, which are indifpenfable to every honeft Man j but I 
cannot help faying in the Defence of Truth, and my own Juftification, that he has often forgotten 
himfelf in his Book ; of which here follows a fufficient Proof. 

In the Frontifpiece of his Work he has inferted an Advertifement, which has a Look of Integri- 
ty ; for 'tis compos'd only to make a kind of Reparation : Thefe are his Words •,- He fays, He met 
with a Copy of the Search after Truth, of the Strasbourgh-Edition, in the Year 1677. which obliges 
him to fignifie to his dear Reader, that I have in the Imprefiion retraced and Err our, which I had 
advanc'd in the Firft. But it is fo true, that I am either little skill'd in Divinity, or very daring, 
that I could not recant that Enow, without advancing Two others. His whole Advertifement is 
only to make me a charitable Reparation. 

However it is falfe, Firft, That I have retraced that pretended Errour about Original Sin : The 
fame Propofition being found in the fame Words, in the Eddition he * cites, and in all thofe that 
W.'p. are Printed at Tarts. 
190. Par. Edit. u p. 172. in the fccond, p. 190, in the third, 187. \ntho*fenrth 9*5. 

Secondly* 



againfi M. de la Ville." 191 

\ Secondly , That Propofition is notmy peculiar Opinion - 7 fince it is the common Doctrine of the 
Schools. But though it were not at prefent taught, yet 'tis certainly no Errour, much lefs a moft 
pernicious one, as he elfewhere ftiles it *. •• 

The two Errours he fuppofes me to fubftitute, in the Room of this recanted one,are Two things * Pa S-9°« 
I never faid ; and which he puts upon me. 'Tis but reading his own Words relating to the 
Queftion , to difcover the Truth of what I fay ; and therefore I fball not Hand to prove it ; 
efpecially fince 'tis done fufficiently by an unknown Hand. I could only with this un- 
known Perfon had alledg'd the Reafons which I had for faying , That an Infant at the 
time of Baptifm was justified by an Actual Love, and which I have given in the llluftration upon 
Original Sin. 

Let a Man judge then, after he has examin'd the candid and fincere Advertifement of Monfieur 
de la Vtlle, whether I have not reafon to require the Equitable Readers not to credit him, on his 
bare Word. For if we believe him, he is the moft fmcere and courteous Man in the World; but 
we cannot find all the Marks of Sincerity and Candour, when we carefully examine him. At the 
End of his Advertifement, he protefts, hehasendeavour'd, as much as poflible, to obferve all the 
Moderation which he ought, that he has no ill Will but to the Errours of his Adverfavies, and for 
their Perfons all Efteem and Refpeft : Whilft yet one cannot confider that Advertifemenr, without 
difcovering at leaft the Symptoms of a difingenuous Spirit, and a Malign Temper, which furprizes 
and irritates Mens Minds. 1 pray God to pardon him his Outrages, to Regulate his Zeal, and to 
infpire him with the Spirit of Meeknefs, Charity and Peace towards his Brethren. I know not 
whether he finds Pleafure in abufing me fo hainoufly as he does •, but I defire to allure him, That it 
is Matter oi much Sorrow, and Trouble to me, That I am forc'd in the Defence of Truth, to give: 
fome Sufpicion of his Probity •, and that I mould, on the contrary, be extreamly joyful, if he could 
know how fincerely I honour, refpett, and love him, in Him in whom we all are Brethren. No- 
verit mam ettm non contemnam, & wantwn-in illo Deum t'vmeam^ & cogitem caput noftrum in cujus cor-* 
pore fratres fumus. Aug. ad Fortunianum, £pift. 3. 



M=PB» 



F I N I M 



( m ) 






F. MALEBRANCHE's TREATISE 

CONCERNING 

Light and Colours. 

BEING AN 

ILLUSTRATION 

O F T HE 

Fourth CHAPTER of his Sixth BOOK. 

Never before Printed. 

IN order to explain my Thoughts concerning the Natural Caufes of Light and Colours, let us 
conceive a great Foot-ball externally prefs'd by a Force, in a manner infinite ; and that the 
fluid Matter contain'd in it, has fo rapid a Motion, as not only to turn all, after one and the 

fame Fafhion, with a mighty Swiftnefs •, but that each Part of it, to imploy all its Motion, 
(that is, to move it felf equally to its Force,) is ft ill obliged either to turn upon the Centre of an 
infinite Number of little Vortices, or elfe to glide between them, and ali this with a prodigious 
Celerity ^ infomuch that the Force of the Matter contain'd in the Foot-ball, fhall make an equal 
Poize with that external Force which comprefiTes it. In a word, let us conceive the Matter con- 
tain'd in the Foot-ball to be like that with which M. Des Cartes furnifh.es our Vortex, excepting 
only that the little Bowls of his fecond Element, which hefuppofeshard, be nothing but little Vor- 
tices themfelves -, or at leaft, that they have no Hardnefs but what is occafion'd by thePrefTure of 
thofe which furround them : For if thefe. little Bowls were hard by their own Nature, (as I think 
I have demonftrated the contrary,) it were impofftble for them to tranfmit Light and Colours, as In , tf}e ta $. 
we fhall fee by and by. But if this Supposition be difficultly conceived, let u$ only fuppofe a ^fiairdi 
Foot-ball fill'd with Water, or rather with a Mat- 
ter infinitely more fluid, and receiving an extreme 
PrefTure from without. The Circle A B C is the 
Section through the Centre of the Foot-ball. 

This being fuppos'd, let there be imagin'd a 
fmall Hole to be made at the Point A ; I fay, that 
all the Parts of the Water, as R S TF, contain'd 
therein, will tend towards the Point A by the 
right Lines, R A, S A, &c. For all the Parts which 
were equally prefs'd before, ceafe to be fo on that 
fide which anfwers to the Hole. They mull: 
therefore tend towards it, fince every Body that 
is prefs'd, mull: tend to move it felf that way 
where it finds the leaft Refiftance. 

But if a Stopple be put in the Orifice J, and 
it be haftily thruft inwards, the fame Parts, R S 
T F", 8£c. will all tend to remove themfelves from 
the Hole, direftly by the fame Lines, A R, A <S,&c. 

Becaufe, upon the advancing in of the Stopple, they are more prefs'd on the Side wherein it 
enters. 

Laftly, If we conceive the Stopple moved haftily backwards and forwards, all the Parts of 
the fubtile Matter (which exa£Uy fills the Foot-ball, whole Elafticity is very great, and which 
difficultly contra&s or extends it felf) will receive infinite Vibrations from the PrefTure. 

Let us now fiippofe an Eye at T, or elfewhere, directed towards a Torch at A ; the Parts of the 
Torch being in continual Motion, will conftantly prefs the fubtile Matter on all fides, and con- 
iequently quite from A to" the Fund of the Eye : And the Optick Nerve, being vehemently prefs'd 
and fhaken by very quick Vibrations, will excite in the Soul the Senfation of Light, or of a lively 
and glittering Whitenefs. 

If ive fuppofe at 5 a dark Body M, the fubtile Matter being not reflefted towards the Eye that 
way dire&ed, nor vibrating the Optick Nerve, the Body will appear black \ as when we look in- 
to the Mouth of a Cave, or the Hole of the Pupil of the Eye. 

If the Body M be fuch, as that the fubtile Matter vibrated by the Torch, be refle&ed towards 
the Eye, without anv Diminution of the Quicknefs of the Vibrations, the Body M will appear 

A a White, 




where I 

treat of the 
Hardnefs of 
Bodies. 



rp4 F- Malebranche Concerning 

White, and fo much the more White as there fhall be more Rays relieved. It will likewife ap^ 
pear Luminous, as Flame, if the Body M being polifh'd fhall reflect all, or almoft all the Rays; 
in the- fame order. 

But if the Body M be fuch, as- that the fubtile Matter reflected has its Vibrations lefs quick* 
in certain Degrees that cannot be exactly determin'd, the Refult will be one of the primitive Co- 
lours, Yellow, Red, Blue, provided all the Parts of the Body 711 diminifh equally the Vibrations 
caufed by the Flame in the fubtile Matter •, and all the reft of the Colours, made up of a Mixture 
of the primitive, will arife according as the Parts of the Body M fhall unequally diminifh the 
Quicknefs of the faid Vibrations. This is what I meant, when I advanc'd in fbme Places of my 
Book, that Light and Colours confifted only in the Vibrations of PreiTure, as they were more or 
lefs quick, produced by the fubtile Matter on the Retina.- 

This fimple Expofition of my Opinion will, perhaps, make it feem probable enough, to thole 
at leait who are acquainted with M. Des Cartes's Philofophy, and who are not fatisfitd with the 
Explication which that Learned Man gives of Colours : But that a more folid Judgment may be 
made on my Opinion, it is not enough to have barely propose it; it isrequifite to produce fome 
Arguments to confirm it. 

To that End, it is neceflary to obferve, Firft, That Sound is rendred Senflble only by the Vi- 
brations of the Air, which make the Ear ; for upon the Air's being drawn out of theAir-Pumpy 
Sound is no longer heard. 

Secondly, That the- Difference of Tones proceeds not from the Strength of thefe Vibrations of 
. the Air, but from their Quicknefs, as it is more or lefs. ' 

Thirdly, That though the Imprefhons which Objects make upon the Organs of our Senfes, dif- 
fer fometimes, but according to more or lefs, the Senfations which the Soul receives from them 
differ effentially. There are no Senfations more oppofite than Pleafure and Pain ; and yet a 
Man that fcratches himfelf with Pleafure, feels Pain, if he fcratches a little harder than ordi- 
nary] There is great probability that Bitter and Sweet, which caufe Senfations effentially diffe- 
rent, differ only by more and lefs : For there are thofe who tafte that Bitter which others tafte 
Sweet. There are Fruits which to Day are Sweet, and to Morrow Bitter. A little Difference in 
Bodies makes them capable of caufing very oppofite Senfations •, a fign that the Laws of Union 
of the Soul and Body are arbitrary, and an undoubted Proof that we receive not from Objects 
the Senfations we have of them. 

Fourthly, If the Vibrations of the Air, as they are quicker or flower, produce very different Tones', 
we mould not admire that the Vibrations of the fubtile Matter, which preffes perpetually the 
Optick Nerve, fhould caufe us to fee Colours altogether different, though the Celerity of thefe Vi- 
brations differ only by more or lefs. When a Man has beheld the Sun, and his Optick Nerve has 
been ftrongly ftruck by the Luftre of its Light, becaufe that Nerve is fituate in the Focus of the 
Eye, if at that time he fhut his Eyes, or enters with them open into a dark Place, the Concuflion 
of the Optick Nerve, or of the Animal Spirits 'contain'd in the Nerve, diminifhing by unequal De- 
grees, he fees fucceffively Colours effentially different, firft White, then Yellow, Red, Blue, and 
at laft Black. Whence can this come, except that the Vibrations or Concuflions of the Optick 
Nerve, which at firft are very quick, become by Degrees more flow ? (For we muft not judge of 
the Concuflions of the Optick Nerve, as of thofe of the Strings of Inftruments, which are 
ftretch'd in the Air, and faftned at both Ends, and the Celerity of whofe Vibrations diminifb 
not.) And might not one from thence alone conclude, that the Vibrations of the Retina, which 
caufe Yellow, are quicker than thofe which caufe Red ; and thofe of Red, quicker than thofe of 
Blue •, fo of other Colours fucceflively. 

As the PreiTure of the Air is only from the Weight of the Atmofphere, its Elafticity is but 
moderate, and fome time is required that each part of Air may impell its Neighbour : And thus 
Sound is tranfmitted but leafurely, it making but about an Hundred and eighty Fathom in a Se- 
cond. But the Cafe is different with Light, becaufe all the Parts of the other, or fubtile Mat- 
ter, are contiguous, rapidly moved ; and efpecially becaufe they are comprefs'd with the Weight, 
as I may fay, of all the Vortices. So that the Vibrations of PreiTure, or the Action of a lumi- 
nous Body, muft be communicated to the greateft Diftance in the fhorteft Time ; and if thePref- 
fure of the Parts conftituting our Vortex, were actually infinite, the Vibrations of Preflure muft 
undoubtedly be made in an Inftant. Monfieur Hugens, in his Treatife of Light, pretends, from 
Obfervations made on the Eclipfes of Jupiter\ Satellites, that Light is tranfmitted about Six 
hundred thoufand times fafter than Sound. The Weight therefore of all the other, or the Com- 
search af- preflion of its Parts, is much greater than that of the Atmofphere. I think I have fijfficiently 
ch^lr P rove ^, that the Hardnefs of Bodies can proceed only from the PreiTure caufed by this vYeight; 
and if fo, it muft needs be extraordinary great, fince there are Bodies 'fo hard, as demand a very 
great Force to feparate the leaft part of them. 

Let usfuppofe then that all the Parts of the other, or of the fubtile and invifible Matter of our 
Vortex, are comprefs'd with a kind of infinite Force, and that each of thefe Parts is very fluid, ha- 
ving its Hardnefs only from the Motion of thofe which incompafs andcomprefsiton all fides 5 ' and 
let us fee'how it's poflible for the Impreffions of infinite different Colours to be communicated 
without Confufion •, how Ten thoufand Rays which cut one another, in one phyfical or fenfible 
Point, tranfmit, through the fame Point, all their different Impulfions : For, probably, the Syftem 
which can explain that great Difficulty, will be confonant to the Truth. 

Let 



cdf <? h 




LIGHT and COLOURS. 

Let A P E M be a Chamber painted with a great Variety of Colours, and let them be as oppo. 
£te as may be ; that is, let there be White at A next to 
Black at 77, Blue at b next to Red at r,. Yellow at i nfrxt to 
Purple at v. From all thefe Points, A nb r i v, let right 
Lines be drawn, all cutting in one common Point O, and let ^ 
an Eye be placed beyond it, as in E c dfg /;, all thefe dif- 
ferent Colours will be feen through the tame Point of Inter- 
feron 0. And fince this Figure reprefents only one row of 
Colours, whereas we muft imagine as many as there are vi- 
fible Points in a Sphere, the Point of Intersection O, muft 
receive and tranfmit an infinite Number of different Impref- 
fions, without deftroying one another. 

I fay then, that if the Phyfical Point, or the Globule O, be 
an hard Body, as M.Des Cartes fuppofes it, it is impoffible that 
an Eye at E mould fee White at A, and that another Eye at c v * r * n -A. 
mould fee Black at n. For a Body being hard, if any part of it tends directly from A, for Ex' 
ample, towards E, (that is, if it proceeds any whit tocomprefs the Optick Nerve) all the other 
parts muft neceffarily tend thither alfo : and therefore Black and White cannot be feen at the fame 
time, by the Interpofition of the Globule O. M. Des Cartes pretends farther, that Red is made 
by the turning of the little Globules, which is communicated from one to another quite along 
the whole Ray, from the Object to the Eye. That Opinion is tndefenfible for many Reafons ; 
but there needs no more to ruin it, than to confider that if the Globule O turn upon the axis P M 
from r, where there is Red, towards /"where the Eye is placed, it cannot at the fame time turn 
upon the axis r/from M, where I likewife fuppole Red, towards P where I fuppole another 
Eye. For the reft : When I fay that the Rays cut themfelves in the Globule O, I do not affert 
that the vifual Rays have no greater denfity than that of a Globule of the fecond Element. I 
do not determine what thicknefs of thefe Rays is fufficient fo to ftrike the Optick Nerve, as to 
caufe it to fee Colours. But what I have faid of a fingle Globule, muft be underftood of an 
Hundred or a Thoufand, if lb many be required to make a Ray fenfible. 

It is not therelore poflible that the little Globule O, or its fellows, mould tranfmit the Action 
of infinite different Colours, if thefe Globules are hard : But if they be conceived infinitely foft, 
as the fimple Idea or Matter reprefents them (fince Reft has no Force, and it is indifferent to each 
part to be or not to be near another ; ) I fay, if thefe Globules be conceived very foft, or rather 
as exquifitely little Vortices compoled of an infinitely fluid Matter, they will be fufceptible of in- 
finite different Impreflions, which they can communicate to others upon which they lean, and 
with which they are as it were infinitely compreffed. I will endeavour to explain and prove 
this. 

In order to which, it is neceflary well to underftand, thatRe-action is here neceffarily equal to 
Action, for thefe Reafons, That naturally Force is never deftroy'd, that our Vortex is as it were 
infinitely comprefs'd, and that there is no Vacuum ; and laftly, becaufe the Ethereal Matter is in 
vehement Motion. If, for Example, a Man thruft his Cane againft an immovable Wall, it will 
be repelled with the fame Force that it is pufhed. The Re-action will be equal to the Action. 
Now though the Rays are not hard like Sticks, yet very near the fame thing will happen in re- 
gard of Reaction, becaufe of the compreffion and plenitude of om Vortex. 

For if we fuppofe a Cask exactly full of Water, and a Pipe being fitted to it, a Stopple be thruft 
into this Pipe, it will meet with a Refiftance within, equal to the driving Force without. And if 
a little Hole be made in the middle of the Stopple, through, which the Water may pafs from 
the VefTel ; and then the Stopple be thruft in, all the Water which (hall be compreffed by it, 
will tend at the fame time, by reafon of its fluidity, both to recede from every point of the 
Stopple, and alfo to approach the Hole in the middle of it. For if the Stopple be forced in 
with violence enough, the Veffel will burft in the weakeft part of it, let it be where it will ; 
a certain fign that the Water preffes the Veffel every where ± and if the Stopple be puflfdin, the 
.Water will immediately thereupon fly out by the little Orifice. All this, becaufe Re-action is 
equal to Action inzp/enum, and that Water, or the fubtile Matter, is foft or fluid enough for 
every part of it, fo to figure it felf as to fuffice for all forts of Impreflions. It muft alfo be ob- 
ferved, That the more violently the Stopple is forcd into the Veffel, the more forcibly the 
Water' whilft 'tis driven toward the Concave Surface of the Veffel, returns towards the Stopple, 
and leaps through the Hole. 

Hence 'tis eafie to perceive that a Black Point on White Paper muft be more vifible than upon 
Blue j becaufe White repelling the light ftronger than any other Colour, it muft by its Re-action 
tend more forcibly towards the Black Point. But if the Ethereal Matter were not infinitely foft 
and fluid, it is plain that the little Globules which tranfmit the impreiTion of White, being hard-, 
would hinder that of Black, becaufe thefe Globules fupporting one another, could not tend to- 
wards the Black Point: And if that Ethereal Matter were not preffed, there would be no Re-act ion. 

What I have been faying of White and Black, ought to be applied to other Colours, though it 
would be difficult to do it in particular, and to anfwer the Objeftions which many would make 
upon that Subject : For it is eafie to raife Objections, in matters that are obfcure. But all thole 
who are able to make Objections, are not always capable of comprehending the Principles on vyhich 
the Refolution of them depend. To me it fcems eafie enough, to conceive how it is pofl-.ble for 

a fgnlible 



IP5 



ip 6 K Malebranche Concerning^ Sec, 

a iMible. point of Matter, infinitely fluid, and compreffed on all fides, to receive at the feme 
time infinite different Impreffions, if we attend to thefe two tilings : Firft, That Matter is divi- 
fible in infinitum : Secondly, That each part neceffarily tends and advances that way where it 
meets with leaft refiftance. 5 and thus, that every foftand unequally prefs'd Body, receives all the 
Sculptures of the Mould, as I may fay, that furroundsit, and receives them fo much more readi- 
ly] as it is more fluid and more comprefs'd. I omit the enumeration of Conferences which fol- 
low from the Principles I have been explaining 5 by which Confequences, I think, may be remo- 
ved that furprifing Difficulty, how the Rays, of different Colours may crofs each other without 
Confufion ; which appears to me fo great a Difficulty, as that none but the true Syftem of the 
World can entirely diffipate and refolve it. 

As for the reft, it muft not be imagined that what I have faid of the Globules of the fecond 
Element (which I am fo far from believing hard, as that I confider them as little Vortices) can 
injure M. Des Cartes's Phyficks : On the contrary, my Opinion^ if true, perfeQs his Syftem in Ge- 
neral. For if my Sentiment may be ufeful to the Explication of Light and Colours, it feems 
much more proper to refolve other General Queftions of Natural Philofophy •, as for Example,- 
how to; explain the furpfizing Effeef s of Fire. 

As Bodies cannot natutally acquire any Motion, unlefs it be communicated to them, it is mam- 
feft that Fire cannot be made but by the Communication- of the Motion of the fubtile Matter* 
M. Des Cartes, as is known, pretends that 'tis only the firft Element which communicates- its Motioft 
ro the third, of which grofs Bodies are compos'd, and which fets it on fire. According to him, when 
one ftrikes fire, one forcibly dhTevers a little part of the Flint : (I rather fhould belieVe it to be a 
part broke off from the SteeljWhich iskindled : For when we behold with a Microfcope the Sparks of 
Fire which are collected, it appears to be the Iron which has been melted and reduced into Globules* 
or little long and round Figures. I have not obferv'd 3ny Change to have happened in the little parts 
broken from the Flint, but that makes nothing at the bottom.) That little part broken off from the 
Iron, fpinning then round with force, drives the little Globules, or the fecond Element, and confer 
quently caufes : that firft to flow towards the Particle of Steel, which. furrounding it on all fides, 
communicates its Motion to it, and fets it on fire. This is pretty nearly the Opinion of M. Des 
Cartes. It may be feen more at large in the Fourth Part of his Principles, in the 8oth. and follow- 
ing Numbers. But if thefe Globules are hard, and all contiguous, it is difficult to conceive how the 
firft Element could flow towards the feparated part of the Iron, and that with a fufficient Quantity 
to encompafs and let it on fire, not only that, but all the Powder of a Cannon or a Mine, fince the 
fiift Element is but a very fmall Portion of the Ethereal Matter, as fitting only the little triangu- 
lar or concave Spaces, which the contiguous Globules leave between them. This then is the Way 
that I explain Fire, uponSuppofition that the little Globules of the fecond Element are only little 
Vortices of a violently agitated Matter. 

Though the Air be not abfolutely necefTary to excite fome Spark of Fire, yet for want of Air, Fire 
immediately goes out," and cannot fo much as communicate it felf to Gun-powder, though very 
eafie to be inflamed. Experience (hews, that if a Piftol well primed have its Cock Itruck down 
in an Air-Pump, when the Air is exhaufted, the Priming never takes fire, and it is very difficult 
to obferve the Sparks. Laftly, Every Body knows that Fire goes out for want of Air, and that it 
is kindled by blowing : This being fuppoled, fee how I explain the Production of Fire. . 
. When a Man ftrikes Fire in a Vacuum, he breaks off, by the force of the Blow, a little part of 
the Steel, or of the Flint •■ this little part whirling about, and ftriking rudely upon fome little 
Vortices, breaks them •, and confequently determines their Parts to follow its Determination, and 
to furround it in anlnftant, andfet it on fire. But the Matter of thefe little Vortices, after ha- 
ving made abundance of irregular Motions, re-places it felf partly in new Vortices, and partly 
efcapes between the Intervals of the furrounding Vortices, which approach the difTever'd part of 
Iron. And thefe new Vortices are not eafily broken, becaufe they follow pretty exatlly the Motion 
of the part of Iron •, which being perhaps either circular or cylindrous, and turning nearly, either 
upon its Centre, or its Axis, ftrikes no more the Vortices in a manner capable of breaking them. 
All this is perform'd as in an Inftant, when the Flint ftrikes the Steel in a Place void of Air, and 
the Spark then is hardly vifible. 

But when the Steel is ftricken in full Air, the part broken off from it, as it whirls, meets and 
vibrates a good deal of Air, whofe Parts, probably branchy, meet with it, and break many more of 
the Vortices than the Iron alone. So that the fubtile Matter of thefe Vortices, coming to furround 
the Iron and the Air, affords them plenty enough of different Motions, ftrongly to repel the other 
Vortices. Thus the Sparks muft be much more glittering in the Air than in a Vacuum, they muft 
remain much longer, and have fufficient force to fire Gun-powder •, which cannot want fubtile 
Matter to let it on fire, whatever Quantity of Powder there is ; fince it is not only the firlt Ele- 
ment, but much more the fecond, which produces its extraordinary Motion. If one make Re- 
flexion on what happens to Fire, when 'tis clear, that is, when a great deal of Air is driven 
. againft it, wefhall not doubt but that the Parts of the Air are very proper to deteimine the fub- 
tile Matter,- to communicate a part of its Motion to the Fire fince 'tis only from this Matter 
that the Hie can derive its Motion ; no Body being capable of moving it felf, but by the Action 
of thofe which environ it, or which ftrike againft it. 



The END. 



A 



TREATISE 



CONCERNING 



Nature and Grace. 



B Y 



Father MJLEBRANCHE, 

Of the ORATORY. 



Done into Englifli out of French. 



ADVERTISEMENT. 

Ilntreat thofe into whofe Hands this TracT: jljall come, to believe I princi- 
pally undertook^ it to fatisfe the Difficulties of fome Hiilofophers, rrijo i 
methojights, had not all that due Senfe Religion teaches us to have of the 
Goodnefs ofGO D, nor were Sufficiently acquainted with the Obligations we 
are under to JESUS CHRIST. J defire it may be looked on only 
as an Effay, and not judg'd of before it be attentively examind ; and that 
the Reader would not let himfelf be furpriild by the Motions of Fear and 
Mijiruji, which naturally arife in us < from any thing that bears the Char a- 
Ber of Novelty. Having written for Philofbphers, who Jiand upon a great 
Accuracy and rigorous ExaSlnefs, I have been obligd to avoid the General 
Terms in Ordinary ZJfe ; fince I could not content them without nfing fuch 
Terms as raife dijiinB and particular Ideas in the Mind, as far as tlie Sub- 
jeSt will permit . I quejiion not but equitable Perfons will conclude I had no 
other Defign than to prove in allpoffible manners the Truths we are taught by 
Faith -, and that I am not fo Inconfiderate as to call in quejiion what the 
Church entertains as certain, and Religion obliges us to believe* But it has 
ever been allow 'd Men to give New Proofs of Ancient Truths, to endear G O EJ 
to the AjfeStions of Men, and to Jhew that there is nothing harjh or nnjuji in 
the ConduSi He takgs for the Eftablijhment of His Church. 

This Piece is divided intoThree Difcourfes : In the Firji I reprefent GOD 
as working for his Creatures all the Good His Wifdom will permit. In tlve 
Second I explain how the SON of GOT), as Incarnate Wifdom, and Head 
of the Church, fbeds on His Members the Graces He could not beflow, as 
Eternal Wifdom, and they could not receive from His Father. And I lihg- 
wife endeavour to make Men fenfible of the Obligations and Relations they are 
under to JESUS CHRIST. Laftly, in the Third D if conrfe, I Jhew 
what is Liberty, and how Grace works in us with a Salvo to it. Since there 
are Perfons of fo little Equity as to draw dangerous Confeqnences from Prin- 
ciples mojl Advantageous to Religion ; I defire I may not be condemn d upon 
their bare Word, but that, before I am jndgd, I may have the Juflice done 
me of being underjiood. Surely there ought to be no Neceffity of nty making 
this Petition. 



C O N- 



Cf ] 



C O N C ERNING 



Nature and Grace, 

DISCOURSE t 

0/ f/?e Necejftty of the General Laws of NATURE W 

of GRACE. 



PART I. 



s 



Of the Necejpty of thi General Laws of Nature, 

I ^"*1 1 N C E G D can ad only for his own Glory \ andean find this no where but in Him* 
fetf, He could have no other Defign in the Creation of the World than the Eftablifh- 
ment of His Church. Prov.3. 22. 

II. JESUS CHRIST, who is the Head of iu is the Beginning of the Ways cf Eccl." 24. 
the LORD; is the Firft Born of the Creatures ; and though lent among Men in the Fu/nefs of h »4- 
Time, was their Exemplar in the Eternal Defigns of his Father : After his Image all Men Were ph * lit ' 
created, as well thofe that preceded as we that fucceed His Temporal Birth. In a Word, 'tis He "i"^!,' 
in whom the Univerfe fubfifts, there being none befides that could make the Work of G D per- 22. 4. 13, 
feftly worthy of its Author. '<*• Co11 - '• 

, III. Some Proportion there ought to be between the World and the A£tion that produe'd it. jg'^V 7 * 
But the Action that edue'd it out of Nothing is that of G D, of ari infinite Worth •, whilft the pf.' 72 . 17. 
World, though never fo perfett, is not infinitely Amiable, nor can render to its Author an Ho- Joh. 17. 
hour worthy of Him. Thus feparate JES US CHRIST from the reft of the Creatures, js* 2 4» 
and fee if He, who a£ts but for his own Glory, and whole Wifdom his no Bounds, can purpofe , p"' ,.20. 
the Produ£tion of any External Work. ? Apce. *>' 

But joining J E S U S CHRIS TtoUh Church, and the Church to the reft of the World it is 8. u 8,&c, 
taken from, you raife to the Glory of G D a Temple fo majeftick, magnificent^ and holy, that 
you'll wonder perhaps he laid the Foundations of it lb late. 

IV. Yet if you obierve, that the Glory which redounds to G D from His Work, is not ef 
fential to Him ; if you are perfuaded, that the World cannot be a neceflary Emanation of Deity, 
you will evidently lee that it muft not have been Eternal, though it ought to have no End. Eter- 
nity is the Chara&er of Independency. The World therefore muft have a Beginning : Annihi- 
lation of Subftances is a Sign of Inconftancy in Him that produe'd them $ therefore they will 
have no End. 

V. If it be true then, that the World muft have begun, and that the Incarnation of JESUS 
CHRIST could not have been fo ancient as the Eternal Generation of his Divine Perfon \ An 
Eternity muft neceffarily have preceded Time. Think not therefore that t? D delay'd the Pro- 
duction of His Work : He has a greater Love for the Glory He receives from it in / E S U S 
CHRIST. In one Senfe it may be moft truly affirm'd, that He made it as foon as poffible i 
For though to us he might have created it Ten thoufand Years before the Beginning of Ages, yer, 
Ten thoufand Years having no proportion to Eternity, He could neither do itfoo)ter nor later, 
fince an Eternity muft have gone before. 

VI. 'Tismanifeftthat&NW and Late are Properties of Time ; and though we fuppofe that GOD 
had created the World as many Millions of Years as there are Grain of Sand on the Sea-more, 
before He did, it might ftill be enquir'd, why G D, who fo loves the Glory he receives in the 
Eftablifhment of His Church, had not begun it many Ages before ? Thus it fuffices to lay, That 
an Eternity ought to forego the Incarnation of the WORD, to manifeft why this Great Myfte- 
rv was accomplifh'd neither fooner nor later. GOD then muft have created the Univerfe for 
the Church, and the Church for J J? S U S CHRIST j and J E S US CHRI S T, that 
He might find in Him a Sacrifice and High-Piieft worthy of the Divine Majefty- We [Ml not 

A 2 doubt 



F. MalebrAnche Concerning 

doubt of this Order of the Defigns of GOD, if it be obferv'd that He can have no other End 
of his Anions than Himfelf. And if it be conceiv'd that Eternity does not belong to Creatures, 
we (hall acknowledge they were produc'd when 'twas requifite they fhould be : Which Truths 
fuppos'd, let us try to difcover fomething in the Method GOD takes for the Execution of His 
Grand Defign. 

VII. Were I not perfuaded that all Men are no farther Reafonable than enlightned by Eternal 
Wifdom, it would, no doubt, be great Temerity to fpeak of the Defigns of GOD^ and offer to 
difcover any of His Ways, in the Production of His Work. : But whereas it is certain that the 
word Eternal is the Univerfal Reafon of Minds, and that by the Light which he continually (beds 
in us, we may have fome Communication with G D, I ought not to be blam'd for confulting 
that Light, which, though Confubftantial with GOD Himfelf, fails not to anfwer thofe who 
know how to enquire of it by a ferious Attention. 

VIII. However, I confefs that Faith teaches a great many Truths not difcoverable by the natural 
Union of rhe Mind with Reafon. Eternal Truth anfwers not to all we ask, fince we ask fome- 
times more than we can receive. But this mult not ferve for a Pretence to juftifie our Lazinefs 
and Inapplication. 

IX. Vulgar Heads are foon wearied with the Natural Prayer, the Mind by its Attention ought 
to make to inward Truth, in order to receive Light and Understanding from it; and thusfatigu'd 
by that painful Exercife, they talk of it in a contemptuous manner. They difhearten one ano- 
ther, and cover their Weaknefs and Ignorance under the delufive Appearances of a counterfeit Hu- 
mility. 

X. But their Example is not to infufe into us that agreeable Vertue which cherifhes Carelefs- 
nefs and Negligence in the Mind, and comforts it under its Ignorance of moft neceflary Truths. 
We muft pray conftantly to Him who enlightens all Men, That he willbeftow His Light upon 
us, recompence our faith with the Gift of Underftanding •, and efpecially, to prevent us from 
mHtaking Probability and confus'd Senfations, which precipitate proud Minds into Darknels and 
Errour, for the Evidence which accompanies His Refolves. 

XI. When we defign to fpeak Of GOD with any exaftnels, we muft not confult our felves, 
nor the vulgar part or Men ; but elevate our Thoughts above all Creatures, and with great Re- 
verence and Attention confult the vaft and immenfe Idea of a Being infinitely perfect ; which re- 
prefenting the true GO D very different from what the Vulgar fancy Him to themfelves, we are 
not to treat of Him in popular Language. Every Body is allow'd to fay with the Scripture, that 
GOD Repented Him that He created Man % that He was Angry with his People •, that he deli- 
ver'd Ifrael from Captivity by the Strength of His Arm. But thefe or the like Expreflions are 
not permitted Divines, when they ihould fpeak accurately and juftly. Therefore 'tis not to be 
wondred if in the Sequel of Difcourfe ray Expreffion mail be found uncommon. It ought rather 
to be carefully obferv'd whether they be clear, and perfectly adapted to the Idea which all Men 
have of an Infinitely Perfect Being. 

XII. This Idea ci a Being infinitely perfect includes two Attributes abfolutely necefTary to the 
Creation of the World ; an unlimited Wifdom, and an irrefiftible Power. The Wifdom of GO D 
affords infinite Ideas of different Works, and all poffible Ways for the executing His Defigns ; 
and His Power renders Him fo abfolutely Matter of all things, and fo independent of all Afliftan- 
ces whatever, that He need but Will to execute what he Wills. For we muft above all take no- 
tice, that GOD needs no Inftruments to work with t, that His Wills are necefiarily efficacious ; 
in a Word, that as His Wifdom is His own Underftanding, His Power is no other than His Will. 
Among thefe innumerable Ways whereby GOD might have executed His Defign, let us fee 
which was preferable to all other ; and let us begin with the Creation of this Vifible World, from 
which, and in which He forms the Invifible, which is the Eternal Obje£t of His Love. 

XIII. An excellent Artift ought to proportion his A£tion to his Work •, he does not that by 
Ways compound, which may be perform'd by more fimple -, he acts not without End, and never 
makes infignificant ElTays. Whence we are to conclude, that GOD difcovering in the infinite 
Treafures of His Wifdom an Infinity of poffible Worlds, as neceflary Confequences of the Laws 
of Motion, which he could eftablifh, was determin'd to the Creation of that which might be 
produc'd and preferv'd by the firnpleft Laws, or which mould be the perfecteft that could be, con- 
fidering the fimplicity of the Ways neceflary to its Production and Prefervation. 

XIV. GOD might, doubtlefs, have made a perfe&er World than that we inhabit. He might, 
for Inltance, have caus'd the Rain, which fecundates the Earth, to have fallen more regularly on 
Plow'd Lands than in the Sea, where it is not neceffary. But in order to this, He muft have 
chang'd the Simplicity of His Ways, and have multiplied the Laws of the Communications of 
Motions, by which our World fubfifts ; and fo there would not have been that Proportion be- 
tween the Action of G D and His Work, which is neceflary to determine an infinitely wife Being 
to act ^ or, at leaft, there would not have been the lame Proportion between the Action of GOD 
and this ib perfect. World, as there is between the Laws of Nature, and the World we inhabit : 
For our World, imagine it as imperfect as you will, is founded on fo Simple and Natural Laws 
of Motion, as make it perfectly worthy of the infinite Wifdom of its Author. 

And indeed I am of Opinion, that the Laws of Motion, neceflary to the Production and Pre- 
fervation of the Earth, and all the Stars in the Heavens, are redue'd to thefe Two : Firft, That 
inov'd Bodies tend to continue their Motion in a right line : Secondly, That when two Bodies 
meet, their Motion is diltributed to each, in proportion to their Magnitude ; fo that after the 

Collifion 



NATURE and GRACE. 

CoDifion they ought to move with equal degrees of Celerity. Thefe two Laws are the Caufe of 
all thofe Motions which produce that variety of Forms which we, admire in Nature. 

XVI. 'Tis own'd notwithftanding, that the fecond is never manifeftly obfervable in the Experi- 
ments that can be made upon the Subject ; but that comes from our feeing only what happens in 
vifible Bodies, and our not thinking on the invifible that furround them, which by the Efficacy of 
the fame Law, giving the Elajiicity to vifible Bodies, oblige them, to rebound, and hinder them 
from obferving it. But this I ought not to explain more at length. 

XVII. Now thefe two Laws are fo Simple, fo Natural, and at the fame time fo Fruitful, that 
though we had no other Reafon to conclude they are obferv'd in Nature, we mould be induct 

' to believe them eftablifh'd by Him who works always by the fimpleft Ways, in whofe Action 
there is nothing but what's fojuftly uniform, and wifely proportion'd to his Work, that He doe3 
infinite Wonders by a very fmall Number of Wills. 

XVIII. It fares not fo with the General Caufe, as with the Particular ; with infinite Wifdom, 
as with limited Underftandings. GOD forefeeing, before the Eftablifhment of Natural Laws, 
all that could follow from them, ought not to have conltituted them, if He was to difinnul 
them. The Laws of Nature are conftant and immutable, and general for all Times and Places. 
Two Bodies of fuch degrees of Magnitude and Swiftnefs, meeting, rebound fo now as they did 
heretofore. If the Rain falls upon fome Grounds, and the Sun fcorches others ; if a feafonable 
Time for Harveft is followed by a deftructive Hail •, if an Infant cones into the World with a 
monflrous and ufelefs Head growing from his Breaft, that makes him wretched h this proceeds 
not from the particular Wills of G D, but from the Settlement of the Laws of Communica- 
tion of Motions, whereof thefe Effects are neceflary Confequences : Laws at once folimple and 
lb fruitful, that they ferve to produce all we fee Noble in the World, and even to repair in a lit- 
tle time the moll general Barrennefs and Mortality. 

XIX. He that having built an Houfe, throws one Wing of it down, that he may rebuild it, 
betrays his Ignorance •, and he who having planted a Vine, plucks it up as foon as it has taken 
root, manifefts his Levity ; becaufe he that wills and unwills, wants either Knowledge or Refo- 
lution of Mind. But it cannot be faid that GOD acts either by this Freakifhnefs, or Ignorance, 
when a Child comes into the World with fuperfluous Members that make him leave it again ; or 
that an Hail-ftone breaks off a Fruit half ripe. If he caufes this, 'tis not becaufe he wills and 
nnwills j for G D a£ts not like particular Caufes, by particular Wills -, nor has he eftablifh'd 
the Laws of the Communications of Motions,. with defign to produce Monfters, or to make 
Fruit fall before Maturity ^ it not being their Sterility but Fecundity, for which He will'd thefe 
Laws. Therefore what He once will'd, He ftill wills, and the World in general, for which thefe 
Laws were conltituted, will eternally fubfilt. 

XX. 'Tis here to be obfervd, That the Eflential Rule of the Will Of GOD is Order ; and 
that if Man, for example, had not finn'd, (a Supposition which had quite chang'd the Defigns,) 
then Order not fuffering him to be punifh'd, the Natural Laws of the Communications of Mo- 
tions would never have been capable to incommodate his Felicity. For the Law of Order, which 
requires that a righteous Perfon mould fuffer nothing againft his Will, being EiTential to GOD, 
the Arbitrary Law of the Communication of Motions muft have been necelTarily fubfervient 
to.it. 

XXI. There are if ill fome uncommon Inftances where thefe General Laws of Motions ought 
to ceafe to produce, their Effect ; not that GOD changes or corrects His Laws, but that fome 
Jvlirades muft happen on particular Occafions, by the Order of Grace, which ought to fuperfede 

the Order of Nature. Befides, 'tis fit Men mould know that G D is fo Mafter of Nature, 
that if He fubmits it to His Laws eftablifh/d, 'tis rather becaufe He wills it fo, than by an abfo^ 
lute Neceffity. 

XXII. If then it be true, that the General Caufe ought not to produce His Work by particular 
Wills, and that GOD ought to fettle certain conftant and invariable Laws of the Communica- 
tion of Motions, by the Efficacy whereof He forefaw the World might fubfift in the State we find 
it j in one Senie it may be raoft truly faid, that GOD defires all his Creatures mould be perfect * 
chat He wills not the Abortion of Children ; nor loves monftrous Productions -, nor has made the- 
Laws of Nature with defign of caufing them ; and that if it were poflible by ways fo fimple to 
nuke and preferve a perfecler World, He would never have eftablifh'd thofe Laws, whereof fo 
great a Number of Monfters are the neceflary Refults : But that it would have been unworthy 
His Wifdom to multiply His Wills to prevent fome particular Diforders, which by their Diver- 
litv make a kind of Beauty in the Univerfe. 

'XXIII. GOD has given to every Seed a Cicatricle, which contains in Miniature the Plant 
and Fruity another Cicatricle adjoining to the former, which contains the Root of the Plant j 
which Root contains another Root ftill, whofe imperceptible Branches expand themfelves into 
the two Lobes or Meal of the Seed. Does not this manifeft, that in one molt real Senfe He de- 
fleas all Seeds fhould produce their like ? For why mould He have given to thofe Grains of 
Corn He defign'd fnonld be barren, all the Parts requifite to render them Fecund ? Neverthelefs, 
Rain being neceflary to make them thrive, and this falling on the Earth by General Laws, which 
diitribute it not precifely on well manur'd Grounds, and in the fltteft Seafons, all thefe Grains 
come not to good •, or, if they do, the Hail, or fome other mifchievous Accident, which is a 
Neceflary Confequence of thele fame Natural Laws, prevents their earing. Now GOD having 
c'onitituted thefe Laws, might be faid to will the Fecundity of fome Seeds rather than others, it" 

B we 



F. Malebranche Concerning 

we did not otherwife know that, it not becoming a General Caufe to work by Particular Wills, 
nor an infinitely wife Being by Complicated Ways •, GOD ought not to take other Meafures than 
He has done for the Regulating the Rains according to Time and Place, or by the Delire of the 
Husbandman. Thus much is iufficient for the Order of Nature ; Let us explain that of Grace 
a little more at large, and efpecially remember that 'tis the fame Wifdom, and the fame Will ± 
in a word, the fame GOD who has eftablilh'd them both. 




PART II. 

Of the Necejpty of the General Laws of GRACE. 

XXIV. jf~~~t D loving Himfelf by the Neceflity of His Being, and willing to procure an In- 
finite Glory, an Honour on all Hands worthy of himfelf, confults His Wifdom for 
the accomplishing His Defires. This Divine Wifdom, fill'd with Love for Him 
from whom He receives His Being, by an Eternal and Ineffable Generation, fee- 
ing nothing in all poffible Creatures worthy of the Majefty of His Father, offers Himfelf, .to efta- 
blilh to His Honour an Eternal Wormip, and to prefent Him, as High Prieft, a Sacrifice which 
through the Dignity of His Perfon, mould be capable of contenting Him. He reprefents to Hirri 
infinite Models, for the Temple to be rais'd to His Glory • and at the fame time all poffible Ways 
to execute His Defigns. 'Mongft all which, that which inftantly appears Greateft, and moft Mag- 
nificent, moft Uniform, and Comprehenfive, is that whereof all the Parts have moft Symmetry 
with the Perfon who conftitutes the whole Glory and Sanftity of it : And the wifeft way of exe- 
cuting that Defign, is the Eftablifhing certain moft fimple and fruitful Laws to bring it to its Perfe- 
ction. This is what Reafon feems to anfwer to all thofe who confult it with Attention, when 
following the Principles which Faith teaches us. Let us examine the Circumftances of this Great 
Dejgn, and then endeavour to difcover the Ways of executing it. 

XXV. The Holy Scripture teaches us, That 'tis J ejus Chriji who ought to make all the Beauty, 
the Sanftity, the Grandeur, and Magnificence of this Work. If Holy Writ compare it to a City, 
'tis Jejus Chriji who makes all the Luftre^ it not being the Sun and the Moon, but the Glory of 

Apcc 21. God, and the Light of the Lamb that mine upon it. When reprefenting it asa Living Body, where- 

2 ?-. of all the Parts have a wonderful Proportion, 'tis Jejus Chriji who is the Head of it. 'Tis from 

Cci. i. 1 8. p x j m t j ie kpij-j,. an( j Lif e are communicated into all the Members that compofe it. Speaking of 

Ephef. i. ^ as a Temple, jjefus Chrifl is the Chief Corner-ftone, which is the Foundation of the Build- 

12. ing. 'Tis He who is the High Prieft, and Sacrifice of it. Ail the Faithful are Priefts^ but as 

they participate of his Priefthood, they are Victims, only as partaking of HisHolinefs; it being 

in Him and through Him alone they continually offer themfelves to the Majefty of God. In 

fine, 'tis only from the Analogy they bear to Him, that they contribute to the Beauty of this Au- 

guft and Venerable Temple, which has always been, and will eternally continue, the Objeft of 

the good Pleafure.of God. 

XXVI. Reafon Hkewife evinces thefe fame Truths: For what Proportion is there between Crea- 
tures, how perfect foever we fuppofe them, and the Aftion that produces them > How can any 
Creatures which are finite, be equivalent to the Aftion of God of infinite Worth > Can God re- 
ceive any thing from a mere Creature that determines him to aft ? But be it fo, that God made 
Man with Hopes of being hOnour'd by* him •, whence comes it, that thofe who difhonour Him 
make the greateft Number ? Is not this a.fufficient Indication that God is very negligent of His 
pretended Glory, which He receives from His Work, if feparated from His Well-beloved Son ; 
that it, was in Jefm Chriji that He refolv'd to produce it, and that without Him it would not 
fubfift a moment. 

. XXVII. AManrefolves upon a Work, becaufe he has need of it, or has a Mind to fee what 
Effeft it ivill have ; or, laftly, becaufe by this Effay of his Strength he learns what he is able to 
produce. But God has no need of his Creatures ; nor is He like Men who receive new Impreffi- 
ons from the Prefence of Objefts. His Ideas are Eternal and Immutable. He law the World be- 
fore it was form'd, as well as he fees it now. Laftly, Knowing that His Wills are efficacious, 
he perfeftly knows, without making trial of his Strength, all that He's capable of producing! 
Thus Scripture and Reafon allure us, that by Reafon of Jejus Chriji the World fubfifts, and 
through the Dignity of his Divine Perfon receives an additional Beauty, whiefi renders it well 
pleafing in the Sight of God. 

XXVIII. From which Principle, methinks, it follows, that Jejus Chriji is the Model by 
which we are .made -, that we were ffam'd after His Image and Similitude, and have nothing 
comely in us any farther than we are the Draught and Eflypenoi' Him •, that He is the End of' the 
Laxv,. and the Archetype of the Ceremonies and Sacrifices of the Jews. That to determine that 
• Succefiion of Generations preceding His Birth, they mutt needs have had fome certain Agree- 
ments with Him, whereby they became more pleafing to God than any other. That fince Jefus 
Chriji was to be the Head and Husband of the Church, 'twas requifite he fliould be typified by 
the Propagation of Mankind from one Perfon • as related by MoJes, and explain'd bv" St. FjuL 
In a word, from this Principle it follows, that die prefent World ought to be the Figure of the 

future » 



NATURE and GRACE. 'f 

future • and that as far as the Simplicity of General Laws will permit, all the Inhabitants of it 
have been or fliall be the Figures and Refemblances of the Only Son of God, quite from AM 
in whom he was facrificed, to the laft Member that mall conftituteHis Church 

XXIX. We judge of the. Perfection of a Work by its ConfOrmiry with the Idea afforded us 
by Eternal Wifdom : For there is nothing Beautiful or Amiable, but as related to Eifential, Necef- 
lary, and Independent Beauty. Now that Intelligible Beauty, being made fenfible, becomes even 
in this Capacity the Rule of Beauty and Perfection. Therefore all Corporeal Creatures ought to 
receive from it all their Excellency and Luitre. All Minds ought to have the fame Thoughts 
and the fame Inclinations as the Soul of jefm, if they would be agreeable to thofe who fee no- 
thing Beautiful, nothing Amiable, lave in what is conformable to Wifdom and Truth. Since 
therefore we are oblig'd to believe the Work of GO D to have an abfolute Conformity with Eter- 
nal Wildom, we have all Reafon to believe, that the fame Work has infinite Correfpondencies 
with Him who is the Head, the Principle, the Pattern, and the End of it. But who can ex- 
plain all thefe Agreements > 

XXX. That which makes the Beauty of a Temple, is the Order and Variety of Ornaments 
that are found in it. Thus, to render the Living Temple of the Divine Majefty worthy of its 
Inhabitant, and proportionate to the Wifdom and infinite Love of its Author, all poffible Beauties 
are to make it up. But it is not fo with this Temple rais'd to the Glory of God, as with Mate- 
rial ones. For that which conftitutes the Beauty of the Spiritual Edifice of the Church, is the 
infinite Diverfity of Graces, communicated from Him, who is the Head of it, to all the' confti- 
tuent Parts. "lis the Order and admirable Proportions fettled among them, 'tis the various De- 
grees of Glory fhining and reflecting on all fides round about it. 

XXXI. It follows from this Principle, that to the eftablffhing that Variety of Rewards, which 
make up the Beauty of the Heavenly jenij'akm, Men ought to be fubjeCt upon Earth, not only 
to Purgative Afflictions, but alfo to the Motions of Concupifcence, which make them gain fo 
many Victories by adminiftring fuch a multitude of various Combats. 

XXXII. The BlefTe'd in Heaven, no doubt, will be endow'd with a SanCtity, and Variety of 
Gifts, perfectly correfponding to the Diverfity of their Good Works. Thofe continual Sacrifices, 
whereby the Old Man is deltroy'd and annihilated, will enricfi the Spiritual Subltance of the 
Ncio Man with Graces and Beauties. And if it were neceiTary that Jefi/s Chriji fhould fuffer all 
forts of AffliCtions before He entefd on the Poflefiion of His Glory ; Sin, which introduc'd into 
theW^orld the Miferiesof Life^ and Death, which follows it, were neceiTary, that Men after 
their Trial upon Earth might be legitimately crown'd with* that Glory, the Variety and Order 
whereof fliall make the Beauty of the future World. 

XXXIII. 'Tis true, that Concupifcence which we feel in us is not neceflary to our Meriting : 
For J ejus Chriji, whofe Merits, are infinite, was riot fubjeCt to it. But though He abfolutely 
controll'd it, He was willing to admit in Himfelf the moft vexatious Motions and Senfations, 
that He might merit all the Glory that was prepared for Him. Of all Senfations, that which is 
moil repugnant to a Soul willing, and deferving to be happy, is Pain $ wbich yet He was willing 
to fuffer in the moft exceflive degree. Pleaftrre makes actually Happy the Perfon that actually 
enjoys it, which yet he willingly deny'd Himfelf. Thus he has offer'd, like us, innumerable Sa- 
crifices, through a Body which he took like ours : But thefe Sacrifices were of a different kind 
from thofe of the greateft Saints ; becaufe he voluntarily rais'd in Himfelf all thofe painful Sen- 
fations, which in the reft of Men are the neceiTary Confluences of Sin •, which being thus 
ptrfeCUy voluntary, were therefore more pure and meritorious. 

XXXIV. If I had a clear Idea of the Bleffed Spirits, who are not embody'd, I perhaps could 
clearly refolve a Difficulty that arifes from their Confideration. For it may be objeCfed, either 
that there is very little Variety in the Merits or Rewards of Angels, or that it was to ill pur- 
pofe tor God to unite Bodies to Spirits, which are, Whllft united, fo dependant on them. I 
confefs I do not fee any great Diverfity in the Rewards anfwering the Merits of purely intelli- 
gible Subftances, efpecially if they have merited their Recompence by one fole ACt of Love.' 
For being not united to a Body, which might be an Occafwn to God's giving them, by moft Sim- 
pie and General Laws, a Train of different Thoughts and Senfations, I fee no Variety in their 
Combats, or Victories \ But polTibly another Order has been eftablifli'd, which is unknown to 
me -, and therefore! ought not tofpeak,of it. And 'tis fufricient thatl have eftablifli'd a Prin- 
ciple, from w ; hence may be concluded, that God ought to create Bodies, and unite Minds to 
them, that by the moft fimple Laws of Union of thefe two Subftances, He might give us in a 
general, conltant, and uniform manner, that gteat Variety of Senfations and Motions, which is 
the Principle of the Diverfity of our Merits and Rewards. 

XXXV. Laftly, 'twas requifite that God alone fhould have all the Glory of the Beauty and 
Perfection of the future World. This Work, which infinitely excels all others, ought to be a 
Work of pure Mercy. It was not for Creatures to glory in having any other part in it, than Rom. u. 
that the Grace, of j'ejus Chriji had given them. In a word, 'twas fit that God fhould fuffer all ^ 
Men to be involved in Sin, that He might iheW them Mercy in Jefus Chriji. 

XXXVI. Thus the firft Man, being impower'd by the Strength of His Charity, to perfevere 
in Original Righteoufnefs, God ought not to have fiYd him to his Duty, by preventing Pleafures -, 
tor having no Concupifcence to conquer, God ought not to prevent his Free Will by the Delecta- 
tion of His Grace. In ih'ort, having all in general that was neceiTary to his meriting his Reward, 
God, who works nothing in vain, ought to leave him to himfelf though Heforefaw His Fall, fines! 

Fie 



S F. M^ 1e tranche Concerning 

He defign'd to raife him up in Jef/ts Chrifi, put Free Will to confufion, and manifeft the Greatnefs 
of His. Mercy. Let us now endeavour to difcover the Ways whereby God executes His Eternal 
Purpofe of the San&ification of His Church. 

XXXVII. Though God in the Eftablifhment of the future World" a£ts in Ways very different 
from thofe by which He preferves the prefent •, yet it ought not to be imagin d that difference is 
fo great as to take from the Laws of Grace the Character of the Caufe that made them. As it 
is the fame God, who is" the Author both of the Order of Grace and Nature ; thefe two Orders 
muft agree in all thofe included Symptoms, which difcover the Wifdom and Power of their 
bounder. Therefore fince God is a Genn\il Caufe, whofe Wifdom has no Bounds, He.muft needs, 
for the Reafons before given, act asfoch in the Order of Grace, as well as in that of Nature -, 
and His own Glory being His End, in the Conftru&ion of His Church •, He mult eltablim melt 
Simple and General Laws, and which have the greatelt Proportion of Wifdom, and Fertility 
with their defign'd EffecF. 

XXXVIII. The more wife an Agent is, the more comprehenfive are his Wills. A very limi- 
ted tlnderftanding is conftantly taking frefh Defigns, and in the Execution of any one of them em- 
ploys more Means than areufefuL In a word, aftraitned Capacity does not fufficiently compare 
the' Means with the End •, the Force and the Action, with the Effeft to be produced by them. 

On the contrary, a Mind of great Reach and Penetration collates and weighs all things •, forms 
not Defigns, except upon the Knowledge of the Means to diipatch them •, and when it has ob-. 
ierv'd in rhefe Means a certain Proportion of Wifdom with their Effects, he puts them in pra- 
ctice. The more fimple are the Machines, and more different their Effecls, the more Marks they 
bear of an intelligent Workman, and more worthy they are to be efteem'd. The great Number 
of Laws in a State, are commonly a Proof of the want of Infight and Extent of Thought in 
their Founders ; it being rather the Experience of their Exigency, than a wife Fore-light that 
eiiablifli'd them. God therefore, whofe Wifdom is infinite, ought to employ the fimpleft and 
molt comprehenfive Means in the Formation of a future World, as well as in the Prefervation of 
the prefent. He ought not to multiply His Wills, which are the executive Laws of His Defigns, 
fave when Neceffity obliges Him to it •, but muft a£t by General Wills, and fo fettle a Conitant 
and Regular Order, by which He forefees, through the infinite Comprehenfion of His Wifdom, 
that a Work fo admirable as His muft needs be form'd. Let us fee the Conlequences of this 
Principle, and the Application we may make of it in the Explication of thofe Difficulties which 
ieem very puzzling and perplex'd. 

XXXIX. Holy Writ on one hand teaches us, that God wills all Men fhould be fav'd, and 
come to the Knowledge of the Truth ; and on the other, that He does whatever He wills-, and 
vet Faith is not given to all Men ; and the Number of thofe that periih. is greater than that of the 
Predeitinate. How can this be reconcil'd with His Power ? 

XL. God forefaw from all Eternity Original Sin, and the Infinite Number of thofe whom Sin 
mould call: into Hell \ and neverthelefs created the'Firft Man in a State from whence He knew He 
mult fall h and likewifehas appointed fuch Relations betwixt this Man and his Polterity, as mult 
communicate his Sin, and render them all worthy.. His Averfionand His Anger. How is this to 
be reconcil'd with His Goodnels ? 

God often fheds abroad His Graces, without having the Effe£t for which His Goodnels obliges 
us to believe He gives them. He increafes Piety in Perfons till towards the End of their Days, 
and Sin triumphs over them at Death, and throws them headlong into Hell. He makes the Rain 
of His Grace to fall on hardned Hearts as well as on prepar'd Grounds, which Men refill: and 
render ineffectual. In a word, God continually does and undoes $ and feems to will and nill 
again. How fhall this be reconcil'd with His Wifdom ? 

Lo here great Difficulties. And the whole (economy of Religion ; the Idea we have of a Good, 
Wife, Powerful God, conitant in His Defigns, regular in His Aftion ; and a thoufand places in 
Scripture furnifh us with feveral others, contrary to what we experimentally find every Day in 
the Order of Grace -, and though very Learned Men have anfwer'd them, to me they feem inca- 
pable of a fatisfa£tory and clear Refolution, without the fore-eftabliflf d Principle. 

XLII. For my own part, I always believ'd that God would have all Men faved. Reafon and 
Scripture will not fuffer me to doubt it. And though the Authors whom I honour with a very 
profound Reverence, have in the preceding Ages given out various Explications of this Truth, I 
have ever been uneafie to receive luch", as without any Neceffity' feem'd to me to give Bounds to 
the Extent of God's Goodnefs and Mercy. Therefore confulting the Idea which all Men have 
of God, I enter'd on this Opinion, which I now expofe tO the Cenfure of all thofe who mall be 
willing to examine it attentively, and pals an equitable Judgment on it. 

XL1II. God being oblig'd to a£t always in a manner that becomes Him, by ways Simple, Ge- 
neral, Conitant, and Uniform: In a word, fuitable to the Idea we have of a General Caule, whofe 
Wifdom has no Bounds^ ought to fetue certain Laws in the Order of Grace, as I haveprov'dHe 
has done in the Order of Nature. Which Laws, by Reafon of their Simplicity, muft necelTarily 
have unhappy Confequences in reference to us. But thefe COnfequences are not of fuch Account, 
as fhould caufe God to change thefe Laws for more compounded ; as having a greater Proportion 
of Wifdom, and Fecundity to the Work they produce, than all that could be eftablifh'd for the 
i'lme Defign •, fince he always acts in the wifelt and perfe&eft manner. 'Tis true, God could re- 
drefs thele unhappy Confequences by an infinite Number of particular Wills : But Order will 
not fuller him. The Effect producible by each Will would not countervail the Attion that fhould 

produce 



NATURE and G R A C E. 9 

produce it. And confequently God is not to beblanfd for not difturbing the Order and Simi 
city of his Laws by Miracles, which would be very welcome to our Exigencies, but very repi 
hant to the Wifdom of God, whom it is not lawful to tempt. 

XLIV. Therefore, as 'twould be unreafonable in us to be angry at the Rajtfs falling in I 

where 'tis ufelefs, and efcaping Seeded Grounds where 'tis neceflary -, fince the Law ; « 

munication of Motions are molt Simple, molt Exuberant, and perfectly worthy of their Autl 
Wifdom j and that by thefe Laws it is impoihble the Rain fhould fall rather on the Earth th i 
Sea, fb we ought not to complain of the feeming Irregularity, by which Grace is given to Men. 
Tis the Regularity wherewith God works ; 'tis the Simplicity of the Laws he obferves ; 'tis the 
Wifdom, and Uniformity of his Conduct, which is the Cauie of that feeming Irregularity. 'Tis 
neceflary by the Laws of Grace eftablim' d by God in favour of his Elect, and for the Conlrru- 
cfion of his Church, that Celeftial Rain mould fall as well on hardn'd as prepar'd Hear ts • and 
if it be Ihed in vain, 'tis not becaufe God a&s without Defign 5 much lefs with Defign of making 
Men more culpable by the Abufe of his Favours : But becaufe the Simplicity of General Laws 
permits not that Grace which is loft in a corrupt Heart, to fall upon another where it would have 
been effectual. Since this Grace is not given by a particular Will, but in purfinmcc of the Im- 
mutability of the General Order of Grace h if this Order produces a Work proportioned to the 
Simplicity of its Laws, it fuffices to render it worthy of the Wifdom of its Author. For, in 
f hort, the Order of Grace would be lefs perfect, lefs admirable, and amiable, if it were mo; e 
complex'd. 

XLV. If God gave Grace by particular Wills, doubtlefs he would never go to convert a Sin- 
ner, who had four Degrees of Concupifcence, by giving him three Degrees of Spiritual Election, 
luppofing thefe Degrees infufficient tor his Converfion. He would defer his Liberality till the 
Sinner was abfent from the tempting Object, or rather would beftow the fame Grace of three 
Degrees Strength to him whofe Concupifcence was lefs lively. For ro what Purpofe is it to give 
three Degrees of Spiritual Delectation to one that wants four, and to deny them him whom they 
were fufficient to convert ? Is this fuitable to the Idea we have of the Wifdom and Goodnefs 
of God ? Is this to love Men, to will they fhould be fav'd, and to do for them all he can > 
Neverthelefs, God cries out by his Prophet : Inhabitants of ferujalem, and Men of Judah, if a j a h $, 
judge, 'I pray ye, betwixt me and my Vineyard. What could have been done more to my Vineyard. 3, 4. 
that 1 have not done in it : Wherefore, when I looked that it fhould bring forth grapes', brought it 
forth wild grapes ? What Wifdom is there in giving by particular Wills fo many fruitlefs Graces 
to Sinners, if we fuppofe God wills their Converfion, as we are taught by Scripture, and has no 
fatal Defign of rendring them more culpable and criminal by his Gifts ? 

XLVI. But if Grace be beftow'd on Men by molt Simple and General Laws, all thefe great 
Difficulties vanifh. The fettled Order of Grace having a greater proportion of Wifdom and Fe- 
cundity to the Work which God produces than any other, ought to be cholen for the Eftablh'h- 
ment of Flis Church. Thus we may affirm, That God' truly wills the Salvation of all Men 5 that 
He does for them all that's pofTible, whillt he acts as becomes him ; that if there were any Order 
of Grace as fimple, but more fecund, as worthy of his Wifdom, and more advantageous to Men, 
he would have chofen it •, and that therefore he faves as many as it's pofTible to lave, whilft act- 
ing by the adorable Rules prefcrib'd by his Wifdom. 

XL VII. Let Men therefore love and adore not only the Good Will of God, by which the Elect 
are fanctify'd ; but alfo the fecret Judgments of his Jultice^ by which fo great a Number are re- 
jected. : Tis the fame Order of Wifdom ; they are the fame Laws of Grace which produce thefe 
fo different Effects. God is equally adorable and amiable in all he does ; his Conduct always 
abounds with Wifdom and Goodnefs. Wo to the Wicked, who condemn it without'under- 
itanding it, and who would have the immutable Order of Divine Wifdom to ftoop and accom- 
modate it felf to their PafTions and Interefts! 

XL VIII. The wife and induftrious Husbandmen plow, dung, and fow their Lands with great 
Labour and Coft. They carefully obferve the fittelt Seafons, for the different Agriculture, and 
tax not God with the Succefs of their Labours. They leave their Work to the Order of Nature, 
well knowing it's in vain to tempt God, and to fancy that on our behalf he will change the Or- 
der- which his Wifdom prefcribes. 

XLIX. Jejus Chriji came to teach us to imitate their Conduct, who having for us an immenfe 
Charity, and defiring to fave us, as much as the Simplicity of the General Laws of Nature and 
Grace will permit, has forgotten nothing that might bring us into the ways that lead to Heaven. 
That which moft withftands the Efficacy of Grace, are fenfible Pleafures, and Senfations of Pride ; 
there being nothing which fo much corrupts the Mind, and hardens the Heart, more than thefe. 
But has not J ejus Chr/f facrifked and annihilated in his Perfon all Grandeurs and Pleafures fen- 
fible ? Was not his Life to us a continual Example of Humility and Repentance? How was he born? 
how did he die ? what was his Conversation in the World > every Body knows. To what likewife 
is his Doctrine reducible, and whither tend all his Counfels ? Is it not to Humility and Re • \nc'e % 
to a General Self-denial 'of all that gratifies the Senfes, of all that corrupts the Purity of the 
Imagination, of all that cherifhes and ftrengthens the Concupifcence of Pride ? Therefore-what- 
ever he has laid, whatever he has done, whatever he has fuffer'd, was to prepare us by his Do- . 
chine, his Example, and Merits, to receive the Celeftial Rain of Grace, and to render it ef 
clous.' Since he could not, or ought not to alter the Laws of Nature, tempt God, or. trouble the 
Order ana Simplicity of his Ways ; He has done all for Men that could ii fpire t) h 

: ■.. .' I\. nfive, Induftrious, and Ardent Charity. C L. I . 



IO F. Maleeranche Concerning 

L. I fear not, after what the Scripture has faid of it, to affirm that the Charity of J ejus Cbrifi 
is Immenfeand Incomprehenfible h and though all Men receive not the Effects of it, it would be 
t Cor. 8. prefumptu'ous Rafhnefs to go to fet Bounds to it. He died for all Men,^ even for thole who perifh 
"• everlaftingly/ Why do not Sinners enter into the Order of Grace ? Why do they not follow the 

Counfels of J ejus Cbrifi, and prepare themfelves for the Reception of the Rain of Heaven ? They 
cannot merit it, but they may encreafe its Efficacy on their Account. Cannot they from a Prin- 
ciple of Self-love, through the Fear of Hell ; or if you will, by General Graces, avoid many 
Occafions of finning ? deny themfelves Pleafures, at leaft thofe they have not yet tarred, and con- 
fequently are not enllaved to ? Thus they may take away fome Letts and Impediments to the Effica- 
cy of Grace, at;d prepare the Earth of their Heart, fo as to make it fruitful when God mall pour his 
Rain upon them, by the General Laws he has ■prefcrib'd himlelf. But they would have God to 
lave them, without any trouble on their part •, like thofe lazy and fenfelefs Labourers, who, with- 
out giving their Fields the ordinary Improvements, pretend that God ought to fhower down fo 
impregnating and abundant Rains,_ as may fave them their Trouble. Falie and vain Confidence ! 
God caufes it to rain as well on Fallow as Cultivated Lands. But let the Proud and Voluptuous 
know, that the Rain of Grace fhall fall much lefs.on them than on other Men, whilft yet they put 
themfelves in fuch a Condition as requires much more to convert them. 

LI. Since God ordinarily diffufes his Graces by General Laws, we clearly fee theNeceffity of 
the Counlels of Jefus Cbrifi. We fee that they ought to be followed, that God may lave us by 
the fimpleft ways -, whilft giving us but little Grace, he operates a great deal in us. We fee clearly 
that it lies on us to labour and to cultivate our Field, before the Heats of Concupifcence have dried 
and hardned it ; or at leaft when the Rain has diluted and foftned it -, that we muft diligently 
obferve the moments in which our Pafliqns leave us fome Liberty, that we may feize the Advan- 
tage that is offer'd : That we muft extirpate, as much as pofhble, whatever may fuffocate the 
Seed of the Word ; and not foolifhly imagine we fhall repent, when we have made our Fortune 
in the World, or are ready to leave it. For befides that, it depends not on the Husbandmen to 
make it rain when their Occafions call for it ; when a Field has lain long fallow, the Brambles 
and Thorns ftrike their Roots fo deep, that thofe who are moft us'd to labour, have neither ftrength 
nor denre to cultivate it. 

LIT. But if God a£ted in the Order of Grace by particular Wills, and efficaciouily caus'd in 
all Men all their good Motions, and Operations, with a particular Defign •, I fee not how it- 
might be juftify'd, that he acts by the moft fimple Laws ; when I confider all thofe indirect ways 
by which Men arrive to the Place where God conducts them. For I doubt not but God lome- 
times gives a Man no more than an hundred good Thoughts in a whole Day. Nor can I any 
more conceive how 'tis pollible to reconcile his Wifdom -and Goodnefs, with all the ineffectual 
Graces the Malice of Men refills. For God being Good and Wife, ought he not to proportion 
his Supplies to our Needs, if he afforded them with a particular Defign cf comforting us ? 

LIII. God makes the Weeds to grow with the Corn till the time of Harveft -, he caufes it to 
rain on the Tuft and Unjuft ; becaule Grace falling on Men by General Laws, is often given to 
fuch as make no ufe of it 5 whereas if others had received it, they would have been converted. 
If Jefus Cbrifi had preach'd to the Syrians and Sydonians, as well as to the Inhabitants of Betb- 
falda and Cborazin, they would have repented in Sackcloth and Alhes. If the Rain which 
falls on the Sands had been fhower'd upon prepar'd Fields, it would have made them fruitful. 
But what is regulated by General Laws, is not fuited to particular Defigns -, and it fuffices to ju- 
ftifie the wife Eftablifhment of thefe Laws, that being extremely fimple, they carry to its Perfe- 
ction the Grand Work for which they were enacted. 

But though I do not believe that God has innumerable particular Defigns for every of his Elect, 
or that he daily gives them multiplicity of good Thoughts and Motions by particular Wills 5 yet 
I deny not but they are predeftined by a bounteous Will of God had to them, for which they 
ought to pay their Eternal Gratitude and Acknowledgments. Which things I explain as follows. 

LIV. God dilcoveis in the infinite Treafures of his Wifdom an Infinity of pofiible Works • and 
at once the perfefteft way of producing each of them. Amongft which he confiders his Church : 
Jefm Cbrifi who is the Head of it, and all the Perfons which in confequence of fome General 
Laws eftablifffd, ought to compofe it. In brief, upon Confederation of Jefus Cbrifi and all his 
Members, he conftitutes Laws for his own Glory. Which being fo, is it not evident that Jefus 
Cbrifi, who is the Principle of all the Glory redounding to God from his Work, is the firlt of 
the Predeftinate ? and that all the Elect are likewife truly lov'd, and predeftined gratis in Jefus 
Cbrifi, becaule they may honour God in his Son ? That, laftly, they are all under infinite Oblir 
gations to God, who without regard to their Merit, has fettled the General Laws of Grace, 
which ought to fanctifie them, and conduct them to the Glory they fhall eternally poffefs. 

LV. You'll fay, perhaps, that thefe Laws are fo fimple and exuberant, that God mult prefer 
them to all other •, and that fince he only loves his own Glory, his Son ought to become incar- 
nate ; and fo has done nothing purely for his Elect. I confefs God has done nothing purely for his 
Elect: For St. Paid teaches us, that he has made his Elect for Jefm Cbrifi, and Jefus Cbrifi for 
h'mfelf. If God cannot be rendred amiable to Men, unlefs we make him act purely for them, 
or not in the wifeft manner, I had rather be filent. Reafon teaches me, that we render God ami- 
able by (hewing him to be infinitely perfect, and by reprefenting him io full of Love for his Crea- 
tures, as not to produce any one with Defign of making him milerable. For if all are. not fo 
happy as to enjoy his Prelence, 'tis becaule Order requiring that fo great a Good fhou Id be merited -, 

all 



NATURE and GRACE, i\ 

all do not deferve ir, for the Reafons I have given. Surely this is to make God lovely, to re- 
prefent him. fuch as even the Reprobate cannot choofe but adore his Conduct, and repent them of 
their Negligence. 

LVI. Yet for their Satisfaction, who will have God to predefine every of his Elect by a par- 
ticular Will, it may be faid with a Salvo to the foregoing Hypothecs, That God, before he created 
Souls to unite them to Bodies, Ibrefaw all that could befall them by the General Laws of Nature 
and Grace, and all that they mould do in all poffible Circumftances : Therefore being able to cre- 
ate, as is fuppos'd, the Soul of Paul, or of. Peter, and to unite it to a Body which he forefaw 
fhould be that of a Predeltinate Perfon ; he refolved, from all Eternity, to create the Soul of Paul 
by a Benevolent Will had for him, and to predeftine him by this Choice to Life Eternal -, whereas 
he creates the Soul of Peter, not for any Benevolent Will had to him, but by a kind of Neceitity,. 
by Reafon of the Laws of Union which he has moft wifely eftablifh'd betwixt Souls and Bodies, 
by which he is oblig'd, as foon as Bodies are form'd, to unite Souls to them ; which would have 
been advantageous to all, if Man had not finned. But the Body of Peter being begotten of an 
Heathen Father, or of one that is carelefs of his Children's Education ; or, Laltly, Peter being 
engaged- by the Fortune of his Birth, Places, Times, Employments, which induce him to Evil, 
will infallibly be one of the Reprobate. Yet Peter fhall be ufeful to the Deiigns of God. For 
though he himfelf mall not enter into the Number of the Predeltinate ; yet he mall by fome of 
his Pofterity : Fie fhall be fubfervient to the Beauty and Grandeur of the Church of JefmChrjft, 
by the infinite Relations he fhall have to the Elect. Furthermore, he fhall not be miferable, bin 
in proportion to the wrong ufe he has made of his Liberty, fince God punifhes with Pain only 
voluntary Diforders. This is what may be offer' d for the Satisfaction of fome Perfons Inclina- 
tion ; though I cannot clearly fee how it can be altogether rely'd on. 

LVII. Such as afcribe to God particular .Defigns and Wills, for all the particular Effects pro- 
duced in Confequence of General Laws, commonly employ the Authority of Scripture tojtiiiifie 
their Opinion. But being the Scripture is made for all the World, for the Simple as well as the 
Intelligent, it abounds with Anthropologies. It not only afcribes to God a Body 2 a Throne, a 
Chariot, and Equipage •, Paflions of Joy, Sorrow, Wrath, Repentance, and other Motions of the 
■Soul -, but alfo attributes to him the cuftomary Ways of humane Actings, that it may fpeak to 
the Simple in a more fenfible manner. If JefmChriji became Man, 'twas in part to fatisfie the 
Inclination of Men, who love what is like them, and are ftudious of what affects them. 'Twas 
by this real and true kind of Anthropology to perfuade Men of thofe Truths they were incapable 
to comprehend any other way. Thus St. Paul, to accommodate himfelf to the World, fpeaks 
of the Sanctification and Predeftination of the Saints, as if God continually work'd in them by 
particular Wills ; and even Jefus Chrijl fpeaks of his Father, as if he took care by fuch like 
Wills to adorn the Lilies, and to preferve every Hair of the Ffead of his Difciples : Becaufe, m 
truth, the Goodnefs of God to his Creatures being extreme, thefe Expreflions afford a great Idea 
of it, and recommend God to the Affections of the groffeft Souls, and fuch as are moft infected 
with Self-love. Yet as by the Idea we have of God, and by the Paffages of Scripture conforma- 
ble to that Idea, we correct, the Senfe of other Texts which attribute to God Members and Pat 
lions like ours ; fo when we would fpeak with Exactnefs of the manner of God's acting in the 
Order of Grace, or Nature, we ought to explain thofe Paflages which make him act as a Man, 
or a particular Caufe, by the Idea we have of his Wifdom and Goodnefs, and other Scripture 
Taff tges comporting with that Idea. For, in fine, if we may fay, or rather if we are oblig'd to 
fay, from the Idea we have of God, that he caufes not every drop of Rain to fall by particular 
Wills, though the natural Senfe of fome Scripture Paffages authorifes that Opinion -, there is the 
fame Neceffity to think, notwithftanding fome Authorities of the Scripture, that God gives not 
by particular Wills to fome Sinners all thofe good Motions which are ufelefs to them, and which 
would be ufeful to feveral others : For otherwife I fee not how 'tis poffible to reconcile the Holy 
Scripture either with Reafon, or it felf, as I think I have prov'd. 

If I thought what I have faid mfufficient to convince attentive Perfons, that God acts not by 
particular Wills., like particular Caufes, and finite Underftandings, I would proceed to mew that 
there were very few Truths that would admit of greater Probation •, on Suppofition that God go^ 
veins the World, and that the Nature of the Heathen Philofophers is nothing. For indeed every 
thing in Nature proves this Opinion, except Miracles -, which yet would not be Miracles, or dif- 
ferent from thofe we call Natural Effects, if it were true that God acted by particular Wills, 
fince Miracles are fuch only from their not happening by General Laws. Therefore Miracles fup- 
pofe thefe Laws, and prove the Opinion I have eftablifri'd. But as to ordinary Effects, they clear- 
ly and directly demonftrate General Laws or Wills. If, for Inftance, a Stone be dropp'd upon the 
Head of Paffengers, it will continually fall with equal fpeed, not diftinguifhing the Piety or Qua- 
lity, or Good or 111 Difpofition of thofe that pafs. If we examine any other Effect, we mall fee 
the fame Conflancy in the Action of the Caufe of it : But no Effect proves that God acts by par- 
ticular Wills ■, though Men commonly fancy God isconftantly working Miracles in their Favour. 
That way they would have God to act in, being confonant to their own, and indulgent to Self-- 
love, which centers all things on themfelves ; and very proportionate to their Ignorance of the 
Complication of Occafional Caufes, which produce extraordinary Effects, naturally falls into 
Mens Thoughts, when but greenly ftudied in Nature, and confult not with fufficient Attention 
the abftract fdea of an Infinite Wiidom, of an Univerfal Caufe, of a Being Infinitely Perfect. 

C NV 



i- F. Malebranche Concerning 



CONCERNING 






ISC OU RSE II. ; 

Of the Laws of G R A C E in particulars and of the Occafional Confer, 
which regulate and determine their Efficacy. 



PART I. 

Of the Grace of J E S V S C HK 1ST. 

I. g^\ INCE none but GOD can a£l immediately and by himfelf on Minds, and produce 

IL. in them all the various Motions they are capable of: Tis he alone who fheds his Light 

^k within us, and infpires us with certain Senfations, which determine our diverfe Voli- 

* By True Y^d? tions. And therefore none but he can, as a * True Caufe, produce Grace in our Souls. 

Cau(e, / For Grace, or that which is the Principle or Motive of all the Regular Motions of our Love, is 

tfitw?H nece ff aru y either a Light which inftructs us, or a confus'd Senfation that convinces us, that God 

atj's'fyfrs ' s our Good '■> ^ nce we never ^ e B ln t0 * ove an ^bje8:, unlefs we fee clearly by the Light of Reafon, 

mn Force, or feel confufedly by the tall of Pleafure, that this Objeft is good -, I mean capable of making us 

happier than we are. 

II. But fince all Men are involv'd in Original Sin, and even by their Nature infinitely beneath 
the Majefty of God. 'Tis Jefus Chrift .alone that can by the Dignity of hisPerfon, and theHo- 
linefs of his Sacrifice, have accefs to his Father, reconcile him to us, and merit his Favours for 
us -and confequently be the meritorious Caufe of Grace. Thefe Truths are certain : But we 
are not feeking the Caufe which produces Grace by its own Efficacy -, nor that which merits it by 
its Sacrifice and Good Works. We enquire for that which regulates and determines the Efficacy of 
the General Caufe, and which we may term the Second, Particular, and Occafional. 

III. For to the end the General Caufe may a£t by General Laws, or Wills ; and that his AcFion 
may be regular, conitant, and uniform, 'tis abfolutely necelTary there mould be fome Occafional 
Caufe to determine the Efficacy of thefe Laws, and to help to fix them. If the Collifion of Bo- 

s, or fomething of like Nature, did not determine the Efficacy of the General Laws of the 
Communication of Motions, it would be neceffary for God to move Bodies by particular Wills. 
The Laws of Union of the Soul and Body become efficacious only from the Changes befalling 
one or other of thefe two Subilanc.es. For if God made the Soul feel the Pain of pricking, tho' 
the Body were not prick'd, or though the fame thing did not happen in the Brain, as if it were, 
he would not act by the General Laws of Union of the Soul and Body, but by a particular Will. 
If Rain fell on the Earth otherwife than by a neceffary Confequence of the General Laws of 
Communication of Motions, the Rain, and the Fall of every Drop that compofes it, would be 
the Eft'eci of a particular Will. So that unlefs Order requir'd it mould rain, that Will would 
be abfolutely unworthy of God. 'Tis neceffary therefore that in the Order of Grace there fhould 
be fome Occafional Caufe, which ferves ro fix thefe Laws, and to determine their Efficacy. And 

i : the Caufe we mull endeavour to difcover. 

IV. Provided we confult the Idea of intelligible Order, or confider the fenfible Order, which 
appears in the Works of God, we mall eafily difcover that Occafional Caufes, which determine 
the Efficacy of General Laws, and are of ufe in fixing them, muft necefTarily be related to the 
Defign for which Cod haseftablififd them. 

.Example : Experience evidences, that God has not made, and Reafcn certifies that he 

!;:; not ke the Co'iries of the Planets the Occafional Caufes of the Union of our Soul 

>ueht not to will that our Arm fhould be mov'd in fuch or fuch a manner , or 

hat our Sou) fhould reel the Tooth-ake, when the Moon fhall be in conjunction with tire Sun, if 

njun'cnoq acts not on the Body. God's Defign being to unite our Soul to our Body, 

he" cannot, in profeciking that Defign, give the Soul Senfations of Pain, iave when there happen 

lbme 



NATURE and GRACE. ,3 

fome Changes in the Body repugnant to it. Wherefore we are not to feek out of our Soul or 
Body the Occafional Caufes of their Union. 

t V. Hence it follows, that Goddefigning to form his Church by fefus Chriji, could not accord- 
ing -to that Defign, feek the Occafional Caufes, which ferve to fettle the General Laws of Grace 
(by which the Spirit of Jefus, diftus'd through his Members, communicates Life and Holinefs to 
them) except in Jefm Chriji, and in the Creatures united to him by Keafon. Thus the Rain of 
Grace is not deriv'd to our Hearts, by the diverfe fituations of the Stars, nor by the Collifion of 
certain Bodies, nof even according to the different Courfes of the animal Spirits, which give us 
Motion and Life. All that Bodies can do, is to excite in us Motions and Senfations purely Natu- 
ral. For whatever arrives to the Soul, through the Body, is only for the Body. 

VI. Yet, as Grace is not given to all thatdefire it, nor as foon as they define it, and is granted 
to thofe who do not ask it -, it thence follows, that even our Defires are not the Occafional Cau- 
ies of Grace : For this fort of Caufes have conftantly and raoft readily their Effe£t -, and with- 
out them the Effect is not produc'd. For Inffance, the Collifion of Bodies being the Occafional 
Caufe of the Change which happens in their Motion • if two Bodies did not meet, their Motions 
would not alter ; and if theyalter'd, we may be aflur'd they met. The general Laws which filed 
Grace upon our Hearts, find nothing therefore in our Wills to determine their Efficacy 3 as the ge- 
neral Laws which regulate the Rains are not founded on the Difpofitions of the Places rain'd up- 
on. For it indifferently rains upon all Places, on hollow and manur'd Grounds, even on the Sands, 
and the Sea it felf. 

VII. We are therefore reduc'd to confefs, that as Jefus Chrifi alone can merit Grace for us, fo 
it is he alone that can adminifter Occafions to the General Laws by which it is diftributed to Men. 
For the Principle or Foundation of thefe General Laws, or that which determines their Efficacy, 
being neceffatily either in us, or in Jefus Chriji, fince it is certain that it is not in us, it mull needs 
be found in him. 

VIII. Befides, when Man had finn'd, did it behoove God to have any more regard to his De : 
fires ? Being we are all in a diforder'd State, we can-no longer be an Occafion of God's (hewing 
us Favour. But a Mediatour was needful, not only to give us Accefs towards God, but to be the 
Occafional Caufe of the Favours we hope from him. 

IX. Whereas God had a Defign of making his Son the Head of his Churchy it was requifite he 
mould conftitute him the Occafional or Natural Caufe of the Grace which fan&ifies it. For 'tis 
the Head which communicates Life and Motion to the Limbs ; and with that ProfpeQ; God per- 
mitted Sin. For if Man had continued in Innocence :, as his Will had been meritorious of Grace, 
and even of Glory -, fo the inviolable Laws of Order would have requir'd that God fhould have 
appointed in Man the Occafional Caufe of his Perfe£lion and his Happinefs : In fo much that Je- 
fus Chriji would not have been the Head of the Church -, or, at moft, had been but the Head of 
thofe Influences which all the Members might have eafily difpens'd with. 

X. If our Soul were in our Body before it was form'd, and if by her diverfe Volitions all the 
Parts which compofe it were rang'd and poftur'd ; with how many various Senfations and diffe- 
rent Motions would (he be touch'd, upon confideration of all the Effetts which were to follow 
her Volitions : Efpecially if fhe were extremely defirous of forming the moft vigorous and bsft 
made Body poblhle > 

XI. Now Holy Scripture does not only fay, that Jefm Chriji is the Head of the Church • but 

alfo that he begets it, and fafhions it, and gives it increafe -, that he fuffers, merits, a£ls and in- Epk *• 22* 
fiuences continually in it. The Zeal which Jefus Chriji has for his Father's Glory, and the Love ^ 4- *& 
he bears to his Church, conftantly fuggeft to him the Defire of making it the moft ample, the 2 .°i 9> ' 24 ° 
moft magnificent, and the perfe&eft that can be. Therefore, as the Soul of Jefus has not an in- 1 Cor. 12. 
finite Capacity, and yet would endow his Church with infinite Beauties and Ornaments, we have 27. 
all reafon to believe, that there is in his holy Soul a continual Chain of Thoughts and Defires, ¥}* u 2 4* 
with reference to the myftical Body which he conftantly forms. 

XII. Now they are thefe continual Defires of the Soul of Jefm that tend to fan&ifie his 
Church, and render it worthy of his Father's Majefty, which God has eftablifffd the Occafional 
Caufes of the Efficacy of the general Laws of Grace. For we are taught by Faith, that God 
hath given his Son an abfolute Power over Men, in conftituting him Head of his Church ; which 
yet cannot be conceiv'd, unlefs the feveral Volitions of Jefus Chriji aje foilow'd by their Effe&s. 
For 'tis manifeft I fhould have no Power over my Arm, if it mov'd when I would not have it, 
and remain'd dead and motionlefs when I defir'd to move it. 

XIII. This Sovereign Power Jefus Chriji has merited over Men, as alfo that Quality of Head 
of the Church, by the Sacrifice he offer'd upon Earth, on full PofTeffion of which Right he en- 

tred after his Refurreftion. 'Tis now that he is.High Prieft of future Goods, and that He by his job. 7. 39, 
diverfe Defires prays indefatigably for Men to the Father. And fince his Defires are Occafional Heb. 7. 25. 
Caufes, his Prayers are always heard. His Father denies him nothing, as the Scripture afTures , t^; 8 ; 3 ']' 
us • and yet his Prayers and Defires are neceiTary to obtain : Becaufe Occafional, Phyfical, Natu- 
ral Caufes (for thefe thtee Terms have here the fame Signification) have no Power of themfelves, 
and all the Creatures, even Jefus Chriji, confider'd as Man, are in themfelves but Weaknefs and 

Impotence. „ •- * „,"■■. m , , . , c 

XIV. Therefore the Soul of Jefus, having a Succeflion of various Thoughts, with reference to 
the diverfe Difpofitions whereof Souls in general are capable, has thefe Thoughts attended with 
certain Defires relating to the Sanftification of thefe Souls. Which Defires being Occafional 

D Cauies 



!A F. Malebranche Concerning 

Caufes of Grace, ought to fried it on thofe Perfons in particular, whofe Difpofitions referable 
that which the Soul of Jejus Cbriji actually thinks on -, and this Grace ought to be fo much 
ttronger, and more abundant, as his Defires are more ftrong and lafting. 

XV. When a Perfon confiders any Part of his Body that is not form'd as it ought to be, he na- 
turally has certain Defires relating to it, and to the life he would make of it in a fociable Life -, 
which Defires are profecuted with certain infenfible Motions of the Animal Spirits, and tend to 
the pofturing or proportioning it in a due manner. When the Body is quite form'd, and the Flefh 
is grown folid and confiftent, thefe Motions cannot change the Contexture of the Parts, but only 
give them certain Difpofitions, which we call Corporeal Habits. But when the Body is not com- 
pletely form'd, and the Flefh is extremely foft and tender, thefe Motions which accompany the 
Defires of the Soul, not only give the Body particular Difpofitions, but alfo change its Conftru-- 
ction. Which is fufficiently manifelt in Children unborn : For they are not only mov'd with the 
fame Paffions as their Mothers •, but alfo receive on their Bodies the Marks of thefe Paffions, 
from which their Mothers are always exempt. 
Eph.4. 13. XVI. The Myftical Body x>f Jefus Cbriji is not yet grown into a Perfect Man, nor will be 
till the Accomplifhment of Ages •, but he continually is forming it. For he is the Ffead, which 
gives all the Members their increafe by the Efficacy of his Influence, according to the proporti- 
on convenient for each, to the end it may be form'd and edified by Charity. . Which are Truths 
ibid. 15, & we are taught by St. Paul. Now fince Jefus Cbriji has no other Action than the diverfe Motions 
l6 - of his Will, 'tis neceifary that his Defires mould be follow'd with the Influence of Grace, which 

only can form him in his Members, and give them that Beauty and Proportion which ought to 
be the Eternal Object of Divine Love. 

XVII. The diverfe Motions of the Soul of Jejus, being the Occafional Caufes of Grace, we 
need not wonder if it be fometimes given to the greater!. Sinners, or to Perfons that make no ufe 
of it. For the Soul of Jejus defiring to raife a Temple of a vaft Extent, and of infinite Beauty, 
may wilfi that Grace may be given to the greateft Sinners ; and if in that Moment Jejus Cbriji 
thinks actually on the Covetous, for Inftance, the Covetous mail receive Grace. Or Jejus Cbnji 
wanting, for the Conftruction of his Church, Minds of a certain Character, commonly not at- 
tainable, but by thofe who fuffer certain Persecutions, whereof the Paflions of Men are the natu- 
ral Principle : In a word, Jejus Cbriji needing Minds of particular Difpofitions, for the caufing 
particular Effects, may in general apply to them ; and by that Application infufe into them fan- 
ttifying Grace •• As the Mind of a Projector thinks in general of fquare Stones, when thefe Stones 
are actually neceifary to his Building. 

XVIII. But the Soul of Jejus being not a general Caufe, we have reafon to think it has 
often particular Defires, in regard to particular Perfons. When we intend to fpeak of God, we 
mufr not confult our felves, and make him act like us ; but confider the Idea of a Being infi- 
nitely perfect, and make God act according to that Idea. But in fpeaking of the Action of the 
Soul of Jejus, we may look into our felves, and make him act like particular Caufes. For Exam- 
ple : We have reafon to believe that the Converfion of St. Paul was owing to the Efficacy of a 
particular Defire of Jejus Cbriji. And we are to look upon the Defires of the Soul of Jejus, 
which have a general refpect to Minds of a certain Character, as particular Defires, though they 
comprehend many Perfons, becaufe thefe Defires change daily like thofe of particular Caufes. 
But the general Laws by which God acts, are always the fame, becaufe the Wills of God ought 
to be firm and conftant, by reafon that his Wifdom is infinite. 

XIX. The diverfe Defires of the Soul of Jejus diftributing Grace, we clearly conceive why 
it is not equally difpers'd to all Men, and why beftow'd on fome more abundantly at one time 
than another. For his Soul not thinking on all Men at once, cannot at the fame time have all the 
Defires whereof it is capable : So that he acts not on his Members in a particular manner, ex- 
cept by fucceffive Influences ; as 'the Soul moves not at once all the Mufcles of our Body : For 
the Animal Spirits are unequally and fucceflively diftributed into our Members, according to the 
various Impreffions of Objects, the diverfe Motions of our Paffions, and the feveral Defires we 
freely excite within us. 

XX. True it is, that all the Righteous conftantly receive the Influence of their Head, which 
gives them Life •, and that when they act by the Spirit of Jejus Cbriji, they merit and receive 
new Graces, though it be not neceffary that the Soul of Jejus mould have any particular De- 
fires as the occafional Caufes of them. For Order, which requires that every Defert mould be 
rewarded, is not an arbitrary but a neceffary Law, and independent from any occafional Caufe. 
But though he who performs a meritorious Action maybe rewarded fork, whilit the Soul of Jejm 
has no actual Defires relating to him, yet 'tis certain that he merited not this Grace but by the 

Job. 5.4, 5. Dignity and Sanctity of the Spirit which Cbriji has communicated to him. For Men are not 
well-pleafing to God, nor able to do good, but in as much as they are united to his Son by 
Charity. 

XXI. It muft be farther acknowledg'd, that thofe who obferve the Counfels of Jejus Cbriji 
out of an Efteem they have for them, and through the Fear of future Punifhment, follicite, as 
I may fay, by their Obedience, the Charity of Cbriji to think on them, though they act from a 
Principle of Self-love. But their Actions are not the Occafional Caufes either of Grace, fince it 
does not infallibly follow them $ or even of the Motions of the Soul of Jejus in their Favour, 
fince thefe Motions never fail to communicate it. Thus only the Defires of Jejus Cbrift, as 

Occalional 



NATURE W GRACE. 15 

Occafional Caufes, have infallibly their Effect; becaufe God having conftituted him Head of the 
Church, ought by him only to communicate his fanQifying Grace to his Elect. 

XXII. Now we may confider in the Soul of Jefus Chrift Defires of two forts ; viz. Actual 
Tranfitory and Particular, that have but a fhort-liv ? d Efficacy ; and Stable and Permanent, which 
confift in a fetled and. conftant Difpofition of the Soul of Jefus Chrift, with relation to certain 
Effects which tend to the Execution of his Defign in general. 

If our Soul by its various Motions communicated to our Body all that was necetTary to its 
Formation and Growth, we might dift inguiih in her two kinds of Defire. For it would be by the 
actual and tranfitory Defires, that me would drive into the Mufcles of the Body the Spirits which 
gave it a certain Difpofition with reference to prefent Objefts, or to the actual Thoughts of the 
Mind. But it would be by ftable and permanent Defires, that fhe would give to the Heart and 
Lungs the natural Motions by which Refpiration and the Circulation of the Blood were per- 
form^. By thele Defires me would digeft the Aliments* and diftribute them to all the Parts 
mat needed them, in as much as that ibrt of Action is at all times neceffary to the Prelervation 
of the Body. 

XXIII. By the actual tranfitory and particular Defires of the Soul of Jefus, Grace is deriv'd 
to unprepar'd Perfons in a manner fomewhat lingular and exrraordinary. But 'tis by his per- 
manent Defires that it is given regularly to thofe who receive the Sacraments with the necelfaiy 
Difpofitions. For the Grace we receive by the Sacraments is not given us precilely becaufe of 
the Merit of our Action, though we receive them in Grace * but becaufe of the Merits of Je- 
fus Chrift, which are freely applied to us in confequence of his permanent Defires. We receive 
in the Sacraments much more Grace than our Preparation deferves •, and it fuffices to our receiving 
fome Influence from them, that we do not oppofe and refill it. But 'tis abufing what is molt Sa- 
cred in Religion to receive them unworthily. 

XXIV. Amongft the actual and tranfitory Defires of the Soul of Jefus, there are certainly fome 
more durable and frequent than others ; and the Knowledge of thele Defires is of greater!: Con- 
fequence in Point of Morality. Doubtlefs he thinks oftner on thofe who obferve his Counfels, 
than on other Men. His Motions of Charity for Believers, are more frequent and lafting than . 
thofe for Libertines and Atheifts. And as all Believers are not equally prepar'd to enter into the ■ 
Church of the Predeitinate, the Defires of the Soul of Jefus are not equally lively, frequent, and 
durable, on the account of them all. 

Man more earnefrly defires the Fruits that are fitteft for the Nourifhment of his Body -, he 
thinks oftner on Bread and Wine than on Meats of difficult Digeftion. <So Jefus Chrift design- 
ing the Formation of his Church, ought to be more taken up with thofe who. can moft eafily en- 
ter, than on others which are extremely remote. 

The Scripture likewife teaches us, truic the Humble, the Poor, the Penitent, receive greater 
Graces than other Men ; becaufe the Deipifers of Honours, Riches, and Pleafures, are the fittelt 
for the Kingdom of Heaven. 

Thofe, for Example, who have learn'd of Jefus Chrift to be meek and humble in Heart, fhall 
find Reft to their Souls. The Yoke of Chrift, which is infupportable to the Proud, will become 
eafie and light by the Affiftances of Grace, for God hears the Prayers of the Humble, he will 
comfort them, jurthe them, and lave them -, he will fill them with Bleffings, and will debafethe 
high Mind of the Proud. Bleffed are the Poor in Spirit, for theirs is the Kingdom of Heaven ; but 
woe to the Rich, for chey have their Confolation in this World. How hard is it, fays our Saviour, 
for thofe that have much Wealth to enter into the Kingdom of Heaven ? 5 Tis harder for a Camel 
to pafs through the Eye of a Needle ; which cannot be done without a Miracle. 

As for thole, who, like David, humble their Souls with Falling, change their Garments for 
Sack-cloth -5 in a word, afflict themfelves upon fight of their Sins, and the Holinefs of God ; they 
are the worthy Objects of the Companion of Jefus. For God> defpifes not a broken and contrite 
Heart. We conftantly difarm the Anger of God, when we take his Part againft our felves, and 
revenge his Quarrel. 

The Will of Jefus Chrift being entirely conformable to Order, whereof all Men have natu- 
rally fome Idea, we rrrghr ftill dilcover by Reafon, that he has more Thoughts and Defires in re- 
gard to fome Perfons than others. For Order requires that more Graces mould be fhed on thofe, 
for Example, who are call'd to Holy Orders, than on others whofe Employment neceiTarily enr 
gages them in Worldly Commerce •, in a word, On thofe who conftitute the Principal Parts of 
the Church Militant, than on fuch as have no regard to any body, or that meddle in the Eccle- 
iiaftical State, or raife themfelves above others out of Ambition or Intereft. For though it be 
requifite that Jefus Chrift mould give them Graces in relation to their Charge, they merit not 
the Gift of that Grace which may fanctifie them in the Station they have chofen out of Self-love. 
They may have the Gift of Prophecy, whilft they may want Charity, as we are taught by Scrip- 2 Cor. 13.2: 
ture. 

XXVI. But though we may difcover by the Light of Reafon, and the Authority of Holy Writ, 
fomething of the diverfe Wills of the Soul of Jef/s, yet that Order and Procefs of Defires, 
which accompliffi the Predeftination of the Saints, and which tend only to the honouring God in 
the Eftablifhment of his Church., is an unfathomable Abyfs to the Mind of Man. For if St. Paul 
had not taught us, that God would that all Men fliould be included in Unbelief, that he might 
exercife his Mercy towards them-, fhould we ever have thought that the Jews were to fall into a 
wilful Blindneis, not only that the multitude of the Nations might enter into the Church, but 
. ■ . - that 



■ \6 i\ Malebranche Concerning 

that they themfelves might receive Mercy at the Accomplifhment of Ages ? The future World be- 
ing, to be a Work of pure Mercy, and to have infinite Ornaments, whereof we have no Idea;; 
fince the Subftarice of Spirits is unknown to us, it is plain we can difcover very little in the diffe- 
rent Defires of the Soul of jefm \ thefe Defires being related to Defigns we are ignorant of. Thus 
in the Diftribution God makes of his Graces, we ought to cry out with St. Paul, the depth of 
the Riches both of the Wifdom and Knowledge of God ! How unfearchable are his Judgments, and 
his Ways paft finding out ! 

XXV IL We have prov'd that the diverfe Defigns of the Soul of Jefm are the Occafional Cau- 
fes of Grace •, and we have endeavour'd to difcover fomething of thefe Defires. Let us now fee 
of what fort of Grace they are the Occafional Caufes. For though Jefm Chrift be the meritori- 
ous Caufe of all Graces, it is not necefTary he fhould be the Occafional Caufe of the Graces of 
Light, and of certain external Graces, which are Preparatory to the Converfion of the Heart, and 
which do not opperate. For Jefm Chrift is always the Occafional, orNeceflary Caufe, according 
to the Eftablifh'd Order of God, in point of all thofe Graces which opperate Salvation. 

XXVIII. In order to our diftinct underftanding what this Grace is which Jefm Chrift, as Head 
of the Church, diffufes in his Members, we ought to know what is that Concupifcence which 
the Firft Man has communicated to all his Pofterity. For the Second Adam came to remedy the 
Diforders which the YitRAdam was the Caufe of And there is fuch an Affinity between the Sin- 
Rom. 5. 14. ful and Earthly, and the Innocent and Heavenly Adam, that St. Paul looks upon the former com- 
17, 18, 19. municating Sin to his Children by his Difobedience, as the Type and Figure of the latter infufing 
1 Cor. 1 5. j u f^ ce an £ Holinefs into Christians by his Obedience. 

XXIX. Order requires that the Mind mould have the Supremacy over the Body, ,and not be di- 
vided againft its Will by all thofe Senfations and Motions which apply it to fenfible Objects. 
Therefore the Firft Man, before his Sin, was fo abfolute over his Strifes and Paflions, that they 
Were mute andfilentas foon as he defir'dit-, nothing could give him an involuntary Diverfion 
from his Duty •, and all the Pleafures, which at prefent precede Reafon, did only refpectfuily 
caurion him, in a ready and eafie manner, of what ought to be done for the Prefervation of his 
Life. But after his Sin, he loft on a fudden that Power over his Body. So that not being able to 

• flop the Motions, nor obliterate the Traces which fenfible Objects produced in the principal 
Part of his Brain •, his Soul, by the Order of Nature, and in'Punifhment of his Difobedience, 
found her felf miferably enflav'd to the Law of Concupifcence -, to that Carnal Law which con- 
ftantly wars againft the Mind, infpiring it with the Love of fenfible Goods - ? and fo ruling it by 
ftrong and lively, and at once foft and agreeable Paflions, that it cannot, and indeed will not, make 
the necefTary Struggles for its breaking the captivating Bonds. For the Contagion of Sin is fpread 
through the Children oiAdam by an unavoidable Confequence of the Order of Nature, as I have 
explain'd in another place. 

XXX. The Heart of Man is the conftant Slave of Pleafurey and when Reafon teaches us, that 
'tis not convenient to enjoy it, we put it off but withDefign of finding it more delicate and folid. 
We willingly facrifice little Pleafures to the greater '; but the invincible Impreflion we are under 
for Happinefs, Will not permit us to deny our felves all our Life the Satisfaction we enjoy, when 
we give our felves up to follow our Paflions. 

XXXI. 5 Tis certain that Pleafure makes happy the PofTefTou^at leaft whilfthe enjoys it. There- 
fore Men being made to be Happy, Pleafure always gives the Will the firft fhock, and puts it 
conftantly in Motion towards the Good that caufes or feems to caufe it. The contrary is to be 
faid of Pain. Now Concupifcence confifting only in a continual train of Senfations and Motions 
antecedent to Reafon, and not fubjeet to it ; of Pleafures which feeming to flow from furrounding 
Objects, inlpire into us the Love of them ■{ and of Pains, which rendring the Exercife of Vertue 
rough and painful, make us hate it : The Second Adam, to remedy the Diforders of the Firft, 
ought to produce in us contrary Pleafures and Averlions to thole of Concupifcence : Pleafures for 
the True, and Averlions or Diilikes for fenfible Goods. Thus the Grace, whereof Jefm Chrift 
is the Occafional Caufe, and which he inceffantly fheds on us as Head of the Church, is not a 
<irace of Light, though he has merited that Grace likewife for us ; and lbmetimes may commu- 

^ nicate it, as I fhall fay by and by : But 'tis a Grace of Senfation, 'tis the preventing Deleft ation, 
which begets and nurles Charity in our Hearts. For Pleafure naturally produces and cherifhes the 
Love of thofe Objects which caufe or feem to caufe it. : Tis likewife the Difguft which lbme- 
times fenfible Objects give us, which create an Averfion to them, and capacitate us to guide the 
Motions of our Love by Light or Knowledge. 

XXXII. We muft oppofe the Grace of Senfation to Concupifcence, Pleafure to Pleafure, Diflike 
to Diflike, that the Influence of Jefus Chrift may be direct ly oppofite to the Influence of the Firft 
Man. The Remedy muft be contrary to the Difeafe, that it may cure it. For illuminating Grace 
cannot heat an Heart that is wounded by Pleafure •, this Pleafure muft ceafe, or another fucceed it. 
Pleafure is the Weight of the Soul, and naturally bears it along with it, and fenfible Pleafures 
weigh it down to Earth. In order to her determining her felf, thefe Pleafures muftvanifh, or de- 
lectable Grace muft raife her up towards Heaven, and inflate her well-nigh in Equilibrio. Thus it 
is the New Man may war againft the Old; the Influence of our Head may refill that of our Pro- 
genitor, and Jefus Chrift may conquer in us all our Domeftick Enemies. 

The Firlt Man being free from Concupifcence before his Sin, needed not to be invited to the 
Love of the True Good, by preventing Delectation. He knew clearly that God was his Good ; 
and there was noNeccflity he mould have xIiq Senfe of it.Twas not fit he fhould beallui'd by Plea- 
fure 



27' 



NATURE and GRACE. i<& 

fure to the Love of him, fince nothing withftood this Love, and he knew him perfectly deferving I 
it. But after the Sin, the Grace of Delectation was neceffary to counterpoize the continual Strug- 
gle of Concupifcence, Therefore Light is the Grace of the Creator, Delegation is that of the 
Reftorer. Light is communicated by Jefus Chrijl as Eternal Wifdom h Delectation is given by 
him, as Wifdom Incarnate. Light, in its Original, was mere Nature. Delectation has ever been 
Pure Grace. Light, after the Sin, was granted us only for the Merits of Jefus Chrijl. Delecta- 
tion is granted both for the Merits, and by. the Efficacy of the fame Jefus. Laftly, Light isfhed 
into our Souls, according to our own feveral Volitions and various Applications, as I fhall explain 
by and by : But the Delectation of Grace is infus'd into our Hearts, according to the diverfe De- 
fires of the Soul of Jefus Chrijl. 

XXXIII. 'Tis true, Pleafure produces Light, becaufe the Soul is more attentive to Objects that 
give her Pleafure. Since molt Men defpile or neglect the Truths of Religion h becaule abftract 
or unaffecting, it may be faid that the Delectation of Grace inltructs them : For thar rendring thefe 
Truths more lenfible, they more eafily learn them by the Attention they afford. And for this Rea- 

fon St. John fays, That the Unction we receive from Jefus Chrijl teaches all things ; and that , Tohn a 
thofe who have received it, have need of no Inftructor. 

XXXIV. Yet it muft be obferv'd, That this Unction does not ptoduce Light immediately, and 
by itsfelf 5 it only excites our Attention, which is the Natural or Occafional Caufe of our Know- 
ledge. So we fee that Men of the greatelt Charity are not always the moft Underftanding. All 
Men being not equally capable of Attention, all the Receivers of the fame Unction are not equal- 
ly inftructed by it. Therefore, though Light may be fried on the Soul by a fupernatufal Infuiion, 
and Charity often produces it -, yet we are always to look upon this kind of Grace but as a Natu- 
ral Effect : For ordinarily Charity produces not Light in the Mind, fave in proportion to the In- 
ducement it gives the Soul to defire the Knowledge of what fhe loves.- For, in fine, the diverfe 
Defires of the Soul are the Natural or Occafional Caufes of the Difcoveries we make on any Sub- 
ject whatfoever. But thefe things we muft explain more at large in the Second Part of this Difcourfe. 



PART II. 

Of the Grace o/^CREAfO R. 

XXXV. T Know but two Principles that directly and of themfelves determine the Motion of out. 
JL Love : Light and Pleafure* Light, to difcover our feveral Goods •, and Pleafure, to 
make us tail: them. But there is a great difference betwixt Light and Pleafure -, the former leaves 
us abfolutely to our felves, and makes no Intrenchment on our Liberty. It does not efficacioufly 
carry us to Love, nor produce in us Natural or NecefTary Love •, but only induces us to carry our 
felves to the loving, with a Love of choice, the Obje&s it difcovers ^ or, which is the fame 
thing, only caufes us to determine to particular Goods the general Impreflion of Love, God con- 
stantly gives us for the General. But Pleafure effectually determines our Will, and as it were 
conveys us to the Object wiiich caufes or feems to caufe it. It produces in us a Natural and Ne- 
cefTary Love ; weakens our Liberty, divides our Reafon, and leaves us not perfectly to our own 
Conduct. An indifferent Attention to the Senfe we have of our internal Motions, will convince 
us of thefe Differences. 

Thus Man, before the Sin, being perfectly free, and having no Concupifcence to hinder him from 
profecuting his Light in the Motions of his Love, and knowing clearly that God was infinitely 
amiable, ought not to be determin'd by preventing Delight, as I have already faid, or by any 
other Graces of Senfation, which might have leffen d his Merit, and induc'd him to love by In- 
ftinct the Good which fhould only be lov'd by Reafon. But after he had finned, he, befides the 
Grace of Light, had need of that of Senfation to refiftthe Motions of Concupifcence. For Man, 
having an invincible Defire for Happinefs, cannot poffibly facrifice his Pleafure to his Light •, his 
Pleafure which makes him actually Happy ,and fubfifts in him infpight of his Refiftance to his Light, 
which fubfifts but by a painful Application of Thought, and dies at theprefence of the leaft actual 
Pleafure •, and laftly, which promifesno folid Happinefs, till after Death, which to the Imagina- 
tion feems a perfect Annihilation. 

Light therefore is due to Man, to conduct him in the queft of Happinefs, and belongs to Natu- 
ral Order, and fuppofes neither Corruption nor Reparation in Nature. But Pleafure, which relates 
ro the true Good, is pure Grace. For naturally the true Good ought not to be belov'd otherwife 
than by Reafon. Therefore the Occafional Caufes of the Graces of Senfation, ought to be found 
in Jefus Cbrift^ becaufe he is the Author of this Grace. But the Occafional Caufes of Light 
ought to be ordinarily found in the Order of Nature, becaufe Light is the Grace of the Creator. 

XXXVI. In the eftablifh'd Order of Nature I can fee but two Occafional Caufes which (hed 
Light on Minds, and fo determine the General Laws of the Grace of the Creator h one which is 
in us, and depends in fome meafure on us - ? the other which is found in the Relation we have 
with'furrounding Objects. The former is nothing but the diverfe Motions of our Will •, the fe- 
cond is the Occurrence of fenfible Objects which act on our Mind, in confequence of the Laws 
of Union of our Soul with our Body. 

E XXX.V1L 



* ^i 8 F. Malebranche Concerning 

XXXVII. We are taught by our own inward Confcioufnefs, That the Love of Light produces 
it •, and that Attention of Mind is a Natural Prayer, by which we obtain Inftruc~tion of God -, 
for all the Enquirers of Truth, who apply themfelves to Truth, difcover it in proportion to their 
Application. And if our Prayer were not interrupted, nor our Attention difturb'd, if we had any 
Idea of what we ask, and fhould ask it with a competent Perfeverance, we mould not fail to ob- 
tain, whilft we were capable of receiving it. But our Prayers are continually interrupted, unlefs 
Selfinterefs'd ; our Senfes and Imagination muddy, and confound all our Ideas. And though the 
Truth we confult anfwers our Enquiries, the confus'd Noife of our Paffions deafens us to its An- 
fwers, or makes us fpeedily forget them. 

XXXVIII. If it be confider'd, that Man, before the Fall, was animated with Charity, and pof- 
fefs'd with all that was requifite to his Perfeverance in Innocence •, and that by his Perfeverance and 
Application, he ought to merit his Reward, 'twill eafily be conceived that' the feveral Defires of 
his Will were eftablifh'd the Occafional Caufes of the Light receiv'd in hisllnderftanding ; other- 
wife his Diftra&ion had not been voluntary, nor his Attention meritorious. But Nature, how- 
ever corrupted, is not deftroy'd : God has not defifled to will what he once wilFd. And the fame 
Laws ftill fubfift. Therefore our manifold Volitions are ftill the Occafional or Natural Caufes of 
the Prefence of Ideas to our Mind. But becaufe the Union of the Soul with the Body is chang'd 
into a Dependence on it by a Natural Confequence of Sin, and the immutable Will of God, as 
I have explain'd elfewhere^ our Body at prefent difturbs our Ideas, and fpeaks fo loud in favour 
of its refpe&ive Goods, that the Mind but feldom confults, and diftractedly liltens to Internal Truth. 

XXXIX. Moreover, Experience daily teaches us that our Converfation with Underftanding 
Perfons, is capable of inftru£ting us by railing our Attention ; that Preaching, Reading, Converfe, 
a thoufand Occurrences of all .forts, may raile fome Ideas in us, and likewife infpire us with 
good Thoughts. The Death of a Friend is, • doubtlefs, capable of putting us in Mind of Death ^ 
unlefs fome great Paffion takes us up. And when a Preacher of great Natural Endowments un- 
dertakes to demonftrate a moft fimple Truth, and convince others of it :, it muft be own'd that 
he may perfuade his Hearers, and even move their Confcience, give them Fear and Hope, and 
-raile in them fuch other Paffions as put them in a lefs State of Oppofition to, the Influence of the 
Grace of J ejus Cbrift. 

Men being made for a fociable Life, 'twas requifite they mould mutually communicate their 
Thoughts and Motions. 'Twas fit they mould be united in Mind as well as Body ; and that 

Seaking by the Voice tp their Ears, and by Writing to their Eyes, they fhould infufe Light and 
nderftanding into one anothers Minds. 

XL. But Light, whatever way produc'd in us, whether by particular Defires, or fortuitous In* 
fiances, as the Occafional Caufes of it, may be call'd Grace ; efpecially when it nearly relates to 
Salvation 3 though it be but a Confequence of the Order of Nature ; becaufe fince Sin, God owes 
us nothing, and all the Good we have is merited for us by J ejus Cbrift, in whom our very Being 
fubfifts. But this kind of Grace, though merited for us by J ejus Cbrift, is not the Grace of our 
Lord, but that of the Creator ; Rncefcfvs Cbrift is not ufually the Occafional Caufe of it, but the 
Caufe of it is difcoverable in die Order of Nature. 

XXL There are ftill feveral other Natural Effe&s which we might reafbnably look upon as 
Graces. For Example : Two Perfons have at the fame time two Defires of Curiofity. The one 
to go fee an Opera, the other to hear a celebrated Preacher. If they fatisfie their Curiofity, he 
that goes to the Opera fhall find fuch Objects, as, according to his prefent Difpofition of Mind, 
(hall raife in him Paffions that will damn him ; whilft the other fhall find in the Preacher fo great 
Force and Light, that the Grace of Converfion working in him at that moment, fhall be able to 
fave him. Which fuppos'd, Let but a (hower of Rain, or any other Accident happen, that may 
ftay them at home. Though the Rain be a Natural Effeft, as depending on the Natural Laws of 
the Communication of Motions ; yet it may be faid to be a Grace, in refpett of him whole 
Damnation it prevents, and a Punifhment to him whofe Converfion it hinders. 

XLIJ. Grace being conjoin'd to Nature, all the Motions of our Soul and Body have fome re- 
lation to Salvation. This Man is fav'd, by having in a State of Grace made a falfe Step, which 
happily broke his Neck -, and another is damn'd, by having on fome Occafion misfortunately 
avoided the Ruines of a falling Houfe. We know not what is for our Advantage, but we -'well 
know there is nothing of it felf fo indifferent but lias fome reference to our Salvation, becaufe 
of the Mixture and Combination of Effe&s depending on the General Laws of Nature, with 
others that depend on the General Laws of Grace. 

XLIII. As therefore Light points out to us the True Good, the Means to obtain it, our Duties 
to God ■, in a word, the Ways we are to follow ; it is fufficient to caufe thofe who are animated 
with Charity, to dq good, to merit new Graces, and to conquer fome Temptations, as I fhall ex- 
plain in another Place •, fo I think we may lawfully give it the Name of Grace, though Jefits 
Cbrift be only the Meritorious Caufe of it. And whereas External Graces, which have no imme- 
diate Influence on the Mind, come nevertheless into the Order of Predeftination of Saints, I con- 
fider them alfo as True Graces. In a word, I fee not why we may not give the Name of Grace 
to all Natural Effefts, when relating to Salvation, fubfervient to the Grace of Jefus Cbrift, and 
delivering us from fome Hindrances to his Efficacy. Yet if others will not agree with me, I fhall 
not contend with them about Words. 

XLIV. All thefe Graces, if we may be allow'd to call them fo, being thofe of the Creator, the 
* General Laws of thefe Graces are the General Laws of Nature. For we muft ftill obferve, that Sin 

has 



1 N A T U R E and G R A C E. l9 

has not deftroy'd Nature, though it has corrupted it. The General Laws of the Communications 
of Motions are always the lame r 5 and thofe of the Union of the Soul and Body are chane'd no 
otherwise than that the Union of the former is grown into a Dependence, for the Realbnsf have 
given elfewhere. For at prefent we depend on that Body, to which, before Sin, we were onlv 
united. ' ' 

X . L Y* ^? W i the ^ a J^°, f Nature are alwa y s moft Sim P le and General s For God afts not bv 
E ar £™ Wl i ls > ™ lefs 0rder quires a Miracle. Which Truth I have f iifficiently prov'd in the 
Firlt Difcourie. Thus when a Stone falls on the Head of a good Man, and rids him of his Life 
it tails in confequence of the Laws of Motions ; and not becaufe that Man is Juft, and God de- 
figns to recornpenfe him. When a like Accident deftroys a Sinner, 'tis not becaufe God will 
actually punilh him : For God, on the contrary, would have all Men fav'd. But he is not to change 
the Simplicity of his Laws, to fufpend the Punifhment of a Criminal. So likewife when Light 
breaks into our Undemanding, 'tis becaufe our Defires are the Natural or Occafional Caufes of 
it •, 'tis becaufe we hear fome underftanding Perfon, and becaute our Brain is difpos'd to receive 
the Impreffions of the Speaker : And not that God has a particular Will on our behalf, but that 
he follows the General Laws of Nature, to which he has oblig'd himfelf. I can fee nothing My- 
fterious in the Diftribution of thefe kinds of Graces, and I Hand not to draw Conlequences dedu- 
cible from thefe Truths. 

XLVI. 5 Tis to be obfenrd, that Jefus Chrift, who is the fole Meritorious Caufe of the Goods 
we receive from God, by the Order of Nature, is fometimes the Occafional Caufe of the Grace 
of Light as well as of that of Senfation ; yet I am of Opinion, that this but rarely happens ; 
becaufe indeed it is not neceffary it ffiould. Jefus Chrift, as much as poflible, makes the Order 
of Nature fubfervient to that of Grace. For befides that, Reafon evinces that Order will have 
it fo ; becaufe that Method is moft fimple, it is fufficiently manifeft by the Conduct he takes on 
Earth, and the Order he has eftablifh'd, and ftill preferves in his Church. Jefus Chrift made 
ufe of Speech for the Inftru&ion of the World, and likewife fent his Difciples, two by two, to Luk. jo." 
prepare the People to receive him. He has fettled Apoftles, Prophets, Evangelifts, Dollars, Bijhops, E P h - »** 
and Priefts, to labour in the Edification of the Church. Is not this to make Nature Handmaid l2 ' 
to Grace ; and to propagate the Light of Faith in Mens Minds by ways moft Simple and Natu- 
ral ; And indeed Jefus Chrift on Earth was not to inftrucl Men by particular Wills, fince he 
might inftru£t them as Interiour Truth and Eternal Wifdom, by the moft fimple and exuberant 
Laws of Nature. 

XLVII. That which lies moft hidden and unreveal'd in the Order God has follow'd for theEfta- 
blifhment of his Church, is, doubtlefs, the Time, Place, and other Circumftances of the Incarna- 
tion of his Son, and the Preaching of the Gofpel. For why mould Jefus Chrift, for whom the 
World was created, become Man Four thoufand Years after its Creation > Why muft he be 
born among the Jews, he that was to reject that wretched Nation ? Why muft he choofe to be 
the Son of David, when the Family of David was obfcur'd ; and not rather to be born from Em- 
perours, who have commanded the whole World, fince he came to Convert and Enlighten all the. 
Earth ? Why to ele£l his Apoftles and Difciples out of the Ignorant and Illeterate, to preach to 
the Inhabitants of Bethfaida and Corazin, who remain in Incredulity ; and to leave Tyre and Si- 
don, who would have been converted by the like Grace afforded them ; to hinder St. Paul from 
preaching the Word of God in Afia, and to appoint him to pals into Macedonia ? A thoufand 
other Circumftances, which have accompanied the Preaching of the Gofpel, are, no doubt, fuch 
Myfteries as admit not clear and evident Reafons ; nor Is it my Defign to give them. My Pur- 
pofe is only to eftablifh fome Principles that may afford fome Light to thefe and the like Diffi- 
culties •, or at leaft, give us to underftand that nothing can be thence concluded againft what I 
have faid of the Order of Nature and Grace. 

XLVIII. 'Tis certain that Natural Effects are complicated and mix'd a thoufand ways with the 
Effe&s of Grace ; and that the Order of Nature ftrengthens or weakens the Efficacy or Effe&s of 
the Orders of Grace, according as thefe two Orders varioufly combine together. Death, which 
by the General Laws of Nature, at a particular Juncture befals a good or ill Prince, or Bifhop, 
occafions a great deal of Good or Evil in the Church; becaufe fuch kind of Accidents caufe a great . 
Diverfity in the Sequel of Effecfs, which depend on the Order of Grace. But God would have 
all Men fav'd by the fimpleft ways. Therefore we may and ought to fay in general, That He 
has chofen the Time, the Place and Manners, which in the procefs of Time, and by the General 
Laws of Nature and Grace, muft, all things confider'd, introduce a greater Number of the Pre- 
deftinate into the Church. God does all things for his Glory : Therefore, among all the poflible 
Combination of Nature and Grace, he has from the infinite Extent of his Knowledge made 
choice of that which could form the perfefteft Church, and moft fuitable to his Majefty and Wifdom. 
XLIX. This, one would think, were fufficient to anfwer all the Difficulties that can arife about 
the Circumftances of our Myfteries : For if it be fajd, i\\2Xjefm Chrift ought to be born to a Roman 
Emperour, and to perform his Miracles in the Metropolis of the World, that the Gofpel might 
fpread it felf with greater Eafe into the remoteft Countries : It may be boldly anfwer'd, That 
though this feems fo to Men, yet that Combination of Nature and Grace had not been fo wor- 
thy of rhe Wifdom of God as that which he has chofen. I conihik Religion had been propagated 
with greater eafe ; but its Eftablifhment had not been fo Divine and Extraordinary, nor confer 
quently an invincible Proof of its Reality and Truth. So hat, according to that Combination, 
Religion would at this Day have been deftroy'd., at leaft' lefs diffeminated abroad in. the World. 

Befides, 



20 F. Malebranche Concerning 

Befides, when we fay that God a£ts by the fimpleft ways, we ever fuppofe an Equality in the reft, 
and efpecially in the Glory that ought to redound to God from his Work. But the Church had not 
been fo perfect, nor fo worthy of the Greatnels and Holinefs of God, if it had been form'd with 
To much eafe. For the Beauty of the Heavenly Jerufalem confiding in the Variety of Rewards 
accruing upon the feveral Combats of Chriftians , 'twas requifite the Martyrs fhould lay 
down their Lives as well as Jefm Chrift, to enter into the Poffeflion of their prefent Glory. In 
a word, this Principle^ That of all the infinite Combinations of Nature and Grace, God has 
chofen that which ought to produce an Effe£t moft worthy of his Greatnefs and Wifdom, fuffi- 
ces for a General Anfwer to all the Difficulties that can be ftarted about the Circumftances of our 
Myfteries •, like as, ' to vindicate the Orders of Nature and Grace in themfelves, we need but 
know, That God, being infinitely wife, frames no Defign but upon the admirable Proportion of 
Wifdom and Fecundity, difcover'd in the ways capable to bring it to pafs, as I have explain'd itj 
the Firft Difcourfe. 

L. Molt Men judging of God by meafure of themfelves, imagines that he firft forms a Defign, 
and afterwards confults his Wifdom about Ways to execute it. For our Volitions generally pre- 
vent our Reafon, and our Defigns are hardly ever perfectly Rational. But God's Ways are not 
like thofe of Men, who a£ts in the following manner, if I have well confulted the Idea of a 
Being infinitely perfect. God, by the infinite Light of his Wifdom, knows all poflible Works, 
and at once all the refpe&ive Ways of producing them, He fees all the Proportions between 
Means and their End. He- compares all things by one Eternal, Immutable and Neceffary View - y 
and by the Comparifon he makes of the Proportions of Wifdom and Fecundity, which he difco- 
vers between the Defigns and Ways of executing them, he freely forms a Defign. Bur the De- 
fign being form'd, he necejjarity choofes the general Ways moft worthy of his Wifdom, Great- 
nels and Goodnefs. For fince he forms no Defign, but through the Knowledge of the Means of 
executing it, the Choice of the Defign includes the Choice of Means. 

LI. When I fay, That God forms his Defign freely, I would not be thought to mean that he 
may make choice of another lefs worthy, and reject that which is more worthy of his Wifdom. 
For fuppofing that God wills the Production of an external Work worthy of him, he is not indif- 
ferent in the Choice, but muft produce the perfe&eft poflible, with reference to the Simplicity of 
the Ways he atts by. This God owes to himfelf, from following the Rules of his Wifdom, and 
he muft always aft in the wifeft and perfe£teft manner. But I fay, that God forms his Defign 
freely -, becaufe he does not invincibly and neceffarily love any thing befides his own Subftance, 
Neither the Incarnation of the Word, nor for a much ftronger Reafon, the Creation of the World, 
are neceffary Emanations of his Nature. God is fully Self-lufficient : For the Being infinitely per- 
fect may be conceiv'd alone, and without necefTary Relation to any of his Creatures. 

LII. As God neceffarily loves himfelf, he neceffarily follows the Rules of his Wifdom. But 
whereas his Creatures conftitute no part of his. Being, he is fo full and fufficient in himfelf, that 
•nothing obliges him to produce them •, and he is abfolutely indifferent or free on their Account. 
And therefore it is that he has made the World in Time : For that Circumftance fufficiently fhews 
that the Creatures are not necefTary Emanations of the Divinity, but effentially depending on the 
Free Will of the Creator. 

LIII. Lo ! however an Objection that offers it felf immediately to the Mind. If it were true, 
that God neceffarily follow'd the Rules of his Wifdom, the World would not have been created 
in Time : For either the World is worthy or unworthy of God. If it were better that the World 
fhould not be produc'd from Nothing, it ought to be Eternal •, if on the contrary, that it fhould 
remain in Nothingnefs, it ought not to be created. Therefore God is not oblig'd to Hick to Rules 
which his Wifdom prefcribes, fince the World was created in Time. 

But this Objection is eafily anfwer'd. 'Tis better for the World to be, than not to be -, but it 
had better not be at all than be Eternal. . The Creature ought to carry the Effential Character of 
Dependency. If Spirits were Eternal, they might have ibme reafon to confider themfelves as 
Gods, or necefTary Beings ; or at leaft, as capable of contributing to the Greatnels or Felicity of 
God ; whilft imagining he could not forego producing them. They might in a manner compare 
themfelves with the Perfons in the Deity, while believing themfelves produc'd like them by a 
neceffary Emanation. Thus God ought by the Rules of his Wifdom to leave Creatures the 
Mark of their Dependence •, and yet give them Affurance that he made them not to annihilate 
them •, and that being conftant in his Purpofes, by reafon of his unlimited Wifdom, they mall 
eternally fubfift. 

LIV. This Difficulty may ftill be driven farther in this manner. God neceffarily follows the 
Rules of his Wifdom, and neceffarily does what is beft. But it was at leaft better for the World 
to be created in Time, than not to be at all. And certainly it was fit, by the Rules of the Wifdom 
of God, that the World fhould be produc'd in the Circumftances in which he produc'd it. There- 
fore the Creation of the World in Time is abfolutely neceffary, God was not at Liberty on its 
account, nor capable of hindring its temporary Production. 

tor the Reiolution of this Difficulty, it muft be obferv'd, That though God follows the Rules 
prefcrib'd by his Wifdom, yet he does not neceffarily what is beft •, becaufe, being Mafter of his 
action, he may chooie to do any thing. To aft, and not to follow the Rules of his Wildom, is 
a Fault : Therefore, on fuppofition that God afts, he neceffarily ads in the wifeft manner con- 
ceivable. But his Liberty in the Production of the World, is a Sign of his Abundance, Fulnefs, 
and Self-fuificiency. 'Tis better for the World to be, than not to be ; the Incarnation of ' Jefus 

Chriji 



NATURE '^ GRACE. l{ 

Chrijl renders the Woi-k of God worthy of its Author, I acknowledge : But whereas God is ef- 
fentially happy and perfeft, and as nothing is good on his Confideration, but himfelf,or theCaufe 
ot his Perfection and his Happinefs, he loves nothing invincibly befides his own Subffc incc ; and 
whatever is extenour to him, ought to be produc'd by an Aftion really eternal and immutable 
but that derives its Neceflity from Suppofition of the Divine Dectees. 

LV. I offer another Principle, which I have already mention'd, which may afford fame Light 
to the Difficulties that may arife about the Incarnation of Jefus Chrifi, and the Geation of the 
World. Reafon and Authority of Holy Writ teach us, that the Firft and Principal of the De- 
hgns of God, is the Conftitution of his Church in Jefus Chrijl. The ptefent World is not crea- 
ted to remain as it is : The Falfhood and Errour, the Injuftice and Difbrder, that are ieen in ir, 
give us fufficiently to underftand it ought to have an end. The future World, which Truth and 
Juftice (hall inhabit, is the Earth which God has fettled on inviolable Foundations s and which be- 
ing the Object: of Divine Love, fhall eternally fubfift. God has not created this Vifible World 
with other Defign than to raife by degrees that invifible City, whereof St. John f peaks fo many 
Wonders -, and as Jefus Cbrijl fhall be the principal Beauty of it, he was always had in View 
by God in the Production of his Work. He has made all for Man, and with reference to him, 
as the Scripture teaches : But he for whom, according to St. Fan/, God has made all things, is Heb. 2. 
the Man Jefus Chrif. 'Tis to teach Men that they are created, and that they fubfift in Jefui 
Chrijl; 'tis to unite them ftraitly to him 5 'tis to induce them to make themfelves like him, that 
God has rlgur'd Jefus Chrijl and his Church, in the principal of his Creatures. For 'tis neceilary 
that Jefus Chrijl fhould be found in the whole Work of God, that it might be the worthy Ob- 
ject of his Love, and of the Aft ion that produe'd it. 

LVI. If we confider the manner of the Firlt Man's Creation, as related by Holy Scripture, how 
his Wife was form'd out of his Flefh and Bone ; his Love to her, and the Circumftances of their 
Sin, we fhall doubtlefs judge that God thought on the Second Adam in the Formation of the 
Firft:-, that he confider'd the Father of the future World, in creating the Father of the prefent- 
and that he'defign'd the Firft Man and Woman for exprels Types of Jefus Chrijl and his Church. 1 Cor. 12. 
St. Paul permits us not tQ doubt of this Truth, when he allures us we are form'd of the Flefh *7- 
and Bone of Jefus Chrijl, that we are his Members-, and that the Marriage of Adam and 'Eveif^' 5 ' 3 °> 
is the Figure of Jefus Chrift and his Church. 

LVIL God might perhaps form Men and Animals by ways as fimple as common Generation. 
But fince this way typified Jefus Chrijl zndlmChurch, fince it wore the Imprefs of the principal of 
God's Defigns, and reprefented, as I may fay, the well-belov'd Son to his Father, that&vz in whom 
alone the whole Work of the Creation fubfifts, God ought to prefer it before all other •, thereby 
likewife to teach us, that as intelligible Beauties confift in their Relation to Eternal Wifdom, fo 
fenfible Beauties muft, though in a manner little known to us, relate to Incarnate Truth. 

LVIII. Doubtlefs there are many Analogies and Agreements betwixt the mod principal of the 
Creatures, and Jefus Chrijl, who is their Pattern and their End. For all is full of Jefus Chrijl; 
every thing reprefents and typifies him, as much as the Simplicity of the Laws of Nature will per- 
mit. But I (hall not venture to enter on the Particulars of this Subjeft. For befides that I am fearful 
of miftaking, and have not a competent Knowledge either of Nature or Grace, of the prefent 
World, or the future, to difcover their Relations •, I know that the Imagination of Men is fo 
farcaftical and nice,* that we cannot by Reafon lead them to God, much lefs to Jefus Chrijl,mth- 
out tiring their Patience, or provoking their Railery. Moft Chrijl ians are accuftom'd to a Philo- 
fophy that had rather have recourfe to Fiftions, as extravagant as thofe of the Poets, than to 
God ; and fome of them are fo little acquainted with Jefus Chrijl, that a Man would perhaps be 
reckon'd a Vifwnijl, if he faid the fame things with St. Paul, without ufing his Words. For 'tis 
rather that great Name which perfuades them than the View of Truth. The Authority of Scri- 
pture keeps them from blafpheming what they do not underft and ; but whereas they are but little 
converfant with it, it cannot.much enlighten them. 

LIX. 'Tis certain that the Jewijh People was the Figure of the Church, and that the molt Holy 
and Remarkable Perfons among the Kings, Prophets, and Patriarchs of that Nation, were the 
Types of the Me/Jiah, our Saviour Jefus Chrijl ; which is a Truth not deniable, without under- 
mining the Foundations of the Chrijl tan Religion, and making the moft Learned of. the Apojlles 
pafs for the moft Ignorant of Men. Jefus Chrijl being not yet come, ought at leaft to be typi- 
fied. For he ought to be expefted, he ought to be defired, and by his Types he ought to itrew 
fome fort of Beauty over the Univerfe, to make it acceptable to his Father. Thus it was neceffary 
he mould in fome manner be as ancient as the World, and that he mould die prefently after the Sin 
in the Perfon of Abel. The Lamb that was (lain from the Foundation of the World : The Begin- 
ning andEnd: Alpha and Omega: Tejhrday and to Day.: He is, was, and is to come. Thefe are 
the Qualifications St. John attributes to the Saviour of Men. 

I 
his 

^iSs^^'^^^^ffi^^'^'^^^ GoV loving 'that moft which had neareft 
Relation to his Son, ought to make the Jews the Fathers of Jefus Chrijl, according to the rlelli, 
fince they had been the moftlively and exprefs Figures of his Son. . _ 

LXI But if driving this Difficulty up higher, The Reafon be demanded ot the Choice God 
made of the Jews to be the principal" Figures of Jefus Chrijl, I think I may and ought afhim, 

T« Ill-It 



fl *) 



F. Malebranche Concerning 

that God a&ing always by the fimpleft ways, and difcovering in the infinite Treafures of his 
Wifdom all the Combinations of Nature with Grace, chofe that which was to make the Church 
the moft ample, moft perfect, and moft worthy of his own Greatnefs andHolinefs, as I have faid 
before. Secondly, I think I ought to anfwer, that God forefeeing that what was to happen to the 
Jevoijh People by a neceflary Confequence of Natural Laws, would have more Analogy to his 
Defign of typifying Jefus Chrift and his Churchy than all that could befall other Nations, thought 
fit to choofe that People rather than any other. For, in brief, Predeftination to the Law is not 
like Predeftination to Grace •, and though there be nothing in Nature that can oblige God to filed 
his Grace equally on a whole People, yet methinks Nature may merit the Law in the Senfe I here 
under ftand it. , 

LXII. Tis true, that all that befell the Jeivs, who reprefented JeJ us Chrift, was not a neceflary 
Confequence of the Order of Nature : There was need of Miracles to make the Jews lively, and 
exprefs Figures of the Church. But Nature at leaft furnifh'd Ground-work, and Materials, and 
poihbly the principal Strokes in moft Inftances,. and Miracles finifh'd the reft. Whereas no other 
Nation would have been fo proper for fo juft and accomplifh'd a Delign. 

LXIII. If I miftake not, we are oblig'd to think that God, having a Wifdom prefcious of all 
the Events and Confluences of all poffible Orders, and all their Combinations, never works Mi- 
racles when Nature is fufflcient •, and that therefore he mull choofe that Combination of Natural 
Effects, which, as it were, remitting him the Expence of Miracles, neverthelefs moft faithfully 
executes his Defigns. 

For Example : 3 Tis neceflary that all Sin mould be puhifh'd. But that's not always done in 
this World. Yet fuppoling it was requifite for the Glory of Jefus Chrift, and the Eftablifhment 
of Religion, that the Jews mould be puniflfd in the Face of the whole World, for the Crime 
they had committed in murthering out Saviour-, it was fit that Jejus Chrift mould come into the 
World, about the Reign of Herod; fuppoling that People, by the neceflary Confequence of the 
Order of Nature, was to be divided about that time ; that Civil Wars and perpetual Seditions 
were to weaken them ; and that, laftly, the Romans were to ruine and difperfe thern, with the 
total Deftru£tion of their City and Temple. 'Tis true, there feems to be fomething extraordi- 
nary in the Defolation of the Jews : But as it (hews greater Wifdom m God, to produce fo fur- 
prizing EfteQs, by the moft fimple and general Laws of Nature, than by particular Wills, which 
are always Miracles 5 I queltion whether on that Occafion we are to fly unto a Miracle. But, 
for my part, I difpute it not here ; fince'tis a Facl that we cannot eafily nor need we explain oui: 
felves upon : And I produce this Inftance only to make fome Application of my Principles, and 
to make them more eafily intelligible to others. 

I have, I think, faid enough of Nature and Grace^ to fatisfie all equitable and moderate Per- 
fons about an infinite Number of Difficulties, which difturb only their Minds who muft needs 
judge of God by themfelves. For if Men' would confult the Idea of an Infinitely Perfeft Being, 
of a General Caufe, of an Infinite Wifdom ; and if they would confent to the Principles I have 
eftablifh'd conformable to that Idea, I believe they would neither be furpriz'd nor offended at the 
Conduct of G O D, and that they would change their Murmurs and Cenfures into Wonder and 
■Adoration, 



CONCERNING 



NATURE and GRACE. 23 



CONCERNING 



Nature and Grace. 



DISCOURSE III. 

Of the Manner of GKACEs atting in m. 



T 



PARTI. 

Concerning Liberty. 

*• P" 1' *^H E R E is nothing more rude and unform'd than the Subftance of Spirits, if we fe- 
parate it from God. For what's a Mind void of Understanding and Reafon, defti- 
tute of Motion and Love? Yet it is the Word and Wifdom of God which is theuni- 
verfal Reafon of Minds •* and 'tis the Love whereby God loves himfelf, that gives 
the Soul the Motion me has towards Good. If the Mind knows Truth, 'tis by its Natural and 
NecelTary Union with Truth it felf : If it is reafonable, 'tis fo through fupreme Reafon : Laftly, 
If it be a Spirit, or Intelligence, 'tis in one fenfe, becaufe its Subftance is enlightned, penetrated^ 
and perfected by the Light of God himfelf Thefe Truths I have explained in another Place. 
So likewife the Subftance of the Soul is not capable of loving Good, fave by its Natural and Ne- 
celTary Union with the Eternal and Subftantial Love of the Supreme Good ; it advances not to- 
wards Good any farther than convey'd by God -, it is volent only from the Motion it continually 
leceives from him j it lives only through Charity, and wills merely through the Love of Good, 
which God makes it participate, though it abufes it. For, in fine, God making and preferving 
Minds only for himfelf inclines tbem towards him as long as he preferves their Being, and com- 
municates the Love of Good to them whilft they are capable of receiving it. Now that natural 
and continual Motion of the Soul towards Good in general, towards Good indefinite, towards 
God, is what I here call Will : Since 'tis that Motion which capacitates the Subftance of the 
Soul to love different Goods. 

H. This Natural Motion of the Soul towards Good in general, is invincible ; for 'tis not in 
our Power not to will to be happy. We neceiTarily love what we clearly know and lively feel to 
be Our Good. All Minds love God by the Neceffity of their Nature • and if they love any thing 
elfe by a Free Choice of their Will, 'tis not becaufe they feek not God, or the Caufe of their Fe- 
licity, but becaufe they are deceiv'd. 'Tis becaufe, perceiving by a confus'd Senfation, that fur- 
rounding Bodies make them happy, they confider them as good, and by an Ordinary and Natural 
Confequence, love them, and unite to them. 

III. But the Love of all thefe particular Goods is not naturally invincible. Man confider'd in 
his Original State, might fuperfede loving thofe Goods that fill'd not the whole Capacity of his 
AffeQion. There being but one Good which includes all others, he might facrifice every other ~ 
Love to the Love of this. For God having made Minds only for himfelf, cannot invincibly carry 
them to the loving any thing befideshim, or without relation to him. Laftly, our -own inward 
Confcioufnefs informs us, that we can rejeft a Fruit, though we are inclin'd to take it. Now that 
Power of loving, or not loving particular Goods, the Kon-invincibility which is found in the Mo- 
tion, which carries Minds to the loving what does not feem every way inclufive of all Goods. 
That Power, or Non-invincibilit)\ is what I call Liberty. Thus placing the Definition inftead of 
the thing defin'd, that Expreffion, our Will is free, fignifies, that the Natural Motion of the 
Soul towards Good in general, is not invincible in point of Good in particular. To the Word 
Free* the Idea of Voluntary is commonly annex'd; but' in the Sequel of this Difcourfe, I fhall 
take the Word in the Senfe I have obferv'd, as being the molt Natural and Ordinary.^ 

IV. The Word Good is equivocal, and may fignifie either Pleafure which makes formally hap- 
py, or the true, or feeming Caufe of Pleafure. In this Difcourfe I fhall conftantly take the Word 
Good in the fecond Senfe ; becaufe indeed Pleafure is imprinted on the Soul, that file may love 
the Caufe that makes her happy, that (lie may advance towatds it by the Motion of her Love, 
and may ftrictly unite to it, to be perpetually happy. When the Soul loves nothing but her own 

Pleafure, 



2^ F. Malebranche Concerning 

Pleafure, fhe in cffetl loves nothing diftinft from her felf. For Pleafure is only a Condition or 
Modification of the Soul, which renders her actually happy and content. But whilft the Soul 
cannot be the Caufe of her own Pleafure, fhe's unjuft, ungrateful, and blind, if fhe loves her 
Pleafure, and forgets to pay the Love and Devotion which is due to the true Caufe that produces 
it in her. As none. but God can a£t immediately and by himfelf on the Soul, and make her fen- 
fible of Pleafure by the a£tual Efficacy of his all-potent Will ; fo he alone is truly Good. How- 
ever I term the Creatures Good, which are the ieeming Caufes of the Pleafures we feel- occafio- 
nally from them. For I am unwilling to deviate from the cuitomary way of Speaking, any farther 
than is neceffary to explain my felf clearly. All Creatures, though Good in themfelves, or Per- 
feSL, with reference to the Defigns of God, are not Good, with" reference to us. They are not 
our Good, nor the true Caufe of our Pleafure or Felicity. 

V. The natural Motion which God conltantly imprints on the Soul to carry it to love him, or 
(iO make ufe of a Term which is the Abridgement of feveral Ideas, and can be no longer equi- 
vocal or confusVl after the Definition I have given of it,) the Will is determin'd towards parti- 
cular Goods, either by a clear and evident Knowledge, or by a confused Senfatiou which points 
thefe Goods out to us. Whilft the Mind perceives or tails not any particular Good, the Motion 
of the Soul remains as it were undetermin'd, it tends towards Good in general.. But this Motion- 
receives a particular Determination, as fooh as the Mind has the Idea" of Senfatlon of fome parti- 
cular Good. : For the Soul being continually bent towards Good undetermin'd, ought to move 
when the Good appears. 

VI. But when the Good, which is prefent to the Mind and Senfes fils not thefe two Faculties ; 
when it's difcover'd under the Idea of a particular Good, of a' Good that comprehends not all 
Goods -j and when it is tafted by a Senfation that takes not up the whole Capacity of the Soul, 
fhe may ftill defire the Perception and Fruition of fome other Good •, fhe may fufpend the Judg- 
ment of her Love. She may refufe to acquielce hi the acfual Enjoyment, and by her Defires feek 
out fome novel Object. And as her Defires are the Occafional Caufes of her Light and Know- 
ledge, fhe may, by the natural and neceffary Union of all Minds with him, who includes the 
Ideas of all Goods, difcover the True Good, and in the True, many other particular Goods dif- 
ferent from that fhe perceiv'd and enjOy'd before. 

Therefore having fome Knowledge of the Emptinefs and Vanity of fenfible Goods, and attend- 
ing to the fecret Reproaches of her Reafon, to the Remorfes of her Conieience, to the Com- 
plaints and Menaces of the True Good, who will not that fhe fhould facrifice to feeming and 
imaginary Goods •, may, by the Motion which God continually imprints on her for Good in gene- 
ral, Sovereign Good, that is, for himfelf, check her felf in her Courfe towards any particular 
Good. She may refill the fenfible Allurements, fearch and find out other Objects, compare them 
together, and with the indelible Idea of the Supreme Good, and love none of them with a deter- 
minate Love. And if the Sovereign Good comes to be fomewhat relifh'd, fhe may prefer it to 
all particular Goods, though the Pleafure and Satisfaction they feem to infufe into the Soul be 
extremely great and very agreeable. But thefe Truths require a larger Explication. 

VII. The Soul is conltantly driven towards Good • in general ; fhe defires the PofTefHon of all 
Goods, and will never limit her Love ; there being no Good that appears fuch that fhe refufes to 
love. Therefore when fhe actually enjoys a particular Good, fhe has a Tendency to proceed far- 
ther •, fheftill defires fomething more by the natural and- invincible Impreffion which God gives 
her :, and to change or divide her Love, it fuffices to prefent her another Good befides that of her 
prefent Enjoyment, and to give her a Tafl of the Pleafure it affords. Now the Soul may ordina- 
rily feek and difcover new Goods : She may likewife approach and enjoy them. For, in fine, her 
Defires are the Natural or Occafional Caufes of her Knowledge ; and Objects appear and dfaw 
towards her in proportion to her Earneftnefs to know them. A Man of Ambition, who confiders 
the.Lultreof a Dignity, may likewife think on the Slavery, Conflraint, and the true Evils that 
accompany Humane Grandeur •, he may fumm up the Account, weigh and compare all together, 
if his Paffion does not blind him : For I confers there are Moments in which Paffion takes away 
all Liberty from the Mind, and that it always leffens it. Thus as a Dignity, however great it 
appears, cannot be taken by a perfectly free and rational Man, for univerfal and infinite Good, 
whilft the Will extends to all Goods : This perfe£tly free and perfe£tly rational Man, may enquire 
after and find out others, in as much as he can defire them ; it being his Defires which difcover and 
prefent them to him. He may then examine them and compare them with that which he enjoys. 
But whereas he can find only particular Goods on Earth, he may, and ought, whilft he lives here 
below, to examine them, and perpetually feek, and nevet acquiefce. Or rather, that he may not 
be conftantly following a frefh Chafe, he ought in general to neglect all tranfitory Goods, and de- 
fire only fuch as are Immutable and Eternal. 

VIII. But whereas we love not to feek, but to enjoy, and that the Labour of Examination is 
at prefent very painful, but Repofe and Enjoyment always very agreeable, the Soul commonly 
refts when me has fonnd any Good ; fhe 'flops at it to enjoy it ^ fhe deceives her felf, becaufeby 
hermiltaking and judging fhe has found what (he looks for, her Defire is chang'd into Pleafure, 
end Pleafure makes her happier than Defire. But her Happinefs cannot laft long : Her Pleafure 
being ill-grounded, unjuft, and deceitful, immediately diiquiets and molefts her, becaufe fhe de- 
fires to be folidly and truly happy. Thus the natural Love of Good quickens her, and produces 
in her new Defires. Thefe confus'd Defires reprefent new Objects. The Love of Pleafure puts 
heron the Purfuitof thofe which afford or feem to afford it, and the Love of her Repofe fattens 

her 



NATURE W GRACE. 25 

her upon them. She does not immediately examine the Defers of the prefent Good, when pre- 
pofleis\i with itsSweetnels • but rather contemplates it on its belt fide, applies to that which charms 
her, and thinks only of enjoying it. But the more ftie enjoys, the more the b ives it, and the clo- 
fer (he approaches, the more cunoufly (he conliders it. But the more (he conhders ir the more 
Impeifechons (he fpies in it ; and fince (he defires to be truly happy, (he cannot for ever be milta- 
ken. When (lie is rhirfty, and hungry, and weary with locking, Hie prefentlv inebriates and fills 
her felt with the firft Good (he finds •, but (he is prefently difguited with a Nourilhmcnt which 
was not made for Man. Thus the Love of the True Good excites in her new Defires tor frefh 
Goods ; and whilft (he conftantly changes her Purfuir, all her Life; and her whole Happinefs on 
Earth, confifts in a continual Circulation of Thoughts, Defires, and Plea hires. Such is the Soul 
which makes no ufe of her Liberty, but leaves her felf to the Conduct of Chance, to be guided 
by the obtaining Motion, and the fortuitous Concourfe of determining Objects. But this is the 
State of a Man whole Underftanding is lb weak as daily to miltake the falfe for the true Good • 
and whole Heart is fo corrupt as to betray and fell it felf to every thing it is touch'd with, to the 
Good which gives it an a£tual Senfe of the moll fweet and agreeable Pleafures.' 

IX. But a Man perfectly free, fuch as we conceive Adam immediately after his Creation, knoivs 
clearly that none but God is his Good, or the true Caufe of the Pleafures he enjoys. Though he 
feels Satisfa&ion upon the approach of circumambient Bodies, he loves them not ; God only he 
loves, and if God forbid him to unite to Bodies, he is ready to forfake them, what Pleafure focver 
he finds in rhem. He refolves to fix only in the Enjoyment Of the fupreme Good, and to facrifice 
all others to it •, and though never fo defirous of Happinefs, or the Enjoyment of Pleafures, 
no Pleafure is ftronger than his Light. Not but that Pleafures can blind him, perturbate his 
Reafon, and fill up his thinking Capacity. (For the Mind being finite, all Pleafure is capable of 
dividing and diftra£ting it:) But that Pleafures being fubje&ed to his Will, he is too cautious to 
be intoxicated by them. For the fole invincible Plealiire is that of the BlelTed, or that which the 
Firft Man had found in God, if God {hou\d have prevented and hindred his Fall; not only becaule 
this Pleafure fills all the Faculties of the Soul, without difturbing her Reafon, or carrying her to 
the Love of a pretended Good ; but alfo becaufe nothing withftands the Enjoyment of this Plea- 
fure ; neither the Defire of Perfection, nor that of Felicity. For when we love 'God we are perfect h 
when we enjoy him we are happy ^ and when we love him with Pleafure, we are happy and perfect 
all at once. Thus the perfecleft Liberty is that of Minds, which can at all times overcome the 
greateft Pleafures h of Minds, to which no Motion towards particular Goods is ever irrefiftible : 
Tis that of a Man before the Sin, before Concupifcence troubled his Mind and corrupted his 
Heart. And the molt imperfect Liberty is that of thofe to whom no Motion towards a particu- 
lar Good, though never fo little, but is invincible in all forts of Circumftances. 

X. Now betwixt thefe two forts of Liberty there are more and lefs Perfect to an Infinity of 
Degrees, which is a thing not fufficiently minded. Tis commonly imagined that Liberty is equal 
in all Men, and rhat 'tis anEffential Faculty of the Mind, the Nature whereof remains conftantly 
the fame, though its A£tion varies according to the diverfity of Objects. For we regardlefly fup- 
pofe a perfett Equality in all things, wherein no lenfible Inequality appears. Men indulge their 
Mind, and rid it of all tedious Application, by giving things an abftract Form, confilting in a 
fort of indivifible EfTence. But this is an Errour, Liberty being no fuch Faculty as is imagin'd. 
There are not two Perfbns equally free in refpect of the fame Objects. Children have lefs Liberty 
than Men arriv'd to the perfect Exercife of their Reafon. Nor are there two Men whofe Reafon 
is equally clear, conftant, and certain, in regard of the lame Objects. Thofe whole Paffions are 
unruly, and who have been unaccuftom'd to refill them, are lefs tree than others who have coura- 
gioufly impugn'd them, and who are naturally Men of Temper ; and there are not two Men equally 
moderate, equally fenfible to the fame Objecls^ and who have equally fought for the Prefervation 
of their Liberty. Some Perfons there are fo fold to Sin, that they lefs refill, or think of refitting 
it when awake, than pious Men in their Sleep •, iince we are taught by the Word of Truth, that 
he who commits Sin becomes a Slave to it. 

XI. ''True it is, that by the Inftitution of Nature all Men are equally free : For God does not 
invincibly-determine Men to the Love of any particular Good. But Concupifcence corrupts the 
Moral and Intellectual Part • and fince Man has loft the Power of obliterating the Tra£ts of fen- 
fible Pleafures, and flopping the Motions of Concupifcence : That Liberty which had been equal 
in all Men, if they had. not finnd, grows unequal, according to their different degrees of Light, 
and as variouily work'd on by Concupifcence. For Concupifcence it felf!, which is equal in all 
Men, in as much as they have loft their Power over their Body, is a thoufand ways unequal, be- 
caufe of the Diverfity that is found in the Conftru&ion of the Body, in the Multiplicity and Mo- 
tion of the Spirits, and thofe almoft infinite Alliances and Relations obtain'd through the Com- 
merce of the World. 

XII. To our diftincter underftanding the Inequality which is found in the Liberty of different 
Perfbns, we mult obferve, that every Man perfectly reafonable, perfectly free, and who would be 
truly happy, may, and ought, upon the Pretence of any Object which gives him the fenfe of 
Pleafure, fufpend his Love, and carefully examine whether this Object be the true Good, or whe- 
ther the Motion which carries him towards ir exactly comport with that which leads him to 
the true Good : Orherwife he would love by Initinct, and not by Reafon ; and if he could not 
fufpend the Judgment of his Love, before he had examin'd it, he would not be perfectly free* 
But if he clearly difcovers that this Object, which gives him the Senfe of Pleafure, is truly good 

G to 



2 6 F. M a lebr an ch e Concerning 

to him •, and if the Evidence in conjunction with the §ehfation be fuch as will not permit him to 
fufpend his Judgment, then, though perfectly free, he is no longer free in refpect of that Good ^ 
but he invincibly loves it, becaufe Pleafure agrees with Evidence. But being that God alone can 
act in us, as our Good, and the Motion which byalTes us towards the Creatures is repugnant to 
that which carries us towards God ; every Man, perfectly reafonable, and entirely free, may and 
muft forbear to judge that fenfible Objects are his Goods. He may and ought to fufpend the Judg- 
ment which regulates, or (hould regulate his Love. For he can never evidently fee that fenfible 
Goods are true Goods, fince that can never be evidently feen which is not. 

XIII. This Power of fufpending the Judgment, which is the actual Rule of Love-, this Power, 
which is the Principle of our Liberty, and by which Pleafures are not always invincible, is very- 
much weaken'd fince the Sin, though not quite dertroy'd. And that we may have actually this 
Power, when we are tempted by an Object, 'tis necelTary, befides the Love of Order, to have a 
thoughtful Mind, and to be fenfible to the Remorfe of Confcience •, for a Child or a Man aileep 

• have not actually this Power. But all Men are not equally enlightned - 7 the Mind of Sinners is 
full of Darknefs : Confciences are not equally tender, the Heart of Sinners is hardned : The 
Love of Order, actual Graces are unequal in all Men : Therefore they are not equally free, nor 
have equal Power of fufpending their Judgment : Pleafure determines them, and moves fome ra- 
ther than others. This Man can fufpend his Judgment, and wave his Confent, when a prelent 
Object gives him the Taft of a molt quickning and fenfible Pleafure ; and another is of fo nar- 
row a Mind, and corrupt an Heart, that the leaft Pleafure is irrefiftible, and the leaft Pain infup- 
portable : Being not wont to fight againfl: fenfible Allurements, he becomes fo difpos'd as not even 
to think of refilling them : Thus he has not then the Power of deferring his Confent, fince he 
even wants the Power of making a Reflection j and in regard to that Object, he is like a Man 
afleep or out of his Wits. 

XIV. The more weak is Reafon, the more fenfible grows the Soul, and more readily and falfly 
fhe judges of fenfible Good and Evil. If a Leaf pricks, or even tickles a Man when aileep, fie 
wakes in a ftart, frighted, as if bitten by a Serpent. He perceives this little Evil, and judges of 
it as of the greateft Misfortunes •; fo intolerable it appears to him. His Reafon fainting by the 
Slumber, incapacitates him from fufpending his Judgment. To him the leaft Goods as well as 
Evils, are almoft always infuperable. For 'tis the Senfes which judge in him, and thefe are hafty 
Deciders b which mull be fo for feveral Reaforis. When Reafon is lefs difabled, little Pleafures 
are not invincible, nor little Evils intolerable ^ and Men are not always bound where moll Plea- 
fure is to be found. For fome Pleafures are fo little, that they are defpicable to Reafon, which 
is never quite deftitute of the Love of Order. The prefence of little Evils is not very frightful : 
A Man, for Example, refolves to be let Blood, and fullers it j he judges not fo haftily, but fuf- 
pends and examines ; and the ftronger is Reafon, the longer is its Sufpence, againfl- fenfible Invita- 
tions and Difcouragements. Now there is nothing more certain, than that ail Men who partake 
of the fame Reafon, partake not of it equally ; that all are not equally fenfible, at leaft to the 
fame Objects -, that they are not all equally well born, equally well bred, equally affiited by the 
Grace of Jefus Chriji ^ and therefore not equally free, or capable of fufpending the Judgment of 
their Love in point of the fame Objects. 

XV. But we are to take notice, that the chief Duty of Minds is to preferve and increafe their 
Liberty, fince 'tis by the good ufe poffible to be made of it they may merit their Felicity, if fuc- 
cour'd by the Grace of Jefus Chriji ; at leaft leffen their Mifery, if left to themfelves. That 
which weakens our Liberty, or makes moll Pleafures irrefiftible to us, is the Eclipfe of our Rea- 
fon, and the Lofs of Power we ought to have over our Body. Reafon therefore muft be inftru- 
cted by continual Meditations 5 we muft confider our Duties, that we may perform them h and 
our Infirmities, that we may have recourfe to him who is our Strength. And fince we have loft 
the Power of flopping the IrriprefTions made by the Prefence of Objects on the Body, which thence 
corrupt the Mind and Heart, we ought to avoid thefe Objects, and make ufe of the Power that is 
left us. We ought to watch conftantly over the Purity of our Imagination, and labour with all our 
Powers to efface the adulterate Traces imprinted by falfe Goods, fince they, kindle Defires in us, 
which divide our Mind, and weaken our Liberty. By this means the Man whofe Liberty is juft 
expiring, who cannot conquer the leaft of Pleafures, may obtain fuch a Strength, and fuch a Free- 
dom, as not to yield to the greateft Souls, their Succours being fuppos'd equal. For, at leaft, at the 
time whilft thefe Pleafures do not importune us to Evil, we may lay in to avoid them. We may 
fortifie our felves by fome Reafon, that may, through future Pleafures, countervail thofe we don't 
actually enjoy. For as every one has fome Love of Order, there is no Man but may vanquifh a 
feeble and light Pleafure by a ftrong and folid Reafon 5 by a reafonable Fear of fome Evil, 
orby the Hope of fome great Good. Laftly, there is no one but may, by the Ordinary Sup- 
plies of Grace, vanquifh fome Pleafures and avoid others : Which Pleafures, formerly in- 
vincible or ftudied, being vanquifh'd or avoided, are a Preparatory to our afTaulting others, 
at leaft before they tempt us. For the Satisfaction we find in the Victory provokes us again to 
Battle 5 and the Joy of a good Confcience, and the Grace of J ejus Chrifl adminifter Courage : 
And even the Fear of a Defeat is not ufelels, fince it makes us fly to him who can do all things $ 
and make us difcreet in avoiding perillous Occafions. Thus we are always Gainers in this fort of 
Exercife 5 for if we are worited, we become more humble, wife, and circumfpect, and fometimes 
more earneft for the Combat, and more capable of Conquering or Refilling. 

XVI. As in the ftudy; of the Sciences, thofe who fubmit not to the falfe GHmpfes of Probabili- 
ties, and who are wont to fufpend their Judgment pll the Light of Truth breaks into them, fall 

rarely 



NATURE and GRACE. 

rarely into Esrour ; whereas the vulgar part of Men are daily deceiv'd by their precipitate Tudements 
So „ Moral Difophne, thofe who ufe to facrifice their Pleafures to the Love of ( ders aKh 
continually momhe their Senfes and Paflions , efpecially in tilings which feem of lkt e moment 
which every one may do, will in things important obtain a great Facility of ftipendtag tKd£ 
rnen which regulates their Love Pleafure does not furprile them, like other Men a? leafl dofs 
rot drag them along unawares. It feems, on the contrary, that wh lit it fenhbly afiVcls the* k 
K*" t0 ^ecare of themfeives, and to coniuit Reafon or die ffi oftte SeL 

^^^^^SI^^T^^^^ ° r , herS ' whJ ' m the Scripture Phrafe,S 
tions of nS T 7 * % fe " flblt ; to the fecietReproaches of Reafon, and the wholfome Precau- 
tions of inward Truth. So that tne acquir'd Habit of refilling feeble and light Pleafures mahes 
way for the conquering the more violent , at leaft for the fuffeVmg ibme Regfet andShame when 
a Man is conquer'd which creates forthwith Diflike and Abhofrence. Libertv thus infeSv 
mcreafing, and peeing it felf by Exercife, and the Affifce of Grace, we may at laft Z 
ourfelves in a Capacity of performing the molt difficult Commandments, in as much as by 
the ordinary Graces which are conftantly afforded Chnftiam, we may overcome common Tempta- 
tions, and for the molt part avoid the greateft j and by the Aihifance of the Grace of Jcfus drift 
there is none but may be vanquifli'd. J J 

■ X dF' 7 1S true ' tha o a Sinner fo dif P° s,d 5 as not able fo much as to think of refilling a furpri- 
zing rlealure, cannot actually accomplifh the Commandment that oiders him not to enioy it. For 
the 1 leafure is mluperable to him in that Eftate. And if we but fuppofe this Perfon in this State 
of Impotence, through a Natural Neceffity, his Sin not being free, could not make him more cul- 
pable , I mean, more worthy of the Puniffiment of Pain, than if he were inordinate in his Sleep. 
May it this Impotency were a necelTary Confequence of the free Diforders which had preceded 
his Coijvemon, it would not be imputed to him, by reafon of his Charity. But fince he was both 
abie and oblig'd to ufe himfelf to refilling Plealine, and combating for the Prefervation and Aug- 
mentation of his Liberty ; this Sin, though actually committed by a kind of NecefTity, renders 
him guilty and punifhable h if not by reaion of his Sin, at leaft becaufe of his Negligence, which 
is the Principle of if. The Commandment of God is not abfolutely importable h but the Sinner 
may and ought, for the foregoing Reaions, to put himfelf into a Condition of obferving it h fince 
Men are oblig'd, as well as able, to labour conftantly to augment and perfe£l their Liberty h not on- 
ly by the Helps reach'd to them by Jefos'Chrifl, but alfo by natural Forces, or ordinary Graces. 
For, in brief, Nature may be made fubfervient to Grace in a thoufand Inftances. 



i 7 



PART IL 

Of GRACE. 

XVIII. 'IpHE Inequality which is found in the Liberty of different Perfons being clearly known, 
A it will be no hard Matter, methinks, to difcover how Grace works in us ; if we but affix: 
to the Word Grace diftincF and particular Ideas, and remember the Difference between the Grace of 
the Creator and Renovator. I laid, in the preceding Difcourfe, that there is this difference between 
Light and Pleafure, That the former leaves us entirely to our felves, whilft the latter incroaches 
upon our Liberty. For Light is fomething extraneous to us ; it does not affe£t and modifie our 
Soul ; it does not drive us to the Objects it difcovers •, but only difpofes us to move our felves, 
and to confent freely, and by Reafon to the Impreffion God gives us towards Good. The Know- 
ledge of our Duty, the clear Idea of Order, feparatefrom all Seniation, the Contemplation of na- 
ked, abflracl, wholly pure, and intelligible Good, that is, Good without Taft or Fore-tall, leaves 
the Soul to her entire Liberty. But Pleafure is an Inmate to the Soul, it touches and modifies 
her. And fo it diminifh.es our Liberty, makes us love Good, rather by a Love of Inftinct and Paf- 
fion, than of Choice and Reafon. And it tranfports us, as I may fay, to fenfible Objects: Not that 
Pleafure is the fame thing as Love, or the Motion of the Soul towards Good , but that it caufes 
this Love, or determines this Motion towards the Objefr. that makes us happy. But becaufe no 
Truths are demonftrable, fave thofe whereof we have clear . Ideas, which we have not of our 
own inward Motions, 'tis not ,poflible for me to demonftrare what I advance, as we demonftrate 
the Conclufions depending on common Notions. Every one therefore mull confult his own in- 
ward feeling of what paries in his Soul, if he would beconvinc'd of the difference between Light 
and Pleafure •, and mult carefully obferve, that commonly Light is attended with Pleafure, which 
yet he mull feparate to judge foundly of it. But of this I have fiid enough. 

XIX. If then it be true, that Pleafure naturally- produces Love, and is like a Weight which 
gives the Soul a Propenfity to the Good that caufes or feems to caufe it; 'tis vifible that the Grace 
ofjefus Chrift, or the Grace of Senfation, is of it felf efficacious. For though preventing Delecta- 
tion, when but weak, works nor an entire Converfion in the Heart of thofe whofe Paflions are too 
lively ; yet it never fails of its Effect, in as much as it always inclines them towards God. It is 
in fome meafure always efficacious, but it has not always all portible Effect, becaufe of the Re- 
finance of Concupifcence, . _ 

r XX. Put, 



2 8 * F. Malebranche Concerning 

XX. Put, for Example, in one Scale of a Balance ten pound weight, and in the other only- 
fix ; this latter weight (hall truly gravitate :, for adding but fo much more weight to this, or ta- 
king it from the oppofite Scale, or laltly, hanging the Balance nearer the over-weighted, and the 
fix pounds {hall carry it. But though this weight gravitates, 'tis viflble its effect depends ftill on 
the refilling weight, and the manner of its refilling. Thus the Grace of Senfation is always of it 
felf efficacious ; it conftantly weakens the Effort of Concupifcence, fince Pleafure naturally cre^ 
ates Love, for the Cauie which produces, or feems to produce it. But though this Grace be al- 
ways Self-efficacious, yet it depends, or rather its Effect depends on the actual Difpofitions of the 
Receiver. The weight of Concupifcence refills it, and fenfible Pleafures, which draw us to the 
Gteatures that feem to produce it in us, hinder the Pleafures of Grace from uniting us ftrictly 
to him, who alone can act in us, and make us happy. 

XXI. But the cafe is otherwise with the Grace of Light, or the Grace of the Creator. It is not 
of it felf efficacious. It does not move or convey the Soul, but leaves her perfectly to her felf. 
But though it be not efficacious of it felf, it nevertheless is perfued by many Effects, when 'tis 
great, and animated by fome delectable Grace, which gives it Force and Vigour:, or when it meets 
with no contrary Pleafure that greatly refills it. Such is the difference between the Grace of the 
Creator and that of the Rejlorer •, between Light and Pleafure ; between the Grace which fuppo- 
fes not Concupifcence, and the Grace which is given us to counterpoize the Pleafures of it. The 
one is fufficient to a Man perfectly Free and Fortified with Charity •, the other is efficacious to 
a Man Infirm, to whom Pleafure is necelTary to draw him to the Love of the True Good. 

XXII. But the Force and Efficacy of Grace ought always to be compar'd with the A£lion of 
Concupifcence, with the Light of' Reafon -, and efpecially with the degree of Liberty the Perfon 
is endued with. And we muft not imagine that God bellows it by particular Wills, with defign 
to produce certain Effects by it, and nothing more. For when 'tis laid that Grace always works 
in the Heart the Effect, for which 'tis given, we err if we fuppofe God acts like Men, with parti- 
cular Confiderations. God diffufes his Grace with a General Defign of fanctifying all that receive 
it, or according as the Occafional Caufe determines him to refufe it. Mean while he knows very well 
that it will not have fo much Effect in fome, ' as in others ; not only becaufe of the Inequality of 
Force 'On the part of Grace, but alfo of the Inequality of Refiftance on the part of Concupifcence. 

XXIII. Since Concupifcence has not utterly deftroy'd the Liberty of Man, the Grace of Jcfus 
Chriji, as efficacious as it is, is not abfolutely irrefiftible. A fenfible Pleafure is fuperable, when 
weak :, and a Man may-fufpend the Judgment of his Love, when he is not hurried by a too vio- 
lent Paffion : And when he ftoops to the Lure of an adulterate Pleafure, he is culpable through 
the Abufe of his Liberty. So likewife the Delectation of Grace is not ordinarily invincible. A 
Man may decline following the good Motions it infpires, which remove us from the falfe 
Objects of our Love. This, Grace fills not the Soul in fuch a manner as to hurry her to the True 
Good, without Choice, Judgment, and Free Confent. Thus when we refign up our felves to its 
Motion, and advance farther, as I may fay, than it irrefiftibly carries us -, when we facrifice the 
Plealures of Concupifcence, which weaken its Efficacy ; or, laftly, when we act by Reafon, or 
love the true Good as we ought, we merit through the good ufe we make of our Liberty. 

XXIV. : Tis true, that Delectable Grace, confider'd in it felf, and feparate from the Pleafures of 
Concupifcence, which are contrary to it, is always invincible. Becaufe this holy Pleafure being 
conformable to the Light of Reafon, nothing can withftand its Effect in a Man perfectly free. 
When the Mind fees clearly, by the Light of Reafon, that God is its Good ; and has a lively Senfe 
of him by the Taft of Pleafure, 'tis not poflible to avoid loving him. For the Mind defires Hap- 
pinefs, and then nothing hinders it from following the agreeable Motions of its Love. It feels 
no Remorfes which oppofe its prefent Felicity -, nor is it withheld by Pleafures contrary to that 
which it enjoys. The Delight of Grace is then invincible -, nor is the Love k produces merito- 
rious, unlefs it be greater than its Caufe. I lay, that the Love which is merely a Natural or Ne- 
celTary Effect of the Delectation of Grace, has nothing meritorious, though it be good in it felf. 
For whillt we move no farther than we are driven, or rather, when we advance no longer than 
we are paid in hand, we have no Claim to any Recompence. When we love God but fo far as 
we are attracted, or becaufe we are attracted, we love him not by Reafon, but by Inftinct -, we love 
him nbt on Earth as he requires and deferves from us. But we merit only when we love God by 
Choice, by Reafon, by the Knowledge we have of his being amiable. We merit in proceeding 
on, as I may fay, towards Good, when Pleafure has determin'd the Motion of Love. 

XXV. This fole Reafon demonftrates either that the firft Man was not invited to the Love of 
God, by the blind Inftinct of Pleafure ; or at lealt, that this Pleafure was not fo lively as what he 
felt in reflecting on his own Natural Perfections, or in the actual ufe of fenfible Goods. For 'tis 
evident fuch a Pleafure would have made him impeccable ; it would have put him in a State like 
that of theBleffed-, which merit no longer : Not becaufe they are out of a Way-fairing State; 
(for Merit always follows from meritorious Actions -, and God, being Juft, muft necelfarily re- 
ward them :) But they merit not, becaufe the Pleafure they find in God is equal to their Love, that 
they are throughly imbued with it, and that being freed from all fort of Pain, and all Motions of 
Concupifcence, they have nothing left to iacrifice to God. 

XXVI. For that which makes us impeccable is not precifely that which incapacitates us to me- 
rit. JeJ'us Chriji was impeccable, and yet he merited his Glory, and that of the Church, where- 
of he is the Head. Being perfectly free, he lov'd his Father,- not by the Inftinct of Pleafure, but 
by Choice and Reafon. He lov'd him, becauie he intuitively law how amiable he was. For the 

moft 



NATURE W GRACE. i$ 

moft perfect Liberty is that of a Mind, which has all poflible Light, and is not determin'd by 
any Pleafure ; becaufe all Pleafure, preventing or other, naturally produces fome Love -, and un- 
lets we refill it, it efficacioufly determines towards the agreeable Object", the Natural Motion of 
the Soul. But Light, though conceiv'd never fo great, leaves the Mind perfectly free, fuppofing 
this Light be confidefd alone, and feparate from Pleafure. 

XXVII. As Jefus Cbrijl is nothing but the Word, or Reafon Incarnate, certainly lie ought not 
to love Good with a blind Love, with the Love of Inftinct, with the Love of Senfation, bur by 
Reafon. He ought not to love an infinitely amiable Good, and which he knew perfectly worthy 
of his Love, as we love Goods that are not amiable, and which we cannot know as worthy of Love, 
He ought not to love his Father by a Love in any refpeft like that wherewith we love the vilefi 
Creatures, wherewith we love Bodies : His Love to be pure, at lealt, to be perfectly meritorious, 
ought to be no wife produe'd by preventing Pleafures. 

For Pleafure may andmuft be the Recompence of a Legitimate Love, as in effeStitis in the Saints, 
and Jefus Cbrijl himfelf But it cannot be the Principle of Merit, nor ought it to precede Rea- 
fon, unlefs debilitated. But Reafon in Jefus Cbrijl was no ways weakned. Supreme Reafon fup- 
ported the Created. Jefus Cbrijl, who was free from the Motions of Concupifcence, had no need 
of preventing Delight to counterbalance fenfible Pleafures which furprize us. Nay, it may be he 
refus'd to tait the Pleafure of Joy, which was a natural Refult of the Knowledge he had of his 
Vertue and Perfections, that, being deprived of all forts of Pleafures, his Sacrifice might be more 
holy, more pure, and more difinterefs'd. Laftly, Befide the Privation of all Pleafures, preventing and 
others •, 'tis likely he inwardly fuffer'd unfpeakable Droughts, not better exprefhble by Souls fill'd 
with Charity, than by the Dereliction of God, according to thefe Words of our Saviour on the Oofs 5 
My God, my God, wby bajl tbou foif alien me? But if we will abfolutely have it, that Jefus Cbrijl was 
carried by preventing Pleafures to. the Love of his Father, 'tis neceffary to fay, according to the Prin- 
ciples I have laid down, either that his Love was more intenfe than his Pleafure •, fince Natural Love, 
produe'd by the Inftinct of Pleafure is no ways meritorious •, or at leaft, we muft fay he merited by 
fenfible Pains, by the continual Sacrifice, which he freely and voluntarily offer'd to his Father. Fof 
'twas neceffary he fhould fuffer to enter in PofTeffion of his Glory -, as we are taught by Scripture. 

XXVIII. Though the Delegation of Grace, without relation to any contrary Pleafure,' infalli- 
bly gains the Content of the Will ; yet it is not fo with the Pleafures of Concupifcence. Thefe 
Pleafures, confider'd in themfelves, without refpeft to other a&ual Pleafures, are not always in- 
furmountable. The Light of Reafon condemns them ; the Remorfe of Confcience makes us abr 
hor them •, and we may commonly fufpend our Confent. Therefore the Grace of Jefus Cbrijl is 
ftronger than Concupifcence ; and we may call it Victorious, fince the former always mailers the 
Heart, when equal to the latter. For when the Balance of our Heart is perfectly in Equilibrio\ 
by the even Weights of contrary Pleafures, that which is moft folid and reafonable, has the Ad- 
vantage -, becaufe Light adds fome Grains to its efficacy, and the Remorfes of Confcience with- 
ftand the Influence of a counterfeit Pleafure. 

XXIX. We muft conclude, from what we have faid, that we always merit when we love the 
true Good by Reafon ; and that we merit not at all, when we love it by InitineL We merit al- 
ways when we love the true Good by Reafon -, becaufe Order will have the true Good lov'd in 
that manner, and that mere Light does not convey us, or invincibly determine us to the Good difco- 
ver'd by it. We merit not when we love the true Good by Inftin£t, or as much as we are invin- 
cibly mov'd and determin'd by Pleafure : Becaufe Order requires that the true Good, or the Good 
of the Mind, mould be lov'd by Reafon, by a tree Love, a Love of Choice and Judgment; whilft 
the Love which is produe'd by Pleafure, is a Blind, Natural, and Neceffary Love. I own, that when 
we advance farther than Pleafure forces us, we merit. But that's becaufe we therein aft by Reafon, 
and in the way that Order would have us. For Love, fo much as it exceeds Pleafure, is a pure 

and reafonable Love. , - 

XXX. So likewife we muft conclude, that we always demerit when we love a faife Good, by 
the InftinSl of Pleafure, provided we love it more than we are invincibly fore'd. For when our 
Liberty is naturally fo ftraitned, and our Capacity of Mind fo little, that we are carried in an ii- 
refiftible manner, then though we are corrupt, and our Love be evil, and againft Order ; yet we 
don't demerit : To demerit, I mean to deferve to be punifh'd, we muft purfue falfe Goods with 
more ardency, or tend farther than Pleafure irrefiftibly carries us. For we mult obferve, that there 
is great difference between a Good and a Meritorious Action -, between a Corrupt and a Demerito- 
ous. The Love of theBleffed is Good, but it is not Meritorious : The Love of a Righteous Per- 
fon is often deprav'd in his Sleep •, but it is not Demeritorious. Whatever- is conformable to Order, 
is good ; and whatever is contrary to it is naught. But there is nothing of Merit or Demerit, 
fave in the good or ill ufe of our Liberty, fave in that in which we are the Factors. But we make 
a good ufe of our Liberty, when we follow Light •, when we unconftrain'd, and of our felves, ad- 
vance to the true Good, or were at firft determin'd by preventing Delegation, or the Light of 
Reafon ; when we facrifice fenfible Pleafures to our Duty, and furmount Pain , by the Love of 
Order. On the contrary, we make an ill ufe of our Liberty, when we make Pleafure our Rea- 
fon when we facrifice our Duty to our Paffions, our Perfeftion to prefent Felicity, the Love of 
Order to the Love of our felves -, and all this at a time, when we might really have prevented its 
But I proceed to explain this ftill more clearly. ... 

XXXI. When two ObjeQs are offer'd to the Mind, and it determines it felt about them, 1 
confefs it never fails to take that fide where molt Reafon and Pleafure appears 5 or, all things con* 

H fidet'd/ 



|g £ Malebranche Concerning 



fider'd, where moft Good is to be found. For the Soul not being able to will, orlove,but through 
the Love of Good fince the Will is nothing but the Love of Good, or the Natural Motion of the 



fider' 
the _ 

Soul towards it fhe unavoidably loves what has moft conformity with what Hie loves invincibly. 
But 'tis certain, that when fenfible Pleafure, or fome thing of like nature, does not perturbate the 
Mind, we may ever fufpend the Judgment of our Love, and not determine, efpecially in point of 
falfe Good. For the Soul can have no Evidence that falfe Goods are the true, or that the Love 
of the former agrees perfectly with the Motion which carries us to the latter. Therefore when 
a Man. loves falfe Goods, whilft his Senfes and Paflions leave his Reafon entirely free, he deme- 
rits : Becaufe then he may and ought to fufpend the Judgment of his Love. For if he itood any 
time to examine what was fpeedily to be done, the falfe Good would appear in its own Colours, 
the Pleafure which it feems to infufe into the Soul would vanifh, the Idea of fome other Good 
would prefent it felf to the • Mind ; the Remorfe of Confcience, and perhaps the Delegation of 
Grace, would change all the Difpofitions of his Mind and Heart : For the State of a Traveller 
lias nothing certain. A thoufand different Objects are continually offefd to the Mind, and the 
Life of Man on Earth is nothing but a continual train of Thoughts and Defires. 

XXXII. At flrft Sight it feems that, in point of the true Good, we cannot fufpend the Judgment 
of our Love •, for we cannot fufpend our Judgment, fave when Evidence is not perfect. Now we 
may fee with thecleareft Evidence, that God is the true Good; and that none but he can be good to, 
us : We know that he is infinitely more amiable than we can conceive. But it is obfervable, that 
though we cannot fufpend the Judgment of Reafon, in refpect of Speculative Truths, when the Evi- 
dence is entire -, yet we may fufpend the Judgment of our Love in point of Goods, whatever Evidence 
there is in our Ideas. For when Senfe fights agakft Reafon, when Taft oppofes Light, when that 
is found fenfibly bitter and difagreeable, which Realbn clearly reprefents as fweet and delegable, we 
may fufpend our Choice, and follow either Reafon, or the Senfes. We may act, and commonly 
do aft againft our Light ; becaufe, when we attend to the Senfation, Light difappears, unlefs 
we ftrive to retain it : And becaufe we are ordinarily more attentive to Senfation than to Light, 
becaufe Senfation is always more lively and agreeable than the moft evident Knowledge. 

XXXIII. "lis Pleafure which makes Minds actually happy. Therefore we ought to enjoy 
Pleafure, when we love the true Good. Yet a Mind thinks on God, draws nigh him by its Love, 
and taft s no Satisfaction. On the contrary, God fills it fometimes with Bitternefs and Drought, he 
deferts it, and repels it, as I may fay •, not that it may ceafe to love him, but rather that its Love 
may be more humble, more pure, and meritorious : Laftly, he prefcribes it certain things which 
render it actually miferable. But if it approaches Bodies, it finds it felf happy in proportion to 
the StriQnefs of its Union to them. Certainly, this is perplexing to a Man never fo intelligent, 
iince we are invincibly paffionate for Happinefs. ■ Therefore we merit much, if, following our 
Light, we renounce our felves h notwithstanding thofe difcomforting Droughts, if we facrifice our 

] actual Happinefs to the Love of the true Good ; if living by Faith, and relying on the Promifes of 

God, we remain inviolably bent upon our Duty. Hence we clearly underftand, that Jefus Cbriji 
might merit his Glory, though he knew the true Good in the higheft Evidence ^ becaufe, having 
an extreme Love for his ¥atbe>\ he was entirely conformable to his Orders, without being car- 
ried by preventing Pleafures ; becaufe, being fteadily guided by his Light, he fuffer'd moft vio- 
lent Pains, and facrific'd the moft lively and fenfible Pleafures to his Charity. For he took on 
him a Body like to ours, that he might have -a Victim to offer to God, and that duly receiving 
through this Body, as the Occafional or Natural Caufe, an abundance of various Senfations, he 
might accomplifti a perfect Holocauft, to the Honour of the true Good, by the enduring Pain, and 
the Privation of fenfible Pleafures. 

XXXIV. To the end every one may have a moft perfect Idea of the Grace of Jefus Qmfi, I 
think it requifite to add, that it confifts not in Delectation alone : For all Grace of Senfation is the 
Grace of Jefus Cbriji. But of this Grace there are many Species, and of every Species infinite 
degrees. God fometimes cafts Diftaft and Bitternefs on the Objects of our Paffions, he weakens 
their fenfible Charms, or makes us hate or abhor them. And this kind of Grace of Senfation 
makes the fame Effect as preventing Delight; It reftores and fortifies our Liberty, reinftates us 
almoit in Equilibrio, and thereby puts us in a Capacity of following our Light in the Motion of 
our Love. For to reftore a Balance to an even poize, or to change its propenfion, we need not 
augment the leffer Weight, but only retract from the over-loaden Scale. Thus there are Graces of 
Senfation of feveral forts, and every fort is capable of infinite degrees. For there are Pleafures, 
Averfions, and Diflikes, greater and leffer ad infinitum. What I have hitherto faid of Delectation, 
may be eafily apply'd to other Species of the Grace of Senfation. I only made choice of Pleafure 
or Delegation, as a particular Example, to explain my felf clearly, and without Ambiguity. 

If there be any other Principle of our Determinations to Good befides the Grace of Senfation, 
and that of Light, I confefs I am utterly ignorant of it ^ and therefore I have refolv'd to explain the 
Effects of Grace, neceiTary to the Converfion of Heart $ but by thefe two Principles, for fear of in- 
curring the blame of difcourfing in general Terms, that of themfelves excite only confus'd Ideas 5 
which thing I avoid with all poffible Care. But though I have explain'd my felf in Terms underftood 
by all Mankind •, fince there is nobody but knows, that the Knowledge and Senfe of Good arePrin- 
% n ciples of our Determinations ; yet I prefume not to impugn thofe, who, flicking not to thefe clear 
thus ui<m~ Ideas, &y in general, that God operates the Converfion of our Souls by a particular Action, diffe- 
rhc Search rent, it may be, from all I have here and el few here faid •, that God * works in us. Experi- 
t'fterTrnth, encing in my felf no other Motion than towards Good in general, and that determin'd by Know- 
ledge 



NATURES GRACE. 

ledge or Senfation, I ought to fuppofe nothing more •, if by this alone I can account for all that 
the Scripture and Councils have determined about the prefent Subject, In a word, I am well af~ 
fur'd that Light and Senfation are the 'Principles of our Determinations:, but I declare that I can- 
not tell but there may be fome other whereof I have no Knowledge. 

XXXV. Befidcs Grace of it felf efficacious, and that the Effect whereof entirely depends on 
thegood Difpofitions of the Mind ; befides the Grace of Senfation and the Grace of Light, the Righ- 
teous have moreover an Habitual Grace, which makes them agteeable to God, and capacitates them 
to work Actions meritorious of Salvation. This Grace is Charity, rhe Love of God, or the Love of 
Order. ; a Love which is not properly Charity, unlets it be itronger and greater than every other 
Love. As it is commonly Pleiiufe which produces the Love of the Object that's the true or ap- 
parent Caufe of it -, ib 'tis thelDele&ation of Grace which produces the Love.'bf God. 'Tis the 
Enjoyment of Senfible Pleafures which heightens Concupifcence ■, and 'tis the Grace of Senfation 
which encreafes Charity. Concupiicencediminifh.es by the deprivation of Senfible Pleafures, and then 
Charity is eafily preferv'd and nourifh'd. And whilft Charity faints by the privation of the actual 
Grace of JeJwChrift, Concupifcence fpeedily thrives and grows upon it. For thefe two Loves, 
Charity and Cupidity, conitantly war with one another, and gather Strength from the VVeaknefs of 
their Enemy. 

XXXVI. Whatever participates of Charity, is well-pleafing to God • but Charity is not always 
active in the Juft themfeives. In order to its working, 'tis necefTary at leaft it be Illuminate : 
For Knowledge is needful to determine the Motion of Low. Thus the Grace necefTary to every 
Good Work relating to Salvation, is that of Senfation, in thofe who begin their Converfion ^ is that 
of Light, at leaft, or fome Motion of Faith or Hope, in thofe who are animated with Charity. For 
though the Righteous may do Good Works without the Grace of Delectation, they have always 
need of fome actual Afliftance to deteRnine the Motion of their Charity. But although Cha ; 
rity without Delegation is fufficient ttf ^conquer many Temptation's, yet the Grace of Senfation is 
necefTary on many Occaiions. For Men cannot, without the continual Help of the Second Adam, 
refill: the continual Action of the Firft. They cannot perfevere in Righteoufneis, unlefs frequent- 
ly affifted with the particular Grace of J ejus Chrift, which produces, augments, and maintains 
Charity againft the continual Efforts of Concupifcence. 

XXXVII. The Effects of Pleafure, and of all the Senfations of the Soul, have a thoufand feveral 
Dependencies on the actual Difpofitions of the Mind. The very fame Weight has not always the 
fame Effects : It depends in its Action on the Structure of the Machine by which it is applied to 
the contrary Weight. If a Balance be unequally fufpended, the force of the Weights being un- 
equally applied, the lighter may overweigh the heavier. So it fares with the Weight of Pleafures : 
They act one on another, and determine the Motion of the Soul, according as they are diverfly ap- 
plied. Pleafure ought to have a greater Influence on the Petfon who has already a Love for the 
Object which caufes it, than on another who has an Averfion, or that loves oppofite Goods. Plea- 
fure forcibly determines_a Perfon who clearly knows, or vividly imagines the Advantages of Good, 
which feems to caufe it -, and acts feebly on the Mind of him who knows this Good but confu- 
fedly, and is diftruftful of it. Laftly, It acts with its whole Force on him who blindly follows 
all that gratifies Concupifcence ; and perhaps will have no Effect on him who has acquir'd fome 
.Habit of fufpending the Judgment of his Love. 

Now fince the different degrees of Light, Charity, Concupifcence, and the different degrees of 
Liberty, are perpetually combining infinite ways, with the different degrees of actual Pleafures ^ 
which Pleafures are operative, but according to their relation to the Difpofitions of the Mind and 
Heart ^ 'tis manifeft that no finite Mind can with any certainty pronounce of the Effect a particular 
Grace ought to produce in us. ' For befides that, there's an infinite Combination in the things con- 
curring to the Efficacy of Grace, or the Production of its Effect, this Combination is not like that 
of moving Springs and Forces, which have always infallible and necefTary Effects. Therefore 'tis 
impoflible for any finite Mind to difcover what pafTes in the Heart of Man. 

XXXVIII. But whereas G^ihas an infinite Wifdom, 'tis viiible that he clearly knows all the 
Effects that can refult from the Mixture and Combination of all thefe things ; and that penetra- 
ting the Heart of Man, he infallibly difcovers even the Effects, which depend on an Act, or ra- 
ther on a free Content of our Wills. Neverthelefs I confefs I cannot conceive-how God can difco- 
ver the Confequences of Actions which derive not their Infallibility from his abfolute Decrees. 
But I have no Mind to infift on Metaphyficks, at the Expence of Morality, and to affirm as un- 
deniable Truths, Opinions that are contrary to my own inward Confciouihefs of my felf-, or in 
fine,' to fpeak to the Ears a certain Language which affords no clear Idea to the Mind. I know 
well that fuch Objections may be made as would be too hard for me to anfwer fatisfactorily and 
clearly : But it may be thefe Objections are naturally full of Obfcurity and Darknefs ; are founded 
on the Ignorance we are in of the Properties of our Soul. 'Tis from our having (as I h 



have elfe- Fjy)} Jih . 
where proved) no clear Idea of our Being, and that what is in us, which gives way to be con- Jlratkn on 
quer'd by a Determination not invincible, is abfolutely unknown to us. Furthermore, if I cannot M? yb.ch. 
clearly anfwer thefe Objections, I can anfwer by others, which to mefeemmore incapable of Solu- f* rt e 3r th6 
tion : I can, from Principles opposed to mine, deduce more harm, and unlucky Confequences than ^ B ^ c f 
thofe which areprefum'd to follow from Liberty, fuch as I have fuppos'd in us. But I engage not the Search. 
on the Particulars of ail this, as taking no delight to walk in the dark, and to lead others upon Second it- 

- . . IMJiI'dtlClh 

Precipices. 

•T H £ 



3 a 



THE 

ILLUSTRATION 

OR 

CONTINUATION 

OF THE 

TREATISE 

CONCERNING 

Nature and Grace. 



What is meant by a&ing by General and Particular Wills, 

LT Say that God a^s by General Wills when he a£ls in conference of the Genera ILaws which 
a tie has eftablifh'd. For Example : I lay that God a£ls in me by General Wills, when he 
-EL gives me the Senfe of Pain when I am prick'd -, fince in purfuance of the General and Effica- 
cious Laws of Union of my Soul and Body which he has conftituted, he makes me fuffer 
Pain when my Body's ill diipos'd. 

So when a Bowl ftrikes another, I lay God moves the ftricken by a General Will, becaufe 
he moves it in purfuance of the General and Efficacious Laws of the Communications of Moti- 
ons ; God having generally Ordain'd, that at the Inftant of Collifion of two Bodies, the Motion 
mould be diftiibuted between them, according to certain Proportions ; and 'tis by the Efficacy of 
that General Will, that Bodies have the force of moving one another. 

II. I lay, on the contrary, that God a£ts by Particular Wills, when the Efficacy of his Will is 
not determin'd by fome General Law, to the producing any Effect. Thus fuppofing Gfd mould 
make me feel the Pain of pricking, whilft there happened no Change in my Body, or in any Crea- 
ture whatfover, which determines him to att in me by fome General Law ; I lay that then God 
a£ts by Particular Wills. 

So again fuppofing a Body begins to move without being ftricken by another, or without any 
Alteration happening in the Will of Spirits, or in any other Creature which determines the Effi- 
cacy of fome General Laws -, I lay that God would move that Body by a Particular Will. 

III. According to thefe Definitions, it plainly appears, that, fo tar from denying Providence, I 
fuppofe on the contrary, that God works all in all things h that the Nature of the Heathen Philo- 
fopbers is a Chimera •, and that, to fpeak properly, 'Nature is nothing but the General Laws 
which God has eitabliih'd for the Conftru&ion or Prefervation of his Work, by thefimpleft ways, 
by an Attion always uniform, conftant, perfe&ly worthy of an infinite Wildom, and an univeriai 
Caufe. But that which I here fuppofe, though certain, for the Reafons I have given in The Search 
after Truth, is not abfolutely ^necelTary to what I defign to prove. For if it be firppos'd, that 
God had communicated his Power to the Creatures in fucli a manner, as that furrounding Bodies 
had a real and true Force, by which they might aft on our Soul, and make her happy and mifera- 
ble by Pleafure and Pain 3 and that Bodies in Motion had in themfelves a certain Entity, which 

they 



NATURE and GRACE. 

they call Imprcfi 'duality 5 that they can communicate it to thofe about them, and with that Ce- 
lerity and Uniformity we obferve ; it would be ftill equally eafie to prove what I intend : For 
then the Efficacy of the concurrent Aftion of the General Caufe would ue necelTarily determ'in'd 
by the Action of the Particular Caufe. God, for Inftance, would be oblig'd, by thefe Principles, 
to afford his Concourfe to a Body at the Inftant of Collifion, that it might communicate its' 
Motion to others 5 which is ftill to aft by virtue of a General Law. Yet 1 do not argue upon 
that Suppofition, as believing it utterly falie, as I have (hewn in the Third Chapter and Second 
Part of the Sixth Book of The Search after Truth, in the Illuftration of the fame Chapter, and 
elfewhere. 

Which Truths fuppos'd, here follow the Notes by which we may difcover whether an EfTeS 
be produc'd by a General or Particular Will. 

MARKS by which we may judge whether an EffeSl be producd by a 

General or ¥ articular Will. 

IV. When we fee an Effect immediately produc'd after the A£tion of an Occafionl Caufe, we 
ought to judge it produc'd by the Efficacy of a General Will. A Body moves immediately after 
the Collifion 5 the Collifion of Bodies is the Aftibn of an Occafional Caufe : Therefore this Body 
moves by a General Will. A Stone falls on the Head of a Man, and kills him , and this St ne 
falls like all others, that is, continues its Motion almoft in Arithmetical Proportion, 1,3, yj 7, 
9, iSfc. Which fuppos'd, I fay it moves by the Efficacy of a General Will, or by the Laws of the 
Communications of Motions, as is eafie to demonftrate. 

V. When we fee an Effe£t produc'd without the Mediation of the known Occafional Caufe, 
we have reafon to think it produc'd by a Particular Will -, fuppofing this Effe& be not manifeftly 
unworthy of its Caufe, as I mall fay hereafter. 

For Example : When a Body's mov'd without being fmitten by another, there's great Probabi- 
lity it was mov'd by a Particular Will ; but yet we cannot be confident of it. For on Suppofi- 
tion of a General Law, that Bodies fhould move according to the feveral Volitions of Angels, or 
the like, 'tis vifible this Body might be put in Motion without Impuliion ; the particular Will 
of fome Angel being in this cafe able to determine the Will of the general Caufe to move it. 
Thus we may be often pofitive, that God a£ts by general Wills, but we cannot have the like Affi:^ 
•ranee that he a£ls by particular Wills, even in the moft averr'd Miracles. 

VI. Since we have not a competent Knowledge of the various Combinations of Occaficnal 
Caufes, to difcover whether fuch and fuchEffefts arrive in confequence of their Action h and are 
not fufficiently Intelligent to difcover, for Inftance, whether fuch a Rain be Natural or Miracu- 
lous, produc'd by a neceffary Confequence of the Communication of Motions, or t>~j a particular 
Will j we muft judge an Erfeft is produc'd by a General Will, when 'tis vifible the Caufe did 
not propofe it felf a particular End. For the Wills of Intelligences have neceflarily an End •, ge- 
neral Wills a general End, and particular Wills a particular Defign. Nothing can t>e more plain 
and evident. 

For Example : Though I cannot difcover whether a Shower of Rain which falls on a Meadow, 
falls in confequence of general Laws, or by a particular Will of God, I have reafon to think it 
falls by a general Will, if I fee it fall as well on the neighbouring Grounds, or on the River 
which bounds the Meadow, no lefs than on the Meadow it felf For if God caus'd it to rain on 
this Meadow by a particular Benevolence to the Owner, this Rain would not fall on the River 
where 'tis infignificant ; fince it could not fall there without a Caufe or Will in God which hasi 
neceflarily fome End. 

,VIL But we have ftill more Reafon to think an Effe£t is produc'd by a general Will, when this 
EffecT: is contrary or even ufelefs to the Defign, which we are taught by Faith, or Reafon, the 
Caufe propos'd. J 

For Inftance : The End which God propofes in the various Senfations he affords the Soul, in 
our tailing different Fruits, is, that we may eat thole which are fit for Nouriihment, and reject, 
the reft. I fuppofe thus : Therefore when God gives a grateful Senfation at the Inftant of our 
eating Poifons, or empoifon'd Fruits, he a£ts not in us by particular Wills. So we ought to 
conclude, fince that agreeable Senfation is the Caufe of our Death, whilft the End of God's giving 
us diverfe Senfations is to preferve our Life by a convenient Nourifhment , for I once more fup- 
pofe thus. For I fpeak only with reference to the Grace which God gives us, doubtlefs to con- 
vert us ; fo that 'tis vifible God fhowers it not on Men by particular Wills, fince it frequently ren- 
ders them more Culpable and Criminal : For God cannot have fo Fatal a Defign. God gives us 
not therefore agreeable Senfations by particular Wills, when we eat poifonous Fruits. But be- 
caufe a poifonous Fruit excites in our Brain Motions like thofe produc'd by wholfome Fruits, 
God gives us the fame Senfations, by reafon of the general Laws which unite the Soul to the 
Body, that file might be wakeful for its Prefervation. 

So likewiie God gives not thofe who have loft an Arm Senfations of Pain relating to it, but 
by a general Will : For 'tis ufelefs to the Body of this Man, that his Soul mould fufier Pjin rela« 
ting to an Arm that's loft. Tis the fame cafe with Motions produc'd in jthe Body of a Man, in 
the Commiffion of a Crime. 

I Finally, 



33 



34 F* M a l e B r a to c'h e Concerning 

Finally, fuppofing we are obliged to think that God icatters his Rain upon the Earth, with 
Intent to make it fruitful •, we cannot believe he diftributes it by particular Wills, fince 
it falls upon the Sands, and in the Sea, as well as on plow'd Lands, and is often fo ex- 
ceflive on feeded Ground, as to extirpate the Corn, and fruftrate the Labours of the Husband- 
man. 

Thus it is certain, that Rains which are ufelefs or noxious to the Fruits of the Earth, are ne- 
ceflary Confequences of the general Laws of the Communications of Motions, which God has 
eftablifh'd for the producing better Effects in the World -, fuppofing, (which I again repeat) 
that God cannot will, by a particular Volition, that Rain fhould caufe the Barrennefs of the 
Earth. 

VIII. Laftly, When an EfFeQ happens which has fomething extraordinary j 'tis reafonable to 
believe it is not produc'd by a general Will. 

' Neverthelefs, 'tis impoflible to be fure of it. If, for Example, in the Proceffion of the Holy 
Sacrament, it rains on the Afhftants, fave on the Priefts, and thole which carry it, we have rea- 
fon to think this proceeds from a particular Will of the univerfal Caufe ; yet we cannot be cer- 
tain, becaufe an occafional intelligent Caufe may have this particular Defign, and ib determine 
the Efficacy of the general Law to execute it. 

IX. When the preceding Marks are not fufficient for us to judge whether a certain Effe£t is 01 
is not produc'd by a general Will, we are to believe it is, if it be certain there is an Occafional 
Caufe eftablifh'd for the like Effects. 

For Example : We fee it rain to fome Purpofe in a Field «, we do not examine whether this - 
Rain falls or not in the great Roads, we know not whether it be noxious to the bordering Grounds j 
nay we fuppofe it only does good, and that all the attending Circumftances are perfectly accom- 
modated to the Defign for which we are oblig'd to believe that God would have it rain : Never- 
thelefs, I fay that we ought to judge this Rain is produc'd by a general Will, if we know that 
God has fetled an Occafional Caufe for the like Effects. For we muff not have recourle to Miia* 
cles without Neceifity. We ought to fuppofe that God a£ts herein by the fimpieif ways •, and 
though the Lord of the Field ought to return Thanks to God for the Bounty, yet he ought not 
to imagine it was caus'd in a miraculous manner by a particular Will. 

The Owner of the Field ought to thank God for the Good he receives, '-fince God faw and will'd 
the good EffetF of the Rain, when he eftablifh'd the general Laws whereat ic is a neceifary Con- 
fequence, and that it was for the like Effects they were eftablifh'd. On the contrary, it the 
Rains are fometimes hurcful to the Earth, as it was not to render them unfruitful, that God efra- 
blifh'd the Laws which make it rain, fince Drought fuffices to make them barren •, 'tis plain we- 
oughr to thank God, and to adore the Wifdom 01 his Providence, even when we do not reel the 
EfteQs of the Laws eftablifh'd in our Favour. 

X. But, to conclude, when we cannot be certified by the Circumftances which accompany cer- 
tain Effe&s, that there is an Occafional Caufe eftablifh'd to produce them, 'tis fufficient to know 
they are very common, and relate to the principal Defign of the general Caufe, in order to judge 
they are produc'd by a general Will. 

For Example : The Springs which water the Surface of the Earth, are fubfervient to the prin- 
cipal Defign of God, which is, that Men fhould not want things neceffary to Life ; I f uppof. .lb* 
Befides, thefe Fountains are very common, therefore we ought to conclude they are form d by 
fome General Laws. For as there is much more Wifdom in executing his Defigns by Simple and 
General Means, than by Complicated and Particular, as I think I have fuffcciently prov d elfe- 
where. We owe that Honour to God, as to believe his way of aft ing is general, uniform, con- 
ftant, and proportion'd to the Idea we have of an infinite Wifdom. Thefe are the Marks by whi h 
we are to judge whether an Efieft be produc'd by a general Will. I now come to prove, that God 
bellows his Grace on Men by general Laws, and that J ejus Chrift has been eftablifh d the Oc- 
cafional Caufe to determine their Efficacy 1 I begin by the Proofs of holy Stliipture. 

XI. St. Paul teaches us, That Jefus Cbriji is the Head of the Church : That he conftantly 
Col. 2. 19. influences it with Spirit and Life : That he forms the Members, and animates them as the Soul 
Heb. 7. 25. animates the Body, or, to fpeak ftill more clearly,«the Holy Scripture teaches us two things : The 
9. 24. firft, that Jefus Cbrift prays continually for his Members. The fecond, that his Prayers or De- 
Joh.n.42. fiies are always heard. Whence I conclude, that he was conftituted by God the Occafional Caufe 

of Grace -, and likewife, that Grace is never given to Sinners, but through his Means. 

The Occafional Caufes have conftantfy and readily their Efrect. The Players and diverfe De- 
fires of Jefus Cbriji, with reference to the Formation of his Body, have likewife moft conftantly 
and ipeedily their Accomplifhment. God denies his Son nothing, as we learn from Jejus Cbriji 
himfelf. 

Occafional Caufes produce not their Effeft by their own Efficacy, but by the Efficacy of the 
General Caufe. Tis likewife by the Efficacy of the Power of God, that the 6oul of JejusCh'rift 
operates in us, and not by the Efficacy of Man's Will. 'Tis for this Reafon that St. Paul repie- 
fems Jefus Cbriji as praying to his 'father without Intermix on : For he is oblig'd to Pray, in order 
to Obtain. 

Occafional Caufes have been eftabliflfd by God for the determining the Efficacy of his General 
Wills ; and Jefus Cbriji, according to the scriptuie, has been appointed Ly God, after his hen ;- 
re&idii, to govern the Church which he had purcbas'd by his Blood. \01JeJus Chrifi became" 
the Meritorious Caufe of all Graces by his Sacrifice ; But, after his Reiiirreiuoii, he enured u..o 

tiie 



NATUHE W GRACE. 35 

the Holy of Holies, as High Prielt of future Goods, to appear in the Pretence of God; and to en- 
due us with the Graces which hs has merited for us: Therefore he himfelf applies and diftri- 
butes his Gifts as Occafional Caufe, he difpofes of all things in the Houie of God, as a well- 
beloved Son in the Houfe of his Father. 

I think I have demonftrated, in the Search after Truth, that there is none but God who is the 
true Caufe, and who acts by his own Efficacy ; and that he communicates his Power to Creatures 
only, in eftabliftiing them Occafional Caules, tor the producing ibme Eft'efts. 1 have proved, for 
Example, That Men have no Power to produce any Morion in their Bodies, but becaule God has 
eltabliih'd their Wills the Occafional Caufes of thefe Motions : That Fire has no power to make 
me feel Pain, but becaufe God has eftablifti'd the Collifiori of Bodies the Occafional Caufe of the 
Communication of Motions, and the violent Vibration of the Fibres of my Flefh the Occafional 
Caufe of my Pain. I may heie iuppofe a Truth which I have proved at large in the Third Chap- 
ter of the Second Part of the Sixth Book, and in the Illuftratioh upon the fame Chapter, and 
which thofe, for whom it was principally written, don't contelt. Now Faith allures us, that all 
Power is given to J ejus Chriji, to form his Church : All Power is given unto me in Heaven and Mat.28.1k 
in Earth. Which cannot be underftood of Jefus Chrift, as to his Divinity ■, for as God he has 
never received any thing;. And therefore it is certain, that Jefus Chriji, as to his Humanity, is 
the Occafional Caufe of Grace ; fuppofing I have well proved, thai God only can aft on Minds 
and that Second Caufes have no Efficacy of their own : Which thofe ought fir ft to examine who 
would underftand my Sentiments, and give a Judgment of them. 

XII. I fay farther, that no one is fanctified but through the Efficacy of the Power which God 
has communicated to Jefus Chriji, in conftituting him the Occafional Caufe of Grace. For if 
any Sinner were converted by a Grace, whereof Jefus Chriji was not the Occafional, but only the 
Meritorious Caufe, that Sinner not receiving his New Life through the Efficacy of Jefus Chriji, 
would not be a Member of the Body of which Jifts Chriji is the Head -, in that manner ex- 
plain'd by St. Paul, by thefe Words of the Epiltle to the Ephefians •, That we may grow up into ckp.4 ti- 
him in all things who is the Head, even Chnfl ; from whom the whole Body ft ly join d together, and 1 $, \6. 
compared by that which every Joint fupplieth, according to the efjellual working in the meafure of Col « 2 « I 9« 
every Part, maketh increafe of the Body unto the edifying it f elf in Love : Which Words not only 

lay Jefus Chriji is the Meritorious Caufe of all Graces •, but likewife diftin&ly fignifie that Chri- 
ftians are the Members of the Body whereof Jefus Chriji is the Head-, that 'tis in him we in- 
creafe and live with an entire new Life ; that 'tis by his inward Operation, «w' infyntty, that his 
Church is form'd, and that thus he has been conftituted by God the fole Occafional Caufe, who, 
by his feveral Defires and Applications, diftributes the Graces which God, as the True Caufe, . 
fhowers down on Men. 

'Tis on this Account St. Paul fays Chriftians are united to Jefus Chriji as their Root -, Rooted Co ] /2> s> 
and built up in him. 3 Tis for the fame Reafon that Jefus Chriji compares himfelf to a Vine, and 
his Difciples to the Branches, that derive their Lite from him $ I am the Vine, ye are the Branches. 
On the fame Grounds St. Paul affirms, that Jefus Chriji lives in us, and that we live injiimj 
that we are rais'd up in our Head ; that our Lite is hidden with Jefus Chriji in God; in a word, 
that we have already Life Eternal in Jefus Chriji. All thefe, and many other Expreffions of like 
nature, clearly manifeft, that Jefus Chriji is not only the Meritorious, but alfo the Occafional, 
Phyfical or Natural Caufe of Grace •, and that as the Soul informs, animates, and confummates 
the Body, fo Jefus Chriji diffufes through his Members, as Occafional Caufe, the Graces he has 
merited to his Church by his Sacrifice. 

For my part, I cannot fee how thefe Reafons can be calFd in quell ion, or upon what Grounds 
a moft edifying Truth, and as ancient as the Religion of Jefus Chrift, can be treated as a dange- 
rous Novelty. I grant my Expreffions are novel, but that's becaufe they feem to me the fitteff of 
all others diftin£tly to explain a Truth, which can be but confufedly demonftrated by Terms very 
loofe and general. Thefe words, Occafional Caufes, and A' at ural Laws, feem necefTary to give the 
Philofophers, for whom I wrote this Treatife of I\ature and Grace, a diftinft Underftanding of 
what molt Men are content to know confuiedly. New Expreffions being no farther dangerous 
than involving Ambiguity, or breeding in the Mind fome Notion contrary to Religion ; I do not 
believe that Equitable Perfons, and converfant in the Theology of St. Paul, will blame me for ex- 
plaining my felf in a particular manner, when it only tends to make us Adore the Wifdom of 
God, and itri&ly to unite us with Jefus Chriji. 

Firft Bj ECTlOK 

XIII. 'Tis Objected againft what I have eftablifli'd, That neither Angels nor Saints, of the Old 
Teftament, receiv'd Grace purfuant to the Defires of the Soul of Jefus, fince that Holy Soul was 
not then in Being -, and therefore, rhough Jefus Chriji be the meritorious Caufe of all Graces, he 
is not the Occafional Caufe which diftributes them to Men. 

As to Angels, I Anfwer, That 'tis very probable Grace was given them but once: So that if we 
confider things on that fide, I grant, there is nothing can oblige the Wifdom of jGod .to conltitute 
an Occafional Caufe for the San&ilicacion of Angels. But if we confider thefe Welled Spirits as 
Members of the Body whereof Jefus Chriji is the Head,' or fuppofe them unequally fupplied •, 

there's 



^6 F. Malebranche Concerning 

there's all Reafon to .believe the Diverfity of their Graces rauft proceed from him who is the 
Chief of Angels as well as Men, and who under that Character has merited by his Sacrifice all 
the Graces which God has given his Creatures, but has variouily applied them by his different 
Defires. 

It being undeniable, that Jefus Chrifl, long before his Birth, or Meriting, might be the Meri- 
torious Caufe of the Graces given to the Angels, and Saints of the Old Teltament •, it ought, rae- 
thinks, be granted, that by his Prayers he might be the Occafional Caufe of the fame Graces, long 
before they were demanded. For indeed there is no neceffary Relation between Occafional Cau- 
fes, and the Time of Produ&ion of their Effects ; and though commonly thefe fort of Caules are 
follow'd by their Effects at the Time of their Action, yet their Action being not of it felf effica- 
cious, fince its Efficacy depends on the Will of the univerial Caufe, there's no neceflity of their 
actual Exiftence for the producing their Effect. 

For Inftance : Suppofe Jefus Chrifl at this prefent time fhould defire of his Father, that fuch a 
Perfon might receive fuch a Supply of Grace!, at certain Moments of his Life, that Prayer of Je- 
fus Chrifl would infallibly determine the Efficacy of the General Will God has of faving all Men 
in his Son. This Perfon Will receive thefe Afhftances, though the Prayer of Jefus Cbri ft be pafs'd, 
and his Soul actually think on another thing, and never think again on that which' he requir'd 
for him. But the paft Prayer of Jefus Chrifl is no more prefent to his Father than a future. For 
all that muft happen in all Times, is equally prelent to God. Thus God loving his Son, and 
knowing he mall have fuch Defires, with refpect to his Anceftors, and thofe of his own Na- 
tion ; and likewife to the Angels which muft enter into the Spiritual Edifice of his Church 
and conftitute the Body whereof he is the Head, ought to accoraplifh the Defires of his Son^ 
before they were made, that the Elect which preceded his Nativity, and which he purchas'd by 
•the Merit of his Sacrifice, might as peculiarly belong to him as others, and that he might be their 
Head, as really as he is ours. I acknowledge it- is fit that Meritorious and Occafional Caules mould 
rather precede their Effects, than follow them, and that Order would have Caufes and their Ef- 
fects exift together : For 'tis plain that all Merit ought to be inltantly recompenc'd, and every 
Occafional Caufe actually to produce its Effect, provided nothing hinders b t it may or ought be 
done. But Grace being abfolutely neceifary to Angels and Patriarchs, could not be'deferr d. But 
as for the Glory and Reward of the Saints of the Old Teftament, fince that might be deferrd, 
'twas fit that God mould fufpend its Accomplifhment till Jejus Chrifl mould akend into Hea- 
ven, be conftituted High Prieft over the Houfe of God, and begin to exercife the Sovereign 
Power of Occafional Caufe of all Graces merited by his Labours upon Earth. Therelore we are 
to believe that the Patriarchs entred not Heaven, till after Jefus Chrifl their Head, Mediator, and 
Fore-runner. 

But though it fhould be granted, that God had not appointed an Occafional Caufe for all the 
Graces aflorded the Angels and Patriarchs, I fee not how it can be thence concluded, that Jefus 
Chrifl does not at prefent endue the Church with the Spirit which gives it Incieafe and Lite • 
that he does not pray for it, or that his Prayers or Defires are not effectually heard -, in a word' 
that he is not the Occafional Caufe which applies to Men the Graces he has merited. I giant if 
youll have it fo, that God, before Jejus Chr.ft gave Grace by particular Wills ; the Neceflity of 
Order requiring it: Whilft by Order, the Occafional Caufe could not be fo foon eftablimd, and 
the Elect were very few in Number. But now, when the Rain of Grace falls, not as hereto- 
fore on a fmall Number of Men, but is fhower'd on all the Earth, and Jefus Chrift may, or 
ought, be conftituted the Occafional Caufe of the Goods which he has merited for his Church 
what reafon is there to believe God works fo many Miracles as he gives us good Thoughts ? for 
in fhorr, all that is done by particular Wills, is certainly a Miracle, as not being a Refult of the 
General Laws he. has ordain'd, whole Efficacy are determin d by Occafional Caules. But how can 
we imagine, that, in order to fave Men, he works lb many Miracles uielefs to their Salva- 
tion > 1 would fay, affords them all thefe Graces which they refill, becaule not proportion d to 
the actual Force ot their Concupifcence. 

St. John teaches us, That Chrifl tans receive from the Fulnels of Jefus Chrift Graces in abun- 

Joh. 1. 17. dance : For, fays he, the Law was given by Mofes, but Grace and Truth came by Jefus Chrifl. 
For indeed, the Graces which preceded him were not comparable to thole he diitributed after his 
Triumph : If they were Miraculous, we are to fuppoie they were extremely rare. Even ths 
Grace of the Apoflles, before the Holy Spirit was given them, could not come in companion with, 
thofe they received when the High Prieft of future Goods, having entred by his Blood inco die 
Holy of Holies, had obtain'd by the Force of his Prayers, and lent, through 'tie Dignity ot his 
Perfon, the Holy Spirit, to animate and ianctifie his Church. The unaccountable Blindnels ot rhe 
Jews, their grofs and carnal Notions, their frequent Relapfes into Idolatry, after io many Mira- 
cles, fufficiently manifeft their difregard for true Goods ; and the difpnuedneisof the Apoflles, 
before they had received the Holy Ghofl, is a fenfible Proof of rheir lveaki:cis. So that Grace in 
thole Days was extremely rare, becaufe our Nature in Jejus Chrift was not yet eftabliib d the Oc- 

Hebr.4. cafional Caufe of Graces : Jefus Chrifl was not yet fully conlecrated Pneit, after die Oraer of 

Hcbr. 7. MclchifeJech ; nor had his Father given him that Immortal and Glorious Lile, which is the parti- 
cular Character of his Prieithood. For 'twas neceffary that jefus Chrifl fhould enter the Heavens , 
and receive the Glory and Power of Occafional Caufe of true Goods, oetore he iem the Boiy 
Spirit, according to the Words ot Si. John, The Holy Ghofl was ?iot yet given, becauje that Jejus 

Joh. 1 5. 7. was not yet glorified ; And according to others of Jefus Chrifl himisit, It is. expedient, j or yu 

that 



NATURE and GRACE. 37 

that I go away ; for if I go not away, the Comforter will not come unto you j but if I go, J will fend 
him unto you. 

Now it cannot be inaagtn'd, that Jtf us Chrift, confider'd as God, is .the Head of the Churchy 
as Man, he has obtain'd that Quality. The Head and Members of a Body mult be of the fame na- 
ture. Jefus Chrift, as Man, intercedes tor Men ; as Man, he receiv'd from God a Sovereign 
Power over his Church : For as he is God, he intercedes not -, as God, he has not receiv'd a frame, 
which is above every Name 5 but he is equal to the Father, and abfolute Lord of all things by- 
right of Generation. Thefe Truths are evident, as we are alTur'd by Jefus Chrift himfelff who 
fays, that his father has given him power to judge Men, becaufe he is the Son of Man. So we 
ought not to think, that Scripture Expreffions, which make Jefus Chrift the Author of Grace, 
mult be underftood of him, confider'd in his Divine Perfon : For if fo, I confefs I fliould not 
have prov'd him the Occasional Caufe, fince he would be the True Caufe of it. But whereas 
it is certain, that the Three Ferfons of the Trinity are equally the True Caufe of Grace, becaufe 
all the External Operations of God are common to them all, my Proofs are undeniable, fince Ho- 
ly Scripture fays of the Son, and not of the Father, or the Holy Spirit, that he is the Head of the 
Church ; and that in this Capacity he communicates Life to the conitituent Members of it. 

Second OBJ ECT ION. 

XIV. 'Tis God who gives the Spul of Jefus Chrift all the Thoughts and Motions relating to 
the Formation of his Myftical Body. So that if on one hand the Wills of Jefus Chrift, as 
Occafional or Natural Caufes, determine the Efficacy of the General Wills of God ; on the other, 
'tis God himfelf who determines the feveral Wills of Jefus Chrift. And thus it comes to the 
fame thing : For, in brief, the Volitions of Jefus Chrift . are always conformable to thof ; of his 
Father. 

I grant that the particular Volitions of the Soul of Jefus Chrift are always conformable to the 
Wills of his Father ; not as if there were any particular Wills in the Father, which anfwer to 
thole in the Son, and determine them ; but only, that the Volitions of the Son are always con- 
formed to Order in general, which is the neceffary Rule of the Will of God, and of all thofe who 
love him. for to love Order, is to love God ; 'tis to will what he wills -, 'tis to be Jult, Wile, 
Regular, in our Love. The Soul of Jefus defires to form, to the Glory of his Father, the lar- 
geft, molt fumptuous, and accomplifh'd Temple poflible. Order demands this, fince nothing can 
be made too great for God : All the feveral Thoughts of this Soul, perpetually intent on the Exe- 
cution of its Defign, proceed likewife from God, or the Word, to which it is united : But its 
various Defires are certainly the Occafional Caufe of thefe various Thoughts ; for it thinks on 
what it wills. 

Now thefe diverfe Defires are fometimes entirely free^ and probably the Thoughts which ex- 
cite them, do not invincibly determine the Soul of Jefus Chrift, to apply her felt to the Means 
of executing them. For, in brief, 'tis equally advantageous to the Defign of Jefus Chrift, whe- 
ther it be Peter or John that caufes the Effect which the Regularity of his Work requires. ' 'Tis 
true, the Soul of Jefus is not indifferent in any thing that relates to his Father's Glory, or that 
Order neceffarily demands, but is entirely free in all the reft ; there is nothing extraneous to God, 
which invincibly determines his Love. Thus we ought not to wohder if Jefus have particular 
Wills, though there be not the like Wills in God to determine them. 

But let it be granted,' that the Volitions of Jefus Chrift are not free, and that his Light in- 
vincibly carries him to will, and to will always in a determinate manner, in the Conftru£tion of 
his Church : But it is Eternal Wifdom to which his Soul is united, that muft determine his 
Volitions. We muft not for that Effect fuppofe Particular Wills in God : But all the Wills 
of Jefus Chrift are Particular, or have no Occafional Caufe to determine their Efficacy, as have 
thofe of God. •* * 

For the Soul of Jefus Chrift having not an infinite Capacity of Thinking, his Notices, and 
confequently his Volitions, are limited. Therefore his Wills muft needs ^ be Particular, fince 
they change according to his diverfe Thoughts and Applications : For probably the Soul of Jefus 
Chrift, other wife impldy'd in Contemplating, and tatting the infinite Satisfactions of the True 
Good, methinks, ought not, according to Order, defire at once to think on all the Ornaments 
and Beauties he would beftow upon his Church, nor on the different Ways of executing each of 
his Defigns. For J ejus Chrift defiring to render the Church worthy of the infinite Majefty 
of his Father, would gladly perfect it with infinite Beauties, by Ways moft conformable 
to Order. He muft then conltantly change his Defires -, there being but one infinite 
Wifdom, who can fore-fee all, and prefcribe himfelf General Laws for the executing his 
Defigns. 

But the future World being to fubfift eternally, and to be infinitely more perfect than the pre- 
fent, it was requifitethat God mould eltablifh an Occafional Caufe, Intelligent, and Enlightned 
by Eternal Wifdom, to remedy the Defects which mould unavoidably happen in the Works 
that were form'd by General Laws. The Collifion of Bodies, which determines the Efficacy 
of the General Laws of Nature, is. an Occafional Caufe, without Underltanding and Liberty 5 

K and 



^8 .FIMalebranche Concerning 

and therefore 'tis impoffible but] there mull be Imperfeftions in the World, and Monfters pro- 
duc'd, which are not of fuch account as that the Wifdom of God mould defcend to remedy them 
by Particular Wills. But Jefus Cbrift ibeing an Intelligent Occafional Caufe, illuminate with 
the Wifdom of the Word, and fufceptible of Particular Wills, according to the particular Exi- 
gencies of the Work he forms •, 'tis plain that the future World will be infinitely more per- 
fect than the prefent, that the Church will be without Spot or Wrinkle, as we are taught 
by Scripture ; and that it will be a Work moft worthy of the Complacency of God him- 
felf 
To the in- 3 Tis in this manner that Eternal Wifdom renders, as I may fay, to his Father what he had ta- 
S»r t] \mto k en fr° m h™- For not permitting him to aft by Particular Wills, he feem'd to difable his Al- 
TkFrinci- mighty Arm: But becoming incarnate, he fo brings it to pafs, that God afting in a manner wor- 
palities and thy of him, by moft Simple and General Laws, produces a Work, wherein the moft Illuminate 
Powers in Intelligences cannot obferve the leaft Imperfeft ion. 

Heavenly 

Places might be known by the Church, the manifold Wifdom of God, Eph* 3. 10. 



P RO FS founded on REASON. 

XV. Having demonftrated, by the Authority of Scripture, that the diverfe Motions of the 
Soul of Jejm Chnfl are the Occafional Caufes which determine the Efficacy of the General Law 
of Grace, by which God would have all Men fav'd in his Son% 'tis neceiTary to (hew in general, 
by Reajon, that we are not to believe God afts in the Order of Grace by Particular Wills. For 
though by Reajon, feparate from faith, it cannot be demonftrated, that God has conftituted the 
Wilis of Man-God the Occafional Caufes 1 of his Gifts •, yet it may, without Faith, be fhewn, 
that he diftributes them not to Men by Particular Wills ^ and that in two manners, a priori, and 
a pojferiori -, that is, by the Idea we have of God, and by the Effefts of Grace : tor there is 
nothing but ferves to prove this Truth. Firft, then, for the Proof of a priori. 

A wife Being ought to aft wifely. God cannot deny himfelf : His Ways of afting ought to 
bear the Charafter of his Attributes. Now God knows all, and forefees all ; his Underftanding 
has no Bounds : Therefore his manner of afting ought to bear the Character of an Infinite Intelli- 
gence. But to make Choice of Occafional, and to eftablifh General Laws, for the executing any 
work, mahifefts a Knowledge infinitely more comprehenfive, than to change Volitions every mo- 
ment, or to aft by Particular Wills. Therefore God executes his Defigns by General Laws, whofo 
Efficacy is determin'd by Occafional Caufes. Certainly there is a greater Extent of Thought re- 
quir'd to make a Watch, which, according to the Rules of Mechanicks, goes regularly of it felf, 
whether it be carried about with us, or hung up, or fhaken, as we pleaie, than to make one 
which can go well no longer than he that made it is continually changing fomething in it, ac- 
cording to the Situations it is put in: For when there is a greater Number of Relations 10 be 
compared and combined together, there is required a greater Underftanding. An infinite Pieici- 
ence is requifite to forefee all the Effefts which will happen in confequence of a General Law j 
and there is nothing of all this to be forefeen, when the Wills are changed every moment. There- 
fore, to eftablifh General Laws, and to choofe the moft fimple, and at the fame time the moft 
exuberant, is a manner of afting worthy of him whofe Wifdom has no Bounds. And, on the 
contrary, to aft by Particular Wills, fhews aftraitned Underftanding, and which cannot compare 
the Confequences or Effefts of the leaft fruitful Caufes. The fame Truth might iar.her be de- 
monftrated a priori, by fome other Attributes of God, as by his Immutability ; by wh,± M.Des 
Cartes proves, That every Body tends to move in a right Line, that there is always the lame Quan- 
tity of Motion in the World, and other Truths. But thefe Truths a priori, are too abftraft to con- 
vince the Generality of Men of the Truth advane'd. It is more to the Purpofe to prove it by 
the Marks I have given before, to diftinguifh Effefts produced* by Particular Wills from thole 
which are the neceiTary Confequences of fome General Law. 

God, being infinitely Wife, neither wills nor does any thing without Defign or End. But 
Grace falls often on Hearts fo difpos'd, as to fruftrate his Operation -, and therefore falls not 
ou them by a Particular Will, but only by a neceiTary Confequence of General Laws, for the fame 
keafon that Rain falls on the Sands and in the Sea, no lefs than on Seed-Grounds. 

XVI. Though God may punifh Sinners, or make them more miferable than they are, he can 
have no Defign of making them more culpable and criminal •, which yet is an Erieft of Grace, 
and God knows certainly, that, according to their aftual Diipofitions, the Graces he bellows 
will have that calamitous Event. Therefore Graces are not fhed on corrupt Hearts by a Parti- 
cular Will oi God, but by a neceiTary' Confequence of General Laws, eftablifh'd for the Produ- 
ction of the belt Effefts ; by the fame Reafon that on fome Occafions too abundant Rains cor- 
rupt and putrifie the Fruits of the Earthy though God by his General Will caufes it to rain, to 
make them thrive. 

XVII. If God was minded that fome Lands mould continue barren, he need but have ceas'd to 
. will that the Rain fhould water them. So if God purpos'd that the Hearts of fome Sinners 

(hould remain hardncd, as it would be fufficient for the Rain of Grace not to water them, he 

need 



NATURE and GRACE. 

need but leave them to themfdves, and they would corrupt fall enough.- Why mult we attri- 
bute a Particular Will to God, to make 16 cruel and unhappy ufe of the Price of his Son's Blood ? 
But many others -w.il 1 fay, Gcd, in giving Grace to Sinners, has never that Defign ; and this' 
doubtlefs, feemsmore reafonable. But it God gives his Grace by a Particular Will, he has fome 
Particular Defign * and whereas Grace has that fad Effeft, God is fruftrated in his Expectation, 
fince he gave it with a Defign, and that a particular one, of doing good to a Sinner. Fori fpeak 
not hereof the Graces, or rather Gifts, explain'd by St. P««/, in the 12th. Chapter of his Firft 
Epiftle to th&Corinthians : I fpeak of the Grace which God gives for the Converfion of him it is 
given to, and not of t hole Gifts God bellows on fome for the Profit of others 5 fuch as are the 
Gifts of Prophecy, of Difcernment of Spirits, of Speaking diverfe Tongues, of Healing the 
Sick, and the like. 

XVIIi. When the Rain falls in fuch excefs, that the Floods extirpate the Fruits of the Earth, 
we ought to conclude this Rain comes by a neceflary Confequence of the General Laws God has 
eftablilh'd for better Effe&s. Yet it is certain God may have appointed it by a Particular Will. 
For God, for the Punifhment of Men, may will, that the Rains ordain'd to fecundate the Earth, 
may make it barren, on fome Occafions. But it is not fo with the Rain of Grace, fince God 
cannot difipenie it with Defign of punifhing Men, much lefs of making them more culpable and 
criminal. Thus 'tis much more certain that the Rain of Grace falls by General Wills, than that 
the common Rains do fo -, yet molt Men can eafily believe, that Rains are the neceflary Confe- 
quences of the General Laws of the Communication of Motions 5 whilit there are few but find 
fome Relu&ancy in believing God gives us by General Wills all thefe Motions of Graces, whole 
EfTefts we our felves prevent. 

There's great likelihood this Difpofition of Mind naturally grows from our thinking God a£ts 
almoft like our felves, and that he has on all Occafions Particular Wills for all Men, in fomerh'mg 
refembling thofe Defites we have for our Friends. For though we outwardly cpnfefs, that there 
is an infinite Difference between God's way of a£ling, and our own $ yet fince we ordinarily 
judge of others, with relation to our felves, without confidering 5 few Perfons ferioufly confult 
the Idea of an Infinitely Perfect Being, when they would fpeak of God. And becaufe there is 
fome Air of Novelty in what I fay, it creates a fort of Pain in the Mind, which is reafonably 
miltruftful of what is not common and ordinary. 

I have a particular Honour and Eft eem for all thole who, in Matter of Religion, have a fecret 
Averfion for all Novelties : When this is the Motive which induces them to oppofe my Opinions, 
they give me no Offence ; and whilft their Prejudices are legitimate, though they fhould give me 
hainous Provocations, I mould preferve a RefpecF for them. For their Difpofition of Mind is 
infinitely more reafonable than that of others, who fall foul upon all that bears the Chandler of 
Novelty. Neverthelefs, as I believe that we are bound to love and fearch out Truth with all 
our Strength, and communicate it to .others, when we believe We have found it ; I think that, fup- 
pofing the Doclrines of Faith undeniable, we may, and even ought endeavour, to confirm t' en, 
and recommend them to the Reception of all Men. I might vindicate this Opinion, by the Conduft 
of the Fathers, and by the Authority of St. Auftin, who frequently exhorts to the clearDifco- 
very and Underftanding of thofe Truths, which we already believe in the Obfcurity of Faith. 
But I don't fuppofe there are any fo irrational as to find fault with my Conducf, however pre- 
judiced againft my Opinions. Wherefore I intreat thofe, who will be at the 'Pains of reading 
what I have written, not to fuppofe me in an Errour, but to fafpend their Judgment, till they 
have well underftood my Opinion ; and not to condemn me in General Terms, nor draw too 
halfily from my Principles unwarrantable Conclufions. 

In Matters fo obfcure as thofe of Grace, the Advantage is always on the fide of the AggrelTor •, 
and 'tis not juft to make ufe of it to the Defendant's Prejudice : He mould judge equitably, and 
without PrepofTeffion compare all the Confequences deducible from the feveral Opinions, that he 
may embrace that which feems moft agreeable to the Goodnefs and Wifdom of God. For 'tis un- 
reasonable to condemn an Opinion unexamin'd, for fome unhappy Confequences, which Men ne- 
ver fail to infer from it when the Imagination is fcar'd, and the Mind polfefs'd with contrary- 
Notions. 

XIX. I know, for Example, that fome Perfons have laid, I make all Prayers ufelefs, and rob 
Men of the Confidence they ought to have in God-, fince, in their Notions, God afting by Ge- 
neral Wills, we mult not expea particular Supplies from Heaven. I confefs, if this fole Con- 
fequence were included in my Principles, they would be falfe, heretical, and impious : For we 
overturn Religion, if we take from Men their due Hope and Confidence in God -, and 'tis partly 
on that very account I cannot admit of thofe Mens Opinions which are moft oppofite to my man- 
ner of Reconciling Grace with' Liberty. But fo far are my Principles from leading to Defpair, 
that on the contrary, they give the Righteous, and even Sinners, Confolation, in (hewing them 
the Means of obtaining of God the things they ftand imneed of 

For if we are Righteous, our Prayers are meritorious ; and if meritorious, Order requires 
that they mould be heard =, and Order being with God a Law, infinitely more inviolable than any 
other eftablilh'd for the Conftruftion of his Work, he never fails to do what Order prefcribes him. 
Therefore the Prayers of the Righteous are never ineffecf ual 5 which is what I have eftablilh'd in 
the XIX. Section of the Second Difcourie. 

But 



19 



£ F. Malebranche Concerning 

But if we are Sinners, 'tis certain our Prayers are of themfelves in vain •, for God hears not 
i J0L2. i. Sinners, Order will have it fo: NeVerthelefs we mull not defpair : We have an Advocate with 
Mat. 9. 15. the Father, JefusChrift the Right eoMi He came into the World tofave Sinners : Bis Prayers are 
Joh.n.42. con ft ant iy an i mo ji readily heard. Let us pray in his Name, or addrefs our feives to him. Our 
Prayers will follicite him to form fome Deiires relating to us ^ and his Defires are the Occafional 
Caufes which infallibly determine the General Law of Grace, by which God wills the Salvation 
of all Men in his Son. This is what I have maintain'd at large in the Second Difcourfe. Thus 
I am fo far from depriving Men of the Confidence they ought to have in God, that, on the con- 
trary, I precifely,fhew, by the Authority of Scripture, the way we ought to take for the obtain- 
ing of God the Graces that we want. Therefore I pray -my Readers to do me the Juitice of Exa- 
mining my Opinions, without Prevention ; and I am willing they fhould afterward judge of them 
according to their Light and Knowledge. For I fubmit all my Thoughts, not only to the Cen- 
fure of the Church, which has Right to make me quit them by an Authority, which I lhall be 
ever ready to defer to -, but alfo to the Judgments of all Particular Perfons, by whole Admoni- 
tions I ftiall endavour to profit. 



the END. 



# 



f 






r 





^>:J 







